1967112
John_Hay_Whitney
John Hay Whitney (27 August 1904 &ndash; 8 February 1982), colloquially known as Jock Whitney, was Ambassador to the United Kingdom, publisher of the York Herald Tribune, and a member of the family.FamilyBorn on August 27, 1904, in Ellsworth, Maine, Whitney was a descendant of John Whitney, a Puritan who settled in Massachusetts in 1635, as well as of William Bradford, who came over on the Mayflower. His father was Whitney, and his grandfathers were C. Whitney and Hay, both cabinet members. His mother was Hay Whitney.The Payne Whitneys lived around the corner from B. Duke, and his wife and daughter Doris. Whitneys uncle, Hazard Payne, a business partner of D. Rockefeller, arranged the buyout of Dukes competitors to create the Tobacco Co.Jock Whitney attended College. He joined Kappa Epsilon fraternity (Phi chapter), as his father had.  Whitney, his father, grandfather, and great-uncle were oarsmen at Yale, and his father was captain of the crew in 1898. He was a member of and Key. While at Yale, he allegedly coined the term cut for the haircut that now bears the name.After graduating in 1926, Whitney went to University, but the death of his father necessitated his returning home. He inherited a trust fund of $20 million  (approximately $210 million in 2005 dollars), and later inherited four times that amount from his mother.Thoroughbred horse racingWhitney inherited his familys love of horses, a predilection he shared with his sister, Whitney Payson. Jock and his sister ran Stables in the U.S., owned by their mother. In 1928, he became the youngest member ever elected to Jockey Club.Whitney and his first wife Liz raced horses both in the United States and in Europe. He owned Easter Hero who won the 1929 and 1930 editions of the Gold Cup. In the 1929 National, his horse twisted a plate and was beaten by a nose at the finish. Although Whitney entered the Grand National annually, he never again came close to winning.The Whitneys entered four horses in the Derby in the 1930s, Stepenfetchit, which finished 3rd in 1932, Overtime, which finished 5th in 1933, Singing Wood, which finished 8th in 1934, and Heather Broom, which finished 3rd in 1939. Jock Whitney was also an outstanding polo player, with a four-goal handicap, and it was as a sportsman that he made the cover of the March 27, 1933 issue of TIME magazine.Business venturesFreeport Texas Co.In 1929, Whitney was hired as a clerk at the firm of Lee, Higginson, where he met Meade Williams, Jr., the son of the founder of Freeport Texas Co., a sulfur mining company. Williams enlisted his aid in ousting the chairman of his familys company by buying shares of the company. Whitney soon was Freeports biggest shareholder, enabling Williams to sack the chairman and his management team. Williams became Freeports president in 1933 and Whitney was appointed Chairman of the Board.TechnicolorWhitney invested in several Broadway shows, including Arnos 1931 revue Here Goes the Bride, a failure that cost him $100,000, but was more successful as one of the backers  of with Father.An October 1934 Fortune article on the Corporation noted Whitneys interest in pictures. He had met Technicolor head Kalmus at the Race Course. In 1932, Technicolor achieved a breakthrough with its three-strip process. C. Cooper of Radio Pictures approached Whitney with the idea of investing in Technicolor. They joined forces and founded Pictures in 1933, with a distribution deal with RKO to distribute Pioneers films. Whitney and his cousin Vanderbilt Whitney bought a 15% stake in Technicolor.Whitney was also the major investor in O. Selznicks production company, putting up $870,000 and serving as Chairman of the Board. He put up half the money to option Mitchells with the Wind for the Selznick film version, in which he then invested, and later in Rebecca (1940).J.H. Whitney & Co.Whitney & Company is the oldest venture capital firm in the U.S. (Whitneys business partner, C. Schmidt, Sr., in fact, coined the term venture capital.) In 1958, while he was still ambassador to the United Kingdom, his company Whitney Communications Corp. bought the York Herald Tribune, and was its publisher from 1961 to its closure in 1966. Whitney Communications also owned and operated other newspapers, plus magazines and broadcasting stations.Personal lifeJock Whitney purchased the estate in 1930 as a bridal gift for his fiance, the Pennsylvania socialite Mary Elizabeth Liz Altemus. It was a  historic equestrian farm just outside Virginia. The couple divorced in 1940, but Liz Whitney remained there for the rest of her life, becoming an internationally renowned horse breeder and a member of the Thoroughbred Association Hall of Fame.Although married to Altemus, Jock Whitney was romantically linked to Bankhead, Bennett, Goddard and Crawford.  Gable and Lombard met at one of Whitneys parties. In the early 1930s Jock Whitney began an affair with Nina Gore Vidal; at the same time Mary Altemus Whitney had an affair with Nina Vidals husband Eugene Vidal.()  Whitney and Liz divorced in 1940 and in 1942 he married Cushing Roosevelt Whitney, ex-wife of Roosevelt, son of D. Roosevelt, and adopted her two daughters, Kate and Sara Whitney.Whitney met Astaire in York while the former was a student at University and they became lifelong friends, sharing a passion for horse racing. Whitney became a major investor in two of Astaires Broadway stage vehicles, The Band Wagon (1930) and Divorce (1932), and played a crucial role in securing for Astaire a contract with Pictures in 1933, using his contacts with C. Cooper - both men were board members of American Airways whose planes were prominently featured in Astaires breakthrough film with Rogers: Down to Rio (1933).()During the 1970s, Jock Whitney was listed as one of the ten wealthiest men in the world. The residences at his disposal over the years included an estate on Island; a plantation in Georgia; a townhouse and an elegant apartment in Manhattan; a large summer house on Island, near London, Connecticut; a 12-room house in Springs, which the Whitneys used when they attended horse races; a golfing cottage in Georgia, where he was a member of the National Golf Club; and a spacious house in England, near the Racecourse. Mr. Whitney also owned an estate in South Carolina, which he considered his retirement home and where he hoped to spend his final days.Art collectionAmong the paintings in his collection, Jock Whitneys prized possession was the Bal au moulin de la Galette painted in 1876 by the French artist Renoir. In 1990, his widow put the painting up for auction with Sothebys, York and it sold for US$78 million to Japanese businessman, Saito.Military careerWhitney served in the States Army Air Forces as an intelligence officer during War II, assigned to the of Strategic Services. He was taken prisoner by the Germans in southern France, but escaped when the train transporting him to a camp came under Allied fire.Political lifeWhitney was the major backer of D. Eisenhower.  President Eisenhower appointed him States Ambassador to the United Kingdom, a post held sixty years earlier by Whitneys grandfather Hay.  Whitney played a major role in improving Anglo-American relations, which had been severely strained during the 1956 Crisis, when Eisenhower demanded that the British, French and Israelis terminate their invasion of Egypt.PhilanthropyPayne Whitney made substantial gifts to Yale, to the York Presbyterian Hospital, and the York Public Library. After his fathers death, the family built the Whitney Gymnasium at Yale in his honor. The family also financed Whitney Psychiatric Clinic at York Presbyterian Hospital in 1932.Whitney created the John Hay Whitney Foundation for educational projects in 1946. The Foundation provided fellowships to the racially and culturally deprived. He became a major contributor to Yale University, where he served as a Fellow of the Corporation.In 1951, he and his wife Betsey Cushing Whitney donated land from their Greentree estate in New York toward the building of North Shore Hospital. Currently called Shore University Hospital, it is the flagship hospital of the 3rd largest not-for-profit secular healthcare system in the United States, the North Shore-Long Island Jewish Health System.In 1953, Whitney received Hundred Year Association of New Yorks Gold Medal Award in recognition of outstanding contributions to the City of New York.ReferencesExternal links* * Philadelphia Inquirer Obituary 9 Feb 1982*  ja:
1971692
Confederation_of_German_Trade_Unions
The Confederation of German Trade Unions (, DGB) is an organisation (sometimes known as a trade union center) for eight German unions, in total representing more than 7 million people (31 December 2004). It was founded in Munich, 12 October 1949.The DGB coordinates joint demands and activities within the German trade union movement. It represents the member unions in contact with the government authorities, the political parties and the employers organisations. However, the umbrella organisation is not directly involved in bargaining and does not conclude collective labour agreements.Union delegates elect committees for 9 districts, 94 regions and the federal centre. The organisation holds a federal congress every four years. This assembly sets the framework for trade union policies and elects five Federal Executives. Together with the presidents of the member unions they constitute the DGBs executive committee. The members of the executive committee, together with the DGB regional presidents and 70 delegates from the unions, form a Federal Council which meets once a year to make decisions on national issues. The DGB also has a youth organisation, DGB-Jugend.The DGB has its headquarters in Berlin. It is a member of the Trade Union Confederation (ETUC) and the Trade Union Confederation (ITUC). History  Until 1933 As first German confederation of unions at 14 March 1892 the Generalkommission der Gewerkschaften Deutschlands was founded in Halberstadt. It represented 57 national and some local unions with approximate 300,000 people in total. After World War I unions had to reorganise. During a congress in Nuremberg from 30 June until 5 July 1919 the Deutscher Gewerkschaftsbund (ADGB) was founded as an umbrella organisation of 52 unions with more than 3 million members. The ADGB may be seen as predecessor of todays DGB. Like today, there also existed a conservative counterpart of lesser importance.Curiously, this conservative organisation was named Deutscher Gewerkschaftsbund, DGB. On 2 May 1933 all trade unions were dissolved by the Nazis. 19461949 After World War II German unions had to reorganise once again.On 911 February 1946 the Freier Deutscher Gewerkschaftsbund, FDGB was founded in Berlinas a confederation of 15 unions in the occupation zone.On 2325 April 1947 the Deutscher Gewerkschaftsbund, DGB was founded in Bielefeldas a confederation of 12 unions in the Germany.Foundations in the American occupation zone:24/25 August 1946: Freier Gewerkschaftsbund Hessen30 August  1 September 1946: Gewerkschaftsbund Wrttemberg-Baden2729 March 1947: Bayerischer GewerkschaftsbundFoundations in the French occupation zone:15/16 February 1947: Gewerkschaftsbund Sd-Wrttemberg und Hohenzollern1/2 March 1947: Badischer Gewerkschaftsbund2 May 1947: Allgemeiner Gewerkschaftsbund Rheinland-PfalzOn 1214 October, the 7 umbrella organisation in Germanymerged into the West German DGB as a confederation of 16 single trade unions.Number of members, 30 June 1949::DGB of the British zone ................................................. 2,885,036:Freier Gewerkschaftsbund Hessen .................................... 397,008:Gewerkschaftsbund Wrttemberg-Baden .......................... 464,905:Bayerischer Gewerkschaftsbund ....................................... 815,161:Gewerkschaftsbund Sd-Wrttemberg und Hohenzollern ... 75,502:Badischer Gewerkschaftsbund ............................................ 92,257:Allgemeiner Gewerkschaftsbund Rheinland-Pfalz ............. 232,117:Total...............................................................................4,961,986 Until today In 1990 the members of the FDGB of the Democratic Republic joined the members of the DGB.Until today many single member unions of the DGB have merged, so recently the DGB only has 8 members.Affiliates Today * IG BAU  Bauen-Agrar-Umwelt (Construction, Agriculture, Environment) 314,568 members  5.08%* IG BCE  Bergbau, Chemie, Energie (Mining, Chemicals, Energy) 675,606 members  10.91%* GEW  Erziehung und Wissenschaft (Education and Science) 260,297 members  4.20%* IGM  Metall (Metalworkers) 2,239,588 members  36.16%* NGG  Nahrung-Genuss-Gaststtten (Food, Beverages and Catering) 205,646 members  3.32%* GdP  der Polizei (Police) 170,607 members  2.75%* EVG - und Verkehrsgewerkschaft (Railway Workers) 232,485 members  3.75%* ver.di  Vereinte Dienstleistungsgewerkschaft (United Services Union) 2,094,455 members  33.82%( DGB in total: 6,193,252 members  100% // all values: 2010-12-31 ) 1949 * GEW // still existing, see above* NGG // still existing, see above* GdED  Gewerkschaft der Eisenbahner Deutschlands // 2000 renamed to TRANSNET, 2010 unified to EVG, see above* IGM // still existing, see above* Gewerkschaft Textil und Bekleidung .................. since 1998 part of IGM* Gewerkschaft Holz und Kunststoff .................... since 2000 part of IGM* IG BSE  IG Bau-Steine-Erden ........................ since 1996 IG BAU, see above* Gewerkschaft Gartenbau, Land- und Forstwirtschaft ... since 1996 IG BAU* IG BE  IG Bergbau und Energie ...................... since 1997 IG BCE, see above* IG Chemie, Papier, Keramik .......................... since 1997 IG BCE* Gewerkschaft Leder .................................. since 1997 IG BCE* DPG  Deutsche Postgewerkschaft ................................. since 2001 ver.di, see above* HBV  Gewerkschaft Handel, Banken und Versicherungen ............ since 2001 ver.di* TV  Gewerkschaft ffentliche Dienste, Transport und Verkehr ... since 2001 ver.di* IG Druck und Papier, DruPa .......... 1989 IG Medien .......... since 2001 ver.di* IG Kunst, Kultur und Medien ........... 1989 IG Medien .......... since 2001 ver.di Other unions In 1978 the Gewerkschaft der Polizei (GdP, see above) joined the DGB as 17th union.The Deutsche Angestellten Gewerkschaft  DAG  was a large white collar trade union.Although the DAG in the British zone 1946 was a member of the DGB in the British zone,the West German DAG never joined the West German DGB as a single member union.But in 2001 the DAG merged with four existing DGB unions to become the new DGB union ver.di. See also *of labor unionsReferences** F.Deppe/G.Flberth/H.J.Harrer: Geschichte der deutschen Gewerkschaftsbewegung ISBN 3-7609-0290-1External links* Official site in German* http://www.dgb.de/sprachen/englisch/GewerkschaftsbundAlemana de SindicatosSindikato Federaciaallemande des syndicatsGewerkschaftsbundGewerkschaftsbundGewerkschaftsbundzh:
1977594
Serov_(town)
dateApril 2010Serov () is a mining and commercial town in Oblast, Russia and the administrative center of District.It is located on the eastern foothills of the Mountains, on the left bank of the River, a tributary of the Sosva River. Population: 99,804 (2002 Census); 104,158 (1989 Census).  Serov is located approximately 350 km  north of Yekaterinburg. It can be reached most conveniently by train from Moscow or Yekaterinburg. The climate is continental, with temperate summers and cold snowy winters.Serov is a major center of ferrous metallurgy, which constitutes 80% of its economy. Two largest companies are A.K. Serov Metallurgical Plant and Serov Ferro-Alloys Plant. The latter produces approximately 5% of the worlds ferrochromium. Other industries are machine-building, timber, food. Serov Power Plant (GRES) provides electricity to the area. The town is the center of a mining area, with lignite, iron, bauxite, and gold mines.HistoryArcheological evidence suggests that the Serov area was populated as early as 1000 BCE by the Mansi or their ancestors. In the early days of colonization of Siberia there were only a few minor villages in the area. The situation changed in 1893, when the chief manager of Bogoslovsk Mining District, Alexander Andreyevich Auerbach, proposed a construction of a cast iron and rail plant on Kakva River near the end of an existing railroad. This year the construction of a workers town began. The town was named Nadezhdinsk after Nadezhda Mikhaylovna Polovtsova, the owner of Bogoslovsk Mining District. The first steel and rails in Nadezhdinsk were produced in 1896. The town was an important supplier of rails for Railway. Mendeleev, who visited Nadezhdinsk, was pleasantly surprised by the progressive technology used at the plant. The first school in Nadezhdinsk opened in December 1895, the first power plant (415 kW)&mdash;in 1907.Nadezhdinsk was touched by the Revolution of 1905, with the turmoil continuing through 1908. At the beginning of the War I Nadezhdinsk industry was reshaped to meet the demands of the military. Klein Brothers machine-building factory was relocated to Nadezhdinsk from Riga in 1917. The growing demand for workforce was met by hiring workers from China and Korea, as well as prisoners of war (POWs). There were 1,266 Chinese and Koreans, and 3,329 POWs in Nadezhdinsk in 1917.On October 27, 1917, two days after the Revolution in Petrograd, the power in the town was bloodlessly transferred to the Workers Soviet. On December 18, 1917, Bogoslovsk Mining District, including the Nadezhdinsk plants, was nationalized. In October 1918, the army of the Provisional Government of Siberia, which opposed the Soviets in the Civil War, occupied  Nadezhdinsk. On November 20, 1918, two days after admiral Kolchak become the head of the White government of Siberia, the whites in Nadezhdinsk executed 23 of their red opponents. On July 19, 1919, Red partisans, supporting the Soviets, took the town back. The town was devastated after the Civil War. None of the factories were working and many engineers left the area.The Soviet government put a lot of efforts to restore the town life and economy. By the end of 1925, Nadezhdinsk plant was running at its full capacity. The town changed too. Streets and house numbers were changed. A hospital, a circus, and a cabaret were opened.In 1926, Nadezhdinsk was granted town status. In the 1930s, the ferrous metal production in Nadezhdinsk was expanded and diversified. In 1934, the town was renamed Kabakovsk, after I. D. Kabakov, the leader of the Bolshevik Party in Oblast. In 1937 Kabakov was dismissed as a result of Stalins purges, and the town was renamed back to Nadezhdinsk. In 1939, the town was renamed Serov, after the airpilot Serov, a former Nadezhdinsk Plant worker, and a Civil War hero, who died earlier in the same year.Serov was an important center of steel production during War II. Due to the shortage of males, who were conscribed into the active service, most steel jobs were taken by women. Numerous organization were evacuated to Serov from the Soviet territories occupied by Germans: hospitals from Polotsk and Smolensk, Komsomol Theatre from Petersburg.After the war the demand for steel increased even more due to the reconstruction. Serov became a major electrified railroad center,and a new power plant was built. In 1958 Serov produced first ferrosilicon. In 1970s a timber factory and a gas pipeline were built.In early 1990s, the failed reforms of Gorbachev brought the town economy to a record low level. The town saw a significant growth of unemployment and poverty as most other small cities in Russia. At the same time many businesses were privitized or became municipal property. On July 14, 1993 a dam at Kiselevskoe water reservoir was broken and 1,373 families lost their houses.Since the 2000s, the town economy is on the rise, the standards of living went up, and the town appearance continues to improve. In November 2004 Serov hosted Russian Bodybuilding and Fitness Championship. The current town mayor, V.F. Anisimov, was elected on March 14, 2004.Famous people*Tszyu: Russian/Australian boxer.*Seleznyov: Former speaker of Russian Duma (January 17, 1996 - December 29, 2003)*Bakov: Member of the Duma of the Russian Federation (20032007) from single-mandate Serovskiy electoral district  167. In 1997-2000 A. Bakov was the General Director of the city-forming enterprise - Serovskiy Metallurgical PlantReferencesExternal links*Town government http://serovgov.unets.ru/*Business website http://www.serov1.ru/*Personal website http://www.serov.agava.ru/*Map http://maps.yandex.ru/map_search.xml?map5&lay28&layercity_a&id951&text%D1%E5%F0%EE%E2/*A.K. Serov Metallurgical Plant http://www.serovmet.ru*Serov Ferro-alloys Plant http://www.sfap.ru/ar:az:Serovbg:(msto)cy:Serovda:Serovde:Serowet:Serovel:(Rusia)eo:Serov()(ville)gl:Serovis:Serov(citt)la:Serovlv:Serovalt:Serovasnl:Serovnew:Serovja:no:Serovnn:Serovpap:Serovpl:Sierowpt:Serovro:Serov()fi:Serovsv:Serovtl:Serovtr:Serov()(bungto)zh:
1979577
Hughes_Mining_Barge
thumb|HMB-1 in San Diego, June 2005.The Hughes Mining Barge, or HMB-1, is a submersible barge about 99 m (324 ft) long, 32 m (106 ft) wide, and more than 27 m (90 ft) tall. The HMB-1 was originally developed as part of Azorian (more widely, but erroneously, known as Project Jennifer), the top-secret effort mounted by the Intelligence Agency to salvage the remains of the Soviet submarine K-129 from the ocean floor. The HMB-1 was designed to be submerged under the Explorer to conceal any salvaged remains from Soviet observers.(After the conclusion of Project Azorian, the HMB-1 was mothballed at the Shipyard in Francisco, California until November, 1982. At that time, the States Navy towed the huge barge to a Martin facility in City, California, where it became a floating drydock for the construction and trials of the Shadow, an experimental ship being tested by the Navy. Sea trials of the Sea Shadow continued until 1986.()()FateThe HMB-1 currently sits along with the Sea Shadow - which is still docked inside the vessel - in the Defense Reserve Fleet at Bay, California.References( * Roy Varner and Wayne Collier A Matter of Risk: The Incredible Inside Story of the CIAs Hughes Glomar Explorer Mission to Raise a Russian Submarine, 1978External links*AZORIAN The Raising of the K-129 / 2009 - 2 Part TV Documentary / Michael White Films Vienna*Photos and details of HMB-1*Overview of Project Jennifer*The Navy Has a Top-Secret Vessel It Wants to Put on Display by Barry Newman - Street Journal - February 24, 2009*Virtual tour inside HMB-1 and Sea Shadow, 2011, includes HMB-1 operating manual.*Google Maps view of The Hughes Mining BargeMining Barge
1986949
EMD_SW1000
  localeStates Jamaica Mexico KoreaAn EMD SW1000 is a diesel switcher locomotive built by General Motors Electro-Motive Division between June 1966 and October 1972.  Power was provided by an 645E 8-cylinder engine which generated . This locomotive was built on the same common frame as the SW1500, giving it an overall length of .114 examples of this locomotive model were built for States railroads and industrial operations. One unit was exported to Jamaica for a mining operation and 4 units were exported to Mexican Industrial concerns. See alsoof GM-EMD locomotives References * *  2100  
1991624
Information_access
Information access is a term used to describe an area of research at the intersection of  informatics, Science, Security, Technology, Science, and science.The objective of the various research efforts in information access is to simplify and effectivise for human users to access and further process large and unwieldy amounts of data and information.Technologies applicable to the general area are e.g.  Retrieval, Mining, Translation, and categorisation.In discussions on free access to information and on information policy, information access is understood as  concerning ensuring free and closed access to information. Information access covers many issues such as copyright, source, privacy, and security.Provision was made in copyright and law for information in the domain.  However the extent of the public domain has been under attack in recent years, as database vendors expand the copyright and contract laws to eliminate concepts such as use.  UCITA, the Computer Information Transactions Act has been defeated in most jurisdictions, but restrictions on the public domain still exist in more recent laws such as the Millennium Copyright Act (DMCA).Librarians have always advocated for free and open access to government information.  Groups such as the Library Association, the American Association of Law Libraries, Naders Taxpayers Assets Project have advocated for free access to legal information. The vendor neutral citation movement in the legal field is working to ensure that courts will accept citations from cases on the web which do not have the traditional (copyrighted) page numbers from the Publishing company.  There is a worldwide Access to Law Movement which advocates free access to legal information. The Wired Magazine Article Who Owns The Law is a good introduction to the access to legal information issue.Post 9-11 acts such as the Act, in the interest of security has led to restrictions on access to certain types of information as well as an increased government attempts at surveillance of individuals private information, such as their library records.Links to free softwareFree software takes the approaches of openly accessible information and applies them to software code. Based on the tenets of open information practices, and open source software takes a freedom based approach to software development and maintenance. The free software movement has impacted areas such as software and free access to scholarly journals. Lessig, himself a board member of Software Foundation advocates free software and argues that computer code can regulate conduct in much the same way that codes do.See also*of information legislation*For Economic Reforms (On access to information in the Philippines)External links*CRS Report - Access to Government Information in the United States*Access to Information in the Philippines*Information Access Alliance*ALA- Access to Electronic Information, Services, and Networks*Issues in Access to Information: A Bibliography*The Information Society - The way to equitable globalisation and development? News reports and features by IPS Inter Press Service*  Information and Communication Technologies for Development and Poverty Reduction: The Potential of Telecommunications Edited by Maximo Torero and Joachim von Braun (2006), Johns Hopkins University Press* Access to Information - The World Bank page Accessa la informacinsv:Informationstkomst
1996430
Computer_fraud
Computer fraud is the use of technology to commit fraud.  In the United States, computer fraud is specifically proscribed by the Fraud and Abuse Act, which provides for jail time and fines.Notable incidents;Unauthorized access at North BayQuitugua Sabatia, a former accounts payable clerk for North Bay Health Care Group, admitted to using her computer to access North Bays accounting software without authorization, and in turn issued various checks payable to herself and others.  Several of the checks were cashed by Sabatia or deposited into her personal bank account, and some were deposited into the bank accounts of others.  She attempted to conceal the fraud by altering the electronic check registers of North Bay to make it appear as if the checks had been payable to the companys vendors.   The fraudulent scheme resulted in losses to North Bay of at least $875,035.  On May 27, 2004, Sabatia, plead guilty to two counts of computer fraud, and faces a maximum sentence of five years in prison and a $250,000 fine;Denial of Service AttackOn January 19, 2001, Dennis was sentenced to six months incarceration; three months in jail and three months of home confinement, followed by one year of supervised release.  Additionally, he must allow authorities to monitor his computer activity, and perform 240 hours of community service.;Malicious Systems Admin at UBSA disgruntled computer systems administrator for UBS PaineWebber was charged with using a logic bomb to cause more than $3 million in damage to the companys computer network, and with securities fraud for his failed plan to drive down the companys stock with activation of the logic bomb.  Roger Duronio is charged in one count of securities fraud which carries a maximum penalty of 10 years in federal prison and a $1 million fine and one charge of computer fraud which carries a maximum prison sentence of 10 years and a fine of $250,000 or, alternatively, two times the gain made by the defendant or the loss suffered by the victim.Duronio, who worked at PaineWebbers offices in Weehawken, N.J., planted the logic bomb in some 1,000 of PaineWebbers approximately 1,500 networked computers in branch offices around the country. The logic bomb, which was activated after Durino resigned, deleted files on over 1,000 of UBS PaineWebbers computers. It cost PaineWebber more than $3 million to assess and repair the damage.  Duronio also purchased more than $21,000 of put option contracts for UBS PaineWebbers parent company, UBS, A.G.s stock, hoping that the stock would decline in response to the damage caused by the logic bomb.  The bomb attack did not have any impact on the price of the stock. The investigation of Duronio was conducted by the U.S. Secret Services Electronic Crimes Task Force with help from UBS PaineWebber.Robert Duronio;Illegal Data MiningThe owner of Snipermail, a business that distributes advertisements via the Internet to e-mail addresses on behalf of advertisers or their brokers was indicted for conspiracy, unauthorized access of a protected computer, access device fraud, money laundering and obstruction of justice.It was alleged that Scott Levine and other Snipermail employees illegally accessed a computer database owned and operated by Acxiom Corporation, a company that stores, processes, and manages personal, financial, and corporate data on behalf of its clients.  On numerous occasions, Levine and others illegally entered into an Acxiom file transfer protocol (ftp) server and downloaded significant amounts of data.  The intrusions were traced back to an internet protocol address that belonged to one of Snipermails computers.  The downloading of the databases lasted for period of a year and a half and represented 8.2 gigabytes of data.  While the stolen data contained personal information about a great number of individuals and could have resulted in tremendous loss if the information were used in a fraudulent way, there was no evidence to date that any of the data was misused in this way. Acxiom, immediately notified law enforcement upon discovery of intrusions into its system and assisted with the investigation which was conducted by a task force formed the Bureau of Investigation (FBI) and the States Secret Service (USSS). Scott Levine;The WormDavid L. Smith, a 31-year old Jersey programmer was accused of unleashing the Melissa computer virus, a Basic for Applications based worm.(Johanna Granville Dot.Con: The Dangers of Cyber Crime and a Call for Proactive Solutions, Australian Journal of Politics and History, vol. 49, no. 1. (Winter 2003), pp. 102-109.) This virus was propagated by deliberately posting an infected document to an alt.sex usenet newsgroup from a stolen AOL account.  It is believed that Smith named the virus after a stripper he had known in Florida.  He constructed the virus to evade anti-virus software and to infect computers using Windows and Word programs.  The Melissa virus appeared on thousands of email systems on March 26, 1999, disguised as an important message from a colleague or friend.  The virus was designed to send an infected email to the first 50 email addresses on the users Outlook address book.  Each infected computer would infect 50 additional computers, which in turn would infect another 50 computers.  The virus proliferated rapidly and exponentially, resulting in substantial interruption and impairment of public communications and services.  Many administrators had to disconnect their computer system from the internet.  Companies such as Microsoft, Intel, Martin and Technologies were forced to shut down their e-mail gateways due to the vast amount of email the virus was generating.  To date, the Melissa virus is the most costly outbreak, causing more than $400 million in damages to American businesses.  Smith was one of the first persons ever to be prosecuted for writing a virus.   He was sentenced to 20 months in federal prison and a fine of $5,000.  He was also ordered to serve three years of supervised release after completion of his prison sentence. The investigation was conducted by members of the Jersey State Police High Technology Crime Unit, the Bureau of Investigation (FBI), the Justice Departments Computer Crime and Intellectual Property Section, and the Defense Criminal Investigative service.Once the fraud was discovered, an audit was performed and the report is available at Summerford audit report.See also*security*technology audit*audit resources*Woman Hacks North Bay Health Care Group*Former System Admin. Sentenced For Hacking NY Court Web Site*Cyber Crime - More case studies plus source for the studies described above.*The Computer Fraud and Abuse Act - Text of the most recent revisions to the Act.* Computer Security Statistics: Crimes and PenaltiesExternal links*Information Security & Computer Fraud Cases & Investigations*Union Bank of SwitzerlandReferences
2002560
Clingan_Jackson
Clingan Jackson (March 28, 1907  May 26, 1997) was a Democratic politician and newspaperman from Ohio.Jackson was born in Ohio in 1907, and was raised on the east side of the city and in towns on either side of the Ohio border with Pennsylvania.  He graduated in 1929 from University of Colorado, where he majored in history and English.  He returned to Ohio where he began work in September of that year as a reporter for the Youngstown Vindicator daily newspaper.  He continued work as a reporter and editor for the newspaper until his retirement in 1983.Jackson was a Democratic candidate for Ohio governor in the 1958 primary.  He also served as a Democratic member of the  House of Representatives (1934 - 1936) and the State Senate (1944 - 1950).  During his time in the Senate, he authored bills creating the Ohio Department of Natural Resources and requiring the reclamation of land used for strip mining.  He also served as the chair of the Senate Finance Committee in the 98th General Assembly.Upon leaving the legislature, he was appointed to the Ohio Program Commission by Governor J. Lausche, beginning over 30 years of service on various state commissions and boards.Jackson died in Youngstown on May 26, 1997.See also* Results, Ohio Governor (Democratic Primaries)
2009236
Joseph_Kinsey_Howard
Joseph Kinsey Howard (February 28, 1906  August 25, 1951) was an American journalist, historian, and author, who wrote extensively about the history, culture, and economic circumstances of Montana.()   One of the states most noted authors of nonfiction, Howards landmark 1943 book, Montana:  High, Wide, and Handsome is a respected account of Montana history that has influenced later generations of historians.  Howard also authored numerous other historic and literary works, and was a vocal, articulate and persuasive advocate for a variety of social, economic and environmental reforms.  These endeavors earned Howard the posthumous sobriquet, Montanas Conscience.  Howard believed Montana and the rural West provided the last stand against urban technological tedium for the individual. He fervently believed that small towns of the sort that predominated in Montana provided a democratic bulwark for society. Howards writings demonstrate his strong belief in the necessity to identify and preserve a regions cultural heritage. Howard worked first as an newspaper editor on the Great Falls Leader, later for the Montana Study (a statewide community development project), and as a freelance writer. His books, speeches and magazine articles, expressed his ideals of community awareness and identity, encouraging readers to retain an idealistic vision contesting the deadening demands of the modern world.(Richard B. Roeder, Joseph Kinsey Howard and his Vision of the West, Montana: The Magazine of Western History, March 1980, Vol. 30 Issue 1, pp 2-11 )BiographyHoward was born in Iowa, and spent his early childhood years in Lethbridge, Alberta, with his family.  In 1919 he moved with his mother to Falls, Montana, where he graduated from school in 1923.  Immediately after graduating, Howard landed a job as a reporter for the Falls Leader, one of the citys two daily newspapers at the time.  He was promoted to news editor at the Leader in 1926, at age 20, a position he held until 1944.At the Leader, Howard developed a characteristic writing style that was simultaneously straightforward, evocative, and compelling, and within a few years his talent began to receive broader attention.  Beginning in the mid-1930s Howard authored numerous nonfiction articles for national publications, including Nation, Magazine and others.  He was also a stringer covering Montana issues for Time and Life magazines.  Many of the essays Howard produced for these periodicals explored the difficulties faced by Montanas native Americans and other disenfranchised groups; others were exposs of what Howard saw as undue corporate influence in Montana economics and life, particularly by the Anaconda Copper Mining Company.Though primarily an author of nonfiction, Howard also wrote book reviews for New York Times and short stories that were published in Saturday Evening Post, Esquire, and elsewhere.Howards first book-length effort was Montana: High, Wide, and Handsome, which was published in 1943.  The volume was both a thoughtful history of the state, and an impassioned indictment of the corporate and  bureaucratic forces that had heavily influenced much of that history.  Among the books primary targets were Anaconda Copper, which controlled much of the states economic and political activity at the time, and the Great Northern Railway, which had lured thousands of homesteaders onto Montana land that proved wholly unsuitable for farming.  The book also paid particular attention to the inappropriate and inequitable usage of the states scarce water resources, making an open plea for reform of the system.Montana:  High, Wide, and Handsome proved to be an unquestioned landmark in the states literary history, drawing significant attention both to Howard and the causes he espoused.  The themes of corporate exploitation that Howard so convincingly and eloquently outlined became the primary focus of Montana historians for a generation to come, and became a primary theme in the works of Ross Toole, the states most noted academic historian.  Howards book remains perhaps the most influential and evocative work ever published about Montanas past.The recognition afforded Howard by the response to Montana:  High, Wide, and Handsome helped open the doors to additional writing, research, and advocacy projects.  In 1944 Howard resigned his position at the Leader to become a staff member of the Montana Study, a research project largely funded by the Foundation.  The Study was an examination of life in small-town Montana, with the goal of identifying ways to improve the quality of life in such places and thus helping ensure their preservation.  Howard remained with the Study for two years, before resigning in order to return to writing full time.Howards second published volume was Montana Margins:  A State Anthology, completed in 1946.  The book is a thick collection of short fiction, poetry, and historic narratives, covering the full spectrum of Montanas geography and history.  The depth and scope of the book made it a model for later regional anthologies, such as the voluminous 1988 imitation, The Last Best Place:  A Montana Anthology.The remainder of Howards life was devoted to writing, promoting the arts in Montana, and teaching writers workshops.  Aided by the support of Fellowships in 1947 and 1948, he devoted considerable effort to the writing of a history of Mtis leader Riel and his movements against the Canadian government.  The result of this project was the book Strange Empire:  A Narrative of the Northwest, published posthumously in 1952.Howard died on August 25, 1951 after suffering a heart attack at age 45.  He is still recognized, however, as one of Montanas most talented, influential, and significant authors.  His legacy was summed up by DeVoto in 1952, who wrote, By the time Howard died, he came closer to being the spokesman of the West than any other writer has ever been.Principal Works*Montana:  High, Wide and Handsome.  New Haven:  Yale University Press, 1943.*Montana Margins: A State Anthology.  New Haven:  Yale University Press, 1946.*Strange Empire: A Narrative of the Northwest.  New York:  William Morrow & Co., 1952.External links*School of Journalism biography of Howard*Short biography and picture of Howard*Guide to the Joseph Kinsey Howard Papers at the University of Montana The collection consists primarily of galley proofs and other materials relating to Howards books.Notes(
2013376
Bahariya_Oasis
footnotes              El-Wahat el-Bahariya or el-Bahariya (Arabic:  , al-Wt al-Barya, meaning the northern oases) is a depression in Egypt. It is approximately 360 km away from Cairo. Located in Governorate, the main sectors are agriculture, iron ore mining, and tourism. The main agricultural products are guavas, mangos, dates, and olives.SettlementBahariya consists of many villages of which el-Bawiti is the largest and the administrative center. Qasr is el-Bawitis neighboring/twin village. To the east, about ten kilometers away are the villages of Mandishah and el-Zabu. A smaller village called el-Aguz lies between el-Bawiti and Mandishah. Harrah, the eastern most village, is a few kilometers east of Mandishah and el-Zabu. El-Heiz is the southern most village, but it may not always be considered as part of Bahariya because it is so far from the rest of the villages, about fifty kilometers south of el-Bawiti.People and cultureThe people of the oasis, or the Wahati people (meaning of the oasis in Arabic), are the descendants of the ancient people who inhabited the oasis, Bedouin tribes from Libya and the north coast, and other people from the Nile Valley who came to settle in the oasis.The majority of Wahati people in Bahariya are Muslims. There are some mosques in Bahariya. The nature of social settings in the oasis is highly influenced by Islam.Also, traditional music is very important to the Wahati people. Flutes, drums, and the simsimeyya (a harp-like instrument) are played at social gatherings, particularly at weddings. Traditional songs sung in rural style are passed down from generation to generation, and new songs are invented as well. Music from Cairo, the greater East, and other parts of the world are now easily accessible to the people of the oasis.Agriculturethumb|200px|The quiet life in Bahariya OasisAgriculture is still an important source of income, though now the iron ore industry close to Bahariya provides jobs for many Wahati people. Recently there has also been an increase in tourism to the oasis because of antiquities (tombs, mummies and other artifacts have been discovered there), and because of the beautiful surrounding deserts. Wahati and foreign guides lead adventure desert tours based out of Bahariya to the surrounding white and black deserts, and sometimes to Siwa or the southern oases. Tourism is a new and important source of income for locals, and it has brought an international presence to the oasis.(HistoryThe depression was populated since the neolithic, even if there is no archaeological evidence to all times. In el-Haiz, a prehistoric settlement site of hunter-gatherers was found with remains of grindstones, arrowheads, scrapers, chisels, and ostrich eggshells. In Qrat el-Abya, a Czech team led by Brta discovered a settlement of the Old Kingdom.(Nevine El-Aref: The tale of a city, report of the Al-Ahram Weekly of August 9, 2007.) Rock inscriptions in el-Harrah and other records date to the Middle Kingdom and upwards.(Giddy, Lisa L.: Egyptian Oases : Bahariya, Dakhla, Farafra and Kharga During Pharaonic Times, Warminster: Aris & Phillips Ltd., 1987, pp. 15 sq., 4044, 6264, 66, 95, 146149, 161163.)(Castel, Georges ; Tallet, Pierre: Les inscriptions dEl-Harra, oasis de Bahareya, in: Bulletin de lInstitut franais darchologie orientale (BIFAO), vol. 101 (2001), pp. 99136, 612 sq.) The tomb of Amenhotep called Huy was erected in Qarat Hilwah at the end of the 18th dynasty.(Siclen III, Charles Cornell van: Wall scenes from the tomb of Amenhotep (Huy) governor of Bahria Oasis, San Antonio, Texas: VanSiclen, 1981.) In the 26th dynasty, the depression was culturally and economically flourishing. This can be learned from the chapels in Ain el-Muftilla, the tombs in Qrat Qasr Salim and Qarat esh-Sheikh Subi,(Fakhry, op. cit.) and the site of Qasr Allam.(Colin, Frdric: Qasr Allam : a Twenty-Sixth Dynasty settlement, in: Egyptian archaeology : the bulletin of the Egypt Exploration Society, ISSN 0962-2837, vol. 24 (2004), pp. 3033.)A newly flourishing time occurs at the Greek-Roman time. There is the ruin of a temple to the Great located in Qasr el-Miqisba (Ain et-Tibniya).(Fakhry, Ahmed: Baria Oasis, vol. II. Cairo: Government Press, 1950, pp. 4147, 85, figs. 29 map, 30, 71, plates XXIVXXXV, XLIV.B.) It is believed by some Egyptologists that the Greek conqueror passed through Bahariya while returning from the oracle of Ammon at Oasis. Excavations of the Greco-Roman necropolis found in 1995(Associated Press: Zweitausend Jahre alte Mumien in gyptischer Oase entdeckt, in: Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, Nr. 132, 1995, Friday, 09.06.1995, p. 11.) and known as the of the Golden Mummies began in 1999. Approximately thirty-four tombs have been excavated from this area.(Zahi Hawass, The Valley of the Golden Mummies, New York 2000.) In Roman times, a big military fort was erected at Qarat el-Toub.(Colin, Frdric; Laisney, Damien; Marchand, Sylvie: Qaret el-Toub : un fort romain et une ncropole pharaonique. Prospection archologique dans loasis de Baariya 1999, in: Bulletin de lInstitut franais darchologie orientale (BIFAO), vol. 100 (2000), pp. 145192.)In the spring of 2010, a Roman-era mummy was unearthed in a Bahariya Oasis cemetery in el-Harrah. The 3-foot-tall female mummy was found covered with plaster decorated to resemble Roman dress and jewelry.  In addition to the female mummy, archaeologists found clay and glass vessels, coins, anthropoid masks and 14 Greco-Roman tombs. Director of Cairo and Giza Antiquities Mahmoud Affifi, the archaeologist who led the dig, said the tomb has a unique design with stairways and corridors, and could date to 300 B.C. This find came as a result of excavation work for the construction of a youth center.(Nevine El-Aref: In the sands of time, report of Weekly of April 29, 2010.)Carcharodontosaurus and Bahariasaurus (meaning Bahariya lizard) dinosaur found in the Formation, which date to about 95 million years ago. It was a huge theropod, it was described by Stromer in 1934,(Stromer, E.: Ergebnisse der Forschungsreisen Prof. E. Stromers in den Wsten gyptens : II. Wirbeltierreste der Baharje-Stufe (unterstes Cenoman). 13. Dinosauria, in: Abhandlungen der Bayerischen Akademie der Wissenschaften, Mathematisch-Naturwissenschaftliche Abteilung, Neue Folge, vol. 22 (1934), pp. 179.) though the type specimen was destroyed during World War II in 1944. In 2000, an American scientific team conducted by Smith found the remains of type of dinosaur, the stromeri.(Smith, Joshua et al.: A Giant sauropod dinosaur from an Upper Cretaceous mangrove deposit in Egypt, in: Science, vol. 292,5522 (2001), pp. 17041706.)Modernityright|thumb|200px|Workaday life in el-Bawiti, Bahariya oasisThe oasis has changed drastically in the past 30 years after an asphalt road connecting Bahariya to Cairo was finished in the early 70s. With the new road came electricity, cars, television, phonelines, and a more accessible route to Cairo. The spread of people and ideas between Bahariya and Cairo has increased dramatically since the road was constructed. Also, the language of the Wahati people has been changed and influenced in new ways as the Cairene dialect is heard on television and in music.(Bliss, Frank: Oasenleben : die gyptischen Oasen Bahriya und Farafra in Vergangenheit und Gegenwart, Bonn: Politischer Arbeitskreis Schulen (PAS), 2006, (Beitrge zur Kulturkunde; 23), ISBN 978-3921876275.)Notes(See also* Bahariasaurus (meaning Bahariya lizard)* Formation (fossil bearing geologic formation)* StromerReferences* Fakhry, Ahmed. Bahria Oasis, Cairo: Government Press, 19421950 (2 volumes).* Fakhry, Ahmed. The oases of Egypt. Vol. II: Bahryah and Farafra Oases, Cairo: The American Univ. in Cairo Pr., 1974, reprinted 2003.* Hawass, Zahi A. Valley of the golden mummies : the greatest Egyptian discovery since Tutankhamen, London: Virgin, 2000.External links*Dr. Zahi Hawass, The Discovery of the Valley of the Mummies* Barya on Wikivoyage bg:ca:Bahariyade:Bahariyyaes:Bahariyafr:Al-Bahariyait:Bahariyapl:Al-Bahrijjaru:sv:Bahariya
2017943
Xstrata
 intl    yesXstrata plc (, ) is a global mining company headquartered in Zug, Switzerland and with its registered office in London, Kingdom.() It is a major producer of coal (and the worlds largest exporter of thermal coal), copper, nickel, primary vanadium and zinc and the worlds largest producer of ferrochrome.( It has operations in 19 countries across Africa, Asia, Australasia, Europe, North America and South America.() Xstrata has its primary listing on the Stock Exchange and is a constituent of the 100 Index. It has a secondary listing on the Swiss Exchange. Its largest shareholder is Glencore International plc, which has a stake of approximately 34%.()HistoryThe company was founded in 1926 in Switzerland as Sdelektra, an infrastructure and electricity projects concern operating in Latin America.() In 1990, Marc Rich + Co AG became its majority shareholder. In the 1990s it diversified into mining and disposed of its non-core businesses.(It was first listed on the Stock Exchange in 2002 at which time it acquired Glencores coal assets in Australia and South Africa.(In 2003, it doubled in size with the A$2.9 billion takeover of Australian copper, zinc and lead miner MIM Holdings.() However, it failed in a 2005 bid for another Australian miner, Resources, which was captured by Billiton, the worlds biggest mining company.()In 2004 Xstrata closed its recently purchased Windimurra Vanadium plant in Western Australia which had the effect of increasing Vanadium prices received for Xstratas other Vanadium mines around the world.  Many hundreds of people were put out of work and now many Western Australians are not keen to see Xstrata involved in other mining activities in the state because of this action.()In August 2005, Xstrata purchased a 19.9% stake in Limited, a diversified Canadian mining company producing copper, nickel, aluminum, lead and zinc. Following a contested take-over battle with Inco Limited, Xstrata successfully acquired the remaining 80.1% of Falconbridge in August 2006.()In 2006, The Territory and Australian Governments approved the expansion of the River zinc mine, near the popular fishing destination of Borrooloola. The expansion involves diversion of the river to a new 5.5 km channel, to allow construction of a massive open-cut pit in the existing river.()On behalf of the Traditional Owners of the region  the Yanyuwa, Mara, Garrawa and Gurdanji peoples  the Northern Land Council launched a legal challenge to the Territory Governments decision to approve the mining of and diversion of the McArthur River. On 1 May 2007, The Territory Supreme Court ruled in favour of the Northern Land Council to stop the expansion. On 3 May 2007, the Territory government rushed through retrospective legislation to overrule the court decision and allow the open-cut mine to proceed.()OperationsSince the turn of the millennium it has developed from a small player into one of the worlds largest diversified mining groups with the help of a series of large acquisitions. In 2008, its degree of transnationality according to the Index was 93.2 percent and ranked first place.() It has major operations/projects in eighteen countries (Australia, Argentina, Brazil, Canada, Chile, Colombia, the Dominican Republic, Germany, Jamaica, Caledonia, Norway, Papua New Guinea, Peru, South Africa, Spain, Tanzania, the United States and the United Kingdom) and it is a major producer of copper, coal, thermal coal, nickel, ferrochrome, vanadium and zinc. It has smaller scale involvement in aluminum, gold, lead and silver. It also has interests in platinum group metals through its 24.9% stake in Lonmin.Bulga CoalXstrata are currently the operators of the Coal Mine in NSW, Australia. Xstrata have managed this mine on behalf of the Bulga Coal Pty Ltd shareholders since 2001 when it purchased Enex Resorces Limited from Glencore International AG. The Bulga Coal mine site serves as the headquarters for Xstrata Coals NSW division.Mangoola (Anvil Hill) Coal Mine ControversyIn 2007 Xstrata Coal, based in Sydney, bought Hill Coal Mine from Centennial Coal Company.() Since the purchase of the Hill Coal Mine Xstrata Coal, an Australia-based subsidiary of Xstrata PLC, has come under media scrutiny numerous times in regards to the companys management of the pre-mining stage of the mining project, most notably scrutinised has been the community relations approach of Xstrata Coal towards the local community, with allegations of misleading actions on behalf of the company being cited in the local and regional media, and other regional and local communication channels. Including the setting up of a local action group in opposition to the mine named WAG (Wybong Action Group).()George Fisher mineIn October 2010, Xstratas  A$274 million expansion plan for the George Fisher mine at Isa was approved by the government of Queensland()Relationship with GlencoreXstrata is also noted for its association with the commodity trader Glencore, whom media reports accuse of having entered into illegal deals with states.(For details, see Glencore.) Glencore is reported to serve as a marketing partner for Xstrata.()() As of 2006, Glencore leaders Willy Strothotte and Glasenberg are on the board of Xstrata, which Strothotte chairs.(Xstrata: List of non-executive directors, accessed 22 October 2006 ) According to The Sunday Times, Glencore controls 40% of Xstrata stock and has appointed the Xstrata CEO, Mick Davis.((See also Xstrata: Investor disclosure, accessed 22 October 2006)Senior managementReferencesFurther reading* External links* Xstrata official website*Xstrata Dreaming: The Struggle of Aboriginal Australians against a Swiss Mining Giant CorpWatchde:Xstrataes:Xstratafr:Xstratalt:Xstratano:Xstratapt:Xstrataro:Xstrataru:Xstrata
2025413
Cregganbaun
footnotes               Cregganbaun () is a village in Mayo, Ireland.GeologyIn 2007 there were reports of a proposal by a company called Mayos Gold to open a niche tourism gold mine in Cregganbaun, and an interpretative visitor centre in Louisburgh. This re-ignited a 20 years controversy when several mining companies attempted to open commercial quantity gold mines on the side of Patrick and in the Cregganbaun/Doolough region. The principal idea was to develop a national tourism product based around a show mine, producing a small amount of gold and not a commercial mining venture().EducationCregganbaun National School is now disused and local children travel to modern schools at Killeen or Louisburgh().See also* List of towns and villages in IrelandReferencesde:CregganbaunCreagn Bnnl:Cregganbaunru:
2028963
Edward_Borron
 religion          Edward Barnes Borron (December 6, 1820 &ndash; April 23, 1915) was a Canadian politician. He represented the electoral district of Algoma in the House of Commons from 1874 to 1878. He was a member of the Liberal Party.The son of John Arthur Borron and Mary Geddes, he was educated at Lancashire, upon Tyne and the of Edinburgh before entering work in his fathers mines in Lanarkshire. In 1842, he became general manager. Borron came to Canada in 1850, working in Michigan before becoming general manager for the Montreal Mining Companys operation at Bruce Mines. He married Marie-Edesse Fvrier dit Larame in 1854. In 1858, he returned to Scotland but came back to the Sault Ste. Marie area in 1862. From 1869 to 1873, he was crown lands agent and mining inspector for the province in the Lake Superior division. In 1879, he was named stipendiary magistrate for the northern Nipissing district. He retired to Toronto in 1904. References * * 
2032208
Maafa
Image:Cicatrices de flagellation sur un esclave.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Whipped Americanslave, Baton Rouge, Louisiana, April 2, 1863The Maafa (also known as the African Holocaust or Holocaust of Enslavement) refers to the 500 years of suffering of Africans and the diaspora, through slavery, imperialism, colonialism, invasion, oppression, dehumanization and exploitation.( The terms also refer to the social and academic policies that were used to invalidate or appropriate the contributions of African peoples to humanity as a whole,( and the residual effects of this persecution, as manifest in contemporary society.( The term Maafa is derived from the Swahili term for disaster, terrible occurrence or great tragedy,(Harp, O.J. Across Time: Mystery of the Great Sphinx. 2007, page 247.)() while the term African Holocaust, derived from a Greek word meaning sacrificial burning, is preferred by other scholars to emphasize the intentional character.While Maafa can be considered an area of study within history in which both the actual history and the legacy of that history are studied as a single discourse, it can also be taken as its own significant event in the course of global or world history.() When studied as African history, the paradigm emphasizes the legacy of the African Holocaust on peoples globally. The emphasis in the historical narrative is on African agents, in opposition to what is perceived to be the conventional Eurocentric voice; for this reason Maafa is an aspect of Pan-Africanism.Usage of the term Maafa to describe this period of persecution was popularized by Professor Anis 1994 book Let the Circle Be Unbroken: The Implications of African Spirituality in the Diaspora.(Barndt, Joseph. Understanding and Dismantling Racism: The Twenty-First Century. 2007, page 269.)(Dove, Nah. Afrikan Mothers: Bearers of Culture, Makers of Social Change. 1998, page 240.)(Gunn Morris, Vivian and Morris, Curtis L. The Price They Paid: Desegregation in an African American Community. 2002, page x.)(Jones, Lee and West, Cornel. Making It on Broken Promises: Leading African American Male Scholars Confront the Culture of Higher Education. 2002, page 178.) Historically, the enslavement of Africans by white people was mostly referred to as the slave trade, a phrase that has been criticized for emphasizing the commercial aspects of the African persecution, in keeping with a European or European-American historiographical viewpoint.Beyond slaveryThe Maafa or African Holocaust morally distinguishes domestic slavery in Africa from the commercial ventures of the European and Arab trade in captive Africans, focusing on the consequences and legacy of these foreign interventions in Africa. The term is not limited to demographic significance, in the aggregate population losses, but also references the profound changes to settlement patterns, epidemiological exposure and reproductive and social development potential.()In terms of legacy, the Maafa also includes the academic and social forces which categorized Africans into color labels, and the ramifications of this economic, social, political, and legal disenfranchisement, as manifest in contemporary society.( Curse of Ham The curse of Ham was one moral rationalization underlying the slave trade.() The curse of Ham interpretation of the Bible stems from , which relates the story of Noahs family, soon after the flood. Noah declares of Hams son Canaan, Cursed be Canaan; a servant of servants shall he be unto his brethren. Because Hams sons and their descendants were believed by biblical genealogists to be the people of Africa, these readings of the Bible also assumed that Ham must have been born black... contrary to the common dictation of nature.(Priest, Josiah. Bible Defence of Slavery: And Origin, Fortunes, and History of the Negro. 1852, page 34.) This explanation of biblical events also helped to account for the origins of dark-skinned people.This reading of biblical scripture was far from universal. One 19th century critic suggested that, even if this tenuous theory of a curse were legitimate, the cursed children of Ham were as likely to be European as African, except in the oblique and sinister and not very generous bearing...in the pro-slavery mind.(Hall, Marshall. The Two-fold Slavery of the United States: With a Project of Self-Emanicipation. 1854, page 90.)The equating of blackness with darkness of the soul has been traced back to antiquity, with some historians finding such thinking in the thought of, for instance, Philo and Origen.(Goldenberg, D. M. (2005) The Curse of Ham: Race & Slavery in Early Judaism, Christian, Princeton University Press) In the Ages, European scholars of the Bible picked up on the Talmudic idea of viewing the sons of Ham or Hamites as cursed, possibly blackened by their sins. Though early arguments to this effect were sporadic, they became increasingly common during the slave trade of the 18th and 19th centuries,(Benjamin Braude, The Sons of Noah and the Construction of Ethnic and Geographical Identities in the Medieval and Early Modern Periods, William and Mary Quarterly LIV (January 1997): 103142. See also William McKee Evans, From the Land of Canaan to the Land of Guinea: The Strange Odyssey of the Sons of Ham,American Historical Review 85 (February 1980): 1543) when it began to be used as a justification or rationalization of slavery, to suit the economic and ideological interests of the elite.Historians believe that by the 19th century, the belief that blacks were descended from Ham was used by European-Americans in the United States to justify slavery.(Felicia R. Lee, Noahs Curse Is Slaverys Rationale, Racematters.org, November 1, 2003)  According to Benjamin Braude, the curse of Ham became a foundation myth for collective degradation, conventionally trotted out as Gods reason for condemning generations of dark-skinned peoples from Africa to slavery.(Slavery in AfricaAspects of the slave trade were controlled by indigenous Africans themselves. Several African nations such as the Ashanti of Ghana and the Yoruba of Nigeria had economies depending solely  on the trade. African peoples such as the Imbangala of Angola and the Nyamwezi of Tanzania would serve as intermediaries or roving bands warring with other African nations to capture Africans for Europeans. Europeans would actively favor one African group over another to deliberately ignite chaos and continue their slaving activities.()European slave tradeThis system of enslavement was held to reflect a divine ethno-social dynamic, placing whites as masters above blacks as slaves. There was the presumption of a divine legitimacy in the corporeal system of subjugation and oppression, a system which was motivated and maintained by greed and ignorance and only excused with Christianity, and sometimes even with the idea of, to some extent, Christianizing a heathen people. Some defenders of slavery in the United States South in the antebellum period, for instance, argued that blacks in the United States were becoming elevated, from the degrading slavery of savage heathenism to the participation in civilization and Christianity.(Conser, Walter H. God and the Natural World: Religion and Science in Antebellum America. 1993, page 120.)Christian belief became the context for the prevalence of European culture, European names became Christian names and those who adopted or were forced into Christianity automatically adopted European culture in an attempt to become more Christian.()Arab slave tradeImage:Slaves Zadib Yemen 13th century BNF Paris.jpg|thumb|left|250px|13th century slave market in YemenThe Arab slave trade is sometimes called Islamic slave trade, but religion was hardly the point of the slavery, states Patrick Manning, a professor of World History.(Manning (1990) p.10) Many Arabs were Christian, Jewish and also indigenous Arab faiths. Furthermore, usage of the terms Islamic trade or Islamic world implicitly and erroneously treats Africa as it were outside of Islam, or a negligible portion of the Islamic world. Dr. Kwaku Person-Lynn points out that the Arab trade was rarely a chattel trade and some argue more humane. In both African Slavery and Arab enslavement of Africans, the enslaved were allowed great social ascension.In the 8th century Africa was dominated by Arab-Berbers in the north: Islam moved southwards along the Nile and along the desert trails. The dynasty of Ethiopia often exported Nilotic slaves from their western borderland provinces, or from newly conquered or reconquered Muslim provinces. Native Muslim Ethiopian sultanates (rulership) exported slaves as well, such as the sometimes independent sultanate (rulership) of Adal (a 16th century province-cum-rulership located in East Africa north of Northwestern Somalia).(Pankhurst (1997) p. 59)  The Arab (African identifying as Arab) Tib extended his influence and made many people slaves. After Europeans had settled in the of Guinea, the trans-Saharan slave trade became less important. In Zanzibar, slavery was abolished late, in 1897, under British-controlled Sultan Hamoud bin Mohammed.(Ingrams (1967) p.175) The rest of Africa had no direct contact with Muslim slave-traders.The primary boom of the trade in African slaves by Arabs was during the 18th century. The Portuguese had destroyed the Swahili coast and Zanzibar emerged as the hub of wealth for the Arabian state of Muscat. By 1839, slaving became the prime Arab enterprise. The demand for slaves in Arabia, Egypt, Persia and India, but more notability by the Portuguese who occupied Mozambique, created a wave of destruction on Eastern Africa. 45,000 slaves were passing through Zanzibar every year.()Legacy of Arab enslavement of AfricansIslam like Christianity became the context for the cultural prevalence of Arab culture. Arab names became Islamic names and those who adopted Islam automatically adopted Arab culture in an attempt to become Islamic. The Afro-Arab relationship was riddled with complexities and nuance. Some Arabs were Arab linguistically but racially African. Thus, the Arab trade in enslaved Africans was not only conducted by Asiatic Arabs, but also African Arabs: Africans speaking Arabic as a first language embracing an Arab culture.()Scholarship on Arab slavery has historically been limited, because most people who know themselves to have had enslaved ancestors are people of the African Diaspora whose ancestors were involved in the slave trade. The impact of the Arab trade on people of the Americas was negligible. Another reason why the Arab Slave Trade is far less scrutinized than the European trade is that the social legacy of western slavery is far more salient today:  in the West, ghettos of concentrated poverty, populated by a black-skinned minority, are not uncommon, nor are prison systems disproportionately incarcerating impoverished black minorities. The African Diaspora in Arab lands, on the other hand, has almost disappeared through inter-marriage. The resurgence of Islamaphobia and the need to de-focus European slaving activities, some argue, has brought this aspect of history to the foreground.()thumb|150px|left|Tippu Tip was incorrectly considered Arab despite his predominately African ancestry. His father was a coastal African Swahili while his mother was a Muscat ArabAccording to Dr. Carlos Moore, resident scholar at Brazils Universidade do Estado da Bahia,  Afro-multiracials in the Arab world self-identify in ways that resemble Latin America.  Moore recalled that a film about Egyptian President Sadat had to be cancelled when Sadat discovered that an African-American had been cast to play him. Sadat considered himself white, according to Moore. Moore claimed that black-looking Arabs, like many black-looking Latin Americans, often consider themselves white because they have some white ancestry.(The Subtle Racism of Latin America, UCLA International Institute) Similarly, 19th century slave trader Tip is often identified as Arab(Tippu Tip) despite having an unmixed African mother, in part because of the Arab tradition of assigning race through paternal descent.  Tips mother was an Arab and his father was from the African Swahili coast.ScaleThere is debate that the widely accepted view of the arrival of 10 million neglects to state how many left the continent of Africa. Estimates range from 40 million to 100 million from both the Arab Slave trade and the Transatlantic trade.( (marxists.org)) It has been estimated by Scholars like Karenga and Walter Rodney that the population of Africa in the mid 19th century would have been 50 million instead of 25 million had slavery not taken place.( Many Africans died during capturing or deportation to the coast, in the coastal dungeons or during the passage. It is estimated that the Portuguese trade was underestimated by half and the British trade by 1/3. There were also indirect effects of the slavers actions, including broken families left behind and the spreading of European diseases.((It is estimated that by the height of the slave trade the population of Africa unlike the rest of the World had stagnated by 50%.( Not only was the trade of demographic significance in the aggregate population losses but also in the profound changes to settlement patterns, epidemiological exposure, and reproductive and social development potential.()EffectsFew scholars dispute the harm done to the slaves themselves, nor the legacy of social and financial alienation. African scholar Karenga puts slavery in the broader context of the Maafa, suggesting that its effects exceed mere physical persecution and legal disenfranchisement: the destruction of human possibility involved redefining African humanity to the world, poisoning past, present and future relations with others who only know us through this stereotyping and thus damaging the truly human relations among peoples.()Slavery, colonialism and racism engendered a broad array of aftereffects, which are very visible in western society. The emotional stress of societal alienation and the burden of social and economic disadvantage fall under the scope of this legacy, and Africans of the diaspora are continually tested by the engagement with Eurocentric culture.( Several scholars have suggested that black families often seem to present symptoms of imbalance, alienation, and non-cohesion within themselves and their communities,( linking this tendency to the brutal disconnect in familial tradition that slavery made, when families were arbitrarily destroyed as slaves were bought and sold.(Boyd-Franklin, Nancy. Black Families in Therapy, Second Edition: Understanding the African American Experience. 2006, page 7-8.) Rather than family--community, harmony, and balance--as a generational norm, alienation and chaos in the wake of the Maafa seems more familiar.(Aldridge, Delores P. and Young, Carlene. Out of the Revolution: The Development of Africana Studies. 2000, page 251.)(http://www.inthesetimes.com/article/2523/ Dr. Joy Leary)The destruction of the family unit was furthered by the destruction of the institution of marriage. Not only were slaves disallowed legal marriage and forbidden any American religious and civil proceedings, but also their tribal ceremonies were not permitted or honored.( Children were not raised among their own parents, who were themselves never formally united in union; and children were often sold away.( These practices born of the economics of the slave trade, in addition to undermining family traditions,(Fredrickson, George M. The Arrogance of Race: Historical Perspectives on Slavery, Racism, and Social Inequality. 1988, page 113.) were justified with arguments that dehumanized African people. Dr. Joy DeGruy Leary  speaks to the residual effects of this prolonged campaign of dehumanization as a collective posttraumatic stress disorder,(Boyd-Franklin, Nancy. Black Families in Therapy, Second Edition: Understanding the African American Experience. 2006, page 9.) an anxiety innate to the African American experience which is exacerbated by the barrage of statistics and studies that categorize African Americans as an other, often seeming to revive the bigoted, dehumanizing sentiments of the past.(http://news.newamericamedia.org/news/view_article.html?article_idb6d699be4a8ccc0e7125890ae0963a65)Economics of slaveryImage:Triangular trade.png|thumb|250 px|right|Commercial goods from Europe were shipped to Africa for sale and trade for enslaved Africans. Africans were in turn brought to the regions depicted in blue, in what became known as the Passage. African slaves were thenceforth traded for raw materials, which were returned to Europe to complete the Trade.Slavery was involved in some of the most profitable industries in history. 70% of the slaves brought to the New World were used to produce sugar. The rest were employed harvesting coffee, cotton, and tobacco, and in some cases in mining. The West Indian colonies of the European powers were some of their most important possessions, so they went to extremes to protect and retain them. For example, at the end of the Years War in 1763, France agreed to cede the vast territory of France to the victors in exchange for keeping the minute Antillian island of Guadeloupe.Slave trade profits have been the object of many fantasies. Returns for the investors were not actually absurdly high (around 6% in France in the 18th century), but they were higher than domestic alternatives (in the same century, around 5%). Risks&mdash;maritime and commercial&mdash;were important for individual voyages. Investors mitigated it by buying small shares of many ships at the same time. In that way, they were able to diversify a large part of the risk away. Between voyages, ship shares could be freely sold and bought. All these made slave trade a very interesting investment (Daudin 2004). Historian Rodney estimates that by c.1770, the King of Dahomey was earning an estimated 250,000 per year by selling captive African soldiers and even his own people to the European slave-traders. Most of this money was spent on British-made firearms (of very poor quality) and industrial-grade alcohol.Colonialism and the European scramble for AfricaImage:Colonial Africa 1914 map.png|thumb|right|300px|Map depicting European claims to the African continent at the beginning of War IIn the late 19th century, European powers staged the for Africa, carving up most of the continent into colonial states. Only Liberia and Abyssinia (Ethiopia) escaped colonization. This colonial occupation continued until after War II, when the colonial states gradually attained formal independence.Colonialism had a destabilizing effect that still resonates in African politics. Before European intervention, national borders were no real concern, as a groups territory was generally congruent with its military or trade influence. The European insistence on drawing borders around territories to isolate them from those of other colonial powers often had the effect of separating otherwise contiguous political groups, or forcing traditional enemies to live side by side with no buffer between them. For example, although the River appears to be a natural geographic boundary, there had formerly been linguistically and culturally like groups living on each side, in mutually dependent community; border demarcation, in this case between Belgium and France along the river, permanently separated such groups, undermining these societies. Africans who lived in Saharan or Africa, some of whom had subsisted in trading across the continent for centuries, often found themselves crossing borders that existed only on European maps.European intervention often undermined the local balance of power, creating ethnic conflict where it was previously nonexistent, now that territorial boundaries were artificially redrawn by outsiders. Peoples of like ethnicity, religion, and language were often separated by virtue of having been conquered by different European states; the states themselves often grouped unlike peoples together, such that the nascent political entities completely lacked political unity. Peoples of differing religions, ethnicities, and even languages were jumbled together according to the of influence under which they happened to fall, encouraging internecine conflict and disunity.In nations that had substantial European populations, for example Rhodesia (Zimbabwe) and Africa, systems of second-class citizenship were established to give Europeans power far in excess of their numbers. In the Free State, which was the personal property of King II of Belgium, the native population was subjected to inhumane treatment and near-slavery status; forced labor was not uncommon.In what are now Rwanda and Burundi, two ethnic groups Hutus and Tutsis had merged into one culture by the time German colonists had taken control of the region in the 19th century. No longer divided by ethnicity as intermingling, intermarriage, and merging of cultural practices over the centuries had long since erased visible signs of a culture divide, Belgium instituted a policy of racial categorization upon taking control of the region, as race-based categorization was a fixture of the European culture of that time. The term Hutu originally referred to the agricultural-based Bantu-speaking peoples that moved into present day Rwanda and Burundi from the West, and the term Tutsi referred to Northeastern cattle-based peoples that migrated into the region later. The terms described a persons economic class; individuals who owned roughly 10 or more cattle were considered Tutsi, and those with fewer were considered Hutu, regardless of ancestral history. This was not a strict line but a general rule of thumb, and one could move from Hutu to Tutsi and vice versa.The Belgians introduced a racialized system; European-like features such as fairer skin, ample height, narrow noses were seen as more ideally Hamitic, and belonged to those people closest to Tutsi in ancestry, who were thus given power amongst the colonized peoples. Identity cards were issued based on this philosophy.Persecution of Africans after slaveryImage:JimCrowInDurhamNC.jpg|thumb|250px|In the United States, Crow Laws maintained the disenfranchisement of many Americans until the latter half of the 20th century.The persecution of Africans continued outside colonialist Africa, and beyond colonialism. Although social progress was made during the Reconstruction period, the post-Reconstruction era has been characterized as the of American race relations, in which Southern hardship and bitterness came to manifest in overt hostility against African Americans, and particularly in the phenomenon of lynching. Lynching became a means of terrorizing African Americans in the post-Reconstruction period. In the 20th century, Crow laws came to codify white privilege in the United States.Academic legacy of the African holocaustThe persecution of Africans has been traditionally minimized or whitewashed in historiography. Conventional western historical narratives have frequently been criticized as anti-African or Eurocentric, for instance in regards to viewing centuries of persecution and disenfranchisement as a side effect of commercial enterprise. Prejudicial accounts of African societies, cultures, languages and peoples by Western scholars abound, with African and African Diaspora voices often muted or relegated to the periphery. Until the 1960s, African Americans suffered from what one historian deemed historical invisibility.(Fredrickson, George M. The Arrogance of Race: Historical Perspectives on Slavery, Racism, and Social Inequality. 1988, page 112.)Alik Shahadah traces this pattern of scholarship to the era of slavery and colonialism, when it first came to serve as a means of removing any noble claim from the victims of systemic persecution; this served to rationalize their plight as natural and a continuation of a preexisting historical status, in order to eschew moral responsibility for destroying societies and undermining indigenous social and political systems. The first expressions of this academic trend appeared in the claim that Slavery was a natural feature of Africa, and that Africans sold each other everyday. This contention sought to justify the commercial exploitation of humanity while denying the moral question, a pattern Shahada perceives to have continued beyond the eclipse of slavery and colonialism.()Questions of terminologyImage:BLAKE12.JPG|thumb|right|250px|The term Slave Trade has been criticized for subsuming human suffering in commercial venture.(Diouf, Sylviane Anna. Fighting the Slave Trade: West African Strategies. 2003, page xi.) This 1796 Blake print inverts that effect, as a man dangles by his rib in the horrible foreground, while a slave ship is relegated to the distant corner, emphasizing the human condition as the central concern.(Wood, Marcus. Blind Memory: Visual Representations of Slavery in England and America. 2000, page 38-9.)The term African Holocaust is preferred by some academics, such as Karenga, because it implies intention.() One problem noted by Karenga is that the word Maafa can also translate to accident, and the holocaust of enslavement was clearly no accident. The term holocaust, however, can be misleading as it is primarily used to refer to the Nazi genocide and etymologically refers to something being completely ( - holos) burnt ( - kaustos).()Some Afrocentric scholars prefer the term Maafa to African Holocaust,(Tarpley, Natasha. Testimony: Young African-Americans on Self-Discovery and Black Identity. 1995, page 252.) because they believe that indigenous African terminology more truly confers the events.( The term Maafa may serve much the same cultural psychological purpose for Africans as the idea of the Holocaust serves to name the culturally distinct Jewish experience of genocide under German Nazism.(Aldridge, Delores P. and Young, Carlene. Out of the Revolution: The Development of Africana Studies. 2000, page 250.) Other arguments in favor of Maafa rather than African Holocaust emphasize that the denial of the validity of the African peoples humanity is an unparalleled centuries-long phenomenon:  The Maafa is a continual, constant, complete, and total system of human negation and nullification.(The terms Slave Trade, Atlantic Slave Trade and Slave Trade are said by some to be deeply problematic, as they serve as euphemisms for the intense violence and mass murder inflicted on African peoples, the complete appropriation of their lands and undermining of their societies. Referred to as a trade, this prolonged period of persecution and suffering is rendered as a commercial dilemma, rather than as a moral atrocity.( With trade as the primary focus, the broader tragedy becomes consigned to a secondary point, as mere damage of a commercial venture. Others, however, feel that avoidance of the term trade is apologetic act on behalf of capitalism, absolving capitalist structures of involvement in human catastrophe.Further reading* The Black Holocaust For Beginners, by S.E. Anderson* Let The Circle Be Unbroken, by Marimba Ani* Powell, Eve Troutt, and John O. Hunwick, ed. The African Diaspora in the Mediterranean Lands of Islam (Princeton Series on the Middle East)* van Sertima, Ivan. ed. The Journal of African Civilization.* Rodney, Walter. How Europe Underdeveloped Africa. Washington, D.C.: Howard University Press. 1974.* Worlds Great Men Of Color. Vols. I and II, edited by John Henrik Clarke. New York: Collier-MacMillan, 1972.* The Negro Impact on Western Civilization. New York: Philosophical Library. 1970.* Quarles, Benjamin. The Negro and the Making of the Americas.* The African Diaspora in the Mediterranean Lands of Islam by John Hunwick* Post Traumatic Slave Syndrome by Dr. Joy DeGruySee Also* RenaissanceReferencesExternal links* African Holocaust Society* africawithin.com/maafa/slavery Africa Withinca:Maafaes:Maafa
2037630
Korea_General_Zinc_Industry_Group
Korea General Zinc Industry Group is a Korean mining and industrial group headquartered in Pyongyang.  The group produces zinc, lead, bullion, concentrates, concentrates, cadmium, arsenic, residues and concentrate for export and domestic use.  The group imports some industrial and mining accessories, including industrial chemical reagents and animal feed.See also*of North Korean companies*of Korea-related topics*of North Korea
2041777
Biggenden,_Queensland
BundabergBiggenden is a town situated on the Highway in southern Queensland, Australia, 339 km north-west of the state capital Brisbane, and 84 km west of Maryborough. At the 2006 census, Biggenden had a population of 644.()Primary production is the most significant industry in the Shire with beef and dairy cattle being predominant. Other agricultural pursuits include grain crops, piggeries, peanuts, citrus and timber. The area is also rich in minerals. Biggenden Mine is located eight kilometres out of town off Ban Ban Springs Road. Gold, bismuth and more recently magnetite have been extracted from the mine. The township is also close to Lakes National Park and Walsh National Park.Biggenden was founded in 1889 as a service centre to the short-lived goldrush towns of Paradise and Shamrock; and for coach passengers travelling west from Maryborough. The township, including the intriguingly named Live And Let Live Inn, moved to a new location alongside the railway station when the rail line arrived in 1891.Paradise DamIn November 2005, the Queensland Government opened the Paradise Dam, about 30 minutes north-west of Biggenden, on the River. The 300,000ML dam, which submerges the former mining town of the same name, is touted as securing the future of the nearby Bundaberg and Childers region, although no water will be available for residents of the Biggenden area. However, more than 400 jobs were created during its construction and the dam site is proving to be one of the shires largest tourist attraction.() Artefacts and buildings removed from Paradise before the dam wall was built are now on display by the Biggenden Historical Society.Paradise Dam will be used by the government as the model for the highly controversial Crossing Dam on the Mary River, about two hours south. A 2005 report commissioned by the Wildlife Fund found Paradise to be one of the six worst-planned dams since the World Commission on Dams in 2000.See also* of Biggenden (19052008)ReferencesExternal links* University of Queensland: Queensland Places: Biggenden and Biggenden Shirefr:Biggendennl:Biggenden
2046416
Nuclear_fuel
400px|thumb|Nuclear Fuel ProcessImage:Binding energy curve - common isotopes.svg|right|thumb|300px|A graph comparing number against energyImage:ILL core 8358 extract.jpg|thumb|Close-up of a replica of the core of the reactor at the Laue-LangevinNuclear fuel is a material that can be consumed by fission or fusion to derive nuclear energy. Nuclear fuels are the most dense sources of energy available. Nuclear fuel in a fuel cycle can refer to the fuel itself, or to physical objects (for example bundles composed of fuel rods) composed of the fuel material, mixed with structural, neutron moderating, or neutron reflecting materials.Most nuclear fuels contain heavy metal fissile elements that can be made to undergo a fission reaction in a reactor. The most common fissile nuclear fuels are Uranium 235 (235U) and Plutonium 239 (239Pu). The actions of mining, refining, purifying, using, and ultimately disposing of these elements together make up the nuclear fuel cycle.Not all nuclear fuels are used in fission reactors.  Plutonium-238 and some other elements are used to produce small amounts of nuclear power by decay in thermoelectric generators and other atomic batteries. Light nuclides such as 3H (tritium) are used as fuel for fusion.Oxide fuelFor fission reactors, the fuel (typically based on Uranium) is usually based on the metal oxide; the oxides are used rather than the metals themselves because the oxide melting point is much higher than that of the metal and because it cannot burn, being already in the oxidized state. The conductivity of dioxide is low; it is affected by porosity and burn-up. The burn-up results in products being dissolved in the lattice (such as lanthanides), the precipitation of fission products such as palladium, the formation of fission gas bubbles due to fission products such as xenon and krypton and radiation damage of the lattice. The low thermal conductivity can lead to overheating of the center part of the pellets during use. The porosity results in a decrease in both the thermal conductivity of the fuel and the swelling which occurs during use.According to the Nuclear Safety Center http://www.insc.anl.gov/ the thermal conductivity of uranium dioxide can be predicted under different conditions by a series of equations.The bulk density of the fuel can be related to the thermal conductivityWhere  is the bulk density of the fuel and td is the theoretical density of the dioxide.Then the thermal conductivity of the porous phase (Kf) is related to the conductivity of the perfect phase (Ko, no porosity) by the following equation. Note that s is a term for the shape factor of the holes.:Kf  Ko(1  p/1 + (s  1)p)Rather than measuring the thermal conductivity using the traditional methods in physics such as disk, the method or bar it is common to use a laser flash method where a small disc of fuel is placed in a furnace. After being heated to the required temperature one side of the disc is illuminated with a laser pulse, the time required for the heat wave to flow through the disc, the density of the disc, and the thickness of the disk can then be used to calculated to give the thermal conductivity.:  Cp* conductivity* density*Cp capacity* diffusivityIf t1/2 is defined as the time required for the non illuminated surface to experience half its final temperature rise then.:  0.1388 L2/t1/2*L is the thickness of the discFor details see http://equip.kaist.ac.kr/Journal/lfat.pdfUOXright|thumb|450px|The thermal conductivity of zirconium metal and uranium dioxide as a function of temperaturedioxide is a black semiconductor solid. It can be made by reacting uranyl nitrate with a base (ammonia) to form a solid (ammonium uranate). It is heated (calcined) to form U3O8 that can then be converted by heating in an argon / hydrogen mixture (700 C) to form UO2. The UO2 is then mixed with an organic  binder and pressed into pellets, these pellets are then fired at a much higher temperature (in H2/Ar) to sinter the solid. The aim is to form a dense solid which has few pores.The thermal conductivity of uranium dioxide is very low compared with that of zirconium metal, and it goes down as the temperature goes up.It is important to note that the corrosion of uranium dioxide in an aqueous environment is controlled by similar electrochemical processes to the corrosion of a metal surface.MOXMixed oxide, or MOX fuel, is a blend of plutonium and natural or depleted uranium which behaves similarly (though not identically) to the enriched uranium feed for which most reactors were designed.  MOX fuel is an alternative to low enriched uranium (LEU) fuel used in the water reactors which predominate power generation.Some concern has been expressed that used MOX cores will introduce new disposal challenges, though MOX is itself a means to dispose of surplus plutonium by transmutation.Currently (March, 2005) reprocessing of commercial nuclear fuel to make MOX is done in England and France, and to a lesser extent in Russia, India and Japan.  China plans to develop breeder reactors and reprocessing.The Nuclear Energy Partnership,  is a U.S. plan to form an international partnership to see spent nuclear fuel reprocessed in a way that renders the plutonium in it usable for nuclear fuel but not for weapons. Reprocessing of spent commercial-reactor nuclear fuel has not been permitted in the United States due to nonproliferation considerations. All of the other reprocessing nations have long had nuclear weapons from military-focused research-reactor fuels except for Japan.Metal fuelMetal fuels have the advantage of a much higher heat conductivity than oxide fuels but cannot survive equally high temperatures.  Metal fuels have a long history of use, stretching from the reactor in 1946 to many test and research reactors.  Metal fuels have the potential for the highest fissile atom density.  Metal fuels are normally alloyed, but some metal fuels have been made with pure uranium metal.  Uranium alloys that have been used include uranium aluminum, uranium zirconium, uranium silicon, uranium molybdenum, and uranium zirconium hydride.  Any of the aforementioned fuels can be made with plutonium and other actinides as part of a closed nuclear fuel cycle.  Metal fuels have been used in water reactors and liquid metal fast breeder reactors, such as EBR-II.TRIGA fuelTRIGA fuel is used in TRIGA (Training, Research, Isotopes, Atomics) reactors.The TRIGA reactor uses uranium-zirconium-hydride (UZrH) fuel, which has a prompt negative temperature coefficient, meaning that as the temperature of the core increases, the reactivity decreasesso it is highly unlikely for a meltdown to occur. Most cores that use this fuel are leakage cores where the excess leaked neutrons can be utilized for research.  TRIGA fuel was originally designed to use highly enriched uranium, however in 1978 the U.S. Department of Energy launched its Reduced Enrichment for Research Test Reactors program, which promoted reactor conversion to low-enriched uranium fuel.  A total of 35 TRIGA reactors have been installed at locations across the USA.  A further 35 reactors have been installed in other countries.Actinide fuelIn a neutron reactor, the minor actinides produced by neutron capture of uranium and plutonium can be used as fuel. Metal actinide fuel is typically an alloy of zirconium, uranium, plutonium and the actinides. It can be made inherently safe as thermal expansion of the metal alloy will increase neutron leakage.Ceramic fuelsCeramic fuels other than oxides have the advantage of high heat conductivities and melting points, but they are more prone to swelling than oxide fuels and are much less well understood.Uranium nitrideThis is often the fuel of choice for reactor designs that NASA produces, one advantage is that UN has a better conductivity than UO2.  Uranium nitride has a very high melting point. This fuel has the disadvantage that unless 15N was used (in place of the more common 14N) that a large amount of 14C would be generated from the nitrogen by the (n,p) reaction. As the nitrogen required for such a fuel would be so expensive it is likely that the fuel would have to be reprocessed by a pyro method to enable to the 15N to be recovered. It is likely that if the fuel was processed and dissolved in acid that the nitrogen enriched with 15N would be diluted with the common 14N.Uranium carbideMuch of what is known about uranium carbide is in the form of pin-type fuel elements for liquid metal fast breeder reactors during their intense study during the 60s and 70s. However, recently there has been a revived interest in uranium carbide in the form of plate fuel and most notably, micro fuel particles (such as TRISO particles).The high thermal conductivity and high melting point make uranium carbide an attractive fuel. In addition, because of the absence of oxygen in this fuel (during the course of irradiation, excess gas pressure can build from the formation of O2 or other gases) as well as the ability to complement a ceramic coating (a ceramic-ceramic interface has structural and chemical advantages), uranium carbide could be the ideal fuel candidate for certain IV reactors such as the fast reactor.Liquid fuelsMolten saltsThese include fuels where the fuel is dissolved in the coolant.  They were used in the Salt Reactor Experiment and numerous other liquid core reactor experiments, such as the fluoride thorium reactor.  The liquid fuel for the molten salt reactor was a mixture of lithium, beryllium, thorium and uranium fluorides: LiF-BeF2-ThF4-UF4 (72-16-12-0.4 mol%). It had a peak temperature of 705 C in the experiment, but could have operated at much higher temperatures, since the boiling point of the molten salt was in excess of 1400 C.Aqueous solutions of uranyl saltsThe homogeneous reactors use a solution of sulfate or other uranium salt in water. This homogenous reactor type has not been used for any large power reactors. One of its disadvantages is that the fuel is in a form which is easy to disperse in the event of an accident.Common physical forms of nuclear fuelUranium dioxide (UO2) powder is compacted to cylindrical pellets and sintered at high temperatures to produce ceramic nuclear fuel pellets with a high density and well defined physical properties and chemical composition. A grinding process is used to achieve a uniform cylindrical geometry with narrow tolerances. Such fuel pellets are then stacked and filled into the metallic tubes. The metal used for the tubes depends on the design of the reactor. Stainless steel was used in the past, but most reactors now use a zirconium alloy which, in addition to being highly corrosion-resistant, has low neutron absorption. The tubes containing the fuel pellets are sealed: these tubes are called fuel rods. The finished fuel rods are grouped into fuel assemblies that are used to build up the core of a power reactor.Cladding is the outer layer of the fuel rods, standing between the coolant and the nuclear fuel. It is made of a corrosion-resistant material with low cross section for neutrons, usually Zircaloy or steel in modern constructions, or magnesium with small amount of aluminium and other metals for the now-obsolete Magnox reactors. Cladding prevents radioactive fission fragments from escaping the fuel into the coolant and contaminating it.Image:Fuel Pellet.jpg|Regulatory Commission (NRC) Image of unirradiated (fresh) fuel pellets.Image:Pellet rod.jpg|NRC Image of fresh fuel pellets ready for assembly.Image:Nuclear-Fuel.jpg|NRC picture of fresh fuel being inspected.PWR fuelright|thumb|350px|PWR fuel assembly (also known as a fuel bundle) This fuel assembly is from a pressurized water reactor of the nuclear-powered passenger and cargo ship . Designed and built by the Babcock and Wilcox Company.water reactor (PWR) fuel consists of cylindrical rods put into bundles.  A uranium oxide ceramic is formed into pellets and inserted into Zircaloy tubes that are bundled together.  The Zircaloy tubes are about 1 cm in diameter, and the fuel cladding gap is filled with helium gas to improve the conduction of heat from the fuel to the cladding.  There are about 179-264 fuel rods per fuel bundle and about 121 to 193 fuel bundles are loaded into a reactor core.  Generally, the fuel bundles consist of fuel rods bundled 14x14 to 17x17.  PWR fuel bundles are about 4 meters in length.  In PWR fuel bundles, control rods are inserted through the top directly into the fuel bundle.  The fuel bundles usually are enriched several percent in 235U.  The uranium oxide is dried before inserting into the tubes to try to eliminate moisture in the ceramic fuel that can lead to corrosion and hydrogen embrittlement.  The Zircaloy tubes are pressurized with helium to try to minimize pellet-cladding interaction which can lead to fuel rod failure over long periods.BWR fuelIn water reactors (BWR), the fuel is similar to PWR fuel except that the bundles are canned; that is, there is a thin tube surrounding each bundle.  This is primarily done to prevent local density variations from affecting neutronics and thermal hydraulics of the reactor core.  In modern BWR fuel bundles, there are either 91, 92, or 96 fuel rods per assembly depending on the manufacturer. A range between 368 assemblies for the smallest and 800 assemblies for the largest U.S. BWR forms the reactor core.  Each BWR fuel rod is back filled with helium to a pressure of about three atmospheres (300 kPa).CANDU fuelImage:CANDU fuel bundles.jpg|right|thumb|350px|CANDU fuel bundles Two CANDU (CANada Deuterium Uranium) fuel bundles, each about 50 cm in length, 10 cm in diameter. Photo courtesy of Atomic Energy of Canada Ltd.CANDU fuel bundles are about a half meter in length and 10 cm in diameter.  They consist of sintered (UO2) pellets in zirconium alloy tubes, welded to zirconium alloy end plates.  Each bundle is roughly 20 kg, and a typical core loading is on the order of 4500-6500 bundles, depending on the design.  Modern types typically have 37 identical fuel pins radially arranged about the long axis of the bundle, but in the past several different configurations and numbers of pins have been used. The CANFLEX bundle has 43 fuel elements, with two element sizes. It is also about 10 cm (4 inches) in diameter, 0.5 m (20 in) long and weighs about 20 kg (44 lb) and replaces the 37-pin standard bundle. It has been designed specifically to increase fuel performance by utilizing two different pin diameters. Current CANDU designs do not need enriched uranium to achieve criticality (due to their more efficient water moderator), however, some newer concepts call for low enrichment to help reduce the size of the reactors.Less common fuel formsVarious other nuclear fuel forms find use in specific applications, but lack the widespread use of those found in BWRs, PWRs, and CANDU power plants.  Many of these fuel forms are only found in research reactors, or have military applications.Magnox fuelMagnox reactors are pressurised, dioxide cooled, graphite moderated reactors using uranium (i.e. unenriched) as fuel and magnox alloy as fuel cladding. Working pressure varies from 6.9 to 19.35 bar for the steel pressure vessels, and the two reinforced concrete designs operated at 24.8 and 27 bar.  Magnox is also the name of an alloy&mdash;mainly of magnesium with small amounts of aluminium and other metals&mdash;used in cladding unenriched uranium metal fuel with a non-oxidising covering to contain fission products.Magnox is short for Magnesium non-oxidising.This material has the advantage of a low neutron capture cross-section, but has two major disadvantages:*It limits the maximum temperature, and hence the thermal efficiency, of the plant.*It reacts with water, preventing long-term storage of spent fuel under water.Magnox fuel incorporated cooling fins to provide maximum heat transfer despite low operating temperatures, making it expensive to produce. While the use of uranium metal rather than oxide made reprocessing more straightforward and therefore cheaper, the need to reprocess fuel a short time after removal from the reactor meant that the fission product hazard was severe. Expensive remote handling facilities were required to address this danger.TRISO fuelright|thumb|150px|TRISO fuel particle which has been cracked, showing the multiple coating layersTristructural-isotropic (TRISO) fuel is a type of micro fuel particle. It consists of a fuel kernel composed of UOX (sometimes UC or UCO) in the center, coated with four layers of three isotropic materials.  The four layers are a porous buffer layer made of carbon, followed by a dense inner layer of carbon (PyC), followed by a ceramic layer of SiC to retain fission products at elevated temperatures and to give the TRISO particle more structural integrity, followed by a dense outer layer of PyC.  TRISO fuel particles are designed not to crack due to the stresses from processes (such as differential thermal expansion or fission gas pressure) at temperatures up to and beyond 1600C, and therefore can contain the fuel in the worst of accident scenarios in a properly designed reactor.  Two such reactor designs are the bed reactor (PBR), in which thousands of TRISO fuel particles are dispersed into graphite pebbles, and the prismatic-block gas-cooled reactor (such as the GT-MHR), in which the TRISO fuel particles are fabricated into compacts and placed in a graphite block matrix.  Both of these reactor designs are high temperature reactors (VHTR) known as the high-temperature gas-cooled reactors (HTGR),  one of the six classes of reactor designs in the Generation IV initiative.TRISO fuel particles were originally developed in Germany for high-temperature gas-cooled reactors.  The first nuclear reactor to use TRISO fuels was the AVR and the first powerplant was the THTR-300.  Currently, TRISO fuel compacts are being used in the experimental reactors, the HTR-10 in China, and the HTTR in Japan.left|thumb|150px|RBMK reactor fuel rod holder 1  distancing armature; 2  fuel rods shell; 3  fuel tablets.QUADRISO fuelIn QUADRISO particles a burnable neutron poison (oxide or oxide or carbide) layer surrounds the fuel kernel of ordinary TRISO particles to better manage the excess of reactivity. If the core is equipped both with TRISO and QUADRISO fuels, at beginning of life neutrons do not reach the fuel of the QUADRISO particles because they are stopped by the burnable poison. After irradiation the poison depletes and neutrons streams into the fuel kernel of QUADRISO particles inducing fission reactions. This mechanism compensates fuel depletion of ordinary TRISO fuel. In the generalized QUADRISO fuel concept the poison can eventually be mixed with the fuel kernel or the outer pyrocarbon. The QUADRISO http://linkinghub.elsevier.com/retrieve/pii/S0029549310002037 concept has been conceived at National Laboratory.right|thumb|150px|QUADRISO ParticleRBMK fuelRBMK reactor fuel was used in Soviet designed and built RBMK type reactors. This is a low enriched uranium oxide fuel. The fuel elements in an RBMK are 3 m long each, and two of these sit back-to-back on each fuel channel, pressure tube. Reprocessed uranium from Russian VVER reactor spent fuel is used to fabricate RBMK fuel. Following the Chernobyl accident, the enrichment of fuel was changed from 2.0% to 2.4%, to compensate for control rod modifications and the introduction of additional absorbers.CerMet fuelCerMet fuel consists of ceramic fuel particles (usually uranium oxide) embedded in a metal matrix.  It is hypothesized that this type of fuel is what is used in United States Navy reactors.  This fuel has high heat transport characteristics and can withstand a large amount of expansion.Plate type fuelImage:Advanced Test Reactor.jpg|right|thumb|150px|ATR Core The Test Reactor at National Laboratory uses plate type fuel in a clover leaf arrangement. The blue glow around the core is known as radiation.Plate type fuel has fallen out of favor over the years.  Plate type fuel is commonly composed of enriched uranium sandwiched between metal cladding.  Plate type fuel is used in several research reactors where a high neutron flux is desired, for uses such as material irradiation studies or isotope production, without the high temperatures seen in ceramic, cylindrical fuel.  It is currently used in the Test Reactor (ATR) at National Laboratory.Sodium bonded fuelSodium bonded fuel consists of fuel that has liquid sodium in the gap between the fuel slug (or pellet) and the cladding.  This fuel type is often used for sodium cooled liquid metal fast reactors.  It has been used in EBR-I, EBR-II, and the FFTF.  The fuel slug may be metallic or ceramic.  The sodium bonding is used to reduce the temperature of the fuel.Spent nuclear fuelUsed nuclear fuel is a complex mixture of the products, uranium, plutonium and the transplutonium metals. In fuel which has been used at high temperature in power reactors it is common for the fuel to be heterogeneous; often the fuel will contain nanoparticles of group metals such as palladium. Also the fuel may well have cracked, swollen and been used close to its melting point. Despite the fact that the used fuel can be cracked, it is very insoluble in water, and is able to retain the vast majority of the actinides and products within the dioxide lattice.Oxide fuel under accident conditionsTwo main modes of release exist, the fission products can be vaporised or small particles of the fuel can be dispersed.Fuel behavior and post irradiation examination (PIE)Materials in a high radiation environment (such as a reactor) can undergo unique behaviors such as swelling http://ntrs.nasa.gov/archive/nasa/casi.ntrs.nasa.gov/19700006935_1970006935.pdf and non-thermal creep.  If there are nuclear reactions within the material (such as what happens in the fuel), the stoichiometry will also change slowly over time.  These behaviors can lead to new material properties, cracking, and fission gas release:* Fission gas release** As the fuel is degraded or heated the more volatile fission products which are trapped within the dioxide may become free. For example see J.Y. Colle, J.P. Hiernaut, D. Papaioannou, C. Ronchi, A. Sasahara, Journal of Nuclear Materials, 2006, 348, 229.* Fuel cracking**As the fuel expands on heating, the core of the pellet expands more than the rim which may lead to cracking. Because of the thermal stress thus formed the fuel cracks, the cracks tend to go from the center to the edge in a star-shaped pattern.In order to better understand and control these changes in materials, these behaviors are studied.  A common experiment to do this is post irradiation examination, in which fuel will be examined after it is put through reactor-like conditions http://www.scn.ro/lepi.htmhttp://www.ornl.gov/~webworks/cppr/y2001/pres/114819.pdf http://www.rertr.anl.gov/Web2002/2003%20Web/Rugirello.html http://www.nea.fr/html/trw/docs/mol98/session3/SIIIpaper2.pdf. Due to the intensely radioactive nature of the used fuel this is done in a cell. A combination of nondestructive and destructive methods of PIE are common.The PIE is used to check that the fuel is both safe and effective. After major accidents, the core is normally subject to PIE in order to find out what happened. One site where PIE is done is the ITU which is the EU center for the study of highly radioactive materials.In addition to the effects of radiation and the fission products on materials, scientists also need to consider the temperature of materials in a reactor, and in particular, the fuel.  Too high a fuel temperature can compromise the fuel, and therefore it is important to control the temperature in order to control the fission chain reaction.The temperature of the fuel varies as a function of the distance from the center to the rim. At distance x from the center the temperature (Tx) is described by the equation where  is the power density (W m3) and Kf is the conductivity.:Tx  TRim +  (rpellet2 - x2) (4 Kf)-1To explain this for a series of fuel pellets being used with a rim temperature of 200 C (typical for a BWR) with different diameters and power densities of 250 MWm3 have been modeled using the above equation. Note that these fuel pellets are rather large; it is normal to use oxide pellets which are about 10 mm in diameter.Reference Radiochemistry and Nuclear Chemistry, G. Choppin, J-O Liljenzin and J. Rydberg, 3rd Ed, 2002, Butterworth-Heinemann, ISBN 0-7506-7463-6Radioisotope decay fuelsRadioisotope batteryThe terms battery, nuclear battery and radioisotope battery are used interchangely to describe a device which uses the radioactive decay to generate electricity.  These systems use radioisotopes that produce low energy beta particles or sometimes alpha particles of varying energies. Low energy beta particles are needed to prevent the production of high energy penetrating radiation that would require heavy shielding. Radioisotopes such as tritium, nickel-63, promethium-147, and technetium-99 have been tested. Plutonium-238, curium-242, curium-244 and strontium-90 have been used.There are two main categories of atomic batteries: thermal and non-thermal. The non-thermal atomic batteries, which  have many different designs, exploit charged alpha and particles. These designs include the direct charging generators, betavoltaics, the nuclear battery, and the piezoelectric generator.  The thermal atomic batteries on the other hand, convert the heat from the radioactive decay to electricity.   These designs include thermionic converter, thermophotovoltaic cells, alkali-metal thermal to electric converter, and the most common design, the radioisotope thermoelectric generator.Radioisotope thermoelectric generatorsA thermoelectric generator (RTG) is a simple generator which converts heat into electricity from a radioisotope using an array of thermocouples. has become the most widely used fuel for RTGs. In the form of dioxide it has a half-life of 87.7 years, reasonable energy density and exceptionally low gamma and neutron radiation levels. Some Russian terrestrial RTGs have used ; this isotope has a shorter half-life and a much lower energy density, but is cheaper. Early RTGs, first built in 1958 by the Atomic Energy Commission, have used . This fuel provides phenomenally huge energy density, (a single gram of polonium-210 generates 140 watts thermal) but has limited use because of its very short half-life and gamma production and has been phased out of use in this application.Radioisotope heater units (RHU)heater units normally provide about 1 watt of heat each, derived from the decay of a few grams of plutonium-238. This heat is given off continuously for several decades.Their function is to provide highly localised heating of sensitive equipment (such as electronics in space). The CassiniHuygens orbiter to Saturn contains 82 of these units (in addition to its 3 main RTGs for power generation). The Huygens probe to Titan contains 35 devices.Fusion fuelsFusion fuels include tritium (3H) and deuterium (2H) as well as helium-3 (3He).  Many other elements can be fused together, but the larger electrical charge of their nuclei means that much higher temperatures are required. Only the fusion of the lightest elements is seriously considered as a future energy source. Although the energy density of fusion fuel is even higher than fission fuel, and fusion reactions sustained for a few minutes have been achieved, utilizing fusion fuel as a net energy source remains a theoretical possibility.()First generation fusion fuelDeuterium and tritium are both considered first-generation fusion fuels; they are the easiest to fuse, because the electrical charge on their nuclei is the lowest of all elements. The three most commonly cited nuclear reactions that could be used to generate energy are::2H + 3H \rightarrow n (14.07 MeV) + 4He (3.52 MeV):2H + 2H \rightarrow n (2.45 MeV) + 3He (0.82 MeV):2H + 2H \rightarrow p (3.02 MeV) + 3H (1.01 MeV)Second generation fusion fuelSecond generation fuels require either higher confinement temperatures or longer confinement time than those required of first generation fusion fuels, but generate fewer neutrons. Neutrons are an unwanted byproduct of fusion reactions in an energy generation context, because they are absorbed by the walls of a fusion chamber, making them radioactive.  They cannot be confined by magnetic fields, because they are not electrically charged.  This group consists of deuterium and helium-3.  The products are all charged particles, but there may be significant side reactions leading to the production of neutrons.:2H + 3He \rightarrow p (14.68 MeV) + 4He (3.67 MeV)Third generation fusion fuelThird generation fusion fuels produce only charged particles in the primary reactions, and side reactions are relatively unimportant.  Since a very small amount of neutrons is produced, there would be little induced radioactivity in the walls of the fusion chamber.  This is often seen as the end goal of fusion research.  3He has the highest Maxwellian reactivity of any 3rd generation fusion fuel. However, there are no significant natural sources of this substance on Earth.:3He + 3He \rightarrow 2p + 4He (12.86 MeV)Another potential aneutronic fusion reaction is the proton-boron reaction::p + 11B  34HeUnder reasonable assumptions, side reactions will result in about 0.1% of the fusion power being carried by neutrons. With 123 keV, the optimum temperature for this reaction is nearly ten times higher than that for the pure hydrogen reactions, the energy confinement must be 500 times better than that required for the D-T reaction, and the power density will be 2500 times lower than for D-T.See also* Nuclear Energy Partnership* of nuclear disasters and radioactive incidents* fuel bank* fuel cycle* uranium* market* Nuclear Fuel Cycle Information SystemNotesExternal links and referencesPWR fuel* NEI fuel schematic* Picture of a PWR fuel assembly* Picture showing handling of a PWR bundle* Mitsubishi nuclear fuel Co.BWR fuel* Picture of a canned BWR assembly* Physical description of LWR fuel* Links to BWR photos from the nuclear tourist webpageCANDU fuel* CANDU Fuel pictures and FAQ* Basics on CANDU design* The Evolution of CANDU Fuel Cycles and their Potential Contribution to World Peace* CANDU Fuel-Management Course* CANDU Fuel and Reactor Specifics (Nuclear Tourist)* Candu Fuel Rods and BundlesTRISO fuel* TRISO fuel descripcin* Non-Destructive Examination of SiC Nuclear Fuel Shell using X-Ray Fluorescense Microtomography Technique* GT-MHR fuel compact process* Description of TRISO fuel for pebbles* LANL webpage showing various stages of TRISO fuel productionQUADRISO fuel* Conceptual Design of QUADRISO FuelCERMET fuel* A Review of Fifty Years of Space Nuclear Fuel Development Programs* Thoria-based Cermet Nuclear Fuel: Sintered Microsphere Fabrication by Spray Drying* The Use of Molybdenum-Based Ceramic-Metal (CerMet) Fuel for the Actinide Management in LWRsPlate type fuel* List of reactors at INL and picture of ATR core* ATR plate fuelTRIGA fuel* General Atomics TRIGA fuel websiteSpace reactor fuels* Space Nuclear Conference 2005 (SNC 05)Fusion fuel* Advanced fusion fuels presentationnuclearpalivoda:Kernebrndselde:Kernbrennstoffet:Tuumktusnuclearnuclaireko:gorivobakar nuklirnuclearenl:Kernbrandstofja:jdrowenuclearfuelsv:Krnbrnsle
2050632
Waste_(law)
Waste is a term used in the law of property to describe a of action that can be brought in court to address a change in condition of property brought about by a current tenant that damages or destroys the value of that property. A lawsuit for waste can be brought against a tenant or lessee of a estate, either by a current landlord or by the owner of a vested interest.  The holder of an interest, however, has no standing to enforce an action for waste, since his future interest is not vested.There are several different kinds of waste under the law.Voluntary wasteVoluntary waste, (sometimes called affirmative waste) is any structural change made to the estate that intentionally or negligently causes harm to the estate or depletes its resources, unless this depletion is a continuation of a pre-existing use. Some jurisdictions follow what is called the mines doctrine, which permits continued excavation from any mine on the property that is already open, but prohibits the opening of new mines. However, the majority of jurisdictions now follow a doctrine that allows any activity necessary to continue the exploitation of a particular resource, if the land has already been used for that purpose.:Example: If there is a copper mine on the land, the current tenant can continue the mining operation to the point of extracting all available copper. If there were no such mine there originally, excavating property would constitute waste.Permissive wastePermissive waste is failure to maintain the estate, both physically and financially. Rather than requiring some bad act on the part of the tenant, this requires the failure to maintain ordinary repairs, pay taxes, or pay interest on the mortgage by the life tenant or the lessee of a leasehold estate.Ameliorative wasteAmeliorative waste is an improvement to an estate that changes its character even if the change increases the lands value. Under English common law, when ameliorative waste occurs, the interested party can recover from the tenant the cost of restoring the land to its original condition. This is based on traditional law jurisprudence presuming that the grantor intended the property to be kept in its original condition.ExamplePerson A has a present life estate to three acres of land with a beautiful forest and his familys historic home. Person B is willed to inherit the estate after A dies. B loves studying ancestry and hopes to one day live in the historic building on his familys land. Instead, A decides that the land would be more valuable as a nightclub and draws up a business plan to transform the old estate into a new late night hotspot. B can sue A for ameliorative waste and get an injunction preventing the construction of the club. Even if the club is set to make money and the old family house is a valueless wreck in terrible condition, B still has a right to stop A from improving the property.If A does in fact build the club, then B can sue for the cost of demolishing the new structure and returning the land to its original condition.In the United States, damages for ameliorative waste are generally not given, especially if the improvement to the property is likely to last a long time. The policy behind this change in common law is to encourage improvements and economic development, even at the cost of historical change.ExceptionsThere is an exception to this doctrine where a long-term tenant makes a change that increases the value of the property in a way that reflects a change in the nature and character of neighboring properties. If a tenant tears down a house and builds a factory on property in an area in which residences have generally been replaced with industry, the tenant will not be liable for waste.In Malms v. Pabst Brewing Co., 79 N.W. 738, the Pabst Brewing companys plant encroached on a residential home. The owner of the home wanted to convert the land to commercial use but held an estate limiting the land to residential purposes. The court held that the neighboring properties had sufficiently changed the nature of the area and allowed the estate holder to convert the land despite the existence of potential ameliorative waste.Equitable wasteUnder law and law, equitable waste is waste that a life tenant has a right to commit at common law but is restrained by a of equity. This doctrine fits under the broader framework of equity, in which a legal right to do something is not so unrestrained that it is impossible to abuse that right. A life tenant who is granted an estate without impeachment of waste (may not be sued for waste) may not commit acts of flagrant destruction inconsistent with the fruitful use of the land. For example, a mansion may not be stripped of its glass, timber or pipes (Vane v Lord barnard), and trees of an ornamental value may be cut down by the life tenant (Turner v Wright).Remedies for wasteWhere a court finds that a tenant is engaging in waste, there are a number of possible remedies which can be taken:#The court may award sufficient money damages to compensate the injured party for the loss resulting from the waste.#The court may directly require the party responsible for the waste to restore the property to its original condition.#The court may accelerate the passage of title in the land, divesting a tenant or life estate holder of the property and vesting it in the landlord or remainderman.Kentucky has a particularly harsh remedy for voluntary waste. A person found to have committed voluntary waste without the written permission of the holder of the future interest is forced to pay damages to the holder of the future interest, and the persons present interest (whether a life estate or a lease) is automatically terminated.(Kentucky Revised Statutes Annotated  381.350 (2006).)Missouri has two statutes that prescribe a harsh remedies for waste. There, a person found to have committed voluntary waste without the written permission of the holder of the future interest holder is forced to pay treble damages. In some cases, the plaintiff has been able to recover triple damages twice--once for voluntary waste and again for wantonly committed waste.(Missouri Revisited Statutes 537.420; 537.490 (for wantonly committed waste))If the plaintiff can show that the defendant is currently engaged in voluntary or permissive waste of the land, the court may enjoin (or stop) the activity; however, courts are reluctant to enjoin ameliorative waste unless the property being destroyed has some unique historic value.References
2053824
Fountain_Valley_School_of_Colorado
Faculty~47Fountain Valley School of Colorado is a private, co-educational independent college preparatory school for students in the 9th through 12th grades. The Schools primary campus is located on  of rolling prairie at the base of the Mountains in Springs, Colorado. The School also owns and utilizes a 40 acre Mountain Campus located near Vista, Colorado. FVS is a member of Association of Boarding Schools, or TABS, and is home to the Carney Leadership Institute for teaching professionals. History FVS was founded in 1930 by Elizabeth Sage Hare, a wealthy New York native who moved to Colorado Springs in 1927 in hopes that the fresh air would help heal her husbands tuberculosis. Ms. Hare dreamed of creating a great progressive school in the West in the tradition of prestigious schools in the East, such as Old Farms in Connecticut. With the help of Colorado Springs entrepreneur and philanthropist Penrose, she convinced the schools first headmaster, Mitchell Froelicher to come West to start the school and commissioned architect Gaw Meem to use the Revival Style architecture model for its design. The site chosen for the School was a large ranch, known as Lay B Ranch, belonging to Palm Beach polo enthusiast Bradley, and the schools first building was Bradleys spectacular 1927 home designed by Mizner. The house was known as Casa Serena, and was surrounded by a polo field, stables, and some small residences for ranch hands. Hare purchased the Lazy B and all of its amenities for $150,000 in November 1929. The school opened as a boarding school for boys in September 1930. Original faculty members included Martin Brown, who taught science, S. Campbell (English), C. Josephs and C. Langdon (mathematics), Kitson (music), Dwight Perry (French), Robinson (art), and Froelicher himself, who taught history. Early funders, in addition to Hare and Penrose, included Hanna McCormick Simms, Alsop,  Hagner Holme, and Alfred Cowles.(Lavender, David. G. They Wrote Their Own Histories: Fountain Valley Schools First Seventy Years. Fountain Valley School 2000.)The school has had only seven headmasters in its 80+ year history: Froelicher served from 1930 to 1950 and was succeeded by B. Poor (19511958), Perry Jr. (19581978), Knox (19781987), S. Waples (19871995), E. Creeden (19952007), and current headmaster T. Larimer, who is also a 1969 graduate of the School. Mission FVS is dedicated to creating a rigorous college-preparatory curriculum in academics, athletics, and the arts. It seeks to serve motivated students within a close-knit and supportive community, which in turn endeavors to foster a lifelong love of challenge and learning in an environment of diversity and mutual respect, and to prepare adolescents to become individuals who are open-minded, curious, courageous, self-reliant and compassionate.(http://www.fvs.edu) Students and Faculty During the 2010-2011 academic year, FVS enrolled 260 students, 173 of whom were boarding students and 87 of whom were day students. Of those students, 48% were male and 52% were female. They hailed from 27 different states and 19 different countries, and 22% of them claimed permanent residence in a nation other than the United States. International students during the first decade of the 2000s matriculated from many diverse countries around the world, including Germany, Britain, Bulgaria, Hungary, Macedonia, Spain, Japan, Korea, Taiwan, Thailand, Arabia, Syria, Mexico, Canada, Guatemala, and Australia. 36% of students received some form of financial aid.During the same year, the School employed 47 faculty members, 36 of whom were full time, 27 of whom lived on campus, and 70% of whom held advanced degrees in their field.(See above) Outdoor and Equestrian Programs FVS is home to a world-class equestrian program and a spectacular 40 horse herd. Both English and Western riding programs are available, and students compete in everything from gymkhana to hunter-jumper shows. The school has a rich, nearly 80 year history in Western Riding and has garnered numerous national awards. Since the inception of the English riding program in 2003, student teams won an Equestrian Association national title twice, in both 2007 and 2010.The outdoor education program and the Western Immersion Program (WIP) are both part of the school curriculum and utilize the Mountain Campus throughout the school year. The outdoor education program sponsors overnight and day trips to the campus, and allows students to participate in rock climbing, mountain biking, and other mountain pursuits in place of a traditional NCAA sport or other extracurricular activity.WIP was established in 1996 to allow 10th graders to utilize the Western landscape for an interdisciplinary study experience. The sophomores head to the Mountain Campus every October to learn how the Western environment shaped the people, history, culture and region. The Mountain Campus also hosts student ski trips, biking trips and other outdoor adventures throughout the year. Athletics, Arts, and Extracurricular Activities The school sponsored 33 competitive athletic teams during the 2010-11 school year. Offerings include cross country, field hockey, golf, tennis, volleyball, basketball, swimming and diving, ice hockey, skiing and snowboarding, lacrosse, soccer, and track and field, in addition to the previously mentioned equestrian program and climbing and outdoor education programs.  Students interested in the performing arts can participate in any of the schools three annual productions, including the winter musical. The music program includes instruction in vocal and instrumental disciplines, with opportunities to participate in concerts, small ensemble performances and in statewide honor choirs and bands. The school also has a digital film studio.The schools Bedford Gallery hosts two student art exhibits each year to showcase art such as painting, ceramics and jewelry making. Academics In 2010, FVS offered more than 70 courses, including 19 Advanced Placement courses. Coursework can include anything and everything, from AP Government to photography to an ever-popular course devoted exclusively to the study of Shakespeare. Every night, Sunday through Thursday, boarding students are required to attend study hall from 7-10 pm where they are required to attend to their work. The first hour is closed study hour where students work quietly and independently. After a half-hour break, the rest of study hall is open  students have the option of quiet study time, group study, project work or faculty meetings. Student Life Students live in four residence halls that are composed of 10 houses (five boys houses and five girls houses). A house typically includes eight student rooms, a common area, kitchen and dining area, computer area, bathrooms and laundry facilities, as well as the houseparents office and residence.Two days in a six day rotation, the students and all faculty and staff join in the Lewis Perry Jr. Chapel to attend All-School, which is when announcements, events, and performances are made. Senior students have the opportunity to share a meaningful presentation with the community during this time as well. Students also participate in the annual interim program, which occurs during the first week of spring break. Interims allow students to explore their passions through experiential education. Past interim programs have included trips to foreign nations, such as China, Israel, The Baja Peninsula, France, The Bahamas, Great Britain, and Peru, as well as domestic trips such as The American Deep South and Photography in de Chelly. All freshmen participate in a locally based interim, through which they explore Colorados rich history in ranching, mining, and pioneering. Notable Alumni *Perry Barlow, digital rights activist and lyricist for the Grateful Dead*Chase, producer of The Amazing Race*Dourif (HBOs Deadwood and Lord of the Rings movie trilogy)*Dunne (Actress, appeared in Poltergeist)*Dunne*Fuller, former editor of the Paris Review*Goldwyn Jr.*Lane, director of the Museum of Art*Lemme of Broken Lizard Comedy Troop (starring in movies such as Troopers, Dread, and Beerfest)*Matisse (grandson to Matisse)*Ormes, director of NASAs Goddard Space Flight Center*Scribner, pioneer of kidney dialysis*Sherin, producer of & Order*Weir, a member of Grateful Dead References ( External links * Official Website* Boarding School Review - Fountain Valley School
2057338
CoolgardieEsperance_Highway
 The CoolgardieEsperance Highway is a 368 km Australian highway between Coolgardie and Esperance. It runs in a north-south direction linking the WAs Eastern Goldfields to the coast. The Coolgardie-Norseman stretch (National Highway 94) forms part of the Perth to Adelaide National Highway route and is the busier part of the highway with heavy interstate truck traffic. The interstate traffic continues eastwards via Highway from its junction in Norseman. From Coolgardie to Norseman it passes through arid mining country, mainly dotted with patches of gum trees, scrub and salt lakes. The Norseman-Esperance stretch is a part of Australias Highway 1. The scenery changes to wheatbelt with thicker stands of gum trees along the way as the climate gets wetter towards the coast.See also*in Australia*of highways in Western AustraliaHighway
2062699
Linden,_Guyana
Linden is the second largest town in Guyana after Georgetown, and capital of the Demerara-Berbice region, located at , altitude 48 metres (160 feet). It was declared a town in 1970, and includes the communities of MacKenzie and Wismar. It lies on the River and has a population of roughly 60,000. It is primarily a bauxite mining town, containing many mines 6090 metres deep, with many other pits now in disuse.Points of interestLinden is the largest urban centre in Guyana that does not have a university, since the of Guyana is located in Turkeyen, which is part of Greater Georgetown.The mining company runs a colonial-era guest house, with other hotels including the Summit Hotel and Starbonnet Bonnet Hotet.Schools in Linden include Mackenzie High School, established in 1946.HistoryThe three villages that made up Linden were previously known as Wismar-MacKenzie-Christianburg, but was renamed/unified in 1970 as a township under the name Linden by then President Linden Forbes Sampson Burnham, also known as Burnham, after himself.( http://www.guyanaundersiege.com/History/wismar/wismar%20page.htm) In 1964, Wismar was the site of the Massacre, where rioting targeted at the Indian minority also led to the widespread destruction of property. The disturbances started on Wednesday, May 20, escalating to murder on May 25th before the arrival of British troops on Tuesday, May 26.  During this period more than two hundred properties were destroyed by fire and more than fifty people reported physical assaults, including at least seven rapes. The riots also claimed five lives, R. Khan and P. Mirgin, Indian residents of Wismar were killed on May 25th, along with G. English, an alleged looter. B. Wharton died in a fire on May 27th, while I. Bridgewater was killed on the 28th(http://www.guyana.org/features/wismar_report.html REPORT OF THE WISMAR, CHRISTIANBURG AND MACKENZIE COMMISSION Wismar Comission Report , Georgetown, 29 January 1965.). The Massacre decreased the Indian population in Wismar, before the riots it was estimated at 3000. This fell to about 300 by the following July, as more than 3000 Indians were evacuated after the riots. The Massacre was triggered by the general climate of political and ethnic strife within Guyana in 1964. The murder of an African couple in Buxton on May 21st was the most recent violent event, in a extended period of unrest and is considered the trigger for the Massacre(.On Monday, July 6th, 1964 an explosion blew apart the Chapman launch as it sailed up the Demerara river from Georgetown to Mackenzie. Forty-three people died either due the explosion or drowned when the launch sank (http://www.kaieteurnewsonline.com/2009/07/05/remembering-son-chapman-four-decades-later/ Remembering Son Chapman four decades later News, Georgetown, 5 July 2009. ). Most of the thirty-three survivors(, including the entire crew, were those fortunate to be on the deck or bow ( http://www.kaieteurnewsonline.com/2010/07/07/%E2%80%98son-chapman%E2%80%99-victims-remembered-at-touching-ceremony/ Son Chapman victims remembered at touching ceremony News, Georgetown, 7 July 2010. ) when the boat exploded. The Sun Chapman exploded shortly after leaving Horadia( about sixteen miles from Mackenzie. By July 8th, thirty-two bodies were recovered from the river and taken to the Mackenzie Hospital morgue to be buried ( http://www.guyana.org/features/sun_chapman.html MEDICAL JOURNAL OF DR. DAVIES-WEBB WITH REFERENCE TO THE SINKING OF THE SUN CHAPMAN Wismar Comission Report, Georgetown, 22 July 1964. ). Some badly decomposed bodies were also buried at Horadia (. With forty-three fatalities, the sinking of the Sun Chapman is the single largest loss of Guyanese life. Most victims were Lindeners traveling home from Georgetown along the Demerara river. The river was commonly used for this journey before the Linden-Soesdyke highway was constructed in 1966. The explosion was caused by a bomb, but the persons responsible and the type of explosives used remains unknown, this has led to numerous theories about the bombing.ReferencesLinden websites*Guymine.com - Guymine.com is Lindens premier website*Linden Fund - Charitable fund focusing on Linden*Real Guyana - Only Guyanese Language website (non-English)*http://www.lib.utexas.edu/maps/americas/guyana_rel_1991.pdf(Guyana)(Guyana)(Guyana)(Gajana)ko:(Guyana)(Gujana)pt:Linden(Gvayn)
2066349
Gunge
Gunge as it is known in the Isles, or slime as it is known in America and other parts of the world is a thick, gooey, runny substance similar in consistency to paint. It has been a feature on many childrens programmes for many years around the world and has made appearances in game shows as well as other programming. While gunge mostly appears on television, it can also be used as a fundraising tool for charities, youth and religious groups. Gunge tanks have appeared at nightclubs and Fun Days. The British charities Relief and in Need, supported by the BBC, have used gunge for fundraising in the past. In most countries, being gunged is seen as a forfeit with the aim to cause embarrassment. In contrast, being slimed in America can be a good thing as well as a bad thing. Overall the main point of being gunged or slimed is to cause mess. Composition The gunge which is widely used on television is an industrial powder thickener called Natrosol.(Natrosol Hydroxyethylcellulose (HEC) is a non-ionic water-soluble ether, formed by reaction of cellulose with oxide.) In the UK the two main suppliers of gunge are Gungefactory and Fundraising Supplies. Alternatively, other items can be used for gunge, for example eggs, sauces, as well as other messy items, but Natrasol remains the official ingredient of gunge. In most cases, the gunging occurs in a gunge tank, a transparent booth with a means for storing and releasing the gunge. Today gunge or slime features on many television shows around the world; however, since the 2000s the focus has changed from mainstream shows to childrens and teenagers television programmes. In addition to be used on television and as a fundraiser, nightclubs sometimes feature a gunge tank. Youth groups such as church groups and scouting movements also make use of gunge to gunge the leaders as well as the children. Due to Natrasol having industrial uses as a food thickener, this makes gunge safe to eat, provided the colouring is also non-toxic. History of gunge on television  The 1960s In Britain the popular BBC show Only... But Also featured a closing sketch called Poets Corner in which that weeks guest would be challenged to an improvisational poetry contest against Peter Cook, with Dudley Moore acting as referee. Each contestant would sit at the corner of a square tank of BBC Gunge on a rigged seat that could be triggered so as to catapult the occupant into the tank. The referee would sit at one of the other corners in a similar chair. Any use of repetition, hesitation or deviation from the challenge theme would precipitate the offender into the tank. The sketch always ended with all three personalities in the tank, chest deep in slime and reciting poetry.19701979The UK Saturday morning childrens show Tiswas used the concept of gunge in abundance. Having already established messy slapstick humour through pies and buckets of water being thrown over presenters and guests, Tiswas had taken to locking up adult volunteers into a cage. Once inside the cage, the inhabitants would normally be soaked with buckets of water at random points in the show. Where gunge became involved, was thanks to the tin bath perched on top the Cage. Through a handle, this tub could be tilted, dropping its messy contents onto the people below, While famous for its custard pie humour, it would not be unusual for Tiswas to have buckets of food and imitation mud/horse manure poured over people. Custard and beans were popular choices.19801989In North America, Cant Do That on Television, a Canadian childrens show popular on Nickelodeon, routinely subjected its characters to gunge when they said, I dont know., or any other phrase related to slime, the colour, or pies. It became a staple of the show where other actors would try and encourage their peers to say a phrase to get them slimed. This aspect of the cult show later became iconized in Nickelodeons slime logo, and live events where kids would be offered the chance to get slimed or publicly humiliated. In Britain and Europe, in the early 1980s, childrens gunge-based game shows were the norm. Particularly shows like How Dare You! on ITV and Crackerjack on the BBC ensured that the gunging element featured on shows for the decade to come. On How Dare You!, one of the main games was Teach Them a Lesson, where children got the opportunity to drench their teacher or representative from their school in gunge while sitting above a knee deep filled gunge tank. After this game the teachers were sometimes knocked off their perch by one of shows presenters and into the gunge tank. On Crackerjack, the two weekly celebrities would compete against host Francis in a gunge based gamed called Take A Chance to try and win points for their child contestant. Usually the ladies (not always) got away with it but the male contestants were always gunged along with Francis who would cop it at least once per show.Later in the 1980s, the BBC launched Double Dare, based on the US style format, but much sloppier than its U.S. counterpart. Also, gunge started to appear on mainstream shows such as for a Laugh on ITV and Noel Edmonds Saturday Roadshow on the BBC.Other countries in Europe also started to have gunge elements on mainstream shows. Un Dos Tres on TVE in Spain often had contestants throwing buckets of gunge at each other. Also, Donnerlippchen, a television show in Germany, had many messy games; the climax of the show was dunking the teams suited boss in a dunk tank and pouring custard down inside every team members pair of boxer shorts.New Zealand childrens show Now has used gunge over the years since its launch in 1981. As of 2010 the show is still broadcasting on channel TV2. Various segments of the show using gunge include, tank of terror, gunge on the run, flushed away, frog in the bog and brain freeze.19901999In House Party, the public often voted to determine which celebrities on the television show would be gunged in the Gunge Tank. In later years, the Gunge Tank became the Gunge Train, and celebrities were forced to take a ride on the train and were covered in gunge throughout their journey. Celebrities usually returned with their suits ruined and faces unrecognizable. Sometimes audience members were gunged on the show for reasons of revenge by family members or friends.The entertainment factor attached to the process of gunging was realised by the producers of the charity event Comic Relief, who held an event, in cooperation with the World Records at the Exhibition Centre, Birmingham where an attempt to set a record for the Most People Gunged Simultaneously took place on March 12, 1999. 184 gallons of gunge was splattered over 731 people.All across Europe television producers were ordering more gunge segments to be fitted into mainstream television shows due to its popularity with viewers. In Germany, on Sat.1, Halli galli,(http://www.wunschliste.de/links.pl?s0269&p1) Glcksritter (RTL),(http://www.gameshowkult.de/ritter.htm) Glcksspirale,(http://www.gameshowkult.de/spiral.htm) plus the German version of NHP - Gottschalks Haus-Party, all involved a high dose of gunge. Halli Galli had audience members plucked out of their seats and sent down a messy gunge slide and into a pool. Likewise, Glcksspirale and Glcksritter had contestants plucked out of the audience and gunged in the most spectacular ways.Towards the end of the 1990s, with the demise of Noels House Party and the dwindling audience figures for other European shows, the gunge segment in many mainstream shows started to fade.Throughout the 1990s, gunge became a focal feature in many childrens television shows. Teenagers and celebrity guests are often seen competing in quizzes on & Kicking, and are gunged if they lose. Pop stars Ryan, Adams, Hill, Waters, Merry, Suttie and Hawkins were gunged on this show. Many other shows used gunge throughout - Fun House, Your Own Back, the Risk and Double Dare.From 1996 to 2001, The Dutch television show Droomshow featured gunge.20002009In mainstream television programmes during the noughties, gunge started to be featured less frequently. Paul OGrady Show sometimes featured a gunge tank on his 4 shows. The ITV reality television series a Celebrity...Get Me Out of Here! which ran throughout much of this decade regularly contained gungey elements in its Bushtucker Trials. The Norton Show featured Sploshing when the show was on TWO. Gunge featured on other shows on an irregular basis, but despite the loss of mainstream appeal gunge continued to feature on childrens Television.In 2000 a BBC childrens game show called Insides Out featured gunge throughout the programme, most notably pulling items out of a gunge filled nose and a tug of war involving intestine-like ropes over a pit of gunge. The final game, which consisted of an inflatable assault course representing the digestive system, during which gunge would drop at unexpected points while the contestants were going back and forth to pick up body pieces. The most regularly watched show containing a gunging was the Saturday Show, in which a child and an adult, normally Grant, would compete. If the grownup lost they got gunged and they would remain in the gunge tank the following week, while the child took home prizes, however if the child lost they got gunged instead and took home with them a certificate stating I Got GUNGED On The Saturday Show.Other kids programmes such as Xchange, Best of Friends and Diggin it also featured gunge or messy activities from time to time. and Dom in the Bungalow and & Stephens Saturday Showdown (previously Ministry of Mayhem) featured messy segments throughout the programmes, and a while ago Toonattik featured a gunge quiz known as make em squirm. In 2006, S4C introduced a kids show called Waaa!!! where kids are sat on a chair that moved along rails over tanks of gunge and foam and failing to answer a question correctly resulted in then being dropped into the gunge or foam. In 2007 there was a programme on CITV called Scratch and Sniffs den of doom featuring gunge, where children fall in to a vat of gunge similar to the Gunk Dunk on Your Own Back. Gunged has also appeared on Prank Patrol and Globo Loco. Throughout the second season of the CBBC show in the House, in order to claim prizes, the adult who had been tricked in that episode must have gunge dumped on them. This was known as Push the Pedal.New Zealand childrens show Now has retained a gunging element over the years. Modern day games involving gunge involves Flushed Away and brain freeze where two children sit under a giant gunged filled brain and every time a child gets a question wrong they are gunged. Recently there has been Frog In The Bog where a child wearing a wetsuit and flippers enters a pool of gunge with a frog spewing out gunge in to the pool. while in the pool the child has to collect items in the pool while being timed and deposit them into a nearby bucket. The idea is to collect as many items as possible before the time is up. Brain Freeze succeeded Frog in the Bog where two children sit under a giant brain and are paired up with a caller answering questions - for each wrong answer a child under the brain is gunged. The Tank of Terror was a big cylindrical tank, see through, and like a bath, it was quite big, and it would fill up with gunge, to about the chest of the person, who was seated.The 2008 remake of Swap Shop (Swap Shop) features gungey games. Question Line, a game where children ask the celebrity guest questions and if the celebrity chooses to answer it the child does not get gunged. If however, the celebrity chooses not to answer the question the child asking the question slides in to the gunge tank (a pool of gunge similar to the one on Waaa!!!). The children move as they are sitting in or lying across a rubber ring on a ramp with their legs hanging out on the gungeulator a red and white travelator. If the child does slide into the gunge tank then they have to move over and sit in the gunge tank until the game is over. Another game called Dunk Beds, is where there are 3 teams of 2 children, 1 is on a bed attached to a platform and the other child is off the bed. The child off the bed pushes the bed off along the platform , where along the platform are scoring zones. Up to a point, the points are negative then past a certain point, the points become positive until finally off the scale. If the bed goes off the scale the child on the end of the bed slides into a tank of green coloured water. 0 points are awarded if the child gets dunked. Each child from each team is on the bed once during the duration of the game. In the final Game, the final two children, left over from the previous game, play on a moving platform called the gungeulator collecting objects, avoiding obstacles, to get them back to the start of the gungeulator. If a child falls then he or she is automatically gunged and the child that is left continues the game. However, if the child left wins then prizes are awarded to both the children but if both children are gunged the game is over and no prized are awarded. These gungey games meant the return of gunge to Saturday morning childrens television in the UK. In the second series, broadcast early 2009, The question line and gungeulator segments no longer featured. The Gunge Gallery along with a tweaked dunk beds featured instead. The Gunge Gallery is five gunge tanks in a row in which children (members of a karate club, football team, etc.) sit in and after a swap has been completed a child is gunged. The gunge used was either very watered-down gunge or custard.The end of August 2009 saw a new gungey gameshow on CBBC on One. Wait for it..! sees four children trying to avoid being dropped in to the goo portal, a large orange pool of gunge. The idea is similar to ITVs Scratch and Sniffs Den of Doom. The twist is that the longer the children take to answer the questions, the more points are awarded. The person with the least number of points in the first round, wait is dropped from a drop zone into the goo portal. The second round, watch and wait sees the children the player is given a category and the player has to estimate many seconds of clue is needed to be said to be able to answer. Again, the more time, the more points will be won. If the player loses, another player can win the points if they can work out the answer with more of the clue being said. Another player falls into the goo portal via their drop zone if they have the least points. The third round, wait and see a head to head round and the player has to guess when the oppolment will come in with their answer. The player has a selection of times to choose from and a point is rewarded is the oppolment answers within the predicted time. Again the player with the least points enters the goo portal via their drop zone. The final round, wait a minute sees the remaining contestant try to win prizes on offer by trying to cross the goo portal in less than a minute. The player is asked questions which are descriptions of an object and for each correct answer the player is able to step across smaller drop zones. If the player makes it to the end within the 60 seconds, he/she wins the prizes (a star prize is awarded if the player crosses within 40 seconds) &mdash; if not the player falls into the goo portal when the platform which the player is standing on collapses.During Autumn 2009, three new CBBC shows called Planet Ajay, Keep Your Enemies Close and School of Silence launched with gungey segments. Playet Ajay has two gungey segments. The first being called Under Pressure, where three kids sit under a gunge tank and they are curried in order to relieve the planets pressure winning prizes in the order in which they were gunged. The second game called Beat Badjay is where a child goes head to head with Badjay over a dunk tank of gunge, answering general knowledge questions, If the child has the lowest score he/she is dunked in the gunge, or if Badjay has the lowest score he is gunged. In Keep Your Enemies close, the final round sees two groups of two children in mining carts playing along a track. Here questions are asked &mdash; a letter on the giant board and a category and the child must give two answers beginning with the letter for the question. The team the furthest along the track before it merges into a single track is the losers and the winning team pulls a lever sending the losing teams cart through the clag barrier. There is an overhead machine with three pipes filled with gunge or clag, as the teams cart moves along the track the clag is released from each of the pipes as the cart passes under them. Finally, School of Silence features messy games some involving gunge. There was no gunge tank, instead challenges such as gunge boot, where a child had to stick his/her foot into a Wellington boot of gunge.2010-PresentGunge continues to feature in 2010 on childrens TV in the UK. Wait For It and Keep Your Enemies Close all returned for new series. Later than usually shown, Swap Shop returned minus the gunge gallery but introducing a new game with a western theme called Gold Rush. In this game, the two winning teams from the previous game (dunk beds) take part in the game set in a mine shaft where the aim is to fill up tubes with liquid sludge by tipping buckets with the slop into the tubes which are hidden (so the children do not know who is winning). At the end the four kids take cover in the now shuddering mine shaft. The winning team then receives gold (yellow gunge) while the losing team were initially covered in brown sludge however later episodes they remain dry. In Zealand kids television, Now introduced a new gungey game the big breakfast and Splat CaveAutumn 2010 saw Fi Fo Yum, a show about giants launch on CBBC, a round challenge saw two children go barefoot into a bowl of gunge (Simalar to TMI) to collect objects for their team mates such as letters/numbers or other items. The final game also makes use of the gunge bowl, where the last part involves wading in the pool and up a ramp in order to release their captive team mates. A second series was launched in may 2011. In addition, the spin of of Horrible Histories, Histories: Gory Games involved a physical challenge involving gunge. The three children in the quiz running barefoot across an inflatable collecting poo and depositing it in their tanks at the other end. Above the inflatable are three containers - one for each lane of the inflatable, storing gunge which is released at points in the game. References 
2068758
Bacnotan,_La_Union
 footnotes                Bacnotan is a first class municipality in the province of Union, Philippines. According to the 2007 census, it has a population of 38,743 people in 7,183 households. Ilocano is the language spoken. English and Filipino are the languages used in government and business while English is the medium of instruction in the schools.Economic activities in Bacnotan mostly involve farming, fishing, bee-keeping, pebble extraction, tourism and Portland cement manufacture. Bacnotan is the seat of the beekeeping industry in La Union. A mining engineer from Bacnotan who saw the limestone deposits in Dumarang (renamed Quirino) also saw deposits of coal and traces of gas. Schools in Bacnotan include the Mariano Marcos Memorial State University, the North Provincial High School (now Bacnotan National High School), the Bacnotan Elementary School, other elementary schools located in various barangays, and a prep school operated by the United Church of Christ in the Philippines in Bacnotan.BarangaysBacnotan is politically subdivided into 47 barangays. Below is a list of these barangays and their respective populations as of 2007.Geography and climateBacnotan is located at 12017E 1642N. It is bounded on the north by Balaoan, on the east by San Gabriel, on the south by San Juan, and on the west by the China Sea. The western side of Bacnotan faces the China Sea and has a long stretch of black sand beaches, indicating a large amount of magnetite. Some portions of the seashore have pebble and limestone deposits. The beaches stretching about 16 kilometers are suitable for fishing, boating, swimming, snorkeling, diving and surfing.Although San Juan is a favorite place among serious surfers, the waves in Quirino have been discovered to be likewise excellent for surfing. The Baroro River, located at the southern boundary of Bacnotan, provides fresh water fishing, aquaculture farming and recreation.Climate in Bacnotan is dry from November to May and wet from mid-May to October. The southwest monsoon brings an abundant rainfall experienced during the wet season. The relatively dry season is caused by the northeast monsoon passing over the Mountain Range. Average temperature is 27.21 C.HistoryThe town of Bacnotan was formally founded in 1599 as part of Sur. In 1785, during the administration of the Governor-General Jose Basco, Bacnotan became a part of Pangasinan. When Union was created in 1850, Bacnotan was one of the 12 towns that formed the province.In the past, Bacnotan was only a vast expanse of wilderness inhabited by natives with a rudimentary form of government. There was a time when it was ruled by a despotic chieftain who had absolute control over all his constituents. Disobedience to his directives meant severe flogging of the culprit. After several years under the tyrannical rule of the chieftain, the people successfully overthrew him and flogged their chieftain to death. The word basnutan means flog in the local dialect, and become a byword among the inhabitants, hence the name of the town. During the Spanish period, the name of the town was changed from basnutan to Bacnotan as shown by documents which are still kept intact at the National Archives in Manila.The towns history is linked with the deeds of heroic men who fought, bled, and died for their own native land. At the turn of the century, during the War, Dumarang (now known as Quirino), was a scene of carnage and plunder.In December 1941, during War II, the first organized resistance against the Japanese invaders that landed in the north in their advance southward to Manila was at Barrios Baroro and Bacsil. On January 4, 1945, the tides of war changed in La Union as Filipino and American soldiers captured in Baroro Bridge in the town of Bacnotan, a strategic bridge that connects the rest of Northern Luzon to San Fernando. The victory ensured the liberation of La Union by joint Filipino and American troops at the end in War II. It was followed by the historic Battle of San Fernando and Bacsil Bridge.After the war, Bacnotan became the provisional seat of provincial government. San Fernando was then in ruins. As a consequence of this transfer, the La Union National High School was also moved to Bacnotan. When things went back to normal, the provincial government was again moved to San Fernando and the La Union National High School followed afterwards. The transfer of the provincial high school in Bacnotan resulted in the establishment of the North Provincial High School (now Bacnotan National High School.)In 1949, the vast mineral deposits of limestone used in cement production were noticed in Barrio Dumarang (now Quirino) by a mining engineer who was then a municipal councilor at that time. Because of the desire to create economic activity, the municipal council, through the efforts of this mining engineer, invited potential investors to set up a Portland cement plant. Within a year, a cement plant called Cebu Portland Cement (CEPOC), was established. On May 11, 1957, the CEPOC, a government-owned corporation, was sold to the privately-owned Bacnotan Consolidated Industries (BCI). BCI is the manufacturer of Union Cement. In 2004, BCI was sold to Holcim Cement.On June 18, 1960, the La Union Agricultural School (now the Mariano Marcos Memorial State University) was established. Nestling at the foot of the mountains of Barangay Sapilang, the agricultural school progressed and was later named Don Mariano Marcos Memorial State University. Its campus occupies an area of about 6 square kilometers.Notable personalities from BacnotanBacnotan has produced notable personalities in various endeavors. Some of them are as follows:;Ambassador Erlinda Fadera-Basilio: Ambassador and Permanent Representative of the Philippines to the United Nations and Other International Organizations in Geneva, Switzerland. She was elected as the first woman Vice President of the UN Human Rights Council.  She also holds the position of Undersecretary for Policy at the Philippine Department of Foreign Affairs. She is a founding member of the English Speaking Union (ESU), Philippines Chapter. :Among the honors she has received include the DFA Ladies Foundation Award in 1997; Outstanding Sigma Alphan Award in 2004; outstanding Zambaleno award by the Union Zambaleno during its Centennial celebration in 2006;  the Gawad Mabini Award with the rank of Grand Cross conferred by the Secretary of Foreign Affairs in 2007; the Order of Lakandula conferred to her by the President of the Philippines in 2007, and the Order of Sikatuna, rank of Datu (gold distinction) conferred to her by the President of the Philippines in June 2010. :She is a resident of Raois and a product of Bacnotan Elementary School (19511957), the North Provincial High School (19571960), and the University of the Philippines in Diliman, Quezon City (1965 and 1990).;Fr. Bienvenido F. Nebres: The longest-serving university president of Ateneo de Manila University; member of the board of trustees of Georgetown University, Regis University, the Asian Institute of Management (where he sits as Vice-Chair), and other colleges and universities in the Philippines. Founding President of the Mathematical Society of the Philippines in 1972; one of the founding officers of the Southeast Asian Mathematical Society (SEAMS) also in 1972. :He is a resident of Poblacion and studied at the Bacnotan Elementary School, and then moved to Christ the King College in San Fernando, La Union.;Dr. Augusto A. Litonjua: Founder and first Filipino president of Philippine Association for the Study of Overweight and Obesity (PASOO, 1994). He is called the father of Philippine Endocrinology. :He was born and raised in Poblacion and is a product of the University of the Philippines and Harvard.;Fr. Adolfo N. Dacanay, S.J.: The chair of the Theology Department of the Ateneo de Manila University and a member of the Society of Jesus. He is also an officer of the Canon Law Society of the Philippines.ReferencesExternal links*Pasyalan La Union*Philippine Standard Geographic Code*1995 Philippine Census Information*2000 Philippine Census Information*2007 Philippine Census Informationde:BacnotanLa Unionit:BacnotanLa Unionnl:BacnotanLa UnionLa Unionvi:BacnotanLa Union
2071283
Denver_Mint
 refnum          72000270()200px|thumb|right|The Denver Mint in a May 1972 photographThe Denver Mint is a branch of the States Mint that struck its first coins on February 1, 1906.(United States Mint at Denver Celebrates 100 Years of Change The United States Mint. Retrieved Jun 20, 2009.) The mint is still operating and producing coins for circulation, as well as sets and coins. Coins produced at the Denver Mint bear a D mark (not to be confused with the mark of the Mint). The Denver Mint is the single largest producer of coins in the world.HistoryThe predecessors of the Denver Mint were the men of Gruber and Company. During the Peak Gold Rush, they coined gold dust brought from the gold fields by the miners. For almost three years, they minted gold coins (186061) and ingots (1862). They were formally bought by the US Treasury in 1863.  Established by an of Congress on April 21, 1862, the United States Mint at Denver opened for business in late 1863 as a United States Office. Operations began in the facilities of Clark, Gruber and Company, located at 16th and Market Streets and acquired by the government for $25,000.Unlike Clark, Gruber and Company, though, the Denver plant performed no coinage of gold as first intended. One reason given by the Director of the Mint for the lack of coinage at Denver was, ... the hostility of the Indian tribes along the routes, doubtless instigated by rebel emissaries (there being a Civil War) and bad white men.Gold and nuggets brought to there by miners from the surrounding area were accepted by the Assay Office for melting, assaying, and stamping of cast bars. The bars were then returned to the depositors as imparted bars stamped with the weight and fineness of the gold. Most of the gold came from the rich beds of placer gold found in the streams and first discovered in 1858, the same year Denver was founded.When the supply of gold was exhausted from the streams, the emphasis turned to lode mining, uncovering veins of ore with a high percentage of gold and silver. By 1859, the yearly value of the gold and silver deposited at the Assay Office was over $5.6 million. During its early years as an Assay Office, the Denver plant was the citys most substantial structure.The United States Treasury did not expand its smelting and refining operations at the same rate as the discovery and production of gold. In 1872 a group of businessmen led by Hiram Bond (formerly one of the largest brokers on the York Gold Exchange), Joseph Miner and Denver Mayor E. Bates set up a firm Smelting and Refining Works which built an independent complementary plant which processed ore into ingots which were then assayed, weighed and stamped by the Denver Mint. There was new hope for branch mint status when Congress provided for the establishment of a mint at Denver for gold and silver coin production. The site for the new mint at West Colfax and Delaware streets was purchased on April 22, 1896, for approximately $60,000. Construction began in 1897.Appropriations to complete and equip the plant were insufficient, and the transfer of assay operations to the new building were delayed until September 1, 1904. Coinage operations finally began in February 1906, advancing the status of the Denver facility to Branch Mint. In addition, before the new machinery to be used at the Mint was installed for use, it was first sent to the Louis Exposition of 1904 for display. Silver coins were minted in Denver for the first time in 1906. During the first year, 167 million coins were produced, including $20 gold (eagle) coins, $10 gold (eagle) coins, $5 gold (half eagle) coins, and assorted denominations of silver coins.The mint in popular culture*The Denver Mint is featured in the 1993 Stallone film Cliffhanger, as the production point of the money stolen in the film, and the departure point for the plane.*The rock group Eat World mentions the mint in the title of their song Lucky Denver Mint.References*Public domain text from the US Treasury DeptExternal links*The U.S. Mint*Tour information at the Denver MintMint
2076493
Bob_Schaffer
 religion  Robert Warren Bob Schaffer (born July 24, 1962) was a Republican member of the States House of Representatives from the State of Colorado in the 105th Congress and the two succeeding Congresses (January 3, 1997 to January 3, 2003). In 2004, Schaffer lost in the election to be the Republican nominee for a Senate seat. He was also a candidate for Colorados other Senate seat in the 2008 election, which he lost to Senator Udall.BiographyBob Schaffer was born in Ohio and attended Moeller High School. The son of public-school teachers, Schaffer worked his way through college as a farm hand. In 1984, he graduated from the of Dayton with a B.A. in Political Science. He was later awarded an honorary doctorate in Management from Technical University.Prior to entering politics, Schaffer held a variety of jobs, including carpet layer, lifeguard, salmon cannery worker, legislative researcher, speechwriter, and small business owner. From 1989 to 1995, he owned and operated Northern Front Range Marketing and Distribution, a small marketing business serving Colorados tourism industry.Colorado State SenatorSchaffer served for nine years as a Colorado Senator in the General Assembly. Schaffer was only 25 years old in 1987 when he was appointed to finish Colorado State Senator Jim Beattys term, making Schaffer the youngest to serve in Colorados Senate. As a Colorado Senator, he was Chairman of the Finance Committee, the State Veterans and Military Affairs Committee, and the Local Government Committee. Schaffer also was the Vice-Chairman of the Senate Education Committee. Schaffer was awarded the National Republican Legislator of the Year for 1995 by the National Republican Legislators Association.  In 1993, Schaffer made headlines when he removed a display from the Capitolthat was in clear view of visiting childrenthat contained pamphlets describing unsafe sexual practices. (Durango Herald: Scrappy style, family values help drive Bob Schaffer)U.S. CongressmanSchaffer was first elected to Congress in November 1996 representing 4th congressional district, succeeding Allard and Brown.Congressional highlights*Schaffer introduced the proposed Budget Amendment to the Constitution.*Schaffer was selected by his freshman colleagues to be president of the 1996 Republican class.*He served on three House Committees: Agriculture, Resources, and Education and Labor.*He was an advocate for Ukraine and was a co-chair of Ukraine Caucus.*He was a member of the GOP Theme Team, the one-minute conservative debate squad, which can be seen nearly every morning on C-Span.*He was an active member of the Study Committee (RSC), a caucus of House Republicans organized to promote a conservative social and economic agenda.Schaffer served three terms in Congress, fulfilling the three term pledge he made during his first Congressional campaign.(Rep. Bob Schaffer to retire - Undefined Section) Schaffer upheld his pledge in spite of pleas from national Republicans and President W. Bush to run for another term.(http://www.fortcollinsnow.com/article/20080328/NEWS/999211030)  He was succeeded by Musgrave in January 2003.Post-2002 careerSchaffer is currently vice-president for business development at Aspect Energy, LLC., where he is involved in a variety of energy, mining and education projects. He served as president of the Parental Alliance for Choice in Education, a corporation promoting choice reform in Colorados education system, and is active in the states transformation to a market-driven education system. Schaffer is a trustee of University.(Yorktown University (Trustees)) He is also Chairman of the Leadership Program of the Rockies, a Colorado group providing political organizational training.(http://leadershipprogram.org/board/) Schaffer was also an opinion columnist for the now-defunct Northern Colorado Courier. In March 2005, Schaffer was elected National Committeeman for Colorado. Schaffer was appointed to fill a vacancy on the State Board of Education by a party vacancy committee, representing a district that is coterminous with the states Fourth Congressional District. He successfully ran for the seat in 2006, against Democrat Griggs. Schaffer is the Chairman.He is the Colorado Chairman of the Judicial Confirmation Network.In 2006, Bob Schaffer founded Dreamsoft Colorado, LLC,(Dreamsoft, Chicago - top quality web design services and products across the globe) a firm that creates high-end interactive websites for business and political clients. He is also the President of AMDG LLC.2004 U.S. Senate raceIn 2004, Schaffer contended for the Republican nomination to the U.S. Senate after incumbent Republican Nighthorse Campbell chose not to run for re-election. Brewing magnate Coors opposed Schaffer. Coors entered the bitter primary battle after Schaffer faced down potential contenders such as Liniger, founder of ReMax. The nomination battle concluded when Coors won the Republican nomination over Schaffer with 61% of the vote. Coors went on to lose to Democratic candidate, and eventual U.S. Senator Salazar in the 2004 General Election. http://www.cbsnews.com/stories/2004/04/12/politics/main611406.shtml?sourcesearch_story2008 U.S. Senate electionSchaffer was the Republican nominee for the open seat of retiring Senator Allard. He lost to Udall, the Democratic nominee.On May 9, 2007, Schaffer filed his official statement of candidacy with the Federal Elections Commission. On May 12, 2007, he made an official announcement in Boulder that he would run for U.S. Senate to a group of over 150 Republicans attending a fundraising event.(Former Rep. Schaffer says hell run for Allards seat : Politics : The Rocky Mountain News)On September 28, 2008, Udall and Schaffer appeared on the Presss Senate Debate series, discussing the proposed bailout of the U.S. financial system.(Senate candidates debate the bailout Meet the Press, September 28, 2008, video)Political positionsSchaffers positions on various issues are(http://www.bobschafferforsenate.com/index.php?cissues):*Growing a stronger economy by lowering the tax burden on all Americans and curbing wasteful federal spending.*Achieving energy independence by broadening the incentives, research and investment in renewable energy science, production, conservation and improved development of American-based conventional energy resources.*Protecting the environment.*Reforming education.*Strong national defense by maintaining the best-equipped, best-trained and most professional military in the world.*Creating a 21st century health care system, by ensuring users can make their own choices, not have a government worker or an insurance agent interfering in their relationship with their doctor.* Promoting Colorado agriculture and fighting for Colorado water rights.Political oppositionIn 2008, the League of Conservation Voters named Schaffer a member of its Dirty Dozen because of an anti-environmental record during his tenure in Congress.(League of Conservation Voters Names Former U.S. Rep. Bob Schaffer to 2008 Dirty Dozen) In 2001, then-congressman Schaffer, voted for President Bushs energy plan that Democrats argued was a $33 billion gift to the oil corporations.(Thanks, Bob ad spawns spoof. Rocky Mountain News)  Republicans argued that the bill would help reduce Americas dependence on foreign oil.(G.O.P. Energy Bill Is Likely to Set Off Fierce Policy Fight. New York Times)Endorsements*Grand Junction Daily Sentinel on October 9, 2008 (http://www.gjsentinel.com/hp/content/news/opinion/stories/2008/10/09/101008_6A_Schaffer_edit.html)*The Pueblo Chieftain on October 17, 2008 (http://www.bobschafferforsenate.com/index.php?cpress.open&id34&p1)Link to the Jack Abramoff ScandalsSchaffer was linked to the Mariana Islands worker abuse scandal by his association with the Values Coalition.  The organization was used by Abramoff to pay for the trip of the then-Congressman to visit the island.  The Post reported that the TVC paid the $13,000 travel bill for the trip, organized by Abramoffs lobbying firm.()Abramoffs lobbying team would prepare questions and factual backup for friendly lawmakers. Trips to the island for congressmen and staff would be a key tool to build permanent friends, the memo said.The congressional junkets to the Mariana Islands were designed to build support in Congress among Republican lawmakers to block labor and immigration legislation for the islands, which had been found to harbor squalid working conditions and abusive labor practices, including prostitution and forced abortions.(Schaffer claimed that he spoke with local clergy who denied there was a problem of forced abortions in the Northern Marianas,(foes assail candidate for Senate, Denver Post; 04/22/2008.) the only area of the United States where abortion is banned by their local constitution.(frankenlies.com :: Forced Abortions in Saipan garment factories ?)(Article I, CNMI Constitution) After his return from the islands, Schaffer used his position on the Resources Committee to attack reports of abuses on the islands.(Michael Riley, Schaffer, lobbyist strategies meshed, Denver Post; 4/12/2008.)During his 2008 Senate campaign, Schaffer suggested that the Northern Marianas guest worker program might serve as a model for U.S. national immigration policy, stirring further controversy.(Tricky issue of immigration played down. Denver Post) Schaffer was particularly impressed with their pre-qualifying foreign workers before they were allowed to immigrate to the CNMI. According to a 1998 World magazine article that mainly sourced Andrea Sheldon of the TVC, some argued that the issues of the Northern Marianas labor, wage, and immigration laws are simply attacks by U.S.-based labor unions who are attempting to eliminate competition.(Micromanaging Micronesia? Playing politics with persecution, World Magazine; April 18, 1998.) Schaffer told the Denver Post, The workers were smiling; they were happy.(Michael Riley, Abramoff ties cloud Schaffers 99 fact-finding trip; Denver Post.) Schaffer also downplayed criticism from pro-life organizations that he participated in Abramoffs lobbying strategy to protect the sweatshop system by arguing, In five days, I did not observe a forced abortion or meet anybody who had any knowledge of them.(ReferencesExternal links*Bob Schaffer for U.S. Senate campaign website *Scott Political, political consulting and ad firm used during his campaign*Profile at SourceWatch Congresspedia*Colleen M. McCorkell, Guide to the Papers of Congressman Bob Schaffer from State University*Ukraine.Com*Candidate Bio and Info at votimus.com*Kathryn Jean Lopez, Go Orange! National Review, November 30, 2004, interview about Ukraine elections*AP, Salazar Defeats Coors for Colorado Senate Seat USA Today, November 2, 2004*Staff, Purple People Watch American Prospect, July 14, 2004*Josh Hardin, Rep. Bob Schaffer to Retire The Rocky Mountain Collegian, November 27, 2001Schaffer
2079997
STATISTICA
STATISTICA is a statistics and analytics software package developed by StatSoft. STATISTICA provides data analysis, data management, data mining, and data visualization procedures. STATISTICA product categories include  Enterprise (for use across a site or organization), Web-Based (for use with a server and web browser), Concurrent Network Desktop, and Single-User Desktop. History STATISTICA originally derives from a set of software packages and add-ons that were initially developed during the Mid 1980s by StatSoft. Following the 1986 release of CSS (Complete Statistical System) and the 1988 release of MacSS (Macintosh Statistical System), the first DOS version of STATISTICA (trademarked in capitals as STATISTICA) was released in 1991.  In 1992, the Macintosh version of STATISTICA was released. STATISTICA 5.0, was released in 1995 which automatically configured itself for new 32-bit Windows 95/NT or the older version of Windows (3.1) and featured a large number of new statistics and graphics procedures, a word-processor-style output editor of unlimited capacity (combining tables and graphs), and a built-in professional development environment that enabled the user to easily design new procedures (e.g., via the included, comprehensive STATISTICA Basic language) and integrate them with the STATISTICA system.STATISTICA 5.1 was released in 1996 followed by STATISTICA 97 and STATISTICA 98 editions.In 2001, STATISTICA 6 was based on the COM architecture and high-end technologies (such as multithreading and support for computing).STATISTICA 9 was released in 2009, supporting 32 bit and 64-bit computing.The most recent release of STATISTICA is STATISTICA 10 (release was announced in November 2010). This release features further performance optimizations for the 64-bit CPU architecture, as well as advanced multithreading technologies, integration with Microsoft Sharepoint, Office 2010 and other applications, the ability to generate Java and C# code, and other GUI and kernel improvements.(Localized versions of STATISTICA (including the entire STATISTICA family of products) are available in Chinese (both Traditional and Simplified), Czech, English, French, German, Italian, Japanese, Polish, Russian, and Spanish. STATISTICA documentation is available in Arabic, Chinese, Czech, English, French, German, Hungarian, Italian, Japanese, Korean, Polish, Portuguese, Russian, Spanish, and other languages.Release historyList of releases: (StatSoft Company History)* PsychoStat - 1984* Statistical Supplement for Lotus 1-2-3 - 1985* StatFast/Mac - 1985* CSS 1 - 1987* CSS 2 - 1988* MacSS - 1988* STATISTICA/DOS - 1991* STATISTICA/Mac - 1992* STATISTICA 4.0 - 1993* STATISTICA 4.5 - 1994* STATISTICA 5.0 - 1995* STATISTICA 5.1 - 1996* STATISTICA 5.5 - 1999* STATISTICA 6.0 - 2001* STATISTICA 7.0 - 2004* STATISTICA 7.1 - 2005* STATISTICA 8.0 - 2007* STATISTICA 9.0 - 2009* STATISTICA 9.1 - 2009* STATISTICA 10.0 - 2010OverviewSTATISTICA is a suite of analytics software products and solutions provided by StatSoft. The software includes an array of data analysis, data management, data visualization, and data mining procedures; as well as a variety of predictive modeling, clustering, classification, and exploratory techniques.(STATISTICA Product Overview) Additional techniques are available through integration with the free, open source R programming environment.(Christian H. Weiss Commercial meets Open Source: Tuning STATISTICA with R R-Project. March 2008.)(StatSoft Certifies REvolution Computing R Language HPCwire. December 2008.)Different packages of analytical techniques are available in six product lines: (1) Desktop, (2) Mining, (3) Enterprise, (4) Web-Based, (5) Connectivity and Integration Solutions, and (6) Power Solutions.(According to Annual Data Miner Survey in 2010: (Karl Rexer, Heather Allen, & Paul Gearan (2010) 2010 Data Miner Survey Summary, presented at Predictive Analytics World, Oct. 2010.)* STATISTICA Data Miner along with IBM Modeler and R) received the strongest satisfaction ratings as a mining tool in both 2010 and 2009; moreover, it was rated as the primary data mining tool chosen most often (18%).* STATISTICA Text Miner was rated as the top used mining software (19%). Graphics STATISTICA includes analytic and exploratory graphs in addition to standard 2- and 3-dimensional graphs. Brushing actions (interactive labeling, marking, and data exclusion) allow for investigation of outliers and exploratory data analysis. User interface Operation of the software typically involves loading a table of data and applying statistical functions from pull-down menus or (in versions starting from 9.0) from the ribbon bar. The menus then prompt for the variables to be included and the type of analysis required. It is not necessary to type command prompts. Each analysis may include graphical or tabular output and is stored in a separate workbook. See also * of statistical packages* StatSoft References  Further reading * * Hill, T., and Lewicki, P. (2007). STATISTICS Methods and Applications. Tulsa, OK: StatSoft. WEB: http://www.statsoft.com/textbook/* Nisbet, R., Elder, J., and Miner, G. (2009). Handbook of Statistical Analysis and Data Mining Applications. Burlington, MA: Academic Press (Elsevier).*  External links * STATISTICA Homepage* Electronics statistics textbook online Textbookde:Statisticafr:Statisticaid:STATISTICApl:STATISTICApt:Statisticaru:Statisticauk:Statistica
2083845
Basud,_Camarines_Norte
 footnotes                Basud is a 4th class municipality in the province of Camarines Norte, Philippines. According to the 2000 census, it has a population of 33,885 people in 6,508 households.HistoryHistory relates that in the year 1661 when Spaniards landed on this soul, they noticed and found people were living in clusters of deltas separated by creeks. Having in mind of the situation, the colonizers named the BASUD means deltas.Ancestors revealed that the town of Basud was founded in the year 1783, the first site which was in Pinagwarasan, then later to Nepu, a nearby sitio of the present proper.The town of Basud remained independent until 1904, having fused to the nearby municipality of Daet for lack of funds for the maintenance of its operations. By virtue of Executive Order No. 114 in 1908, Basud was restored to its original status as an independent municipality.Original founders of the town were Bartolome Quiones and Florencia Era, both of whom belonged to a well-to-do family, they commanded the respect of the people.The Spaniards ruled and guided the people of Basud with the local government headed by well known Capitanes del Pueblo. Prominent among them were Paulino Quiones and Maximo Flores.History recalls that in the year 1902, a civil form of government was established with Antonio Quiones as president, while Exequiel Era was the first elected president in the year 1908 when Basud was separated from Daet to form an independent municipality. From then, Basud had been administered by different elected officials even before the commonwealth regime up to the Philippines became a Republic in 1946. It is believed that the town is the oldest municipality in the province of Camarines Norte if not in then Ambos Camarines.Geographical LocationThe municipality of Basud lies on the southern most point of Camarines Norte bounded by mountains that separate the province from the Province of Camarines Sur, it is situated at 122 57.34 longitude and 1404 latitude. On the western boundary is the municipality of San Lorenzo Ruiz, while on the northern portion is bounded by the municipality of Daet and the municipality of Mercedes and the shore of San Miguel bay on the eastern portion.Political SubdivisionsAt present, Basud is composed of 29 barangays after Poblacion was divided into two on June 6, 1988 thru the effort of municipal  Mayor Silverio F. Quiones Jr.Land areaThe municipality has a total land area of 26,028 hectares representing about 11.59 percent of the total land area of the province.Size, Growth Rates, and Distribution of BarangaysPopulationThe municipality population is unevenly distributed to its 29 barangays and varies in terms of population sizes and growth rates. I can be noted that those barangays along the national road recorded the highest population share. In 2007 San Felipe recorded a population share of 8.63%, Barangay Poblacion 1 and Matnog followed with 8.02% and 7.79%, respectively. Binatagan has the least population with 295 or 0.80% of the total population. *Angas	        997*Bactas	        1,152*Binatagan	295*Caayunan	1,302*Guinatungan	786*Hinampacan	686*Langga	        821*Laniton	1,440*Lidong	        455*Mampili	1,046*Mandazo	679*Mangcamagong	1,446*Manmuntay	668*Mantugawe	952*Matnog	        2,864*Mocong	        848*Oliva	        844*Pagsangahan	1,385*Pinagwarasan	1,019*Plaridel	1,060*Poblacion 1	2,949*Poblacion 2	2,598*San Felipe	3,172*San Jose	933*San Pascual	1,531*Taba-Taba	571*Tacad	        1,026*Taisan	        1,270*Tuaca	        1,568Economic ProfileAgricultureThe municipalitys lands, which are devoted to agriculture, have an approximate area of 12,086.60 hectares or 47.38% percent of the municipalitys total land area. The municipality is producing three major agricultural crops. Coconut land occupies the largest area that has 10,324 hectares. Rice land, which has the second largest area with 627.10 hectares irrigated and 254 hectares rainfed. The third is 586 hectares planted to pineapple. Other crops are seasonal crops and are being for family consumption only. CropsCopra is known to be the chief product and the main source of income of the municipality. Coconut by-products such as brooms, baskets, charcoal and even soap making are the traditional sources of income of the people. The second major product of the municipality is palay, which is harvested twice a year in irrigated areas of 627.10 hectares, which has an average yield of 80 cavans per cropping of 74.24 MT per year. Rainfed areas are being harvested once a year with 60 cavans per hectare per cropping or 17.04 MT per year and even lesser in times of calamities and drought. Pineapple, which lately bloomed in production due to the government assistance on crop loan, has made farmers to plant most of the coco-based areas. It occupies an area of 586 hectares. Pineapple production is usually 18 to 20 months before it can be harvested. Livestock/PoultryThe present livestock production is primarily on small-scale basis with mostly backyard farming except those who produce broilers, which range from 100 to 300 birds. Poultry such as native chicken are usually few in numbers per farmer and subsist on stray grain and grasses. Pest and diseases often attack the birds, thus dwindle the stock and produces low quality chickens. Hogs are also a backyard activity. There are usually 1 to 2 stocks per farmer. The housing is built of light local materials. Breeding and inter-breeding with poor quality species results to a smaller and slower hog variety. Farmers cannot afford to have high quality breed because of high capital including the high cost of feeds and the risk in raising this kind of variety, thus diminishing the margin of profit. Fisheries          The municipality has two coastal barangays namely: Taba-taba and Mangcamagong situated along the cost of San Miguel Bay. Most of the fishermen here are sustenance fishermen with limited fishing paraphernalia and few own fishing boats of three tons gross and less. Fish caught in this area are customarily brought and hauled in Mercedes since most of these fishermen have consignment deals with fish dealers. Few are sold in Basud town proper through rigaton. The necessity to improve the road and market facilities will possibly change the trend of fish marketing here in Basud. Likewise, fishermen themselves could directly market their catch to Manila and command a higher price without so much cost on fuel. CommerceThe municipality of Basud significantly improved for the last ten years in terms of commerce. The municipal officials focused their attention at the municipality public market as the center of commerce. It was established in the year 1990 seven fresh fish stalls, meat stalls, vegetables stalls, dried fish stalls, sari-sari stores, agricultural stall, hardware, drugstore, bakery and dry good stall. Study reveals that occupants vacated their stalls due to poor or lack of patronage on the part of the people and an insufficient capital on the part of the stallholders. Other Industries*DIATOMACEOUS EARTH (White Clay)The municipality is rich in mineral resources such as earth (DE) or commonly called white clay. This is one of the income generating industries of the municipality. This non-metallic mineral can be found in barangays Caayunan, San Pascual, Oliva and San Felipe. It has a total approximate reserve of 1,289,600 metric tons. *GRAVEL AND SANDThe municipality has a viable source of sand and gravel. The Bactas River located in Pagsangahan and Oliva is a source of mixed gravel and coarse aggregate. It is being extracted by mining concessionaries. Matnog is another source of construction aggregates including sand that is being extracted by the barangay people. *TRANSPORTATION         Land transportation is the primary means of transporting people, goods and services from the barangay to the town proper of Basud. While sea transport is being used by the municipalitys two coastal barangays, namely: Taba-taba and Mangcamagong, they often use during summer as an alternative route to the fishing town of Mercedes. *ROADS       The municipal proper is being linked to its different barangays by the municipalitys two major roads, namely the Maharlika Highway and the Mangcamagong provincial road. The Maharlika highway has a total length of 25.50 kilometers stretching from the boundary of the municipality of Daet to the Camarines Norte - Camarines Sur boundary. The Mangcamagong provincial road has a total length of 9.46 kilometers, stretching from the municipal boundary of Basud and Mercedes to the junction of Maharlika highway. The municipality has a total road network of 138.057 kilometers composed of 25.50 kilometers of national highway and 23.16 kilometers of provincial roads including 83.481 kilometers of barangay roads and 5.956 kilometers of municipal streets. *FISH LANDING          Basud has fish ports serving the two coastal barangays of Mangcamagong and Taba-taba. To this date, said fish port that the government spent more than one million pesos cannot fully serve for its main purpose, first, due to its almost dilapidated structure and secondly, there is no big fishing vessels using the port. *WATER SUPPLY          The different barangays of the municipality is being served by levels I, II and III water supply. As of 2001, serving with potable water is 4,110 households. CNWD was serving 2,558 households mostly in barangays Poblacion I, Poblacion II and part of barangays Matnog, Bactas and Mocong. The municipalitys water consumers are consuming an average of 07.4 cubic meters per day. To cope with the consumption demand especially during summer, the CNWD has constructed an elevated water tank with a capacity of 200 cubic meters and implementing the Tubig ng Buhay, Hatid sa Barangay program. Barangays San Pascual, Caayunan, Tuaca and San Felipe are being served by spring development. Other barangays are being served by shallow wells, deep wells or dug wells. *POWER SUPPLY         Basud has been served by electric power, formerly by the defunct Hidalgo Electric Enterprise, now by the National Power Corporation through the Camarines Norte Electric Cooperative (CANORECO). After the establishment of this cooperative, there was a great improvement in terms of power supply condition in the municipality. *COMMUNICATION          Basud has a telecommunication system that is being run by one personnel of the Department of Transportation and Communication (DOTC). There are two satellites of Smart and Globe in Poblacion II. There is postal office and has a staff of one mail carriers serving all barangays in the municipality. These personnel cannot adequately serve the entire from the lack of personnel; another problem is the difficulty in the delivery of mails in the remote and far-flung barangays. *EDUCATION          The municipality has 26 elementary schools, two National High Schools and 31 Day Care Centers. Barangay Caayunan has two elementary schools while barangays Mantugawe, Binatagan and Manmuntay has no existing one. There are four High School namely: Basud National High School at Poblacion Uno and Amoguis, San Felipe National High School at Barangay San Felipe, Tuaca National High at Barangay Tuaca and Dominador Narrido High School at Barangay Taisan. Tourist attraction          There are three major tourist attractions in the municipality, this are;*The Taba-taba white sand beach. This beach is situated at the shoreline of barangay Taba-taba and is accessible by barangay road from the junction of the Mangcamagong provincial road. The beach is part of San Miguel Bay and is very shallow with gradual depth of 4 to 7 feet during high tide. The seawater is so clean and calm and is famous of its white glittering sand with an approximately 40 meter distance of shoreline, which extends along the sea coast of the barangay proper.*The Mangcamagong beach has almost the same feature as that of Taba-taba. The only difference is that Mangcamagong beach has a longer shoreline than Taba-taba.The Bicol National Park is located within the territorial jurisdiction of barangay Tuaca. It has a distance of 18 kilometers from the town proper. It has a forest reserve land area of 3,34 hectares. At the heart of this forest is the famous 7- kilometer winding road called Bitukang Manok. Motorists in all walks of life, while passing this forest zone feel the cool breeze and moderate winds.*The Bicol National Park lies between the Province of Camarines Sur and Camarines Norte. The boundary is very much identified because of its famous Bahi River passing a permanent boundary marker.Other historic spots, religious shrine, natural and scenic spots, parks and other man made attractions is cherished places of the beautiful town of Basud.The municipal government has many plans for the development of these tourist potentials but considering its limited resources, the same was left behind.ReferencesExternal links*Philippine Standard Geographic Code*2000 Philippine Census Information*Official Website of the LGU of Basud*LGU Profile of Basud, Camarines NorteCamarines Nortede:BasudCamarines Norteit:BasudCamarines Nortenl:BasudCamarines NorteCamarines Norte
2083846
Capalonga,_Camarines_Norte
 footnotes                Capalonga is a 3rd class municipality in the province of Camarines Norte, Philippines. According to the 2000 census, it has a population of 26,577 people in 5,031 households.HISTORYAgtas and Dumagats, are believed to be the first inhabitants of village used to be called Apalong. This name was derived from a wild plant called Palong Manok, which looks like a roosters comb. It is said that whenever the settlers of Apalong went to other places and asked where they came from, the usual reply is We came from Kapalungan. Historians may comment that the natives were either referring to their place which has many  Palong (rosters comb) or maybe they wanted identification for their settlement. Whatever it was, no record will show and no one at that time is still living, what is clearly known to Capalongueos is that this place was and still is an environment of flowers called Palong Manok.In 1572, the Spanish Conquistador Capt de Salcedo and his men reached pacific shores and landed on Kapalongan settlement. Instead of finding gold, they found abundant wild beautiful red flowers that looked like rosters comb. The Spaniards built a church, formed a government, and the village was made a town and officially named Capalonga. The Spaniards for some years persisted on mining for gold at Sitio Maglagonlong, and the Spanish control was described to be brutal, harsh and full of harassment until they went away leaving behind imprints on the communitys cultural heritage.It is also believed that the first migrants of Capalonga came from the neighbouring province of Quezon, formerly Tayabas. This is the reason that out of the twelve (12) municipalities of Norte, Capalonga has the highest rating and accent in speaking the language. However, with the continuous migration process, mixed dialects has been produced. Today, like other places in the country, the dialects of the residents were enriched by various local medium of expression, thereby making no difference from the trend of other political units.Without roads and being isolated from other towns by mountains, forest, rivers and sea, Capalonga relatively remained untouched by commerce and industry as late as 1950s. In 1956, the road to Capalonga was opened. Still, growth had been slow until Martial law changed the pace. It was in the years 1987 to 1992 that all wooden and temporary bridges have been replaced by concrete bridges. Likewise, in the late part of 2003 up to the present, the concreting of the Bagong Silang - Capalonga Road has started and existence of the Airconditioned Van Transport is now available as a result.GEOGRAPHYCulture, Tradition and FolkloreTourismNature*Itok Falls - Located 4 km. west of the town with fresh and lush foliage and vegetation.*Bangka-bangka Falls-Located at Barangay Catabaguangan.It is being called as Bangka-bangka(Boat),because of its boat-like shape.*Albino Beach-Located at sitio Talagpucao Barangay Catioan with relaxing smooth waves and fine sand.*Mount Samat-Located at Barangay Alayao. This mountain is covered by the undiscovered species of ferns, orchids and etc.  There are also falls with fresh cold clear water.Festivals and Cultural Entertainments* Feast of the Black Nazarene (May 13) - The town Fiesta in honor of the Black Nazarene draws devotees from all over the country. The image is said to be miraculous and its feast is particularly celebrated by Chinese businessmen, who pay annual homage and ask for long life and good fortune.* Palong Festival (May 1013) - Highlighted by colorful streetdancing and agro-industrial fair which expresses the local folks gratitude for their towns names etymology, and signifies the abundant presence of Palong Manok (roosters comb plant) available in the locality. Held also in celebration of the Black Nazarenes Feast Day on May 13 at the town of Capalonga.BarangaysCapalonga is politically subdivided into 22 barangays. In 1955, the sitio of Ilayang Basiad was converted into the barrio of San Pedro.()ReferencesExternal links*Philippine Standard Geographic Code*2000 Philippine Census InformationReferences* Municipal Planning and Development Office LGU, Capalonga, Camarines NorteCamarines NorteCamarines Norteit:CapalongaCamarines Nortenl:CapalongaCamarines NorteCamarines Norte
2086990
Alburquerque,_Bohol
 footnotes                Alburquerque is a 5th class municipality in the province of Bohol, Philippines. According to the 2007 census, it has a population of 9,644 people.The towns short name is Albur. Alburquerque is reputed to have one of the longest (23 feet or 7 meters as of 2005) and heaviest (300 kg or 660 lbs) python in captivity. History  The Beginning left|thumb|250px|Parish ConventDuring the Spanish era, the way to travel around Bohol was by sea. Many coastal areas with a sheltered cove or harbor became progressive settlements. Among them was a place called Lo-oc, Baclayon, Bohol. As the name implies, it was a sheltered cove good for berthing seacrafts. It was also the breeding place of the Bulinaw or anchovie. Since Lo-oc was relatively far from the Poblacion, the people had difficulty in attending Holy Mass during Sundays. To solve the problem, the people thought of the idea of constructing their own chapel and let a priest from Baclayon come to serve the people. Lady Mariona Irag, a prominent lady in the community took the mantle of leadership. In 1842, she requested the parish priest of Baclayon, Fr. Pedro de la Encarnacion, to supervise the construction of the chapel to be built by the people. The first kapitan of the place was Pedro Jala who lived in the sitio of Carnago and the leader of Segunto. Carnago, a barrio separated from the town. Its name was changed to Sikatuna, in honor of the chieftain Sikatuna, who made a blood compact with Spanish Conquistador, Miguel Lopez de Legaspi. On June 9, 1868,  Gov. General Jose de la Gandara, issued the decree establishing the new town of Alburquerque in its civil jurisdiction. On November 14, 1868,  the Fr. Provincial of the Recollects approved the creation of the town as to its religious jurisdiction. On June 18, 1869, the Bishop of Cebu in which Bohol was a part of the Diocese, made Alburquerque a separate Diocesan parish. It was advocated to Sta. Monica. On June 26, 1869 Fr. Tomas Hernandez assumed his post as the first curate Priest of Alburquerque. The name This town was formerly called Sagunto, but according to the research of Engr. Jess Tirol in Manila, this town was called Segunto. Local folklore say that Alburquerque was in honor of de Albuquerque, the famous Portuguese seafarer and conqueror of Malaca, Sumatra. The name Alburquerque (from either albus querqus, meaning white evergreen in Latin; or Abu-al-Qurq, meaning country of cork oaks in Arabic) is very widespread in all of the Americas and the Philippines.Alburquerque is also a name of a town in the province of Badajoz, region of Extremadura, Spain. There is also a place called Albuquerque in the ancient town of Mexico, once a colony of Spain for several years, not to be confused with Albuquerque, Mexico.Since then, Segunto was changed to Alburquerque and its inhabitants are called Alburanons, (Alburquerqueos in Spanish).(Alburbohol.net) Municipal Profile left|thumb|300px|Municipal Hall, Alburquerque, BoholAlburquerque was recognized as an official town in Bohol on June 9, 1868. It is located in the eastern part of Bohol  away from City. It is classified as a 5th class municipality of the 1st Congressional District of Bohol with an IRA share of Php 8,891,774.00 as of 1999. It has an average annual income of Php 8,116,682.49. The town is politically divided into eleven (11) barangays characterized as Coastal and Upland. Coastal barangays includes: Bahi, San Agustin, Western Poblacion, Eastern Poblacion, Sta. Felomina, and Tagbuane. Upland barangays includes Ponong, Toril, Basacdacu, Cantiguib and Dangay. The town has a total land area of 2,865 has. with relatively mild rolling to rolling and hilly. The total land used as built-up area is 216.52 ha, agricultural purposes is 2,511 ha, timberland is 15 ha, mining/quarrying is 44.30 ha, roads is 72.79 ha, and landfill site is 5 ha. The towns soil cover includes 438.92 ha of Bolinao Clay, 1,330.22 ha of Lugo Clay, 1,050.02 ha of Faraon Clay, and 45.84 ha of Hydrosol. Based on the 2000 census, Albur has a total of 8,715 inhabitants, with a population density of 3.01 inhabitants per hectare of land and an average population growth rate of 2.31%. It is composed of 1,670 households. In 1997, its birth rate is 13.4% and death rate of 6.5% with infant mortality rate of 9.3%. It has a poverty incidence household below threshold level) of 41.99% based on the 1997 MAN survey. Alburanons speak in Cebuano/Visayas dialect. The towns major agricultural project is the Gintong Ani project in all barangays. One industry is situated in Eastern Poblacion - the Santisima Trinidad Ice Plant. There are 66 micro type and 2 cottage size of registered business establishments with a total combined Investments of Php 1.5 million. The existing tourists destinations are Sta. Monica Stone Church and Convent, Sta. Fe Beach Resort, Calamay making, Ceramics making, salt making, Loom weaving, basket and broom-making. The potential attractions are Tarsiers Park, Lourdes Spring, Aquarium Fish, Butterfly Sanctuary. There are ongoing tourism activities like the restoration of Sta. Monica Stone Church & Convent, beautification of Church Plaza, Town twinning, development of Sta. Fe Beach, Mang Pandoys Scheme (if possible all households will be available for tourists), retirement homes for Balikbayan. The town has a Labor Force of 37% with an employment rate of 90%. The average family income is Php 4,500.00/month with an average family expenditures of Php 4,000.00/month. In infrastructure, Alburs road network is classified into: national, which is ; provincial ; municipal ; and barangay which covers . It has 1 bridge to barangay Tagbuane which is the 39 L.M. Bridge. It has also 1 fishport. The power supply is currently distributed by the Bohol Electric Cooperative I (BOHECO I) which served a total of 1,281 households in the 11 barangays. The main source of potable water supply is groundwater. The total potable water demand of 1,068.42 m/day. There are two public calling offices; the Philippine Long Distance Telecommunication and ISLACOM and a SMART land line PCO. It also has the Philippine Postal Corporation as a means of communication. Physiography The municipality of Alburquerque covers an area of 28.93 km or 0.77% of Bohols mainland area. It is composed of eleven (11) barangays, from which 5 are located along the coast and 6 inland. The road network shown in Figure 1, is not updated. The central part of municipality, from the east extending toward northwest is characterized by rolling to moderately steep terrain (18-30% slope), with ground elevation ranging from 80 to 131 m amsl. The area in northeastern and southwestern part is characterized by steep terrain (3050% slope), with ground elevation up to 153 m amsl. The southeastern part is characterized with undulating to rolling terrain (818% slope) with ground elevation up to 60 m amsl. The area along the coast is characterized by level to nearly level terrain (0-3% slope), with ground elevation ranging from zero near the coast to 10 m amsl inland. Alburquerque municipality is covered by Hydrosol and three (3) sorts of clay namely, Faraon, Bolinao and Lugo clay. The northern portion of municipality is covered mostly by Lugo clay, the southern half portion is mostly covered by Faraon and Bolinao clay, while Hydrosol has a very limited extent along the coast. For more detailed description of different types of soils refer to Appendix 2. The municipal area is covered by grassland, coconut, shrubs and built-up area. The northern portion is mostly covered with grass, with exception of small area in the northeast, which is covered with shrubs. The southern portion along the coast is covered with coconut, with a small built-up area in the west. The whole Bohol is in the Coronas climate type IV, characterized by evenly distributed rainfall over the year. The average annual rainfall is estimated to 1,627 mm/yr. The average annual rainfall is the sum of the average annual rainfall from respective river basin, multiplied with percentage of respective municipal area within respective river basin. Rivers and river basins Several small rivers and creeks, which have their headwaters in the elevated terrain in the northern part, traverse the Alburquerque municipality. These rivers and creeks flow in generally north to south direction and drain the major part of municipality into Bohol Sea. The only major river basin is the Tagbuane RB situated on the eastern part of Alburquerque (19.94 km or 94.64% of municipal area). The municipality of Albuquerque has a poorly developed drainage system, due to presence of permeable limestone, which covers most of municipal area and enables infiltration of large portion of effective rainfall into underground. This is characteristic for karstified limestone terrain. Surface water runoff (estimated to 304 mm/yr. per km), is estimated to 24,100 m/d on the average. The runoff is sufficient to satisfy the water demand of 65 m/d for irrigation purposes.DemographicsThe population projection is based on 1995 NSO census and the population growth rate from NEDAs population projection 1980-2030, medium assumption, for every 5 years for urban and rural barangays (for details refer to Table 5.4 in the Report on Physiographic & Socio-Economic Conditions in the Bohol Province). The 1998 population is estimated to 7,924 (274/km), which is projected to increase to 7,948 (275/km) in 2030. Urban population in 1998 is estimated to 2,888 (36.44% of total). It is projected to increase to 3,861 (48.58% of total) by year 2030. The urban population is located in three barangays namely, East and West Poblacion and Ponong. The rural population in 1998 is estimated to 5,036 (63.55% of total), which is projected to decrease to 4,087 (51.42% of total) by year 2030. The potable water demand, including domestic, industrial, institutional and commercial water demands of urban and rural population, is estimated in 1998 to 926 m/d, which is projected to increase to 1,529 m/d in 2030. Majority of this water demand (67.4%) in 2030 is for urban population. The water demand estimated to 65 m/d, is required to irrigate 0.015 km of land, located in 1 irrigation system in barangay Ponong.Tourismthumb|right|300px|Santa Fe BeachThe municipality of Alburquerque, 12 kilometers away from Tagbilaran City is a fifth class agricultural locale with an area of about 2,865 hectares, sheltering almost 9,000 inhabitants. The town has natural wonders and micro local industries like the making of calamay, traditional method of manufacturing pottery, and the weaving of raffia using locally made loom. These are just some of the enriching legacies of old time which are being preserved by the Alburanons. With these native industries that evolved from industrious residents with the indigenous materials in the surroundings, Alburquerque is considered as one of the progressive coastal towns in the province of Bohol. Exotic marine sites fascinating upland view are in place to capture nature lovers profound interest in creation. Unspoiled setting of landscape and seascape would bring one to whimsical atmosphere one has ever fantasized. The Local Government Unit of Alburquerque welcomes and invites everybody to take a sensation on the grandeur of tangible wonders. Municipal Marine Sanctuary The Municipal Marine Sanctuary, established on October 8, 2000 at barangay Sta. Felomina where the beach and the Mangrove Protected Area are located, is being given utmost concern by the Local Government Unit. The sanctuary had been set up in the area selected to be fit for the purpose due to its coral cover. Few months in existence prove to be beneficial to marine ecology and to the community as well. Fish stocks rise and corals started to live up again from the destruction done by illegal fishers. Bamboo rafts has been put in place for the curious observers to set on board for a closer view to marine ecology. It has been considered as a dive site of the municipality for local and foreign tourist visiting the place. In the capacious, sandy, white beach, one can refresh in crystal, blue waters in the area with cottages for rent and verdant, lush mangrove area. To satisfy ones longing for mother nature in the area, trekking up to Tagbuane River passing through a Forestal Reserve Zone and an abode to other natures winged and feathered creature is an added enticement to lissome nature lovers.Python sanctum right|thumb|200px|Prony the PythonAlburquerque is home to a Python sanctum which is 5 years old in existence with a length of approximately  and an estimated weight of about 300 kg. The biggest python in captivity ever known. The python named Prony is Alburs star and has known to the people as Live Anaconda of Bohol. Prony, a female python is owned by Mr. Sofronio Salibay. Prony captured the attention of media network GMA 7 who filmed the feeding. According to JingJing Salibay, the lady caretaker, Prony ate cats dogs which should be clean and free of bruises. This illegal kind of feeding according to animal welfare rights activists caught the attention of Animal Kingdom and ordered the caretaker to stop feeding Prony with dogs. Animal Kingdom also donated money to raise a sanctuary. ABS-CBN and other media networks, newspapers and magazines have featured Prony. In March 2006, Kapuso Mo, Jessica Sohos stringer and journalist Udtohan went to Albur to film Prony as an important element whereas snakes of its kind became a popular dish in other parts of the country. http://www.alburq.gov.ph/index.php?optioncom_content&taskview&id14&Itemid13The Animal Kingdom Federation, Inc. (AKFI), an SEC registered, non-profit and non-stock animal welfare organization registered with the Animal Welfare Division of the Bureau of Animal Industry recently vowed to build an animal sanctuary here. The AKFI made this commitment after hearing reports on the  long python locally called baksan, owned by Sofronio Salibay in Barangay Sta. Filomena, has been fed with stray dogs. The python has caught the attention of many local and foreign tourists, not only for its size but particularly on how it has been fed. It even caught the attention of GMA 7 who sent a crew to document the procedure. Feeding is done during full moon. Alarmed by the reports, AKFI requested Mayor Efren Tungol to stop Salibay from feeding the python with dogs since it is a clear violation of Republic Act No. 8485, otherwise known as the Animal Welfare Act. The Mayor agreed. However, in order to preserve the python, which has become a tourist attraction, AKFI, represented by its Director Charles Wartenberg, sealed a memorandum of support and cooperation with the municipality creating the site as an animal sanctuary. The memorandum, aside from manifesting full implementation of RA 8485, also reiterates the improvement of the cage based on animal welfare standards and introduction of alternative feeding. Creating an animal sanctuary would make Albur the only Animal Welfare Friendly Municipality in the country. AKFI is also associated with the International Wildlife Coalition Trust (IWCT), an internationally recognized organization founded in the United States dedicated to the protection of global wildlife and natural habitat protection.Church and conventCreation of the parishSome sources say the parish had its beginning as a visita in 1842 when a chapel was built under the direction of the parish priest of Baclayon. The parish advocated to Santa Monica was canonically established on June 18, 1869, following royal approval given on November 1868. During the Spanish colonial era, the Augustinian Recollect friars administered the parish.Creation of the churchUp to the 1880s, the parish church was more like a huge shed. Although it boasted of three aisles, its walls were only of tabique. The present church of coral stone was commenced shortly afterwards, utilizing the same three-aisled plan. However, the upper portions, especially the tower over the facade, were completed during the first half of this century. Upon closer examination, it becomes clear that the link between the church and the casa parroquial was planned along a grander scale, but never finished. The grotto at the back of the courtyard between the two structures hides a ruin which may be of another unfinished arcade. Ray Francia signed the churchs interior ceiling painting on one side of the choir loft. Another section, now vanished, showed that the painting was carried out from April 12 to August 3, 1932. As regards the church bells, amongst them in the quadrangular tower are three bells, inscribed with the patron saints of the parish (Santa Monica, San Agustin, and Calipay or Joy). Dated 1866, two years before the ecclesiastical recognition of the parish, the bells are mute testimonies to the anxiety of the community in becoming an independent parish. As to the casa parroquial, the year 1876 is etched over the porta maior. However, in the center of the entrance arches to the steps, the year 1884 could be read until recently.Bure-base industry On March 5, 2004, Mrs. Leila M. Caf, Municipal Planning & Development Coordinator, and Ms. Rita D. Comiling, of the Municipal Agricultural Office, went to several livelihood projects in the municipality of Albur. This was to find what could be done to improve work efficiency and income to the workers of these and other projects. The recommendations made in this report can be summarized in the MPRAP to PPDO that will accompany the Poverty Index data being collected in 17 municipalities on Bohol. Household buri weaving project in Basacdacu The weaver processes and weaves her buri cloth at home from local young buri leaves. She produces a roll of 4 place mats joined by a finer buri weave. The Toril barangay captain also buys these for export to Cebu where the place mats are cut from the roll. The weaver gets P14 per place mat (P56 per roll of 4). She also sells the midribs of the buri palm leaf for basket making at P12 for 100, and bundles of bure stems (pawa) to Tagbuane barangay for broom making for P23 a bundle.Loom weavingThe weaving shed in Basacdacu houses 20 looms made by local carpenters, though only 5 were being used at the time of the visit. The municipality of Alburquerque provided funds for construction of the bamboo and zinc-roofed building and the looms. The spears of young buri leaves are now mostly bought from Inabanga municipality using funds from the Self-Employment Assistant Program (SEAP) of the Social Welfare Program. Weavers process the leaves themselves, though colored fibers used for the few -square glass coasters made there are bought ready-dyed from Inabanga. The weavers separate the young buri leaves from the spears, strip the fiber from them with a knife, bleach them by soaking them in water containing acid, then sun dry them at their homes. They then tie the fibers in sequence to make long skeins for weaving. At the Center they weave this white buri into 8-meter lengths of cloth, 30 inches wide. The cloth is rolled up as it is woven, and one 8-meter roll takes one person about five days (a working week) of weaving from 9 am to 5 pm at the Center. The barangay captain of Toril buys 30 rolls of the cloth at a time for P280 per roll. He does not impose a deadline and gives a cash advance for the cloth. He exports this to Cebu from the town of Tubigon from where other orders are sometimes negotiated. The Center once obtained an order for 100 rolls from Manila, but was unable to meet the deadline, and the buyer refused the cloth already made as he considered it of poor quality. In the past the weavers at the Center made the cloth into bags and wall or ceiling-coverings, but no longer do so, probably because the finished product was harder to sell than the rolls of cloth. The only finished products still produced at the Center are coasters, which are sold in Bohol. The main problem the weavers perceive is the difficulty of obtaining markets for their buri cloth.Fan weaving Several households use strips of older buri leaves to make spear-head-shaped fans  by  that they sell for P3.50 to Toril barangay captain for export to Cebu. Smaller fans of 18 by  sell for P2 or P3.Broom-making Buri stems (from Basacdacu, Sikatuna and Loboc at P28 a bundle or P30 a kilogram?) are soaked for 1 to 2 months until the fibers separate. Mrs. Tubera then dries the fibers in the sun and rejects the darker brown ones, as they are weak. She bends bundles of fiber double over both sides of a wooden peg through the end of a short, thin bamboo pole that forms the handle (P60 for 100 handles), and ties them on with one or two strong fibers. A baton of wood is then placed on each side of the fan of fibers, and the two batons tied to each other at the ends. Cutting the fibers to the same length levels the broom end. On the larger brushes, an extra bundle of fibers is added to each side of the fan of fibers, and tied in several places to the broom handle by encircling them and the handle with strong plastic twine. A few green or red fibers are included on each side for decoration. The ends of these extra fibers are cut straight on the handle, and the broom is made stronger by sewing through all the fibers across the narrower part of the fan-shaped broom. Small brooms sell individually for P5, larger ones for P12 and the biggest for P18. Mrs. Tubera has an order from a businessman in Poblacion who sends them to Davao, Mindanao. She receives P120 for a dozen medium-sized brooms, and makes 10 dozen per month, so earns P1,200 each month with which she is putting her son through college. There are 50 households making brooms in the area, and it was not clear whether they all sell to the same middleman.Indigenous salt-making Salt-making is one of the source of income of some Alburanons. Production begins when the upland farmers plow their fields for rice production. This is because the asinderos salt-makers trade their salt for rice in a barter system, and salt production takes about as long as the growth of the rice it will be exchanged for. The fibrous husks of a large number of coconuts are placed in pits on the landward edge of the mangrove area. These fill with seawater at high tide, and this is retained in the pits for the salt water to be absorbed into the fiber of the husks. (Or perhaps the salt water drains away with each low tide and is replenished with each high tide?) After an unspecified time of soaking, the husks are removed from the salt water and allowed to dry, before being burnt in the center of the salt-making hut to leave a fine ash mixed with salt. The ashes is then packed in a cone of bamboo about 1 meters high. Seawater is poured into the top of the cone and leaches out the salt in the ash as it passes through. The water is caught in a wooden trough below the cone. This extra-salty water is then put into very small clay pots, and these pots wedged together in a series of bridges across a large gutter made from compacted coconut husk ash. A fire of palm wood is stoked beneath the suspended pots to cook the salty water. The water evaporates, leaving the dry salt in the pot. More and more of the super-salty water from the ash-filled cone is continually added to the pots, and the fire kept burning, until the pots are full to the brim with salt. It takes one day to obtain the ash from the dried coconut husks, and 100 pots can be filled with dry salt over the fire in 3 hours.Pottery The pottery-making enterprise is located beside the main road in East Poblacion. Clay is dug from a pit near the sea, and mixed with silicate soil before being ground through the large rollers of an electric mill, in a pit beside the pottery works. This is mixed with water and molded into pots of various sizes and shapes on a potters wheel, rotated by the potter pushing round a car wheel below the turntable with his feet. During our visit simple, straight-sided water pots for poultry were being made in about 2 minutes each. There were tall, large, elegantly shaped pots for storing water, and round-bottomed pots for use in cooking, in the open-sided work shed. Small, round-bottomed pots for salt making are also made.Social services File:Alburquerque Bohol.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Roadside stores in AlburquerqueThe local government unit of Alburquerque has the desire to uplift the social standards of the residents of the municipality. It has been its goal to provide the public with proper and sufficient social services. These include:Health and nutrition Health is Wealth...as a saying goes. Thus, the Local Government Unit of Alburquerque is giving the top priority on health and nutrition as their prime basic service to its populace.Education Ensuring quality education to the people is also one of the top concerns of the local officials. The LGU assisted in determining and developing appropriate actions that would address the educational needs of the Alburanons in terms of budgetary allocations, maintenance of facilities and policies concerning education. Albur has 1 public secondary school, the San Roque High School. It has also 4 elementary schools for intermediate level and 3 primary schools. It has also a total of 11 day care centers, one center in each barangay and 1 private pre-school. Enrollment data shows that day care has a total of 191 pupils, primary level has 166 pupils, 892 in elementary and 795 students in secondary. The actual number of teachers in the municipality is only 63 and the teacher student ratio in elementary is 1:24 and 1:43 in secondary level.Waterworks One of the biggest project of the present administration is to provide its constituents with sufficient potable water supply. Almost 80% of the barangay in the municipality currently has water connections.Sports developmentTo motivate the youth against drugs and other illegal activities, the LGU conducts several youth development programs to therefore further enhance their physical, mental, social and moral values, through the Sangguniang Kabataan (SK) headed by Ephraim Tungol, SK Federated Chairman. Some of the activities includes: Inter-Barangay Basketball League, Inter-barangay League, Youth Fora, Trainings and Seminars, Disco Socials and other related activities.Other services Local market services With its desire to serve its contituents, the LGU provided local market services, such as water supply, proper garbage disposal, market cleanliness and orderliness, and peace and order.Local port services The municipality has one local port situated in barangay Western Poblacion.  The said port serve local fishermen as well as other fishing vessels and cargo vessels in transporting equipments & raw materials from other neighboring provinces. It is equipped with proper lighting and gadgets. The municipal LGU as well as the barangay officials ensure the safety, peace and order situation and proper maintenance of the port.Development agendaThe local government unit of Alburquerque, with its present administration, has the desire to improve their services its contituents. To attain this goal, they focuces on the following areas of concerns for development:Governance and administrative development Objectives: *To ensure efficient and effective employees performance of duties and functions. *To ensure strict implementation/enforcement of municipal ordinances. *To source out funds to finance the implementation of such development projects. *To gain cooperation and citizens participation in planning and decision  making. *To have a 100% collection of taxes and other fees due to the governmentInfrastructure and physical development Objectives: *Improvement of municipal and barangay roads. *Construction of municipal nutrition center within five years time. *Completion of Municipal gym and improvement of municipal building. To provide satisfactory service of water to the consumers.Economic Development Objectives: *To eradicate poverty in the locality *To increase agricultural production *To provide and establish market for ube in the area. *To provide employment opportunities to jobless but employable individuals through livelihood program of the local government unit.Social sector development Objectives: *To allocate funds for the improvement of delivery of basic social services. *To provide and establish market for ube in the area. *To provide employment opportunities to jobless but employable individuals through livelihood program of the local government unit.Barangaysright|thumb|300px|Map of Alburquerque, BoholAlburquerque is politically subdivided into 11 barangays.* Bahi* Basacdacu* Cantiguib* Dangay* East Poblacion* Ponong* San Agustin* Santa Filomena* Tagbuane* Toril* West PoblacionCensus 2000 Sister cities * City, California, USA References * Alburbohol.net - The Alburanon Community in the web* Alburquerque External links * Bohol* Municipality of Alburquerque* Official website of Alburquerque, Bohol* Philippine Standard Geographic Code* 2000 Philippine Census Information* Alburquerque Bohol* 2007 Philippine Census InformationBoholBohol(Bohol)(Bohol)Bohol(Bohol)Bohol(Bohol)no:AlburquerqueBoholBohol
2090155
Crawford_Gordon
Crawford Gordon Jr. (26 December 1914 &ndash; 26 January 1967) was a leader of wartime defense production in Canada under Minister of Munitions and Supply Howe during the Second World War.  He was perhaps one of the greatest industrialists and business minds in Canadian history.Early yearsGordon was born in Winnipeg in 1914. He was the first child of Crawford Gordon Sr. and Ethel Fortune, the latter of whom had survived the sinking of the RMS Titanic in 1912.Second World WarGordon was one of D. Howes boys, or dollar-a-year men during the Second World War, helping the government organize industrial resources to meet the needs of wartime production and resource management.Avro CanadaIn October 1951, Howe, arranged for Gordon, now with the Department of Defense Production, to take over as President and General Manager of A. V. Roe Canada (Avro Canada), a subsidiary of A.V. Roe and Company of the U.K., to assist with problems in development and production of the CF-100 Canuck fighter interceptor.(The legacy of the Avro Arrow. The Globe And Mail, 18 January 1997, A2, quoting J.L. Granatstein.) Under Gordons encouragement to Avros designers, Avro offered to design and build the new supersonic jet interceptor identified by the Canadian Chiefs of Staff as needed to counter a Union bomber threat.  In 1953 the government commenced funding of a study for what would first be the design for the C104 delta-wing aircraft, and eventually the CF-105 Arrow.(Bothwell and Kilbourn 1980, p. 95.)During Crawfords tenure in the 1950s, A.V. Roe Canada was restructured into two separate divisions: Avro Aircraft Ltd. and Engines, both based at Airport. The total labour force of both aviation companies reached 15,000 in 1958.  During the same period, A.V. Roe Canada also purchased a number of companies, including Steel and Coal Corporation, Car and Foundry (1957) and Canadian Steel Improvement Ltd.  By 1958, A. V. Roe Canada was an industrial giant with over 50,000 employees in a far-flung empire of 44 companies involved in coal mining, steel making, railway rolling stock, aircraft and aero-engine manufacturing, as well as computers and electronics. The companies generated annual sales in the $450 million range, ranking A.V. Roe Canada as the third largest corporation in Canada.(Zuk 2005, p. 88.)The Avro ArrowGordon continued to ask for further funding as the interceptor program for the CF-105 Arrow proceeded, particularly as the program scope expanded to include the new Iroquois advanced turbojet engine, when other manufacturers engine designs were dropped or proved inadequate. When the Liberal government in which Howe served was defeated, Gordon had to deal with the new Progressive Conservative government of Diefenbaker, a government that narrowly viewed such ambitious, costly projects.Gordon may have clashed with the Diefenbaker government due to a number of pressures, including the unexpected delays in getting the Avro Arrow into production, and the threat to the Arrow from the rise of the missile (it was designed to intercept manned bombers).  There may have also been a clash of personalities:  one of several meetings between the two, Gordon was described as drunken, rude(Grattan OLeary, quoted by Palmiro Campagna, preface to the third paperback edition, p. 18.) and puffed (cigarette) smoke in the old mans face during their meeting.  Gordon was a heavy drinker  and Diefenbaker a teetotaler and non-smoker.(Bothwell and Kilbourn 1980, p. 266.) (There Never Was an Arrow (CBC TV 1980))Final yearsGordons battles and gambles finally lost out when the Arrow program was canceled on 20 February 1959. Gordon was fired as Avro president not long after. Gordons life was on a downward spiral afterward.By the summer of 1966, his net worth of $3 million had mostly evaporated.  He had bought two companies and held one CEO position, but eventually lost it all.Crawford Gordon died in York City on 26 January 1967 of liver failure.  Friends said he drank himself to his death. Gordon could handle success, but not failure.thumb|right|250px|Dan Aykroyd appearing as Crawford Gordon in the CBC mini-series, The Arrow (1996).Crawford Gordon in popular cultureCrawford Gordon was portrayed, with a good visible likeness, by Aykroyd in the 1996 mini-series Arrow. Dramatic licence may have been taken in this movie by showing Gordons secretary Claire as being a mistress, and the breakup of that relationship during 1957 is shown as leading to drinking problems and depression. These drinking problems and depression then served to exacerbate his distrust of the Diefenbaker government into outright abuse. That abuse did not help with the governments disdain for the Arrow program while it was under budget pressure to make just one choice for aeronautic defense of airspace.References;Notes;Bibliography* Bothwell, Robert and William Kilbourn. C.D. Howe: A Biography. Toronto: McClelland and Stewart, 1979. ISBN 0-7710-4535-2.* Campagna, Palmiro. Requiem for a Giant: A.V. Roe Canada and the Avro Arrow. Toronto: Dundurn Press, 2003. ISBN 1-55002-438-8.* Campagna, Palmiro. Storms of Controversy: The Secret Avro Arrow Files Revealed. Toronto:  Stoddard Publishing, 1992.* Stewart, Greig. Arrow Through the Heart: The Life and Times of Crawford Gordon and the Avro Arrow. Toronto: McGraw-Hill-Ryerson, 1998. ISBN 0-07-560102-8.* Stewart, Greig. Shutting Down the National Dream: A.V. Roe and the Tragedy of the Avro Arrow. Toronto: McGraw-Hill-Ryerson, 1991. ISBN 0-07-551119-3* Whitcomb, Randall.Avro Aircraft and Cold War Aviation. St. Catharines, Ontario: Vanwell, 2002. ISBN 1-55125-082-9.* Zuk, Bill. The Avro Arrow Story: The Revolutionary Airplane and its Courageous Test Pilots. Calgary: Altitude Publishing, 2005, ISBN 1-55153-978-0.External links* Fred Smye websiteGordon
2094203
Devco_Railway
The Devco Railway  was a Canadian railway.  Devco Railway operated as an unincorporated department within the Coal Division of the Breton Development Corporation, also known as DEVCO;  as such there is no formally incorporated entity named Devco Railway.  Devco Railway took over the operations of the and Louisburg Railway on March 30, 1968 when DEVCO expropriated the S&L as part of the assets of the Steel and Coal Corporation, or DOSCO.Creation of DEVCOIn 1966, DOSCO (then a subsidiary of the Group) announced that its mines had only 18 years of production left and concluded that expense of opening new underground mines in the Sydney Coal Field would be too expensive.  The company made its intentions clear that it would be exiting the coal mining business within months.In response to a vast public outcry in industrial Cape Breton County, the government of Prime Minister Pearson announced J.R. Donald would head a Royal Commission of Inquiry into the Cape Breton coal industry, with hearings held in 1965 and 1966.  The Donald Commission recommended that a federal corporation be established to acquire and manage DOSCOs coal operations, with the aim being to slowly wean the Sydney area economy off the coal industry.::Future planning should be based on the assumption that the Sydney mines will not operate beyond 1981.On July 7, 1967 the Breton Development Corporation, or DEVCO, was established to operate the mines in the interim, while phasing them out throughout the 1970s and, at the same time, develop new economic opportunities for the surrounding communities.  On March 30, 1968 DEVCO expropriated DOSCOs coal mines and the S&L, settling for a payment of $12 million.  At the same time, the Government of Nova Scotia took over the operation of DOSCOs integrated mill in Sydney, renaming the operation Steel Corporation, or SYSCO.The S&L was reorganized as the Devco Railway.Devco RailwayInitially, the Devco Railway continued to operate much as its predecessor, using former S&L locomotives, cars, trackage, and locomotive shops. Indeed, ifor several years it continued to operate under its old name of the Sydney & Louisburg Division of the Cumberland Railway. In 1972, with H.S. Haslam as general manager, the road operated 39 miles of route with offices at Sydney. At that date the company owned 15 diesel locomotives and 1,100 freight cars.(Henry Sampson (ed.), Janes World Railways 1972-73, pp. 264-265. New York: McGraw-Hill Book Company, 1972.)As DEVCO had been created to shut down the Cape Breton coal industry, the Devco Railway did not have expansion in mind at the outset.  Initial operations consisted of serving the old mines, hauling coal to the international shipping piers on Sydney Harbour (Louisbourgs piers were abandoned during the 1960s).The line east of Glace Bay to Louisbourg fell into disuse as older mines were closed.  As part of a regional economic development initiative, DEVCO created a tourist railway named the Cape Breton Steam Railway, to operate between Glace Bay and Louisbourg.  In 1973, the Sydney and Louisburg Railway Historical Society was created by retired employees of that company to assist with the tourist railway and to preserve the Louisbourg station.  The tourist railway used former S&L equipment and stations, however by the late 1970s it was proving uneconomic to operate and was closed.  The track east of Glace Bay was abandoned at this time.The October 1973 Kippur War and the ensuing oil crisis led the federal government of Prime Minister Trudeau to re-examine all Canadian energy production, including the potential nationalization of Albertas oil, as well as an expansion of DEVCO coal production, reversing the recommendation of the 1966 Donald Commission to phase out production and diversify the Sydney area economy.  The Trudeau government sought to use its ownership of DEVCO to reverse Nova Scotias reliance on the importation of foreign oil for generating electricity; approximately 70% of the provinces electricity was generated by foreign oil by the late 1970s.New mines were built and opened near New Waterford (Phalen and Lingan collieries) and on Island (Prince colliery) starting in 1972.  Devco Railway built a spur to serve the adjacent Phalen and Lingan mines, extending the line to serve Scotia Power Incorporateds Lingan Generating Station which opened November 1, 1979.During the early 1980s, DEVCO built new locomotive shops at Victoria Junction, between Sydney and Glace Bay, and shut down the Glace Bay roundhouse and shops.  DEVCO also built a large coal preparation and wash plant at Victoria Junction, as well as new international shipping piers on Sydney Harbour, replacing the antiquated export piers inherited from DOSCO.  With federal government financing, DEVCO was in expansion mode and with the high international prices for coal, sought to produce more Cape Breton coal for export than ever before.The Devco Railway modernized its locomotive fleet by retiring the S&Ls diesels purchased second-hand during the early 1960s and purchasing General Motors Diesel Limited GP38-2s; a unique design feature of these locomotives was their ability to be used as emergency power generators for various DEVCO mines.  Likewise, the coal hopper fleets were modernized, with many being purchased from the Eastern Car Company in New Glasgow.By the late 1980s, production problems at DEVCO saw the last of the older mines inherited from DOSCO shut down, with production concentrated at Lingan, Phalen and Prince; the latter not receiving any rail service.  The Point Aconi Generating Station was built by Nova Scotia Power Incorporated to receive coal from the Prince colliery directly by conveyor belt, however the Lingan and Phalen mines still hauled coal to the Victoria Junction preparation plant and then to the Lingan Generating Station.The SYSCO steel mill stopped using DEVCO coal to produce coke as a fuel for its blast furnaces in the mid-1980s.  By the late 1980s, SYSCO had modernized by changing to an electric-arc process, smelting recycled metal.Problems with flooding and roof-falls at the Lingan mine saw production cease in 1992, just months short of the collierys 20-year design limit.  The Phalen mine continued to be the only source of online traffic for the Devco Railway, however subsequent flooding and roof-falls at Phalen caused ever increasing production costs at a time of fiscal restraint by the federal government.  Faced with rising subsidies, the federal government announced it was getting out of the coal industry in January 1999 by mining out the rest of Phalen by the end of the year and attempting to sell the Prince colliery.In September 1999, Phalen colliery closed for good, with 400 employees laid off and the only on-line traffic source for the Devco Railway severed.  The Prince colliery continued with production, however coal was trucked from the mine to the Victoria Junction preparation plant, from which it was then taken by rail to the Lingan Generating Station.  Devco Railway also began to be used for importing some coal from locations in the States and America, with the international shipping piers beginning to be used in the reverse of their intended design.On November 23, 2001, Prince colliery closed for good, after the federal government failed to entice any private sector investors to purchase the mine.  DEVCO was out of the coal mining business, however for a period of approximately 1 month, it was in the coal importation business.  The federal government moved swiftly to sell off assets, transferring the mine properties and mineral rights back to the provincial Department of Natural Resources.  DEVCO subsequently decommissioned the Victoria Junction coal wash plant and began to immediately prepare remediation of the mine sites.Creation of Sydney Coal RailwayOn December 18, 2001 DEVCO sold all surface assets, including the international shipping piers, railway track, railway rights-of-way, locomotives and rolling stock, and a coal storage facility and locomotive shops at Victoria Junction to 510845 New Brunswick Incorporated, a wholly owned subsidiary of Emera Inc.,(Devco Railway - DVR. TrainWeb, LLC. Retrieved 6 January 2010.) the holding company which owns Scotia Power Incorporated (Nova Scotia Power Corporation having been privatized in 1992).Emera subsequently contracted the operation of its newly-acquired DEVCO surface assets to Logistec Corporation. Logistec sub-contracted operation of the railway to the des chemins de fer du Qubec, a Quebec-based railway holding company and short-line operating company. The new railway was called Coal Railway,() although ownership of the track and other assets remains with Emeras subsidiary, 510845 New Brunswick Inc.Notes
2098199
Yichun,_Jiangxi
Yichun (; Postal map spelling: I-chun) is a mountainous city in the Chinese province of Jiangxi. Yichun literally means pleasant spring. It is located in the northwest of the province along a river surrouneded by mountains. Its area is 18,669 km; 50% forested, 35% mountainous. It has a total population of 5,100,000; 1,100,000 urban and the other 4,000,000 rural. 99.5% of the people are Han but many ethnic minorities are represented.A large sports complex with two stadiums was built in the 1990s and draws teams for sports competitions from all across China. Agriculture is the main industry but other natural resource industries such as timber and mining are extremely important for the economy. Major mineral deposits include aluminum, tungsten, gold, zinc, and copper. Yichun is also a stop along the major railway running between Beijing and Nanchang, the capital of Jiangxi.ClimateAdministrationYichun has 1 district, 3 cities, and 6 counties under its direct jurisdiction.District*YuanzhouCities*Zhangshu*Fengcheng*GaoanCounties*Jingan*Fengxin*Shanggao*Yifeng*Tonggu*WanzaiExternal links* Official Website (Chinese)(Jiangxi)(Jiangxi)(Jiangxi)(Jiangxi)(Jiangxi)gan: ( )(Jiangxi)ja:(Jiangxi)i Jiangxi(Jiangxi)()Xun, Giang TyJiangxizh:
2101975
The_Awakening_(Doctor_Who)
The Awakening is a serial in the British fiction series Who, which was originally broadcast in two parts on 19 and 20 January 1984.SynopsisThis story features a creature known as the Malus, who is responsible for creating a time link between the year of 1984 and the events from the Civil War. The Doctor must also face the villagers of Little Hodcombe, who have been influenced by the Malus, and save Tegan before she is burned as the ill-fated Queen of the May.PlotOn 13 July 1643, two forces came to the village of Little Hodcombe during the Civil War and destroyed each other. As the story begins,  a group of Roundheads are riding horses in the village of Little Hodcombe, with little regard to the villagers around them. Only it is not 1643, it is 1984.  A schoolteacher, Jane Hampden, is convinced that her fellow villagers, led by the towns leader, Sir George Hutchinson, have taken their re-enactment of a series of war games too far. Hutchinson attempts to assure her that the games are a harmless event, which are merely to celebrate the English Civil War.  When Hampden asks him to stop the games, Hutchinson ignores her.Inside the TARDIS, the Doctor promises to take his companion, Tegan, to 1984 so she could spend some time with her grandfather, Andrew Verney. The Doctor sets the coordinates to Little Hodcombe, where Verney resides.  However, the TARDIS experiences some turbulence and arrives in what appears to be a structurally unstable church. The Doctor, Tegan and Turlough, while watching on the scanner, see a man in 17th Century clothing, fleeing from the church and the Doctor dashes out to help him. However, the man has now vanished. Tegan is convinced that they have landed in the wrong time zone. However, Turlough tells her that he had checked the TARDIS coordinates and they were in 1984.  As the Lord and his companions continue pursue the man, smoke starts to billow from a crack in the wall.Eventually, the three travellers are captured by Captain Joseph Willow and taken to Sir George Hutchinson. The Doctor and his companions are first brought before Hampden and Colonel Ben Woolsey, who apologizes for the poor treatment that they received.  Hutchinson arrives and explains to the Doctor that the town is celebrating the anniversary of the Battle of Little Hodcombe and then he urges him to join the celebration.  Tegan then explains that they have come to this village to see her grandfather, Andrew Verney. She is informed that her grandfather is missing, and runs outside the room, upset. The Doctor follows but loses her. Tegan, still upset, is crying when someone steals her purse.  She tries to get it back and she runs into a barn where she finds the ghost of an old man.The Doctor returns to the church and meets a 17th Century peasant, Will Chandler, who emerges from a wall. He has been hidden in a hole and believes the year to be 1643. Turlough eventually rescues Tegan from the barn and they return to the TARDIS, where they see a sparkly projection on one of the walls. Meanwhile, the Doctor and Will investigate the church. Tegan and Turlough leave the TARDIS and they are re-captured. Turlough is locked in a building with Verney. Willow forces Tegan to change into a 17th century costume.  He informs her that she is to become the Queen of the May.The Doctor and Will continue to investigate. Eventually they find a secret passage back to Ben Woolseys living room under a slab marked with a picture of a creature that Will identifies as the Malus. Coming the other way through the passage, the Doctor and Will meet up with Hampden, who found the passages other end by accident after being locked in Colonel Wolseys office. They avoid Hutchinson, who has followed Jane down the passage, and the Doctor finds a small ball of metal. The Doctor identifies the metal as tinclavic, a metal mined by the Terileptils on the planet Raaga for the almost exclusive use of the people of Hakol, a planet in the star system Rifta, where psychic energy is a force to be harnessed.Returning to the church, the Doctor and Hampden are astonished when a massive alien face pushes its way through the crack on the wall, roaring and spewing smoke. They manage to escape from the psychic projection of a cavalier, and head back to the house via the tunnel. The Doctor realises that the Malus in the church was discovered by Verney and Hutchinson. The latter tried to exploit the creature, but instead, the creature began to use him by organizing the war games. He deduces that the psychic energy released by the war games has fed the Malus. The Doctor and Jane again try to persuade Hutchinson to stop the games, as the final battle will be for real. He refuses and orders Woolsey to kill the Doctor.  However, once Hutchinson leaves, Woolsey joins forces with the Doctor.The Queen of the May is taken in a horse-drawn cart towards the village green, where she is to be burned. When the cart arrives, Hutchinson suddenly noticed that the Queen is not Tegan, but  a straw dummy that has been put in her place by Woolsey. Hutchinson becomes angry and he orders his men to kill Woolsey and the others.  Will appears in the nick of time and uses a flame torch to cause a distraction, which allows the Doctor, Hampden, Woolsey and Tegan to escape and get back to the TARDIS. The Doctor locks the signal conversion unit on the frequency of the psychic energy feeding the Malus, hoping to be able to direct it. Willow and a trooper try in vain to break their way into the TARDIS, and Turlough and Verney knock them unconscious with lumps of masonry. The Doctor succeeds in blocking the energy, and the projection of the Malus in the TARDIS dies. The real Malus, in an act of desperation, attempts to drain as much psychic energy from the villagers as possible. He creates a corporeal projection of three roundheads who try to kill the Doctor, Woolsey, Tegan, Turlough, Hampden, Verney and Will. However, the dazed and confused trooper stumbles from the TARDIS and into the main church area, becomes surrounded by the roundheads, and they decapitate him then vanish.  Hutchinson arrives and holds them all at gunpoint. When the Doctor tries to talk Hutchinson out of the thrall of the Malus, Willow attacks the group. In the scuffle, Will pushes Hutchinson into the mouth of the Malus, destroying the Maluss medium. Realizing it has failed, the Malus prepares to destroy itself and everything around it. Subsequently the church begins to collapse and the Doctor leads the others, including Willow, into the safety of the TARDIS.Inside the TARDIS, the Doctors companions are surprised to see Will still among them. The Doctor explains that he must have been wrong in his assumption that Will was a psychic projection. He then says that the Malus must have created a temporal rift, which allowed Will to slip into the future. The Time Lord then says that he will take Will back to 1643. Tegan objects and ask the Doctor to allow her some time to visit her grandfather. The Doctor is initially disgruntled but he is persuaded to stay in Little Hodcombe for a while for a rest.Continuity*No explanation is given for companion Kamelions absence from this story. *The Doctor mentions the Terileptils mining tinclavic on the planet Raaga. editor Eric Saward added this in the script to create a reference to his own story The Visitation (1982). He had planned to write another story featuring the Terileptils, and wanted to make sure the audience remembered who they were.  But as events worked out, Saward never wrote their planned return.*This was the first story to feature alterations to the Fifth Doctors costume. The Doctor wears a lighter-coloured frock coat, and a white v-neck cricketers sweater with thick red and black piping around the v and the lower waist, as opposed to the costume he wore during the previous two seasons where the v-neck piping was thin and coloured red, white and black and there was no piping around the waist. The shirt is also altered with green lining on the collar and where the shirt is buttoned, instead of red. The Doctor disposed of his original costume in episode 2 of the previous story, Warriors of the Deep, in which he disguised himself in the uniform of a Sea Base 4 guard; it is possible he never retrieved his costume from the base before he left. The Fifth Doctor would wear the secondary version of his costume for the remainder of the season, save for most of of Fire (1984). The newly regenerated Doctor would also be seen wearing it during the first episode of his debut story, Twin Dilemma (1984).*The Doctor encounters the other half of the Hakolian war machine that became the Malus in the Doctor Adventures novel The Hollow Men.Production7.96.6|()()()}}*The working titles of this story were War Game and Poltergeist.*Pringle had submitted this story in the mid-1970s to then-script editor Robert Holmes as a four-part story entitled War Game. In the 1980s he resubmitted his story (as well as a different four-parter, The Darkness, possibly featuring the Daleks) to script editor Saward. Realizing the story did not have enough impact for four episodes, it was later pared down to two, renamed Poltergeist and then finally The Awakening.*The story featured extensive location shooting and studio work. Saward wanted to add a TARDIS sequence with Tegan and Kamelion, utilising the robot prop and played in chameleonic form by Peter Davison and Mark Strickson. However, this scene was cut from the transmitted episode for timing reasons. The recovery of an early edit of episode one on video (in the personal archive of late producer John Nathan-Turner) means that this element, previously thought lost, may now be included on a DVD release of the serial. A small part of the scene has appeared in the documentary Kamelion: Metal Man which featured on the DVD release of Kings Demons(http://www.denofgeek.com/Reviews/527149/doctor_who_kamelion_tales_collection_dvd_review.html).*The master tape for Part One was found to have some scratch damage when the 1984 compilation version was being mastered; no protection copy was made at that time so the original tx master continued to deteriorate.  The tape was checked in the early 1990s and the scratch damage found to be far more intrusive than it had been in 1984; fortunately, the original film sequences were kept and using these, the compilation copy and the reprise from part 2, in 1997 the Who Restoration Team were able to make a repaired master copy. This was used for the VHS release.*This was officially the final story of the series to consist of two 25-minute episodes. All two-parters since then have been 45 minutes long per episode, including most of season 22 and several stories of the revived series. Ultimate Foe, the concluding segment of Trial of a Time Lord, is numbered on screen as Parts Thirteen and Fourteen of the latter title; furthermore, they share the same BBC production code, 7C, with the preceding four-part story arc, of the Vervoids, even though they have their own separate novelisation and feature compilation.*The production designer for this story, Barry Newbery, had worked on Doctor Who intermittently ever since its very first story.  After completing Awakening, Newbery took early retirement from the BBC, making this story his last professional effort.*John Nathan-Turner liked the character of Will Chandler a great deal and seriously considered keeping him on as a companion.  However, it was eventually concluded that Chandlers child-like character would quickly wear thin and lacked any clear path of development, so Nathan-Turner dropped the idea.In printA novelisation of this serial, written by Pringle, was published by Books in February 1985.Broadcast and VHS release*This story was released on a double VHS set with Frontios in March 1997. *The DVD was released in a box set named Earth Story along with Gunfighters on 20th June 2011.ReferencesExternal links****The Awakening on BBCWorldwideTV Youtube channelReviews**Target novelisation*On Target  The Awakeningvo:Galikam
2106196
Newington,_New_South_Wales
240px|thumb|Newington House, Silverwater, c.1894240px|thumb|Newington House Chapel, undated drawingNewington is a suburb in western Sydney, in the state of South Wales Australia. Newington is located 19 kilometres west of the central business district, in the local government area of Council.Newington is located 2km west of Bay, on the River, and 1km north-west of Olympic Park. It is best known as the location of the Athletes Village for the 2000 Olympics and Summer Paralympics. Most people believe that Newington was only conceived as a suburb during the planning of the Sydney 2000 Olympic Games; however, plans to create a suburb in the Newington area have existed as early as 1878. The Athletes Village was converted to residential apartments after the Games and Games. Other apartments and double-storey houses have also been built since. A memorial featuring all the names of the Australian athletes who participated at the 2000 Olympics and Summer Paralympics stands on a reserve opposite Newington Marketplace.HistoryThe suburb of Newington took its name from the Newington Estate which was named by John Blaxland after his family estate in Kent, England.(The Book of Sydney Suburbs, Compiled by Frances Pollon, Angus & Robertson Publishers, 1990, Published in Australia ISBN 0-207-14495-8)Aboriginal cultureNewington is situated on the traditional aboriginal lands of the Wann clan, known as the Wann-gal. The lands of the Wann-gal stretched along the southern shore of the River between Cockle Bay (Cadi-gal land) and Parramatta (Burramatta-gal land). The other side of Parramatta River was occupied by the Wallumetta-gal people.European settlementWithin ten days of the Fleet arriving in Australia, records had been made of The Flats, the extensive tidal wetlands at Homebush Bay. Between the years 1788 to 1831, blocks of land ranging from 100 to 10,000 acres (40 km) were given out to the first European settlers by dividing up the Wanng-al clans land. These land grants were inked in on County of Cumberland maps, with names of owners and land granted clearly indicated on the maps.In 1807, John Blaxland acquired 520 hectares of land, reserving the original grants of Waterhouse, Shortland, Archer and Haslam. He named the estate Newington after his family estate in Kent, England. Blaxland established a series of salt pans on the banks of the Parramatta River and by 1827, was producing 8 tons of salt each week for the Sydney market. Blaxland also established a tweed mill, limekiln and flourmill. Newington House was completed in 1832 and St Augustines Chapel in 1838.In 1843, Blaxland mortgaged the property to the Australian Trust Company. After he died in 1851 the Trust Company sold the property to John Dobie to recover the mortgage. The Blaxland family re-purchased the estate from Dobie in 1854 but offered it as security against a large loan. The property was transferred to the Official Assignee of the Insolvent Estate of Edward James Blaxland in 1860 and subsequently leased to the Church, who established College on the site. The property, extending from near the current Holker Street to the current Carnarvon Street, was sold to John Wetherill in 1877.Coal mining explorations were undertaken by Blaxland in 1841. He dug several six metre pits which gained the interest of the Australian Mining Company. The two parties reached agreement and, subsequently, undertook several unsuccessful explorations. In 1878, the City of Sydney Coal Company acquired the right to bore for coal at the site. The company drilled to 457 metres with no success. In 1855 the Australian Timber Company formed to exploit the timber stands in the Newington and surrounding areas. In the late 1870s and 1880s, Sydneys suburbs were expanding rapidly and it was hoped that the creation of a residential settlement between the large centres of Sydney and Parramatta would be a profitable exercise. This did not prove to be the case.In 1878, John Wetherill registered a subdivision plan for the entire 520 hectare Newington Estate. This proposal comprised an extensive grid layout, of some 114 lots, which extended well into the mud flats and mangroves of Wentworth Bay and Homebush Bay. In 1906 and 1909, Wetherill further subdivided his property as Riverside Heights, with the first allotments sold in that year. It was hoped that the location of the subdivision in close proximity to the developing State Abattoir and Brickworks would attract people to the area in association with the employment opportunities offered by these establishments. This venture was largely unsuccessful, with only a few lots being sold. However the layout of the western part of the Newington subdivision remains obvious in the current street pattern and street names.(Sydney Olympic Park Authority - Five Layers of History)Early public useFormer Athletes Village|thumbThe Newington Estate was first offered to the Government for use as an Asylum for the Insane in 1874. The Government did not accept this offer, however in 1879, Government Architect Barnett prepared a report on the suitability of the Newington estate for a Reformatory School for Boys. His report concluded that the site was suitable for a Boys Reformatory or a Benevolent Asylum for Aged Women. In September 1897 the Crown Solicitor confirmed that 5000 pounds would be paid to John Wetherill to acquire about 19 hectares of land, which included Newington House.thumb|left|Olympic Village MemorialA then new Aged Womens Asylum was constructed to replace the existing asylum which was housed within the Immigrant Depot at the Hyde Park Barracks. The first buildings were established in 1886 on this new site to house 300 patients. At this time, the hospital was categorised as a state asylum for dependent adults with infirmity or illness of incurable character. Various additional buildings and structures were added to the Newington Hospital over the years. In 1960 it was proposed that the hospital should be closed and the site sold to industry. The significance of the site, however, stimulated significant public opposition to the plans. In 1968, after a series of drawn out negotiations, the Government of the day decided to close the hospital and transfer the property to the then NSW Department of Prisons. Some of the buildings are preserved in the grounds of the Remand and Reception Centre where they are still in use.(Commercial areasNewington Marketplace is an outdoor shopping centre featuring a Woolworths supermarket and specialty shops, cafes and restaurants. Newington also features a number of commercial buildings providing office and warehouse space.Schools* Newington Public SchoolReferencesExternal links* (Australie)
2112546
Leaderless_resistance
Leaderless resistance, or phantom cell structure, is a political resistance strategy in which small, independent groups (covert cells), including the case of individuals (solo cells), challenge an established adversary such as a government. Leaderless resistance can encompass anything from non-violent disruption and disobedience to bombings, assassinations and other violent agitation. Leaderless cells lack bidirectional, vertical command links and operate without hierarchal command.() While it lacks a central command, the concept does not necessarily imply lack of cooperation.Given the simplicity of the strategy, as well as the fact that it is difficult to stamp out, leaderless resistance has been employed by a wide-range of movements, from terrorist and groups, to the movement, radical environmental movement, as well as anti-corporate and anti-abortion activists.General characteristicsA typical covert cell operates as anything from a lone individual to a small group. The basic characteristic of the structure is that there is no explicit communication between cells which are otherwise acting toward the same goals. Members of one cell usually have little or no specific information on who else is agitating on behalf of their cause.Leaderless movements may have symbolic figureheads. It can be a public figure or an inspirational author, who picks generic targets and objectives, but does not actually manage or execute plans. Media, in this case, often create a feedback loop: the publishing of declarations of a movements role model instills motivation, ideas and assumed sympathy in the minds of potential agitators who lend further authority to the figurehead. While this may be loosely viewed as a vertical command structure, it is notably unidirectional: a titular leader makes pronouncements, and activists may respond, but there is no established contact between the two levels of organization.As a result, leaderless resistance cells are largely insusceptible to informants and traitors. As there is neither a center that may be destroyed, nor links between the cells that may be infiltrated, it is more difficult for established authorities to arrest the development of a leaderless resistance movement than more conventional hierarchies.Given its asymmetrical character and the fact that it is often strategically adopted in the face of an obvious institutional power imbalance, leaderless resistance has much in common with warfare. The latter strategy, however, usually retains some form of organized, bidirectional leadership and is often more broad-based than the individualized actions of leaderless cells. In some cases, a largely leaderless movement may evolve into a coherent insurgency or guerrilla movement, as successfully occurred with the Yugoslav partisans of War II. In the same conflict, the British leadership had extensive plans for the use of such resistance in the event of a successful German invasion.()While the concept of leaderless resistance is often based on resistance by violent means, it is not limited to them. The same structure can be used by non-violent groups authoring, printing, and distributing samizdat literature, using the internet to create self-propagating boycotts against political opponents, maintaining an alternative electronic currency outside of the reach of the taxing governments and transaction-logging banks, etc. HistoryThe concept of leaderless resistance was reportedly developed by Col. Louis Amoss, an alleged intelligence officer, in the early 1960s. An anti-communist, Amoss saw leaderless resistance as a backup for the possibility of a communist seizure of power in the States.The concept was revived and popularized in an essay published by the anti-government Klux Klan member Beam in 1983 and again in 1992. Beam advocated leaderless resistance as a technique for white nationalists to continue the struggle against the U.S. government, despite an overwhelming imbalance in power and resources. In the same year, the Liberation Front (ELF) was formed as an eco-resistance movement.Beam argued that conventional hierarchical pyramidal organizations are extremely dangerous for their participants, when employed in a resistance movement against government, because of the ease of disclosing the of command. A more workable approach would be to convince the like-minded individuals to form independent cells, without close communication between each other, but generally operating in the same direction.In practiceAnimal liberation:Further information: liberation movement, liberation, Veganarchism, and and animal rightsImage:Hornebeagles.jpg|right|thumb|An ALF raid removing 82 beagles and 26 rabbits from Interfauna in Cambridge on St Patricks Night 1990.(The man, the activist, first published in Arkangel.)Image:Huntingdonmarch.jpg|thumb|A protest march in Huntingdon by Huntingdon Animal Cruelty, November 10, 2007.The first recorded action for animal liberation which progressed into a movement of leaderless resistance was by the original Band of Mercy in 1824 to thwart hunters.(Best & Nocella (eds), Terrorists or Freedom Fighters, Lantern Books, 2004.) Inspired by this group and after seeing a pregnant deer driven into the village by fox hunters to be killed, John Prestige decided to actively oppose this sport and formed the Saboteurs Association (HSA) in 1964. Within a year, a leaderless model of hunt-sabotage groups was formed across the country.(The of Mercy was then formed in 1972 using direct action to liberate animals and cause economic sabotage against those thought to be abusing animals. Lee and others then changed the name to the Liberation Front (ALF) in 1976 and the leaderless resistance model focusing broadly on animal liberation was born.(Webb, Robin. Animal Liberation  By Whatever Means Necessary, in Best & Nocella (eds), Terrorists or Freedom Fighters, Lantern Books, 2004, p. 77.)First! and the movement in the 1980s adopted the leaderless resistance model,() whilst those in the animal liberation movement advocating violence emerged with activists using the name Rights Militia (ARM) in 1982. Letter bombs were sent to the then Prime Minister, Thatcher, with two years later the name Retribution Squad (HRS) also being used.(Singer, Peter. The Animal Liberation Movement: Its philosophy, its achievements and its future. Retrieved on 2007-11-09.)(Focus: Desecrated, Times Online.)The Liberation Front (ELF) was then formed in 1992, which broke from Earth First! when the organization decided to focus on advocating public direct action, instead of ecotage that the ELF participated in,(Alleyne, Richard. Terror tactics that brought a company to its knees, The Daily Telegraph, January 19, 2001) whilst a violent group was established called the Justice Department in 1993, who in 1994, sent razor blades to hunters such as Charles and researchers.(Animal rights, terror tactics, BBC News, 30 August, 2000.)(From push to shove, Southern Poverty Law Group Intelligence Report, Fall 2002, p.3)In 1999 the strategy was then actively employed by animal liberation organisations Huntingdon Animal Cruelty (SHAC), formed from the beagles campaign and the Hill Grove Cats to close down Life Sciences (HLS). Despite claiming successes (Quantum Analytics: Drop HLS, SHAC.) leaderless animal liberation and environmental movements generally lack the broad popular support that often occurs in strictly political or military conflicts. The Revolutionary Cells--Animal Liberation Brigade (RCALB) then appeared in 2003 and sent pipe bombs to Corporation as well as using devices against similar campaign targets, whilst a year later on the south coast of Dorset in 2004, the Liberation Front (LLF) was founded.(Activists war to save lobsters, BBC News, July 30, 2004.)Within a few years of the victories claimed by the SHAC, other campaigns against animal testing laboratories emerged. At the same time, SPEAK Campaigns and the more radical ALF militants, Arson Squad began their campaigns for the same goal; to end Universitys animal research.In April 2009, the Forces Against Huntingdon Life Sciences (MFAH) became active, when along with the ALF, they began targeting HLS customer and financial Directors, as well as company property. Since then, groups have reported over a dozen actions in Europe, including painting homes, burning cars and grave desecration. Militants, however oppose ALF ideology, instead believing in any necessary action to prevent suffering at HLS laboratories.(MFAH Communique: April 7th 2009, Back Magazine, 7th April 2009)Broadly-focused movements, campaigns and organizations* Liberation Front (ALF)* Rights Militia (ARM)* Anarchist Action (A(A)A)Movements/campaigns focused on animal testing;Ongoing movements/campaigns* Highgate Farm* Forces Against Huntingdon Life Sciences (MFAH)* Arson Squad* Freedom Project* Cells - Animal Liberation Brigade (RCALB)* SPEAK* Huntingdon Animal Cruelty (SHAC)* Sequani Animal Testing (SSAT)* Wickham Animal Testing (SWAT);Historical campaigns* Beagles Campaign* the Goats* the Hill Grove Cats* the Newchurch Guinea Pigs* the Shamrock MonkeysMovements/campaigns focused on hunting* Retribution Squad (HRS)* Saboteurs Association (HSA)Movements/campaigns that advocate violence* Rights Militia (ARM)* Justice Department* Retribution Squad (HRS)* Forces Against Huntingdon Life Sciences (MFAH)* Cells - Animal Liberation Brigade (RCALB)IslamistsLeaderless resistance is also often well-suited to terrorist objectives. The Islamist organization Al-Qaeda provides a prototypical figurehead/leaderless cell structure. The organization itself may be pyramidal, but sympathizers who act on its pronouncements often do so spontaneously and independently.Given the small, clandestine character of terrorist cells, it is easy to assume they necessarily constitute leaderless resistance models. Where a bidirectional affiliation occurs, however, the label is inappropriate. The men who executed the bombings of the Underground on July 7, 2005 constituted a leaderless resistance cell in that they purportedly acted out of sympathy for fundamentalism but under their own auspices. The hijackers involved in the 11 attacks, by contrast, allegedly received training, direction, and funding from Al-Qaeda, and are not properly designated a leaderless cell.Internet activismThe Internet, being an easy and instant way to communicate, makes it an excellent tool for leaderless resistance. Anonymouss Chanology used the Internet to plan protests against the of Scientology.Neo-NazisThe concept of leaderless resistance remains important to much far right thinking in the United States,() both in response to Amoss initial fear (foreign forces on U.S. soil) but increasingly also  in line with Beam  as a response to perceived federal government over-reach at the expense of individual rights. The actions of McVeigh are perhaps the most extreme example in the States. McVeigh acted largely alone, but based on motivations widespread amongst the far-right anti-government and militia movement.Leaderless resistance is not only used toward anti-government ends on the far right. Xenophobic organizations such as Aryan Resistance and the British neo-Nazi 18 have adopted and advocate the tactic. The modern Klux Klan is also credited with having developed a leaderless resistance model.() Southgate also advocated forms of leaderless resistance during his time as a leading activist in the Revolutionary Faction and a pioneer of National-Anarchism.Stormfront, Nations, and Nation link to Beams Leaderless Resistance. These extremist groups promote a lone wolf mentality. While nominally decrying violence, the sites praise the man who practices what he preaches, and who backs up his words with his deeds.() Stormfront, while regretting the loss of life, explains how Nathaniel Smiths 1998 killing spree was compelled by circumstances. The Church of the Creator presents a mixed message, calling Smith a selfless man who gave his life in the resistance to Jewish/mud tyranny, but noting the Church does not condone his acts.(Radical environmentalism:Further information: Ecotage, Eco-terrorism, Monkeywrenching, and liberationThe first identified leaderless resistance in the environmental movement was when explosive and devices were used in 1976, by John Hanna and others as the Life Force (ELF), also now known as the original ELF. The group conducted a campaign of armed actions in northern California and Oregon, later disbanding in 1978 following Hannas arrest for placing incendiary devices on seven crop-dusters at the California airport on Day, 1977.(Original ELF) It wasnt until over a decade and a half later that this form of warfare resurfaced using the same acronym.Image:Earthfirstmonkeywrench.gif|thumb|right|180px|The symbol of First!: a Monkey wrench and stone hammer.In 1980 First! was then founded by Foreman and others to confront environmental destruction, primarily of the American West. Inspired by the Abbey novel The Monkey Wrench Gang, Earth First! made use of such techniques as treesitting(Earth Firsts first treesitting civil disobedience action, Earth First! 1985, Oregon, June 1985.) and treespiking(Tree Spiking Memo, Earth First!, April 1990.) to stop logging companies, as well as other activities targeted towards mining, road construction,() suburban development and energy companies.The organization were committed to nonviolent ecotage techniques from the groups inception, with those that split from the movement in the 1990s including the Liberation Front (ELF) in 1992, naming themselves after the Liberation Front (ALF) who formed in the 1970s.(ELF Burns Down Vail, FIRE, December 1999.) Three years later in Canada, inspired by the ELF in Europe the first Earth Liberation action occurred, but this time as the Liberation Army (ELA), a similar movement who use ecotage and monkeywrenching as a tool, although no guidelines had been published.The ELF gained national attention for a series of actions which earned them the label of eco-terrorists,(Earth Liberation Front is now FBIs No. 1 Domestic Terrorist Threat, Property Rights of America Foundation Inc, March 2001.)(ELF News, Earth Liberation Front) including the burning of a ski resort in Colorado in 1998, and the burning of an SUV dealership in Oregon in 1999. In the same year the ELA had made headlines by setting fire to the Resorts in D.C., causing $12 million in damages.(waste & abuse - controversy over a temporary dirt road built by Vail Resortsand its effect on wetlands, BNet, September 27th 1999.) The defendants in the case were later charged in the FBIs Operation Backfire, along with other arsons and cases, which were later named by environmentalists as the Scare; alluding to the Scare, periods of fear over communist infiltration of U.S.(Eco-Terror Indictments: Operation Backfire Nets 11, FBI, January 20th 2006.)(Resentencing date set for Jeff Luers, Freedom4um, 29 December 2007.)Following the 11, 2001 attacks several laws were passed increasing the penalty for ecoterrorism, and hearings were held in Congress discussing the activity of groups such as the ELF. To date no one has been killed as a result of an ELF or ALF action since both groups forbid harming human or non-human life.(Taylor, 1998. Religion, Violence and Radical Environmentalism: From Earth First! to the Unabomber to the Earth Liberation Front, Terrorism and Political Violence 10(4):1-42) It was then announced in 2003 that eco-terrorist attacks, known as ecotage, had increased from the ELF, ELA and the Environmental Rangers, another name used be activists when engaging in similar activity.(The eco-terrorist anthrax connection, ESR, October 21st 2001.)In 2005 the FBI announced that the ELF, is Americas greatest domestic terrorist threat, responsible for over 1,200 criminal incidents amounting to tens of millions of dollars in damage to property,(Best, Steven and Best & Nocella. Igniting a Revolution: Voices in Defense of the Earth, Books, 2006, p. 47.) with the United States of Homeland Security confirming this regarding the ALF and ELF.(FBI, ATF address domestic terrorism, CNN, May 19th 2005.)Stupid then was launched in 2005, in an attempt to combat the growing airport expansions in the UK using action with a year later the first for Climate Action being held with 600 people attending a protest called Reclaim Power converging on Drax Power Station in Yorkshire and attempted to shut it down. There were thirty-eight arrests, with four breaching the fence and the railway line being blocked.()()Movements/organizations*First!*Liberation Army (ELA)*Liberation Front (ELF)*Life Force*for Climate Action*StupidAnti-abortion militancyAnti-abortion militants The Army of God uses leaderless resistance as its organizing principle. As of 2009, The Army of Gods webpage hosts a reprint of an article entitled Leaderless Resistance from a publication called The Seditionist.(http://www.armyofgod.com/LeaderlessResistance.htm)()(http://www.villagevoice.com/1998-11-10/news/the-terrorist-campaign-against-abortion/3)CountermeasuresNetwork analysis in classical settingThe networks based on leaderless resistance are potentially vulnerable to network analysis and its derivative analysis. Link analysis of social networks is the fundamental reason for the ongoing legislative push in the U.S. and the Union  for mandatory retention of telecommunication traffic data and limiting access to anonymous prepaid cellphones, as the stored data contain important network analysis clues.Network analysis was successfully used by French Colonel Yves Godard to break the Algerian resistance between 1955 and 1957 and force them to cease the bombing campaigns. The Algerian conflict maybe better described as guerrilla in nature rather than leaderless resistance (see Modern Warfare by Col. Roger Trinquier). The mapping data was obtained by the use of informants and torture and were used to obtain the identities of important individuals in the resistance; these were then assassinated, disrupting the Algerian resistance networks. The more distinctive the individual is in the adversarys network, the more difficult it is to replace them and the greater the damage. France declared Algeria independent on July 3, 1962.Advantages for leaderless resistanceTraditional organizations leave behind much evidence of their activities, such as money trails, and training and recruitment material. Leaderless resistances, as they are as much ideologies as organizations, generally lack such traces. The effects of their operations, globally reported by the media, act as a sort of messaging and recruitment advertising.The internet provides investigators with further challenges. The individual cells (and even a single person can be a cell) can communicate over the internet, anonymously or semi-anonymously publishing and sharing information online, to be found by others through well-known websites. Even where legally and technically possible to ascertain who accessed what, it is often practically impossible to discern in reasonable timeframe who is a real threat and who is just curious, a journalist, or a crawler.Despite these advantages, leaderless resistance is often unstable. If the actions are not frequent enough or not successful, the stream of public messages, serving as the recruiting, motivation and coordination drives for other cells, diminishes. If the actions are too successful, the result will be formation of groups and other structuresstructures vulnerable to network analysis.In fiction*The 1970 novel A Piece of Resistance, re-published in the US in 2004 under the title  Never Surrender  by Egleton depicts resistance to a Soviet occupation of England.*The 1996 novel Unintended Consequences by John Ross portrays a successful rebellion by the American heartland after decades of bullying by faraway Washington.See also*anarchism*wolf (terrorism)*cell systemReferencesExternal links* Networks and Netwars - PDF book by RAND Corporation.*Leaderless Resistance - the original essay* Garfinkel - Leaderless resistance todaysenza leaderzh:
2118100
William_John_Wills
occupation   Surveyor, explorerImage:William John Wills,lithography.jpg|thumb|right|214px|Lithograph of William John WillsWilliam John Wills (5 January 1834c.June/July 1861) was an English surveyor who also trained for a while as a surgeon. He achieved fame as the second-in-command of the ill-fated and Wills expedition, which was the first expedition to cross Australia from south to north, finding a route across the continent from the settled areas of Victoria to the of Carpentaria. Early yearsWills was born in Totnes in Devon, the second child to Dr William Wills (180028 September 1889) and Sarah Mary Elizabeth Wills (ne Calley, 23 December 180019 February 1880). He was one of seven children;* Elizabeth Rose Wills (August 183123 May 1832).* William John Wills (5 January 1834June/July 1861).* Thomas Wills (July 1835October 1836).* Thomas James Wills (b. 1837, came to Australia in 1853, married Anne McDonald in 1860, d. Ballarat, 20 May 1909).* Charles Henry Wills (18391864).* Elizabeth Margaret Wills (b. 1843, married Humphrey Joseph Hare (b.1835) in 1867, d. ?).* Hannah Wills (b. 24 March 1845, unmarried, d. London, 15 April 1914).He lived at the family home at Ipplepen and as a young child he contracted a fever which left him with slow and hesitating speech.() He was home-tutored by his father until the age of 11 and then from 1845 to 1850 he attended St Andrews Grammar School, Ashburton. He was then articled to Wills surgical practice. In 1852 he studied practical chemistry under Stenhouse at Bartholomews Hospital in London.AustraliaDr Wills bought a share in the Melbourne Gold Mining Company in 1852 and planned to migrate to Australia with William and Thomas. However Sarah Wills objected to him leaving so Dr Wills delayed his departure and the two boys went alone. Eighteen year old William and fifteen year old Thomas left Dartmouth on 1 October 1852 aboard the Janet Mitchell. They arrived in Melbourne on  3 January 1853 with 197 fellow unassisted passengers. William and Thomas found accommodation at the Immigrants Home in South Melbourne.In February 1853 the Wills brothers found work as shepherds at a property owned by the Royal Bank Company on the River near Deniliquin. They were paid 30 p.a. plus rations and were in charge of a flock of 1300 rams at the Ram Station. Dr Wills followed his sons out to Australia, arriving in August 1853, and the three returned to Melbourne before moving to Ballarat where William took up work as a digger on the goldfields. In 1854 he worked as assistant surgeon in his fathers practice and later he opened his own gold office. In early 1855 William worked on William Skenes Kanawalla Station (Hensley Park) on the River near Hamilton. He returned to Ballarat in April 1855 and towards the end of the year he began to study surveying. He was appointed as an amateur to the office of John Hamlet Taylor, Acting District Surveyor in the Ballarat Survey Office on Sturt Street. William spent several months learning trigonometry, Euclid drawing and geometry and then in 1856 he went on to learn field-surveying. He started his practical experience at Glendaruel, near Tourello, where he worked under the supervision of Frederick John Byerly, Assistant Surveyor, on 150 p.a. plus board. In February 1857 he was working at Bullarook Creek Camp and in March 1857 he was surveying at Kingower near Inglewood. In the middle of 1857 he was promoted to foreman and placed in charge of a field party and his salary increased to 185 p.a. From April to June 1858 he was surveying at St Arnaud. His field party contract was terminated in June and he returned to Ballarat in July and took occasional contracts surveying for Hodgkinson, the Deputy Surveyor General.Wills moved to Melbourne in August 1858 and from August to December he lodged with Mrs E Henderson at 1 Dorcas Street, South Melbourne. In November 1858 he received a temporary appointment on the recommendation of Charles Whybrow Ligar, Surveyor-General, as a supernumerary at the recently established Magnetic Observatory which was then at Flagstaff Hill. In February 1859 one of the Observatory assistants, John Walter Osborne (1828-1902), transferred from the observatory to become a photolithographer in the Survey Department of the Office of Crown Lands and Survey. Wills replaced him, and in March 1859 when his permanent appointment was confirmed, he moved into a room at the Observatory. Wills studied under Government Meteorologist and Observatory Director, von Neumayer, and his work companions were Jacob Bauer, Charles E Pickering, Charles Moerlin and supernumeries John O Rose and Edwin James Welch. Burke and Wills expedition OHara Burke was appointed leader of the Victorian Exploring Expedition with George James Landells as second-in-command. Wills was appointed third-in-command, surveyor, astronomical and meteorological observer in July 1860 on a salary of 300 a year. The expedition left Melbourne on Monday, 20 August 1860 with a total of 19 men, 27 camels and 23 horses. They reached Menindee on 16 October 1860 where Landells resigned following an argument with Burke. Wills was promoted to second-in-command.Burke split the expedition at Menindee and the lead party reached Creek on 11 November 1860 where they formed a depot. The remaining men were expected to follow up from Menindee and so after a break, Burke decided to make a dash to the of Carpentaria. Burke split the party again and left on 16 December 1860, placing Brahe in charge of the depot on Cooper Creek. Burke, Wills, John King and Charley Gray reached the mangroves on the estuary of the River, near where the town of Normanton now stands, on 9 February 1861. Flooding rains and swamps meant they never saw open ocean. Already weakened by starvation and exposure, progress on the return journey was slow and hampered by the tropical monsoon downpours of the wet season. Gray died four days before they reached the depot at Cooper Creek and the other three took a day to bury him. They eventually reached the depot on 21 April 1861 to find the men had not arrived from Menindee, and ironically that Brahe and the Depot Party had given up waiting and left just 9 hours earlier. Brahe had already waited 18 weeks for their return (he and Burke had agreed to 13 weeks) and had buried a note and some food underneath a tree which is now known as the Dig Tree.Image:Ac.burkeandwills.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Burke and Wills Statue by Summers on the corner of Collins and Swanston Streets, Melbourne.Burke, Wills and King attempted to reach Mount Hopeless, the furthest extent of settlement in South Australia, which was closer than Menindee (the route preferred by Wills)(), but failed and returned to Cooper Creek. While waiting for rescue Wills became exhausted and was unable to continue. He urged Burke and King to continue on, leaving him alone with food, water and shelter. Wills died alone at a place called Breerily Waterhole on Cooper Creek in Australia. Burke died soon after. The exact date of their deaths is unknown, but has generally been accepted to be 28 June 1861.King survived with the help of Aborigines until he was rescued in September by William Howitt. Howitt buried Burke and Wills before returning to Melbourne. In 1862 Howitt returned to Cooper Creek and disinterred Burke and Wills bodies, taking them first to Adelaide and then by steamer to Melbourne where they were laid in state for two weeks. On 23 January 1863 Burke and Wills received a State Funeral and were buried in Melbourne General Cemetery.A monument to Wills is located in Totnes, Devon.( See also * and Wills expedition* OHara Burke* King (explorer)References*The Argus (Melbourne), 1861. The Burke and Wills exploring expedition: An account of the crossing the continent of Australia from Cooper Creek to Carpentaria, with biographical sketches of Robert OHara Burke and William John Wills. Melbourne: Wilson and Mackinnon.*Bonyhady, Tim, 1991. Burke and Wills: From Melbourne to myth. Balmain: David Ell Press. ISBN 0-908197-91-8. *Burke and Wills Outback Conference 2003, 2005. The Inaugural Burke & Wills Outback Conference : Cloncurry 2003 : a collation of presentations. Dave Phoenix, Cairns Qld. ISBN 0-646-44702-5*Clune, Frank, 1937. Dig: A drama of central Australia. Sydney: Angus and Robertson.*Corke, David G, 1996. The Burke and Wills Expedition: A study in evidence. Melbourne: Educational Media International. ISBN 0-909178-16-X*Murgatroyd, Sarah, 2002. The Dig Tree. Melbourne: Text Publishing. ISBN 1-877008-08-7*Van der Kiste, John, 2011.  William John Wills: Pioneer of the Australian outback. Stroud: History Press.*Victoria: Parliament, 1862. Burke and Wills Commission. Report of the Commissioners appointed to enquire into and report upon the circumstances connected with the sufferings and death of Robert OHara Burke and William John Wills, the Victorian Explorers. Melbourne: John Ferres Government Printer.*Wills, William John, & Wills, Dr William, 1863. A successful exploration through the interior of Australia, from Melbourne to the Gulf of Carpentaria: from the journals and letters of William John Wills. London: Richard Bentley.(External links* * Australian Dictionary of Biography* Burke & Wills Web A comprehensive website containing many of the historical documents relating to the Burke & Wills Expedition.* The Burke & Wills Historical Society The Burke & Wills Historical Society.* The Diary of William John Wills The diary written by Wills while at the Cooper from 23 April to 28 June 1861.* William John Wills journal Images from the National Library of Australias digital manuscript collection.John WillsJohn WillsJohn WillsJohn WillsJohn Wills John Wills
2120271
Mellor,_Greater_Manchester
static_image_captionView of Mellor from Mellor ChurchyardMellor is a village within the Borough of Stockport, in Manchester, England. Mellor, situated between Bridge and Mills, runs along a tributary of the Goyt. It extends from the start of the old turnpike road at the boundary of Bridge to the current county boundary with Derbyshire.(Peak District View - Mellor) Mellor no longer has any shops, so people now shop in Marple Bridge, Marple or further afield. It has a church, primary school, golf course, sports club and a riding school. There are three pubs in the village, The Royal Oak,(Marple Pub Guide - The Royal Oak) The Devonshire Arms,(Marple Pub Guide - The Devonshire Arms) and The Oddfellows Arms.(Marple Pub Guide - the Oddfellows Arms) There is also a fourth pub, the Hare and Hounds(Marple Pub Guide - the Hare and Hounds) in the hamlet of Brow, which was formerly part of the parish of Mellor. An independent census from 1891 lists several of these pubs and a complex of shops and industries which no longer exist.(Kellys Directory of the Counties of Derby, Notts, Leicester and Rutland published London (May, 1891) - pp.262-4)As with virtually all towns and villages in Britain, there is a War I memorial, situated in a small park at the very heart of the modern village. Farmland takes the bulk of the remaining space, although with the decline in the farming economy in recent years, much of it is now given over to non-agricultural uses: horses, golf, and a scout camp. A number of farm buildings and Hall date back to the late 17th century, and were built on ruins of earlier buildings, illustrating the long-standing importance of agriculture to Mellor. The village was a parish in the county of Derbyshire until 1936, when it was transferred to Marple Urban District in Cheshire; in 1974 it became part of Manchester.HistoryThe ancient past of Mellor is slowly being discovered as a result of a long-term archaeological survey of the area by means of excavations and geophysical surveys, including radar. Although some history had survived by means of written records and local tradition, it has become clear that such knowledge only scratched the surface and that the extent of Mellors past had passed from such memories.The origin of the name Mellor is uncertain. In one Celtic dialect, the term would translate to the bare (or rounded) hill. The name Mellor does not appear in the Norman-era Domesday Book, although the neighbouring town of Ludworth (recorded as Lodeuorde) is listed.(National Archives page for the Domesday book entry for Ludworth in Mellor) It is possible that Ludworth originally included Mellor and that they split into two distinct areas at a later date.The Saxons built a church at the southern-most end of the Iron Age settlement some time in the 7th or 8th centuries. The church was subsequently destroyed and rebuilt, possibly several times. St. Thomas Church has the oldest known wooden pulpit in Britain, possibly the world.(Richards (1947), pp. 232&ndash;234.) Dating from the reign of Edward II (1307&ndash;1327), it is ogtagonal and carved from a single piece of wood.(Pevsner & Hubbard (2003), p. 279.) The church also has a 12th century font.()According to local legend, Mellor Hall is built on the foundations of the house of a Norman nobleman. During excavations of the Iron Age hill fort, a 13th century hall was discovered.(Discovery of Medieval Aisled Hall) By the time of the English Civil War, Marple had become totally dominant in the region. So much so that John Bradshawe, Lord President of the High Court of Justice and Lord of Marple Hall was the first to sign the death warrant of King Charles I.Oldknow(Background on Samuel Oldknow)(Summary of Samuel Oldknow) was a significant businessman(Samuel Oldknows Business Records) and mill owner(Oldknows Mellor Mill) in Mellor during the Revolution. Just across the River Goyt, there are the Roman Lakes.(Mellor Mill & Estate)(Roman Lakes Leisure Park)(Photographs and Paintings of the Roman Lakes) These are not Roman, but were water reservoirs for Samuel Oldknows Mill(Photographs and Paintings of Mellor Mill) cotton mill, a major employer in the area in the Industrial Revolution.One of the local stories involves the fate of Samuel Oldknows mill at the Roman Lakes, which was destroyed by fire in November 1892. Accidents at such mills were common, but so were violent rivalries. There have been claims made for both cases. The only thing that can be stated with any certainty is that the mill was gutted by the blaze.The other major figure in Mellor at this time was Radcliffe,(William Radcliffe short biography) a mill owner who invented many devices(Inventions of William Radcliffe) for improving the textile industry.At the height of the Industrial Revolution, coal-power supplanted water-power as the driving force and minable coal seams were found in Mellor. Relatively recently, the Coal Board strip-mined those seams that still had sufficient coal in them.GeographyMellor lies in the foothills of the Pennines, just outside the area of Derbyshire known as the High Peak. Nearby villages include Rowarth, Marple Bridge, Ludworth and Brow. The town of Marple lies across the River Goyt. A little further away are the towns of Romiley and Mills and the villages of Hayfield and Strines. Mellor Church and Hall are situated on the top of a ridge that is separated from the bulk of the village of Mellor by a gully and stream.The oldest part of inhabited Mellor runs alongside the river Goyt, stretching from the oldest parts of Marple Bridge up the hill, spreading out where the slope becomes gentle. Newer parts of the village run down Longhurst Lane, the old turnpike road, and into former farmland released for building by Townscliffe Farm. At the very top of Mellor is the junction of Five Ways. One of these roads runs to Mellor, a second to Rowarth, a third to Strines and New Mills, the fourth to a water treatment plant and a fifth to many farms on the edge of Mellor. Spoil heaps indicate mining operations here and coal was mined in the general area during the Industrial Revolution.Because of the topology, Mellor lies on one of the easier points for entering the Pennines from the Mersey Basin by road or foot. It is also on the flight path for air traffic into Airport, formerly known as Ringway.GeologyMellor is located on a gritstone area in an area of the District referred to as the Peak. (In contrast, the limestone region of the Peak District is referred to as the Peak.) The underlying geology of the area belongs to the Carboniferous Millstone Grit series which are outcrop as the Middle Grit. Below this are shales and mudstones and older Gritstones such as the Kinder Scout Grit which forms the Kinder Plateau to the East. Small seams of coal have been located in Mellor, over the gritstone. clay, left from the Age, can usually be found just below the surface-level soil. At one point, all of the Peak District - Mellor included - was submerged beneath relatively warm waters. Evidence for this is the limestone region, with the limestone containing fossils of coral and other shallow-depth warm-water creatures.The gritstone comes from deposits laid down about 300 million years ago over the limestone. Shallow coal deposits lie on top of the gritstone, although most of these have long since been mined. Very deep coal deposits do exist further into the Pennines, but again many of these have been worked out. Although evidence exists for volcanos elsewhere in the Peak District,The soil in Mellor is fairly rich in peat and can bog easily, but there are no permanent bogs within Mellor itself. The only other noteworthy detail on Mellors geology is the almost complete absence of iodine, particularly in the water of the River Goyt. If no other source of iodine is in the diet, drinking the river water can lead to an enlarged gland, a condition is known as Neck, or Goitre.GovernanceOn the creation of Manchester, Mellor became a part of Stockport metropolitan borough.The voters of Mellor consist of, in almost equal numbers, Liberal Democrats and Conservatives. Labour have never done well here. Mellor is not noted for being particularly active on the political front. Nonetheless, turnout for elections is often very high.DemographyAccording to the for National Statistics, at the time of the Kingdom Census 2001, Mellor had a population of 2,394. The 2001 population density was , with a 100 to 92.1 female-to-male ratio.() Of those over 16 years old, 18.8% were single (never married), 54.6% married, and 6.6% divorced.() This was significantly different to the borough and country figures, with a higher rate of marriages, and fewer single people.() Mellors 1,070 households included 27.4% one-person, 43.5% married couples living together, 5.7% were co-habiting couples, and 5.9% single parents with their children.() Of those aged 1674, 20.9% had no academic qualifications.()As of the 2001 UK census, 88.4% of Mellors residents reported themselves as Christian, 1.0% Muslim, and 0.2% Hindu. The census recorded 5.8% as having no religion, 0.2% had an alternative religion and 4.4% did not state their religion.()Population changeEconomyA few small businesses work out of the old mills that scatter the countryside, and there is a limited amount of farming, principally grazing livestock: sheep and beef cattle. A few farms have free-range chickens, but the majority of poultry are battery-farmed. Horses are also common, and horse-riding is a popular pursuit in the area, which benefits from many ancient bridleways.According to the 2001 UK census, the industry of employment of residents of Mellor aged 1674 was 18.3% manufacturing, 16.3% retail and wholesale, 12.2% health and social work, 12.0% education, 11.7% property and business services, 6.6 public administration, 4.6% construction, 4.5% transport and communications, 4.2% hotels and restaurants, 2.7% finance, 2.0% agriculture, 0.7% energy and water supply, and 4.2% other.() Compared with national figures, the town had a relatively high proportion of people working in education, agriculture, and public administration, and low levels of people working in finance and transport and communications.() The census recorded the economic activity of residents aged 1674, 1.8% students were with jobs, 3.4% students without jobs, 3.1% looking after home or family, 4.1% permanently sick or disabled, and 1.1% economically inactive for other reasons.(SportsSport in Mellor is taken seriously and, despite its size, the village boasts a number of clubs that ensure physical activity all year round.;LacrosseMellor is probably best known for being a hotbed of lacrosse.(Mellor Lacrosse Team) The club has enjoyed great success in its 80 year history, winning the North of England mens championship on many occasions, the most recent being 2006. The club has three mens senior teams and a thriving junior section and has recently created a ladies team. The club also regularly plays host to touring teams from the USA at junior and senior level. The success of the club can be gauged by the fact that many Mellor players have gone on to play at international level. Although recantly relegated for the first time since the War, Mellor is still considered by many in the country to be one of the most dangerous competitors in lacrosse. ;FootballMellor Football Club(Mellor Football Club) was founded in 1923 by members of the Hambleton Family. Mellor FCs home ground is Wood Lane in Marple, and the club currently boasts four open-age teams. Mellor 1st XI are currently in the Premier Division of the Lancashire and Cheshire League and won the Stockport Senior Cup in the 2004/05 season.;CricketMellor Cricket Club(Mellor Cricket Club) had two senior teams that played in the Derbyshire and Cheshire League having previously played in the Glossop and District League for many years and before that, in the High Peak League. They now play in the Cheshire County League 3rd XI Saturday Division 2(http://cheshirecountycl.play-cricket.com/leaguetables/divisionTable.asp?id10057465&seasonID22) under Marple-Mellor having resigned from the Derbyshire and Cheshire League in 2008(http://www.buxtonadvertiser.co.uk/cricket/Shock-ban-for-village-cricket.4180757.jp);TennisThe tennis club(Mellor Tennis Club) was formed around the end of the Second World War, between 1945 and 1950. It originally had only one grass court. This was later extended to include two shale courts and later to include two all-weather courts. These were then replaced with astroturf. It has three mens and three ladies teams in the Slazenger North East Cheshire League.;BadmintonMellors badminton club(Mellor Badminton Club) has eight teams - two teams in the Tameside Badminton League, three in the Stockport Badminton League and three Junior teams in the Stockport Badminton League.;GolfThe Golf course(Mellor and Townscliffe Golf Club) runs through a sparsely-populated section of the oldest inhabited part of Mellor. The course offers a very clear view over Greater Manchester and on a clear day the Welsh Mountains can be seen. The 15th hole is regarded by some as the signature hole, a double dog leg par 5.SocietiesThere are a number of additional societies within Mellor, ranging from church activities to painting to rambling.Some of these societies run charitable events in the area. For example, Every four years the local residents open a number of private gardens during an event known as the Mellor Open Gardens day. The purpose of the event is to raise funds for Cancer Research UK and the support of the local Parish Centre.(Mellor Open Gardens) Another event is the Mellor March, in which ramblers carry out a sponsored walk to traverse the boundary of Mellor(Mellor March)Legends and MysteriesAs with all towns and villages of this age, there are legends, myths and mysteries.Case of Thomas BrierleyOne local mystery involves Brierley, the treasurer of the freemasonry lodge in Mellor around 1785. He had his gravestone carved, using a masonic cipher called Pigpen, some years prior to his death. The text at the head of the stone says Thomas Brierley made his ingress July 16, 1785. The cipher at the foot of the gravestone says Holiness of the Lord. The Pigpen Cipher was used by Freemasons in the 18th Century to keep their records private and surprisingly the cipher on Thomas Brierleys grave seems have a non-standard symbol for the letter S. It is possible the variation in the cipher is a clue to or a key to documents that he dealt with as the treasurer but more likely a simple error.According to some, Thomas Brierley fell to his death from the church tower, but other sources disagree so this story may be an urban legend. To add to the mystery, a bronze plaque was added to the stone in recent times with more cipher upon it, the cipher used being similar but not identical.References;Notes;Bibliography* * External links;General Information* The Mellor Society* Mellor View - Local Blog;Geography* Walking maps of Mellor and surrounds;Historical information for Mellor* History of Mellor and Marple* John Bradshawe, Lord President of the High Court of Justice* Discovery of Medieval Aisled Hall* Stockport Heritage Trust Coverage of Medieval Aisled Hall* Domesday Book entry for Ludworth/Mellor, from The National Archives* Directory of Mellor and surrounds in 1835, showing nearby towns* Census records for Mellor, 1841* Range of historical records relating to the area* Samuel Oldknow and the history of his activities* The Cotton Industry, in Britain in the Industrial Revolution - Briefly covers William Radcliffe* Mellor Archaeological Trust study of Oldknows mill(Greater Manchester)(Greater Manchester)
2126529
Monkayo,_Compostela_Valley
 Monkayo is a 1st class municipality in the province of Compostela Valley, Philippines. According to the 2007 census, it has a population of 90, 971 people. It has 21 barangays, with Mt. Diwata, having the biggest population of 16, 965 people. Monkayo is an agricultural town, with vast tracks of land planted to rice and banana. The municipality is also host to the gold-rich barangay of Mt. Diwata, popularly known as Diwalwal (which in the local dialect means ones tongue is hanging out due to exhaustion), a 1,000-meter high range known worldwide for its rich gold ore deposit. Monkayos seat of government is located in barangay Poblacion, a highly-developed rural town center, and is 120 kilometers away from Mindanaos regional center of Davao City, and some 30 kilometers from Nabunturan, the provincial center.BarangaysMonkayo is politically subdivided into 21 barangays.* Awao* Babag - a barangay of the municipality Monkayo, Compostela Valley in Davao Region with 3,298 residents by the end of 2008.* Banlag* Baylo* Casoon* Inambatan* Haguimitan* Macopa* Mamunga* Naboc - a barangay of the municipality of Monkayo in the province of Compostela Valley,Region XI,Mindanao Island, Philippines. Naboc had 3,500 residents at the end of year 2008. Naboc produces rubber,rice,corn,banana,coconut, and root crops like sweet potato and cassava. The barangay fiesta of Naboc is celebrated every 28th of August and its founding anniversary is celebrated every 22nd of March. The chief executive of the barangay is the Barangay Captain or Punong Barangay who leads the barangay council of eight (8) members.* Pasian (Santa Filomena)* Poblacion* Rizal* Salvacion* San Isidro* San Jose* Tubo-tubo (New Del Monte)* Olaycon* Upper Ulip* Union* Mount DiwataBrief historyMonkayo, as a municipality was created by virtue of an Executive Order signed by the late President Ramon Magsaysay on Sept. 14, 1954.The towns pre-World War II settlers were lumads, or indigenous peoples consisting of the so-called Four Tribes--the Mandayas, Dibabawons, Mansakas and Manobos.These tribes dominated practically all of what is now Monkayo.During World War II,  the battle was fought in Monkayo by joint Filipino and American troops with the local guerrilla fighters against the Japanese Imperial forces.Monkayos development was spurred immediately after the liberation from Japanese invasion. And in the 1950s,abaca trade along the Agusan River flourished. Settlers from the Visayas and Luzon also came, as well as Chinese traders who established a trading post in the mouth of Agusan River along the delta of what is now called Barangay San Jose. Boats plied from Monkayo bringing goods to other trading centers along the Agusan River towards further north up to Butuan City.The construction of the Davao-Agusan Daang Maharlika (Pan-Philippine Highway) further fast-tracked the towns development. More businesses came in, and the motorboat economy brought about by the trade along the Agusan River slowly vanished as overland travel from Davao City to Butuan City was enhanced. The road network shortened the travel time  from Davao to Butuan and eventually to other key cities in Mindanao.Industrymajor industies as of 2006*Compostela Plantation, Inc.MonkayoBanana Exporter*Comval Tropical Fruit, Inc.MonkayoBanana Exporter*JB Mining CorporationMonkayoMining/Gold Processing Plant*Philippine Long Distance CompanyMonkayoTelecommunications*PhilCom CorporationMonkayoTelecommunications*Bulbscor Minerals CorporationMonkayoMining/Gold Processing Plant*Blucor Minerals CorporationMonkayoMining/Gold Processing Plant*Northsun CorporationMonkayoMining/Gold Processing Plant*Sunshine CorporationMonkayoMining/Gold Processing Plant*Australia CorporationMonkayoMining/Gold Processing PlantSchools*Elementary*There are 37 public elementary schools within Monkayo, namely;Anagase Elementary School-Casoon, Awao Elementary School-Awao, Bagong Taas Elementary School-Haguimitan, Babag Elementary School        -   Babag, Banlag Elementary School       -   Banlag, Baylo Elementary School        -   Baylo, BLISS Elementary School        -   Poblacion, Boay Elementary School         -   Salvacion, Cabangkalan Elementary School  -   Casoon, Casoon Elementary School       -   Casoon, Depot Elementary School        -   Upper Ulip, Haguimitan Elementary School   -   Haguimitan, Inambatan Elementary School    -   Inambatan,    Liwanag Elementary School      -   Banlag, Mabuhay Elementary School      -   Awao, Macopa Elementary School       -   Macopa, Mamunga Elementary School      -   Mamunga, Matangad Elementary School     -   Upper Ulip, Monkayo Central Elementary School- Poblacion, Moria Elementary School        -   Banlag, Mt. Diwata Elementary School   -   Mt. Diwata, Munoz Elementary School        -   Union, Naboc Elementary School        -   Naboc, New Kapatagan Elementary School-   Casoon, Olaycon Elementary School      -   Olaycon, Paco Primary School            -   Banlag, Pasian Elementary School       -   Pasian, Pilar Elementary School        -   Babag, Rizal Elementary School        -   Rizal, Samuag Elementary School       -   Salvacion, San Jose Elementary School     -   San Jose, San Isidro Elementary School   -   San Isidro, Sugod Elementary School        -   Union, Totoy Elementary School-San Jose, Tuburan Elementary School      -   Casoon, Tubo-tubo Elementary School    -   Tubo-tubo, Ulip Elementary School         -   Upper Ulip.There are also two (2) private elementary schools, namely;Casa Amazing Grace School and Agape Christian Academy, all of Poblacion.*Secondary*Public High Schools:*Awao National High School-Awao*Babag National High School-Babag*Casoon National High School-Casoon*Monkayo National High School-Poblacion*Mt. Diwata National High School-Mt.Diwata*Pasian National High School-Pasian*Tubo-tubo National High School-Tubo-tubo*Union National High School-Union*Upper Ulip National High School-Upper Ulip.Private High School:*Assumption Academy of Monkayo, Inc.-Poblacion*Tertiary**Bukidnon State University (BSU) *Monkayo College of Arts Science And Technology (MONCAST)The former is state-run while the latter is funded and administered by the municipal government of Monkayo.*Mt. Diwata College of Arts Science And Technology(MDCAST) Tourist SpotKumbilan Cave(Casoon) Kumbilan Cave has tunnel-like features and wide chambers laden with beautiful formations. The presence of stalactites and stalagmites and other formations in one chamber of the cave responds to educational needs with regards to cave evaluation. Fauna observed as occupants of the cave are snakes and fruit flies. The cave is home to the kabyaw fruit bats. Mt. DiwalwalA small town of 40 000 people, mostly migrants from Surigao, Agusan and Cebu - all dependent on gold. Small-scale mining has been their major industry since the gold-rush in the area in the 80s. Diwalwal literally means lawit because old folks say when you reach the place diwawal na ang dila mo or lawit na ang dila mo.Diwalwal is a relatively quiet town but recently caught the headlines when an estimated 25 miners died on October 25 inside a tunnel allegedly due to toxic gas suffocation.Seven Waterfalls of AwaoThe gushing water coming from above was not that high in volume but still it does relaxed our bodies from the stroke of strong current.  The falls is really wide if it was all occupied with water, water is cold but not chilling and it is noticeable that the fauna on its surroundings as well as the moss that was formed above the rocks where the falls are flowing are still thick indicating that this falls is not frequently visited by outsiders.Octagon FarmUpper Ulip Hot SpringLantawanan Inland Resort (Union) Inland Resort of MaitePasian CavesSagay Falls of SalvacionBuenas Creek Inland Resort (Mt. Diwata)Magdagandang Falls,Culture and HeritageAnother Spanish influence that remains up to this day is the observance and celebration of barrios, or villages, of the day of their respective patron saint called Fiesta. It is in these celebrations wherein songs, dances and other forms of arts and merrymaking from various cultures have evolved creatively into the sights and sounds of Monkayo now. Kariyawan FestivalThe festival features pageantry with a Monkayo queen from one of the prominent families of the place, and a cockfight at the Monkayo Sports complex,where cockfighting aficionados from all over the province converge .Binibining MonkayoIs the organization responsible for sponsoring the annual town beauty pageant which selects the beautiful girl throughout the municipality. Monkayo Idol The innovative municipal-wide search for the most talented and versatile homegrown young singers, has opened a new dimension for the youth program of the Municipal government of Monkayo.Drum and BugleIs a musical marching unit (similar to a marching band) consisting of brass instruments, percussion instruments, and color guard. Typically operating as independent non-profit organizations, they perform in competitions, parades, festivals, and other civic functions. Participants from different schools throughout the town compete for the title.Monkayo FiestaMonkayos celebration of the Feast of St. Ignatius de Loyola every July 31 is well-known in the Philippines.Araw ng MonkayoIt is the heart of all celebrations in Monkayo. Furthermore, the celebration falls on the fourth day of September.External links*Philippine Standard Geographic Code*2000 Philippine Census InformationCompostela ValleyCompostela Valleyde:MonkayoTanap ti Compostelait:MonkayoCompostela Valleynl:MonkayoLambak ng KompostelaCompostela ValleyCompostela Valley
2130598
Dilip_Singh_Judeo
Dilip Singh Judeo (born 8 March 1949) was the Indian Minister of State for Environment and Forests in Prime Minister Bihari Vajpayees Janata Party led coalition government.  He hails from the Royal family of Jashpur. He is at present Rajkumar of Royal family of Jashpur.(Jashpur) In November 2003 he was accused of accepting a bribe from an Australian company in exchange for mining rights in Chhattisgarh. The accusation was made by The Sunday Express newspaper, which had received a video of the bribe taking place.() He rejected initial calls for his resignation,() however he did resign on November 17, 2003.()Judeo claimed that he had been set up by Christian missionaries and/or by his Congress Party rival for the post of Chief Minister in Chhattisgarh, Jogi.(In 2005, the Bureau of Investigation told the Indian Supreme Court that the bribe expos was planned by Jogi, the son of the Chief Minister of Chhattisgarh, Jogi, as a means to derive political mileage in favour of Ajit Jogi in upcoming elections.Mr.Judeo successfully led the BJP to victory in the 2003 Vidhan Sabha Elections and refrained from taking the Chair of Chief Minister of the state despite a wide campaign for the same from the Tribals of Chhatisgarh.()ReferencesExternal links* The Indian Express full coverage of the story.* Profile on Rajya Sabha website
2134763
John_Aristotle_Phillips
John Aristotle Phillips is a U.S. entrepreneur.A-Bomb KidPhillips was born in August 1955 to Greek immigrant parents and raised in Haven, Connecticut() In 1976, while attending University as a junior undergraduate, he designed a weapon using publicly-available books and papers.() In February 1977, several months after the story first went public, Phillips was contacted by a Pakistani official trying to purchase his bomb design, an incident addressed on the Senate floor by Proxmire and Charles Percy.() Phillips was a celebrity by this time, dubbed the The A-Bomb Kid by the media,() and making a series of television appearances including a featured spot on the game show Tell The Truth.( Phillips was an underachieving student who played the tiger mascot at Princeton games. Hoping to stay at the school, he proposed a paper for a seminar on proliferation outlining the design for an atomic bomb similar to the Nagasaki weapon. According to Phillips supervisor Dyson, a renowned physicist, and professor Feiveson, who held the seminar, Phillips design was not functional,(James Verini: Big Brother Inc.. Vanity Fair online, December 13, 2007) and the story was widely circulated in exaggerated form. Nevertheless, the Bureau of Investigation confiscated Phillipss term paper and a mockup he had constructed in his dormitory room. In 1979 Phillips published his story together with a co-author, David Michaelis, as Mushroom: The True Story of the A-Bomb Kid (ISBN 0-671-82731-6 / ISBN 0-688-03351-2). Political activityPhillips parlayed his celebrity into a brief career as an anti-nuclear activist. In 1980 and 1982 he ran for the States House of Representatives as a Democratic Party candidate in 4th congressional district, losing both times to Republican Stewart McKinney.(Aristotle, Inc.The experience he had gained during his campaigns obtaining the voter list from the state and using it for campaign purposes led him and his brother Dean (who had written a program to handle the list on an II) to found Inc. in 1983,( a non-partisan technology consulting firm for political campaigns which John Philips has since led as the CEO. It specializes in enriching voter lists with personal data from other sources (such as income, ownership or attendance) and data-mining, to assist with micro-targeting of specific voter groups; as of 2007, its database contained detailed information about ca. 175 million U.S. voters and it had about 100 employees.(Aristotle has served every occupant of the House since Reagan, and consults for several top action committees.(Aristotle - Now You Know)In 1998 he spoke of the critical importance to a political campaign of targeting its advertising, including on the wide web.()  In 2009 he observed that 8.9% of registered voters in the United States are ineligible to vote because they have moved away or died.()As of 2007, Phillips lived in San Francisco with his wife and daughter.(See also*States v. The Progressive, et al.*Country ExperimentReferences(External links* John Aristotle Phillips Bio on Aristotle, Incs home page()
2141280
Bashas
Image:Bashas-119-building.jpg|thumb|300px|A Bashas Supermarket in Arizona.Bashas is a family-owned grocery store chain, primarily located in Arizona with two locations outside the state; one each in California, and New Mexico. Bashas History Najeeb Basha came to the United States from Lebanon in 1886; he and his wife Najeeby moved to Arizona in 1910. The family struggled for years in retail sales in the Arizona mining towns of Ray and Sonora, facing numerous setbacks but remaining determined to succeed. The first store to officially carry the Bashas name, opened in 1932 in Goodyear, Arizona, as a store where employees of G. Boswell could purchase groceries with scrip. Bashas was founded by Najeeb and Najeebys sons, Ike and Eddie Basha, Sr. The current CEO is Eddies son, Basha, Jr. Bashas Today The Bashas Family of Stores includes four distinct formats: Bashas, Bashas Din, AJs Fine Foods and Food City. The company has more than 165 stores serving every county in Arizona, as well as Needles, California, and Crownpoint, New Mexico. The company recently added a new format called Bashas Farmers Market. This newest format is only in Prescott, Payson, and Winslow. With all the layoffs in 2009 and store closures, Bashas employees total approximately 8,500.Bashas has doubled in size in the last decade with stores under the Bashas name, as well as AJs Fine Foods, and Food City, bringing the total to more than 166 stores.Most Bashas stores are non-union; however, nine stores that Bashas acquired from previous chains continue to be represented by the Food and Commercial Workers, which campaigns against the chain. In October 2007, an Administrative Law Judge sided with the UFCW and an NLRB ruling that Bashas violated federal law by withdrawing recognition to the UFCW at the inherited stores http://www.nlrb.gov/shared_files/ALJ%20Decisions/2007/JD-SF-30-07. Chapter 11 filing On July 12, 2009, Bashas filed for bankruptcy protection under Chapter 11, citing the weak economy, increased competition, and their ongoing legal fight with the UFCW union. In doing so, the company plans on closing ten under-performing Bashas and Food City stores. Slogans Bashas, Bashas Din Markets: Where Youve Got a Friend; From Our Family to Yours Since 1932; Sensational Savings... and Service too!AJS Fine Foods: Experience the Difference; The Purveyors of Fine FoodsFood City: Mucho Value! Bashas Bashas Supermarkets are traditional grocery stores.Bashas also has a Distribution Center, located in Chandler, which includes over  of under-roof space, as well as a full mechanic shop. The perishables area of the Center is temperature- and climate-controlled and includes ripening rooms and areas that vary in temperature from a base temperature of 55 F year-round to freezer rooms of -10 F. AJS Fine Foods AJs Fine Foods are gourmet and specialty stores. The stores feature chef-prepared entrees, an extensive wine collection with trained cellar staff, and specialty baked goods. These are the few former Markets left. Food City Food City was acquired by Bashas in 1993. Since acquiring the original Food City store, several Bashas stores have been converted to this format. Food City offers a full range of ethnic and Hispanic food varieties. Although there is nothing in the name that suggests that the store focuses on Hispanic foods, inside most stores offer various Hispanic-themed foods. Some of these stores were previously Bayless Markets.In response, Kroger-owned Food and Drug another Arizona competitor has launched Frys Mercado as a competitor to the Hispanic food market.The City locations outside of Arizona are unrelated. Bashas Din Markets Bashas Din Markets are located on the Nation.(Bashas Supplier Proposal Package. Page 4. Accessed 2010-04-28.) They specialize in the needs of Navajo customers with products such as Blue Bird flour for fry bread, mutton and wool. Stores are labeled in both Navajo and English.References*Jarman, Max, Bashas files for bankruptcy protection; 10 stores to close, The Arizona Republic (at azcentral.com), July 13, 2009.*McTaggart, Jenny and Stephen Dowdell, COVER STORY: Retailer of the Year: Growing up Bashas (Google cache/subscription required), Progressive Grocer, December 1, 2005*Schmidt, Erin, Bashas stores multiplying in Northwest market, Northwest Explorer, February 22, 2005.External links*Bashas Homepage*Food City homepage*AJS Fine Foods homepage*Bashas customers get treats for stores industry award, The Arizona Republic, December 15, 2005.Din
2145918
Ilo_Province
The Ilo Province is one of three provinces that make up the Region in Peru. The province is the largest mining center in all of the southern Peru area.( INEI)( IPAM)GeographyThe province borders the Mariscal Nieto Province to the north, the Basadre Province to the east and southeast, the Ocean to the south and west, and the Province to the northwest.It extends north-south through the regions coastal area, forming a bay. DemographicsPopulationAccording to the 1993 Census, the Ilo Province has a population of 51,481 inhabitants, 52.4% of which (26,964) are male and 47.6% (24,517) are female.As of 2005, the Nacional de Estadstica e Informtica esimates the provinces population to be 68,363.LanguagesSpanish is spoken at home by 82% of the population; while others speak Aymara (10.6%), Quechua (6.1%), other indigenous languages (0.1%) and foreign languages (0.3%).ImmigrationPersons originating from other regions of the country make up 51.6% of the population and 0.3% of residents were born abroad.The largest immigrant groups come from the Region (17.4% of the total population) and the Region (15.3%).AgeThe population is spread out with *42.4% under the age of 20, *10.9% from 20 to 24, *31.2% from 25 to 44, *12.9% from 45 to 64, and *2.6% who are 65 years of age or older.thumb|Map of the province showing its districtsPolitical divisionThe Ilo Province is divided into three districts (, singular: ), each of which is headed by a mayor (alcalde). The districts, with their capitals in parenthesis, are:* El Algarrobal (Algarrobal)* Ilo (Ilo)* Pacocha (Pueblo Nuevo)ReferencesExternal links* Southern Copperjiska suyude IlodIlodi Ilo()(provincie)Ilo(provncia)pruwinsya(lalawigan)
2149022
Kudremukh
World Heritage SiteKudremukh () also spelled Kuduremukha is a mountain range in district, in Karnataka, India. It is also the name of a small hill station town situated near the mountain, about 48 kilometers from Karkala and about 20 kilometers from Kalasa. The name Kuduremukha (as it is known by the natives) literally means horse-face (in the local language Kannada) and refers to a particular picturesque view of a side of the mountain that resembles the same.  It was also referred to as Samseparvata, historically since it was approached from Samse village. The town of Kudremukh is primarily an iron ore mining town where the government run Public Sector Iron Ore Company Ltd. (KIOCL) operated till the last decade. It is noted for its scenic beauty. Owing to the dense forests, sighting wildlife can be challenging, though the area is rich in wildlife. Nonetheless the drive through the forest ranges can be enchanting and exhilarating. Three important rivers, the Tunga, the Bhadra and the Nethravathi are said to have their origin here. A shrine of goddess Bhagavathi and a Varaha image, 1.8 m within a cave are the main attractions.The Tunga river and river  flow freely through the parklands. Kadambi waterfalls area definite point of interest for anyone who travels to the spot. The animals found there include the civet, wild dogs, bear and deer.Recently, it is declared a Tiger Reserve, falling under the Bhadra Tiger Sanctuary Umbrella. It was declared by the honourable Union Enviornmental Minister, Mr.Jairam Ramesh.Locationthumb|left| Kudremukha Iron Ore Company logoThe Kudremukh National Park (latitudinal range 130100 to 132917 N, longitudinal range 750055 to 752500 E) is the second largest declared Wildlife Protected Area (600.32 km) of a tropical wet evergreen type of forest in the Western Ghats. Kudremukh National Park is located in kannada and Chikmagalur districts of Karnataka states. The Ghats is one of the thirty four hot spots identified for bio-diversity conservation in the world. Kudremukh National Park comes under the Global Tiger Conservation Priority-I, under the format developed jointly by Wildlife Conservation Society (WCS) and World Wide Fund-USA.Geography150px|thumb|left|Panoramic View of mountains in the Kudremukh National ParkThe southern and western sides of the park form the steep slope of the Western Ghat ridge line, with the altitude varying from 100 m - 1892 m (peak). The northern, central and the eastern portions of the park form a chain of rolling hills with a mosaic of natural grassland and shola forest. Kudremukh receives an average annual rainfall of 7000 mm, which has evolved forest types of mainly evergreen vegetation.Driving through Kudremukh National Parkhttp://www.weedioh.com/Video.aspx?VideoId2486Historythumb|right|The Horse Faced PeakThe British Government declared Kudremukh region as a Reserved Forest in 1916, to stop rampant slash and burn cultivation practices from penetrating deeper into the Ghats.Well known environmentalist and Tiger expert Dr. Karanth, undertook a detailed and systematic survey of the distribution of the endangered Tailed Macaque in Karnataka during 1983-84 with support from Government of Karnataka. He observed that suitable and extensive rainforest habitat for Lion-tailed Macaque existed in Kudremukh and that the tract probably harbored the largest contiguous population of lion tailed macaques in the Western Ghats outside the Malabar region. He further suggested that Lion Tailed Macaques could be effectively used as a flagship species to conserve the entire biotic community in the region and prepared a conservation plan for survival of wild population of Lion Tailed Macaques in the region delineating the present national park area as a proposed nature reserve. Based on his report, the Karnataka State Wildlife Advisory Board suggested to the Government that Kudremukh National Park be created. Subsequently, the first notification of the Kudremukh National Park was issued.In 1987, the Government of Karnataka declared these Reserved Forests as a National Park based on the above suggestion.Demographics India census,() Kudremukh had a population of 8095. Males constitute 54% of the population and females 46%. Kudremukh has an average literacy rate of 80%, higher than the national average of 59.5%: male literacy is 83%, and female literacy is 77%. In Kuduremukh, 11% of the population is under 6 years of age.EcologyA diverse assemblage of endangered large mammals is found in the park supporting three large mammal predator species Tiger, Leopard and Wild Dogs. The important Tiger prey base found within the Park is Gaur, Sambar, Pig, Muntjac, Chevrotain, Macaque, Common Langur and the Tailed Macaque.The wet climate and the tremendous water retentive capacity of the shola grasslands and forests has led to the formation of thousands of perennial streams in the region converging to form three major rivers of the region, Tunga, Bhadra and Nethravathi that form an important lifeline for the people of Karnataka and Andhra Pradesh. Lobo house is an old abandoned house on top of Kuduremukha.Hanumana Gundi Waterfallsright|200px|thumb| Hanumanagundi Water falls.Located 32 km from the Kalasa, the water fall has water falling onto Natural rock formations from a  height of more than 100 feet (30 m). Getting into falls involves some trekking. The best time to visit this place is between October and May.Trekking in KudremukhThere are about 13 trekking routes in Kudremukh ranging from easy to tough. The most know ones among them are:# Samse - Kudremukh - Samse. The duration fro this trek is around 4 days and 3 nights, covering a total distance of about 40 plus kms.# Navoor - Hevala - Kudremukh - Navoor. The duration fro this trek is around 5 days and 4 nights, covering a total distance of about 60 plus kms.# Navoor - Kudremukh - Samse. The duration fro this trek is around 5 days and 4 nights, covering a total distance of about 50 plus kms.# Horanaadu - Sringeri. The duration fro this trek is around 3 days and 2 nights, covering a total distance of about 30 plus kms.ThreatsFile:Shola Grasslands and forests in the Kudremukh National Park, Western Ghats, Karnataka.jpg|right|200px|thumb|Shola Grasslands and forests in the Kudremukh National Park, Ghats, Karnataka.Kudremukh Iron Ore Company Limited (KIOCL) is a government run company which was mining iron ore from the Kudremukh hills. KIOCL  conducted its operations on an area of 4,604.55 ha for over 20 years. Opposition to its activities built up over the years from environmentalists and wildlife conservationists who are concerned about the threat to the regions flora and fauna, and farmers who are affected by the pollution of the streams that originate in the mining area. KIOCL has been banned from operating in this beautiful Natural Reserve, according to Supreme court order.The rainfall in Kuduremukh, which is perhaps one of the highest for any open cast mining operation in the world, greatly accentuates the impacts of siltation as claimed by environmentalists. The topographic and rainfall characteristics in combination with the open cast mining of low grade iron ore and other land-surface disturbances caused by the KIOCL operations resulted in very high sediment discharge, with over 60% of the total siltation in the Bhadra system being contributed by the mining area which forms less than six per cent of the catchment. With high quality practices adopted by KIOCL to mine, the flora and fauna remained intact, causing no adverse affects on the nature.KIOCL used to send iron ore through pipes running through districts of Udupi and Kannada and converted to pellets at their plant in Panambur.These pellets were exported to countries like China, Iran, Japan, etc by ships.GalleryImage:Kudremukh1.jpg|Kudremukh PeakImage:Kudremukh2.jpg|Image taken during the trek to Kudremukh peak on 1/5/07Image:Kmukh.JPG|Shola Forests of KudremukhImage:Kudremukh from a distance.JPG|from afarImage:Kudremukh from afar.jpg|from afarImage:Kudremukh4.jpg|the hills of Kuduremukha rangeImage:Kudremukh5.jpg|view from topImage:Kudremukh6.jpg|the forest covered hillImage:Kudremukh7.jpg|view from topImage:Kudremukh8.jpg|Kuduremukha forestImage:Kudremukh9.jpg|view from topImage:Kudremukh10.jpg|view from topReferencesExternal links* Kudremukh Company*Checklist of Amphibians reported from Kudremukh National Park *Checklist of Aquatic Insects reported from Kudremukh National Park*Checklist of Birds reported from Kudremukh National Park *Checklist of Butterflies reported from Kudremukh National Park*Checklist of Fishes reported from Kudremukh National Park*Checklist of Mammals reported from Kudremukh National Park*Checklist of Non-Woody Plants reported from Kudremukh National Park*Checklist of Reptiles reported from Kudremukh National Park*Kudremukh trek*Kudremukh Trekking - An Unforgettable Adventure*Bangalore to kudremukhbn:es:Kudremukhnational de Kudremukhhi:bpy:it:Kudremukhkn:new:  vi:Kudremukh
2152540
Pete_Gray
highlights;Notable achievements* Only one-armed man ever to play League BaseballPete Gray (March 6, 1915 &ndash; June 30, 2002) was a baseball player best known for playing in the major leagues despite having lost his right arm in a childhood accident.()BiographyEarly lifePete Gray was born as Peter Wyshner in the mining town of Pennsylvania. He was right-handed until he lost his right arm, at age six, when he slipped while riding on a farmers wagon and his right arm was caught in the spokes. The arm had to be amputated above the elbow.( Grays enthusiasm for baseball led him to learn to bat and field one-handed, catching the ball in his glove and then quickly removing his glove and transferring the ball to his hand in one motion.CareerHis speed and placehitting ability made him a successful minor league outfielder. Gray attained a batting average of .333 and a stolen-base record of 63; as a result, he was named the 1944 Southern League Most Valuable Player. During his career, Gray played for semi-pro teams including the Trois Rivires Renards of the League, the Chicks of the Association and the Bushwicks.The St. Louis Browns purchased his contract in 1945 from the Chicks. Wearing uniform number 14,(.) Gray played left and center field for the Browns. He appeared in 77 games, batting .218 with a .958 fielding percentage in center field. He played competently in the outfield, transferring the ball from glove to hand with remarkable speed.He collected his first major league hit (a single) against the Tigers on April 17, 1945. On May 19, he played in Yankee Stadium, collecting five hits and two RBI as the Browns swept the Yankees. Gray also proved himself an accomplished bunter. In order to bunt, he would plant the knob of the bat against his side, and would then slide his hand about one-third of the way up the shaft of the bat.As the season progressed, however, it became apparent that Gray could not hit breaking pitches. Once he started his swing, he could not change his timing because he had no second hand to check the swing. Opposing pitchers discovered that fact and would throw curve balls.Grays on-field exploits set an inspirational example for disabled servicemen returning from War II, as was portrayed in newsreels of the period. He visited army hospitals and rehabilitation centers, speaking with amputees and reassuring them that they too could lead a productive life.Boys, I cant fight, and so there is no courage about me. Courage belongs on the battlefield, not on the baseball diamond.()Later years and deathGrays major league career ended on Day when many of baseballs stars returned from the battlefront. From 1946 to 1949, he played on as a journeyman minor leaguer with the Toledo Mud Hens, Elmira Pioneers and Dallas Stars. Left to wonder if he had made the majors on his playing abilities or because of his one arm, Gray returned home to Nanticoke where, although a local hero/celebrity, he struggled with gambling, alcohol and lived in near poverty.(The 1986 television-movie A Winner Never Quits starring Carradine, and the publication of Grays biography, One-Armed Wonder: Pete Gray, Wartime Baseball, and the American Dream written by William C. Kashatus, published in 1995 by McFarland & Company, renewed public interest in Gray.He died on June 30, 2002.(Legacy*Pete Grays glove is in the Baseball Hall of Fame and Museum in New York.Notes*Bill Gilbert, They Also Served: Baseball and the Homefront (New York: Crown, 1992).*Richard Goldstein, Spartan Seasons: How Baseball Survived the Second World War (New York: Macmillan, 1980).*William C Kashatus, Baseballs One-Armed Wonder: An Interview with the Late Great, Pete Gray Pennsylvania Heritage (Spring 2003).See also*AbbottReferencesExternal links***Pete Gray Pennsylvania Historical Marker*Pete Gray at Find A Grave.com*Pete Gray cartoon - Detectives (PBS season 5 (2007), episode 12ja:
2155906
Hinunangan,_Southern_Leyte
 Hinunangan is a 3rd class (based on NSCB website as of 31 December 2010 Hinunangan Statistics 2010) municipality in the province of Southern Leyte, Philippines. According to the 2007 census, it has a population of 27,712 a 0.90% growth compared to the 2000 census.(http://www.nscb.gov.ph/activestats/psgc/municipality.asp?muncode086403000&regcode08&provcode64, NTSB National Statistics)Hinunangan is known as the Rice Granary of the Province for its vast plain land that is entirely planted with rice. Hinunangan, one of the key towns of the province, has great potential for tourism because of its beautiful sand beaches and islands. The town is a producer of rattan and wood-based furnitures, abaca handicrafts items, pineapple, vegetables, other forest products, and bamboo furnitures. It has a potential for mineral water and root crops processing and copper mining.(http://elgu.ncc.gov.ph/ecommunity/southernleyte/index.php?id17&id25&id30&show3rdlevel1, Southern Leyte LGU website)The highest mountain in the province is Mount Nacolod can also be found in Hinunangan with an elevation of 948 meters above sea level.(http://www.nscb.gov.ph/ru8/Provincial_Profiles/soleyte.htm, NSCB Southern Leyte Profile) History In 1521, Magellan recorded sighting Hunonganan (Hinunangan) during the voyage in Gulf. As far back in 1750 Hinunangan was a mid-way station of Boholanos trading in Eastern Leyte. They rested overnight at the mouth of Das-ay River where they moored their boats. A shelter was built for the crews and tenders known as hononganan or stopover. Thus the name.In 1822, a certain Boholano named Palonoy founded Hinunangan. At this time Silago of the North and Hinundayan and Anahawan on the South were part of Hinunangan. It was the first place the expedition directed its course to Leyte Island. Again, in 1944, in the greatest naval battle in history the blocking warship of the Liberation waylaid the Japanese Fleet near Hinunangan. Thus, the area in Leyte is the natural frontier of historically significant events in Philippine History. Barangaysthumb|left|230px|Aerial view of Hinunangan town proper.thumb|right|right|230px|View of Hinunangan Bay from PoblacionHinunangan is also known as a major getway in Leyte because of its near proximity to City. The opening of Abuyog - Silago Road cuts travel time to more than 50 percent, from the previous 6 hours (Tacloban - Hinunangan Route) to less than 3 hours. It is also the place in Southern Leyte with the most immigrants from Europe and North America.It has a lot of touristic places, as Tahusan, Talisay or the twin islands (known as Cabugan Grande and Cabugan Chico as Pigafetta stated in his account during their travel with Magellan) and lot of natures. It is also a place far from cities but it is one the first in the province where technology was put in. There are also hotels, inns, a public market and beach resorts. Hinunangan has seen a significant progress, in terms of infrastructure, economy, productivity and improving standards of livingHinunangan is politically subdivided into 40 barangays. Two of which barangays is a twin island located at the east of the town. The twin islands are accessible by motorized boats thru Brgy. Canipa-an. thumb|right|230px|San Pablo and San Pedro Islands off the coast of Hinunangn. The towns major tourist attraction.  Education  Elementary schools * Hinunangan East Central School - Rizal St. Poblacion, Hinunangan* Hinunangan West Central School - Catmonan St. Labrador, Hinunangan* Canipaan Elementary School - Canipaan, Hinunangan* Catublian Elementary School - Catublian, Hinunangan* Holy Rosary Academy - Elementary Department (private school)* Almost all barangay has Elementary / Primary Schools* Nueva Esperanza Elem. School High schools * Holy Rosary Academy (private school run by the Catholic Church) - Arellano St. Poblacion, Hinunangan* Hinunangan National High School/Canipaan Annex (formerly HAVS also SLIAT) - SLSU Campus, Ambacon, Hinunangan* Canipaan National High School - Canipaan, Hinunangan* Nava National High School - Nava, Hinunangan Universities * Leyte State University (SLSU)- Hinunangan Campus (formerly Southern Leyte Institute of Agriculture and Technology (SLIAT))** Course Offered:*** BS in Agricultural Entrepreneurship*** BS Education *** Bachelor of Agricultural Technology *** Associate in Agricultural Technology *** Associate in Information Technology Communication  Mobile * Serviced by Communications (Since 2002)* Serviced by Telecom (Since 2004) Cable Television * Fiesta Cable TV* Dream satellite TV*some are private satellite. Internet * Wireless Internet through SMART Network (Smart Bro)* Wireless Internet through Globe Network (Globe Tatto)* Some internet Cafe in proper Area. Recent development On July 19, 2007, a strong earthquake hit the town with magnitude 6 on Richter scale and damaged some properties.   The partial assessment report of Hinunangan dated July 20, a copy of which was obtained by PIA through Gov. Mercado, placed the estimated cost of damage to properties at P1,650,000.00 broken down as P790,000 for government infrastructure and P860,000 from private infrastructure.Among the public properties destroyed were the water system - P 500,000; Das-ay Bridge railguard - P100,000; East Central School Concrete Fence - P80,000; Otama Elementary School - P50,000; Patong Elementary School - P40,000; and Tahusan Elementary SchoolP20,000.The private infrastructure damaged included the Roman Catholic Bell tower - P100,000; Water tank of the Catholic convent - P40,000; Manalog barangay Chapel - P20,000; Sto. Nino barangay Chapel - P10,000; a number of houses - P400,000, and various appliances, P290,000.Notes External links *Tourist Office Official Site*See the Beauty of Hinunangan*Hinunangan The Fearless eCommunity-eStambayan*Philippine Standard Geographic Code*2000 Philippine Census Information*Holy Rosary Academy Batch 2003*Holy Rosary Academy Batch 1974*Southern Leyte State University - Hinunangan Campus*Travels through HinunanganHabagatang Leyteit:HinunanganSouthern Leytenl:HinunanganKatimugang LeyteNam LeyteSouthern Leyte
2160881
White_Side
 long_d-3.02626White Side is a fell in the English District. It is situated to the east of Thirlmere and to the west of Glenridding valley. This places White Side in the range of the Fells, with Raise to the north and Lower Man to the south, both of which are of greater height.NameStrictly the name White Side refers to the western slope of a nameless summit. However it is often applied to the whole fell for convenience as was done by Wainwright.(Wainwright:Pictorial Guide to the Lakeland Fells, Book 1: ISBN 0-7112-2454-4) He gave White Side the status of a separate fell, a position followed by other guidebook writers.(Richards, Mark; Near Eastern Fells; Collins (2003); ISBN 0-0071-1366-8)(Birkett, Bill: Complete Lakeland Fells: Collins Willow (1994): ISBN 0-0021-8406-0) Wainwright suggested that the fell name could have come from the quartz found on the western slope.Topography and Mining HistoryThe western and eastern faces of White Side are quite different in appearance. The eastern face is predominanlty crag and scree falling abruptly to Keppel and Brown Coves. In contrast the western face falls gently to Thirlmere, the upper parts being mainly grass.  The lower parts do provide some rock, such as Brown Crag, but these are generally outcrops rather than true crags.thumb|300px|right|Map showing White Side and surrounding features from 1925.A great steep-sided hollow is gouged out of the eastern face, just north of the summit. This is the corrie of Kepple Cove, backed by Red Screes. Kepple Cove once contained an artificial tarn, although today the bed is merely marshy except after heavy rain. The water from the tarn was used in a hydroelectric scheme to drive electric winding gear at Greenside Mine. Commissioned in 1891, this was the first such system in the country.(Adams, John: Mines of the Lake District Fells, Dalesman (1995); ISBN 0-8520-6931-6). It continued in use until the night of 29 October 1927 when the Kepple Cove dam burst during a heavy storm, leaving an  wide gap in the earthworks. The resulting wave passed down the valley and through Glenridding village, flooding buildings and causing extensive damage. The breached dam can still be seen today.((Blair, Don; Exploring Lakeland Tarns; Lakeland Manor Press (2003); ISBN 0-9543-9041-5)South of Kepple Cove, between the southern ridge of White Side and Cam is Brown Cove. This also held an artificial tarn, but this is now reduced to a couple of small pools widening the stream. Brown Cove Tarn was another creation of the Greenside mine, a stone faced dam being built in about 1860. The dam is still in place but water now leaks through the base, the extended tarn-bed a smooth patch of luxuriant turf. A water leat passing beneath the north face of Catstye Cam to Red Tarn Beck can still be traced although it is now in ruins. There are also the remains of a level driven into the headwall of Brown Cove, a stone arched entrance leading to an  tunnel.(( Water from Brown and Kepple Coves unites with the outflow of Helvellyns Red Tarn to form Glenridding Beck, flowing on through the village to Ullswater.The western slopes of White Side are bounded by Helvellyn and Brund Gills, both of which originally flowed north to the Vale of St John. With the construction of the Thirlmere reservoir scheme in 1884 these streams were diverted to feed the lake a cutting being made through the low ridge which runs parallel to the shore.(Summit and ViewThe summit bears a small cairn in a sea of grass with the main ridge path crossing the highest point. Other than north and south where higher fells intervene, the view is good (. The subsidiary top of Brown Crag (2,000 ft) on the western face also provides fine views of Skiddaw and The Dodds.(AscentsAscents from the west begin at Swirls or Thirlspot. The Old Pony or White Stones Routes to Helvellyn can be used to give a start before branching off to White Side. Alternatively a more direct path from behind Fisher Place makes straight for the summit. From Glenridding in the east a bridleway zig-zags up beside Kepple Cove to reach the ridge not far from the top. It is also possible to take a direct (and steep) line direct from Brown Cove Dam.(References
2164065
TerraNature
TerraNature is a Zealand environmental organisation, and is an incorporated charitable trust located in Auckland.The Trust is dedicated to land and marine conservation, native habitat restoration, protection of endangered species, and reduction in the loss of New Zealands unique biodiversity.(TerraNature works to provide a greater public awareness of environmental issues in New Zealand, and the international importance of the nations edge ecology which evolved in isolation for 80 million years, and is a biological treasure chest with the worlds largest collection of flightless birds, living fossils of reptiles and frogs that predate the dinosaurs, gigantism in insects, and 80 percent endemism in plants.(TerraNature is also working to establish deep-sea marine reserves, initially along a chain of seamounts on the Kermadec Ridge.  Associated with this is the Trusts opposition to deep seabed mineral mining that is proposed on seamounts, and provision of a greater awareness of whale migration through the New Zealand Exclusive Economic Zone, the impact of anthropogenic ocean noise on marine animals, and the need for legislation to regulate natural resources in the deep-sea.Supporting organisationTerraNature is informally affiliated with, and supported by Nature Fund, a California nonprofit public benefit corporation based in Francisco. The two organisations are jointly managed and share a website. Terra Nature Fund is designated by the United States Internal Revenue Service as a tax-exempt 501(c)(3) organisation, which allows United States taxpayers with an interest in supporting New Zealand conservation, to make tax-deductible donations.Notesrefs()()External links*
2167630
James_Till
James Edgar Till, OC, O.Ont, FRSC (born August 25, 1931)(http://www.cdnmedhall.org/dr-james-edgar-till) is a of Toronto biophysicist, best known for demonstrating &ndash; with McCulloch &ndash; the existence of cells.Early workTill was born in Saskatchewan, Canada at Lloydminster, which is located on the border between Saskatchewan and Alberta. The family farm was located north of Lloydminster, in Alberta; the eastern margin of the farm was the Alberta-Saskatchewan boundary.He attended the of Saskatchewan with scholarships awarded by the Oil Company and the National Research Council, graduating with a B.Sc. in 1952 and a M.Sc. in physics in 1954. Some of his early work was conducted with E. Johns, a pioneer in cobalt-60 radiotherapy. Till proceeded to University, where he received a Ph.D. in biophysics in 1957. He then became a post-doctoral fellow at the of Toronto.Stem cellsHarold Johns recruited Till to the Cancer Institute at Princess Margaret Hospital shortly after he completed his work at Yale.  Subsequently, Till chose to work with McCulloch at the of Toronto. Thus, the older physicians insight was combined with the younger physicists rigorous and thorough nature.In the early 1960s, McCulloch and Till started a series of experiments that involved injecting marrow cells into irradiated mice.  They observed that small raised lumps grew on the spleens of the mice, in proportion to the number of bone marrow cells injected.  Till and McCulloch dubbed the lumps spleen colonies, and speculated that each lump arose from a single marrow cell: perhaps a stem cell.In later work, Till and McCulloch were joined by graduate student Andy Becker.  They cemented their stem cell theory and in 1963 published their results in Nature. In the same year, in collaboration with Lou Siminovitch, a trailblazer for molecular biology in Canada, they obtained evidence that these same marrow cells were capable of self-renewal, a crucial aspect of the functional definition of stem cells that they had formulated.In 1969, Till became a Fellow of the Society of Canada. Later career In the 1980s Tills focus shifted, moving gradually into evaluation of cancer therapies, quality of life issues, and research, including research ethics and the ethics of mining.Till holds the distinguished title of University Professor Emeritus at the of Toronto.Recently, Till has been a vocal proponent of open access to scientific publications.Till is an editorial member of the open access journal of Medical Internet Research.Till is a founding member of the Board of Directors of the Canadian Stem Cell Foundation. Honours *1993, awarded L. Noble Prize by the Cancer Institute of Canada*1994, made an Officer of the of Canada*2000, made a Fellow of the Society of London*2004, inducted into the Medical Hall of Fame*2005, he and Ernest A. McCulloch were awarded the Lasker Award for Basic Medical Research*2006, made a member of of Ontario Selected publications * ************* External links *Canadian Medical Hall of Fame entry*James Till CV, of Science*Joint publications by Till and McCulloch, 1961-1969; full text courtesy of TorontoTillja:Till
2171655
International_Tribunal_for_the_Law_of_the_Sea
Image:Hamburg.IntSeegerichtshof.Elbseite.wmt.jpg|thumb|225px|ITLOS seen from the river ElbeThe International Tribunal for the Law of the Sea (ITLOS) is an organization created by the mandate of the Third United Nations Conference on the Law of the Sea. It was established by the Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea, signed at Bay, Jamaica, on December 10, 1982. The Convention entered into force on November 16, 1994, and established an international framework for law over all ocean space, its uses and resources. The Convention also established the Seabed Authority, with responsibility for the regulation of seabed mining beyond the limits of national jurisdiction, that is beyond  the limits of the territorial sea, the contiguous zone and the continental shelf.The Tribunal has the power to settle disputes between states parties (there are currently 161: 160 states plus the Union).CompositionAccording to its founding statute, the Tribunal has a set of 21 serving judges from a variety of states parties in three primary bodies:*The Chamber of Summary Procedure*The Chamber for Fisheries Disputes*The Chamber for Marine Environment DisputesIn addition, at the request of Chile and the European Union, the Tribunal also set up a special chamber to deal with the case concerning the Conservation and Sustainable Exploitation of Swordfish Stocks in the South-Eastern Pacific Ocean (Chile/European Union).The International Tribunal for the Law of the Sea is based in Hamburg, Germany.Current judgesExternal links* Official ITLOS Site* International Foundation for the Law of the Sea Internationale HavretsdomstolSeegerichtshofMereiguse Kohus     Internacional del Derecho del Marinternational du droit de la mer Internazionale del Diritto del MareInternationale Iuris maritimiJr Teiss Tribunolasja:internasjonale havrettsdomstolen    havsrttsdomstolenzh:
2174593
Isabel,_Leyte
right|Map of Leyte showing the location of IsabelIsabel is a 1st class municipality in the province of Leyte, Philippines. According to the 2000 census, it has a population of 38,486 people in 8,303 households.Isabel is the most industrialized town in Visayas, being the site of Leyte Industrial Development Estate (LIDE). Some of the companies located here are the Phosphate (PHILPHOS) Fertilizer Corp., Associated Smelting and Refining (PASAR) Corp., and Mining Corp. It has earned its moniker as Saudisabel because of the high availability of jobs. Isabelanons enjoy a relatively high standard of living. It is also the home of Learning Center (LLCI), a prestigious institution, which gained its popularity to its neighbors like Ormoc, Palompon, Baybay and also in Cebu. Isabel has one higher institution of learning which is the Visayas State University - College of Industrial Technology, Isabel campus. It offers undergraduate degrees in education, industrial engineering, business and information technology and various two-year technological courses that caters the need of the local and national industry.The town was created from the barrios of Quiot, Sta. Cruz, Libertad, Matlang, Tolingon, Bantigue, Apale and Jonan from the town of Merida by virtue of Republic Act No. 191.BarangaysIsabel is politically subdivided into 24 barangays.External links*Philippine Standard Geographic Code*2000 Philippine Census InformationLeyteLeyteLeyte Utara(Leyte)Leyte(Leyte)LeyteLeyteLeyte
2179360
Mount_Lyell
Mount Lyell can refer to:*Lyell (California), the highest point in Yosemite National Park in California, United States.*Lyell (Tasmania), a peak in Tasmania, Australia.*Lyell (Canada), a peak on the AlbertaBritish Columbia boundary.*Lyell Mining and Railway Company in Tasmania existed between 1897 and 1994.:Note - the Mountains named after Lyell were done so in the nineteenth century during the controversy about Darwins theory of evolution.
2182698
Where_the_Streets_Have_No_Name
}}Where the Streets Have No Name is a song by rock band U2.  It is the opening track from their 1987 album Joshua Tree and was released as the albums third single in August 1987. The songs hook is a repeating guitar arpeggio using a delay effect, played during the songs introduction and again at the end. Lead vocalist Bono wrote the lyrics in response to the notion that it is possible to identify a persons religion and income based on the street on which they lived, particularly in Belfast. During the bands difficulties recording the song, producer Eno considered erasing the songs tapes to have them start from scratch.Where the Streets Have No Name was praised by critics and became a commercial success, peaking at number thirteen in the US, number fourteen in Canada, number ten in the Netherlands, and number four in the United Kingdom. The song has become one of the bands most popular songs and has remained a staple of the their live act since the song debuted in 1987 on Joshua Tree Tour. The song was notably performed on a Angeles rooftop for the filming of its music video, which won a Award for Best Performance Music Video.Writing and recordingThe music for Where the Streets Have No Name originated from a demo that guitarist Edge composed the night before the group resumed the The Joshua Tree sessions. In an upstairs room at Melbeach Househis newly-purchased homeThe Edge used a four-track tape machine to record an arrangement of keyboards, bass, guitar, and a drum machine. Realising that the album sessions were approaching the end and that the band were short on exceptional live songs, The Edge wanted to conjure up the ultimate U2 live-song, so he imagined what he would like to hear at a future U2 show if he were a fan.(McCormick (2006), pp. 184-185) After finishing the rough mix, he felt he had come up with the most amazing guitar part and song of his life. With no one in the house to share the demo with, The Edge recalls dancing around and punching the air in celebration.(Although the band liked the demo, it was difficult for them to record the song. Bassist Clayton said, At the time it sounded like a foreign language, whereas now we understand how it works.( The arrangement, with two signature shifts and frequent chord changes, was rehearsed many times, but the group struggled to get a performance they liked.( According to co-producer Lanois, that was the science project song. I remember having this massive schoolhouse blackboard, as we call them. I was holding a pointer, like a college professor, walking the band through the chord changes like a fucking nerd. It was ridiculous.() Co-producer Eno estimates that half of the album sessions were spent trying to record a suitable version of Where the Streets Have No Name.( The band worked on a single take for weeks, but as Eno explained, that particular version had a lot of problems with it and the group continued trying to fix it up.( Through all of their work, they had gradually replaced each instrument take until nothing remained from the original performance.() So much time had been spent on screwdriver work that Eno thought it would be best to start from scratch. His idea was to stage an accident and have the songs tapes erased.( He said that this was not to force abandonment of the song, but rather that it would be more effective to start again with a fresh performance.( At one point, Eno had the tapes cued up and ready to be recorded over, but this erasure never took place; according to engineer Flood, fellow engineer Pat McCarthy returned to the control room and upon seeing Eno ready to erase the tapes, dropped the tray of tea he was carrying and physically restrained Eno.()The studio version of the song was compiled from several different takes.( It was one of several songs mixed by Lillywhite in the final months of recording The Joshua Tree.((McGee (2008), p. 98) Drummer Mullen Jr. later said of the song, It took so long to get that song right, it was difficult for us to make any sense of it. It only became a truly great song through playing live. On the record, musically, its not half the song it is live.(Lead vocalist Bono wrote the lyrics while on a humanitarian visit to Ethiopia with his wife, Hewson. He first wrote down the lyrics on an bag while staying in a village.(CompositionWhere the Streets Have No Name is played at a tempo of 126 beats per minute.( Note: Software required to view the page.) The introduction and outro are played in a 3/4 signature,( while the remainder of the song is in a common 4/4 signature.( Note: Software required to view the page.) The songs opens with an instrumental section, starting with chorale-like sustained synthesiser notes. The guitar fades in after 42 seconds;() this part consists of a repeated chiming six-note arpeggio. A dotted eighth delay effect is used to play each note in the arpeggio twice, thus creating a rich sound.(accessdate2007-11-03)(Gulla (2009), p. 64) The bass and drums enter at 1:10.(The introduction, following a IIVIIVviVI progression, creates a wall of sound, as described by Mark Butler, against which the vocals emerge after nearly two minutes.()  The guitar part played for the remainder of the song features The Edge strumming percussive sixteenth notes. The bass and drums continue in regular eighth and sixteenth notes, respectively, while Bonos vocal performance, in contrast, varies greatly in its timbre, (he sighs; he moans; he grunts; he exhales audibly; he allows his voice to crack)( as well as timing by his usage of rubato to slightly offset the notes he sings from the beat.( This development reaches a climax during the first chorus at the line burning down love (AGFD); the melody progresses through a series of scale degrees that lead to the highest note in the song, the D5 at burning. In later choruses, Bono sings blown by the wind with the same melody, stretching the same note even longer. After the third chorus, the songs outro is played, the instrumentation reverting to the same state as it was in the introduction, with a six-note guitar arpeggio played against sustained synthesiser notes. The lyrics were inspired by a story that Bono heard about the streets of Northern Ireland, where a persons religion and income are evident by the street they live on. He recalls, That said something to me, and so I started writing about a place where the streets have no name.( According to him, the song is ostensibly about Transcendence, elevation, whatever you want to call it.( Bono, who compared many of his lyrics prior to The Joshua Tree to sketches, said that Where the Streets Have No Name is more like the U2 of old than any of the other songs on the LP, because its a sketchI was just trying to sketch a location, maybe a spiritual location, maybe a romantic location. I was trying to sketch a feeling.(The open-ended nature of the lyrics has led to many interpretations. Journalist Michael Campbell believed the lyrics send a message of hope and wish for a world that is not divided by class, wealth, race, or any other arbitrary criterion.(Campbell, Brody (2007), p. 433) With regard to the place Bono was referring to in the song, he said, Im not sure, really, about that. I used to think it was Belfast...() Journalist Stokes believes the title was influenced by Bonos and his wife Alis visit to Ethiopia as volunteer aid-workers. Bono has expressed mixed opinions about the open-ended lyrics: I can look at it now and recognize that song has one of the most banal couplets in the history of pop music. But it also contains some of the biggest ideas. In a curious way, that seems to work. If you get any way heavy about these things, you dont communicate. But if youre flip or throwaway about it, then you do. Thats one of the paradoxes Ive come to terms with.(Stokes (2005), p. 64)ReleaseOriginally, the third single from The Joshua Tree was meant to be the song Hill Mining Town, but Where the Streets Have No Name was released instead, in August 1987.() The single was released on 7-inch, 12-inch, cassette and CD single formats.( Four B-sides were featured on the single, including Race Against Time, Silver and Gold, and Sweetest Thing, except for the 7-inch release, which only featured the latter two tracks.(  The 12-inch single featured Race Against Time on side A of the record (despite being a B-side),() and the cassette single featured all four tracks on both sides of the tape.() Although not as successful as the albums first two singles, the song did chart well. In the U.S., the song peaked at number 13 on the Billboard Hot 100 and number 11 on the Album Rock Tracks charts.( The song reached number four on the Singles Chart,( and it topped the Singles Chart.(Music videoGrammy Award-winning music video, featuring the bands performance on a Los Angeles rooftop.The video begins with an aerial shot of a block in Angeles with part of the Blue Sky playing from a radio broadcast. Clips of broadcasts are heard with jockeys stating that U2 is planning on performing at 3:30 pm at 7th and Main Streets, and expecting crowds of about 30,000 people. Police show up to the set and inform the bands crew of the security issue that the shoot is causing, due to the large number of people who are coming to see the band perform.  Two minutes into the video, U2 are seen on the top of a liquor store and perform Where the Streets Have No Name to a large crowd of people standing in the streets surrounding the building. Towards the end of the song, the police tell the crew that the shoot is about to be shut down. Bono informs the crowd that they are getting shut down and the police come onto the roof of the building while the crowd is heard booing the police. The video for Where the Streets Have No Name was directed by Avis and produced by Michael Hamlyn and Ben Dossett.  The band attracted over 1,000 people during the videos filming, which took place on the rooftop of the Republic Liquor Store (now Margaritas Place, a Mexican restaurant), at East 7th Street and South Main Street in Angeles on 27 March 1987.(McGee (2008), p. 101) The bands performance on a rooftop in a public place was a reference to Beatles final concert, as depicted in the film Let It Be.(de la Parra (2003), p. 79) style   padding:8px;During the shoot U2 played an eight-song set. The band began with a performance of Where the Streets Have No Name with a track, followed by a cover of People Get Ready. Gods Country, a second performance of Streets, and Bloody Sunday were played next. The set ended with two more performances of Streets and (In the Name of Love).( Prior to filming, a week was spent re-enforcing the roof of the liquor store to ensure it would not collapse if a group of fans were to stand on it. A generator was put on the roof so the shooting could continue in the event that the authorities shut off the power on the primary generator, which happened during filming.(The depiction of the police attempting to shut down the video shoot due to safety concerns actually happened during filming, as seen in the video. Hamlyn was almost arrested following a confrontation with the police.()  According to Avis, the events depicted in the video show what actually happened that day almost in real time, and that getting busted was an integral part of the plan.( manager McGuinness revealed in 2007 that much of the confrontation with the police was exaggerated; the group were hoping to get shut down by the authorities in order to dramatize the music video, but the police continually gave them extensions for shooting the video.() In the background of the video is a sign for The Million Dollar Hotel, which was rebuilt to create some interest, in case no one showed up at the film shoot.() Although the video is of a live performance, the audio used is from the studio-recorded version of the song.() The video won the Award for Best Performance Music Video at the Grammy Awards in 1989.()B-sidesRace Against Time was released on the 12-inch, cassette, and CD versions of the single.(Stokes (2005), p. 206)  The song developed from the bands interest in urban funk, and was described by The Edge as a kind of Afro-rhythmic piece and a study in rhythm.(Stokes (2005), p. 193)() The bass riff in the song, inspired by the bodhrn, was played by The Edge, but stemmed from some of Claytons unused bass parts. Mullens drum part was recorded in a single take. The song is primarily an instrumental piece but does contain some lyrics inspired by Bonos trip to Ethiopia after Aid and his witnessing firsthand the famine in occurrence; these lyrical references include Bono singing in an Ethiopian language and following it with the phrase Race against time.( Bono said of the song, It reminds me of the desert. The desert is so empty, but it aches with a strange kind of fullness.( John Hutchinson of Musician magazine described the song as having an African flavour and as being reminiscent of Gabriel.( The track was used in the Vice episode Childs Play,()()and is the only one of the singles B-sides that was never played live.()Silver and Gold was written in support of the United Against Apartheid project, which protested the South African apartheid. The song was originally featured on the projects 1985 album, Sun City, performed by Bono with Richards and Wood of Rolling Stones. It was re-recorded by U2 for the single while the band returned to Dublin during in May 1987 during a break between the first and second legs of Joshua Tree Tour.(McGee (2008), p. 105) The song was described by Musician as tough and raw, with Bono in husky and confident voice, underpinned by a sinuous bass line, and with The Edge demonstrating his newfound prowess in blues-based guitar.( Silver and Gold was played live on Joshua Tree Tour several times, one performance of which was featured on the bands 1988 album and rockumentary, and Hum. Both the studio recording and the Sun City versions were later featured on the bonus disc of the 20th anniversary edition of Joshua Tree.() The studio version was also included on the limited edition B-sides bonus disk of the bands first compilation album, Best of 19801990.()Thing was written by Bono as an apology to his wife for forgetting her birthday.() The song opens with a short piano piece before the rest of the band begins to play. Some of Bonos lyrics have been described as reminiscent of Lennon.( The Edge described it as a beautiful song... which is pop as it should be  - not produced out of existence, but pop produced with a real intimacy and purity, also noting that Its very new for us.( It was re-recorded with some lyrical alterations and released in 1998 as a single in its own right for The Best of 19801990.  Press editor Stokes stated that this track, along with Race Against Time, is an indicator of what U2 might have made instead of The Joshua Tree.(Critical receptionUpon the release of The Joshua Tree, critics praised Where the Streets Have No Name. Steve Morse of Boston Globe noted the bell-like tones from the Edge frame a search for heaven and along with the subsequent track on the album, Still Havent Found What Im Looking For, these songs showed how the group were pilgrims still on a quest; not preachers who claim to have found answers.() The Bergen Record echoed these sentiments, saying the tracks demonstrated how the band was on a personal and spiritual quest.() Stone called it assertive rock in their review of The Joshua Tree.() The Diego Union-Tribune said of Where the Streets Have No Name, the music charges, like someone fleeing for life.() Washington Post said the track is a bit oblique lyrically, but the implications are clear in Bonos resolute delivery, Dave (the Edge) Evans quavering guitar, Adam Claytons cathedral bass and Larry Mullens rolling thunder drums.() NME lauded the song as the opening track by saying the album starts by spitting furiously. The publication praised Bonos impassioned singing and The Edges guitar playing, which transformed the instrument into something more than an endlessly abused piece of wood. The review commented that the last ten seconds are breathtakingly beautiful.() The Rocket wrote that the song builds a wall of sound that Bonos vocals cut through with a wail of desperation, as the lyrics agonize the need for personal spirituality. The reviewer compared the opening riff to Minds Ghostdancing.() Reviewing The Joshua Tree, Stephen Thomas Erlewine of Allmusic called the song an epic opener.(accessdate2010-04-29) The services Steve Huey, in a review of the song, praised its insistent, propulsive rhythmic drive and anthemic chorus, qualities he singled out for making it a fan favorite. He called the song the perfect album-opener, crediting the slow build of its arrangement toward a climactic peak. Huey also called Bonos delivery passionate and grandiose and his commitment to the material unshakable. He believed the combination of his vocals and the bands sonic power is what gave U2 its tremendous force.(accessdate2010-04-29)Live performancesWhere the Streets Have No Name made its concert debut on 2 April 1987 in Arizona on the opening night of Joshua Tree Tour.  It has since been played at nearly every full-length concert that U2 has headlined, totaling over 700 performances .() The song is widely regarded as one of the groups most popular live songs.( Bono said of it, We can be in the middle of the worst gig in our lives, but when we go into that song, everything changes. The audience is on its feet, singing along with every word. Its like God suddenly walks through the room.(Cogan (2008), p. 110) On The Joshua Tree Tour, Where the Streets Have No Name was most often used to open concerts.(de la Parra (2003), pp. 79121) Fans and critics responded favourably to the song in a live setting. The Diego Union-Tribune wrote that, From the lofty sonic opening strains of song, this audience was up, ecstatic and inflamed.() NME wrote that the song is one such occasion where the power afforded their songs is scary, noting that during the songs opening, the arena ERUPTS.() Other critics called the song uplifting,() exhilarating,() and powerful.() Out of the 109 shows during The Joshua Tree Tour, Streets was played at all except 12 of the concerts.(de la Parra (2003), pp. 7980, 97121) During the Tour which took place in 1989 and the beginning of 1990, Streets was only left out of the set list at one of the 47 concerts.(de la Parra (2003), pp. 124138) The song was performed at every show on the 19921993 TV Tour.(de la Parra (2003), pp. 140172) Concerts from this tour were elaborate multimedia spectacles that Bono performed as a variety of characters, but for the end of the main set, the group reverted to playing classics, including Where the Streets Have No Name, straight. Some of these performances of the song were accompanied by footage of the group in the desert from The Joshua Tree photo shoot.() The video was speeded up for humorous effectNME described the effect as giving it a silly, Chaplin qualityand Bono often acknowledged his younger self on the video screens.()() This video would make a return during performances on the 2010 and 2011 legs of the U2 360 Tour. Some of the Zoo TV performances of the song had a more dance music arrangement that bore a resemblance to the Shop Boys synthpop cover of the song (titled the Streets Have No Name (I Cant Take My Eyes off You)).()()() Bono parodied this by occasionally adopting the deadpan vocal style used in the Pet Shop Boys cover.() Critics welcomed the song in the groups setlist: Independent said the song induces instant euphoria, as U2 do what theyre best at, slipping into epic rock mode, playing music made for the arena.() Other critics()() praised the songs inclusion in a sequence of greatest hits.For the Tour of 19971998, U2 returned to the electronic dance arrangement they occasionally played on the Zoo TV Tour.() The sets massive video screen displayed a video that Press described as an astonishing, 2001-style trip into the heart of a swirling, psychedelic tunnel that sucks the audience in towards a horizontal monolith. Near the end of the song, peace doves were shown on the screen and bright beams of light flanking the sets golden arch were projected upwards. Hot Press said the effect transformed the stadium into a UFO landing site.()Shortly before the third leg of the Tour, the 11 attacks occurred in New York City and Washington D.C. During the bands first show in New York City following the attacks, the band performed Where the Streets Have No Name, and when the stage lights illuminated the audience, the band saw tears streaming down the faces of many fans.(Stokes (2005), p. 173) The experience was one inspiration for the song of Blinding Lights.()() The band paid tribute to the 9/11 victims during their performance of the song at the Bowl XXXVI halftime show on 3 February 2002. The performance featured the names of the September 11 victims projected onto a large white banner behind the band. U2s appearance was later ranked number 1 on Illustrateds list of Top 10 Super Bowl Halftime Shows.()For the Tour, the group originally considered dropping the song from their setlists, but Mullen and Clayton successfully argued against this.( All 131 of the Vertigo Tour concerts featured a performance of the song,() which were accompanied by the stages LED video curtains displaying African flags. On the tours opening night, this reminded Bono that he had originally written the lyrics in an Ethiopian village. He thought this visual accompaniment made the song come full circle, saying, And here it was, nearly twenty years later, coming back to Africa, all the stuff about parched lands and deserts making sense for the first time.(McCormick (2006), p. 337)  The song was also played at the preview screening of the bands concert film 3D at the Cannes Film Festival.()  At the Festival 2010, Edge accompanied rock band Muse for a live version of the track,() later playing it with U2 while headlining Glastonbury in 2011.Live performances of Where the Streets Have No Name appear in the concert video releases Rattle and Hum,() TV: Live from Sydney,() and Live from Mexico City,() as well as the respective audio releases of the latter two concerts, TV Live() and la Vista Baby! U2 Live from Mexico City.()  A second version from the PopMart Tour was featured on  PopHeart Live EP,() and later on the U.S. Please single.()  A live recording from Boston during the Tour was featured in the concert film 2001: Live from Boston,() and on the Walk On() and Electrical Storm() singles.  The concert video and album Go Home: Live from Slane Castle, Ireland featured another performance from the Elevation Tour,() and later performances were featured in  the concert films 2005: Live from Chicago() and 3D() (Tour), and 360 at the Rose Bowl() (360 Tour). The 2004 digital album, from the Point Depot, contains a performance from the Lovetown Tour, only available as part of Complete U2 digital box set.LegacyIn 2002, Q magazine named Where the Streets Have No Name the 16th-most exciting tune ever.() The following year, a special edition issue of Q, titled 1001 Best Songs Ever, ranked the song at number 459 on the eponymous list.() Three years later, the magazines readers voted the track the 43rd-greatest song in history.() Rolling Stone ranked the song at number 28 on its list of the 100 Greatest Guitar Songs of All Time.() In a 2010 poll by fan site @U2, approximately 29% of 4,800 respondents named Where the Streets Have No Name as their favourite song from The Joshua Tree, ranking it as the most popular song from the album.() In 2010, American sports network ESPN used the track, among other U2 songs, in commercials for the FIFA World Cup, with the South African Gospel Choir adding vocals to the song.() The advertisement, titled Robben Island, portrays South African political prisoners during the apartheid era forming a soccer team.() There are plans to bring a recording of the Soweto-supported performance to retail.( Composer John Mackey used the introductory guitar theme in his 2009 piece for wind ensemble, Aurora Awakes.() The songs introduction is used by the Canucks hockey team at the start each of their home games, when the players take to the ice.() The Ravens also use the song as they enter Bank Stadium before home games.()Track listingPersonnel;U2*Bono  vocals*Edge  guitar*Clayton  guitar*Mullen, Jr.  drums, percussion;Additional*Lanois and Eno  production*Flood with Pat McCarthy  recording*Lillywhite  mixing*Mark Wallace  engineeringCharts{|classwikitable!alignleft|Chart (1987)!alignleft|PeakPosition|-|alignleft|Canada RPM Top 100()|aligncenter|11|-|alignleft|Dutch MegaCharts()|aligncenter|7|-|alignleft|Singles Chart( Note: U2 must be searched manually.)|aligncenter|1|-|alignleft|New Zealand Singles Chart(|aligncenter|1|-|alignleft|Singles Chart( Note: U2 must be searched manually.)|aligncenter|4|-|alignleft|U.S. Billboard Hot 100(accessdate2009-12-14)|aligncenter|13|-|alignleft|U.S. Billboard Album Rock Tracks(|aligncenter|11|}See also*of cover versions of U2 songs#Where the Streets Have No NameReferences;Footnotes;Bibliography*******External links*Where the Streets Have No Name at U2.comthe Streets Have No Namethe Streets Have No Namethe Streets Have No Namethe Streets Have No Namethe Streets Have No Namethe Streets Have No Namethe Streets Have No Namethe Streets Have No Namethe Streets Have No Name
2186855
Thistleton
websitethumb|left|St Nicholas ThistletonThistleton is the most northerly village in the county of Rutland in the Midlands of England.The Thistleton area has shown evidence of Romano-British occupation including a large temple precinct and a possible small market settlement.(http://www.roman-britain.org/places/thistleton.htm) To the north of the village there has been extensive mining for ironstone, a stone that has featured very prominently in the building of many churches and other buildings in the area for centuries. It was thought that the mining had obliterated evidence of the former greater extent of the village but much archaeology has survived showing that the original Romano-British  settlement extended some  at least. Extensive surveys, brought about by the planning of a haulage road to the quarry to pass through the site of the ancient township, revealed interesting features including a well preserved Roman road and the skeleton of a child buried well away from the cemetery. The archaeology is ongoing as the mining continues.(http://www.rutlandhistory.org/thistletonfw.html) The village contains several listed buildings including the Old Rectory and the Church of St Nicholas.(http://www.britishlistedbuildings.co.uk/england/rutland/thistleton)  Many of the villages buildings are stone walled and thatched. Although the church is of medieval origin only the 14th century, three stage tower, complete with gargoyles, remains. The church has been rebuilt in the late 18th by the Brudenells, and  the rector, the Rev Sir J Henry Fludyer, Bart to whose family the elaborate chancel is probably a memorial. The newer building is fourteenth century in style however the shape of the apse is, unusually, half an octagon externally and a semi circular shape inside. Most of the internal fittings, including the font and the organ, are relatively modern.(http://www.british-history.ac.uk/report.aspx?compid66225)Close by, to the south of the village, lies the Cottesmore airfield established a few years before WW2 and an important base ever since. This long established RAF base now houses Harrier squadrons and regularly trains in the area. The airfield is scheduled to close in 2013.On 28 September 1811 a massive crowd of up to 20,000 watched a prizefight at Thistleton Gap. Cribb fought the American Molineaux in a hotly contested re-match for the heavyweight championship of England. The match was a matter of national pride and the names of both these men were famous throughout the land. The venue was chosen as the three counties of Rutland, Leicestershire and Lincolnshire met there and if the police arrived to halt the illegal fight the boxers and crowd could escape across the county boundary. In the eleventh round Cribb knocked out Molineaux. The original match, a year before, had ended in exhaustion for both men after a gruelling 33 rounds with accusations of cheating. During the intervening period both men had lost weight; Cribb because of extensive training with the famous Captain Barclay and Molineaux due to loss of muscle whilst earning his keep at local prizefighting venues.(http://boxingbiographies.com/bio/index.php?optioncom_content&taskview&id28&Itemid99999999&limit1&limitstart4)Referencesnl:Thistletonpl:Thistleton
2193139
Winster
Winster is a former lead-mining village in the Dales about  from Matlock and  from Bakewell at an altitude of approx . The village, which lies within the District National Park, has a large number of listed buildings, including the Market House open daily as a National Trust information point. Its current population is about 630; the village has a primary school, two churches, two pubs, and a Village Shop (owned by the community) which includes a Post Office. Winster was mentioned in the book in 1086 when it was owned by de Ferrers(Domesday Book: A Complete Translation. London: Penguin, 2003. ISBN 0-14-143994-7 p.745).A workhouse at Bank Top () was opened in 1744. It had a rule that forbade any relief outside of the workhouse. By the 1770s it could house 40 inmates(Higginbotham, P. (2007), Workhouses of the Midlands, Tempus, Stroud. Page 26. ISBN 978-0-7524-4488-8).Winster Market House was the National Trusts first property in the Peak District and was acquired in 1906.Winster Wakesleft|thumb|upright|The Winster King and Queen tour with the Morris menWinsters Parish Church is the Church of St John The Baptist, and a week-long annual carnival called Winster Wakes starts on the first Sunday on or after June 24 (the patronal day of St John The Baptist).  The Main Street is closed briefly on the Sunday for the Wakes Parade, and for much of the following Saturday afternoon, when there are stalls and entertainment (including Morris Dancing) in the street.Death of the DoctorIn May 1821 a young surgeon, William Cuddie was killed in one of the last duels to take place in England.  Cuddie was aged 31 and had fallen in love with Mary, the daughter of the wealthy Brittlebank family of Oddo House.  For some reason one of her brothers, William Brittlebank, tried to keep them apart.  One evening the two men quarrelled. The doctor later received a note asking:Cuddie refused to reply to the letter and the following afternoon the three Brittlebank brothers turned up in his garden with two loaded pistols.  Cuddie reluctantly accepted one of the weapons. William Brittlebank walked  away, turned and fired. Two shots were heard but only Cuddie was hit. He died a few hours later.Two of the Brittlebanks were tried in Derby to be found not guilty of murder, while their brother William fled to Australia with a 100 reward on his head, never to return to England.ReferencesExternal links* Winster village websitenl:Winsterpl:Winster
2197774
Eagle_Mountain,_California
Eagle Mountain, California is a modern day town, in the Desert, in Riverside County founded in 1948 by iron magnate J. Kaiser.  The town is located at the entrance of the now-defunct Eagle Mountain iron mine, once owned by the Pacific Railroad, then Steel, and located on the southeastern corner of Tree National Park.  The towns fully integrated medical care system was the genesis of the modern-day Permanente health maintenance organization.(Rickey Hendricks, A Model for National Health Care: The History of Kaiser Permanente (New Brunswick, NJ: Rutgers University Press, 1993), ISBN 0813519292, 13-26)  Eagle Mountain is accessible by Riverside County Route R2, twelve miles (19 km) north of Desert Center, midway between Indio and the California/Arizona state line along 10.  The towns relative youth and brief time of abandonment make Eagle Mountain among the countrys best preserved ghost towns.HistoryFounded in 1948 by iron magnate J. Kaiser, Eagle Mountain is located at the entrance of the now-defunct Eagle Mountain iron mine. As the mine expanded, Eagle Mountain grew to a peak population of 4000.  It had wide, landscaped streets lined with over four hundred homes, some with as many as four bedrooms. Two hundred trailer spaces and several houses and dormitories provided living space for Kaisers itinerant workforce.  Other amenities included an auditorium, a park, a shopping center, a community pool, lighted tennis courts, and a baseball diamond. Businesses included a alley, two stations, eight churches and three schools.In the late 1930s, Kaiser decided to build the West Coasts only fully integrated mill.  In 1942, Kaiser built such a mill at California which is located 112 miles (180 km) west of the Eagle Mountain Mine.  Today the Fontana mill is the site of the Club Speedway (formerly the Speedway).  Kaiser then purchased the idle mines from the Southern Pacific as a source of high-grade iron ore.Production at Fontana began in 1948 and a mining town was constructed below what was soon to become Southern Californias largest iron mine.  It connected to the Southern Pacific via a 51-mile-long (82 km) railroad branch known as the Mountain Railroad.  It ran southwest from the mine to the northeast shore of the Sea, just north of the Riverside/Imperial county line.  Ore shipments to Fontana steel plant began in October, with five to eight 100-car trains running weekly.End timesIncreased environmental concerns in the 1970s led to a reduction in iron output and a drop in population to a low of 1890.  In the summer of 1980 the mine shut down briefly, reopening on September 23rd.  Only 750 workers were brought back to the town with an additional 150 (with uncertain employment futures) in Indio, some sixty miles (97 km) west.On November 3, 1981, Kaiser Corporation announced the phasing out of half the Fontana works and the entire Eagle Mountain Mine operation over several years.  The population dwindled as layoffs began.  The grocery store closed in October 1982 and the post office, which had been active since 1951, closed in January 1983.  In June of that year the last official graduating class celebrated their commencement at Eagle Mountain High School, followed by closing of both the mine and mill. The old high school is now the current site of Eagle Mountain School, which continues in operation (as of 2008).The ZIP Code was 92241 until Eagle Mountain shut down, mail is now sent to nearby Desert Center at 92239. The community is within code 760.ResurgenceEagle Mountain experienced a resurgence in 1986 when the California Department of Corrections proposed placing a unique privately operated prison for low-risk inmates in the town. The shopping center was converted by 1988 into just such a facility which operated until State budget problems led to the closing of the prison in December 2003. Talks resumed in 2005 to reopen the prison facility.1988 also saw a proposal to turn the gigantic 1.5 mile (2.4 km) long by half-mile (800 m) wide open-pit mine into a massive, high-tech sanitary landfill. The landfill, to be operated by a partnership of two privately operated trash collection firms and the successor to Kaiser Steel, Kaiser Ventures,(Eagle Mountain) would ship trash by train from metropolitan Los Angeles area via the Eagle Mountain Railroad. A company subsidiary, Mine Reclamation Corp. of Palm Desert, is the landfill developer.(Inland News | PE.com | Southern California News | News for Inland Southern California) Due to numerous lawsuits regarding the environmental effects of the landfill, the project was repeatedly delayed. The private partnership decided in late 1999 to terminate the project. Their share of the project was bought by Kaiser Ventures, making it controlling owner of the project.The Riverside County Board of Supervisors approved the project in October 1992 after EPA approval of the project. In August 2000, Kaiser Ventures reached an agreement with the Los Angeles Sanitation District (a public entity comprising several Los Angeles public waste collection agencies), to purchase the landfill project as a replacement for the Hills Landfill, which would soon be nearing the end of its useful life. Trash would be shipped by rail from the Los Angeles area via the abandoned Mountain Railroad line. However, since the sale agreement states that all lawsuits and claims regarding the project must be resolved, the transaction has yet to begin. As of 2008, there was only one lawsuit still pending. However, much has changed in the waste business since 2000. A reduction in waste generated because of recycling has reduced the urgency for the new landfill. In addition, the Los Angeles Sanitation District has purchased another landfill site in County that is fully licensed and ready to use. It is unclear if the Sanitation District still intends to make Eagle Mountain a landfill. As of 2009, the project has yet to begin.As of July 18, 2007, the town of Eagle Mountain is no longer openly accessible.  The perimeters of both the town and mine have been fenced and gated, with a site manager appointed to handle access requests.  The fencing isnt presently visible from either Earth or Maps, so its easy to believe that the town is still accessible.Eagle Mountain was used in 2005 by elements of 5th Battalion 14th Marines as a work up site to prepare for deployment to Fallujah Iraq.SchoolsThe Center Unified School District at one time operated four schools in the Eagle Mountain and Desert Center areas.  Eagle Mountain Elementary School was located in the center of the town, Henry J. Kaiser Junior High School and Eagle Mountain High School were located on the east and Desert Center Elementary School was located in Desert Center, 11 miles away.  The class of 1983 was the last to graduate from Eagle Mountain High School.(Eagle Mountain, CA) In 1983, the school district converted the high school into the Eagle Mountain Elementary School,(http://www.greatschools.net/modperl/browse_school/ca/4282 greatschools.net ) (in operation since 1983),( educating students in the grades Kindergarten through 8th.The remaining three school sites were closed and boarded up.  Local high school students are bused to Palo Verde High School in Blythe, CA, making the 120-mile round trip every day.  The remaining students in the school district are children of the few full-time residents of Desert Center and children of the employees of the two nearby Water District pumping plants.Popular cultureFilm* Films using Eagle Mountain locations(Titles with locations including Eagle Mountain, California, USA):* Guys (1986):* 2: Judgment Day, 3-D Attraction, Studios (1998):* Impostor (2001):* from Baghdad (film) (2002)(Live from Baghdad):* (film) (2003)(Constanstine):* The Island (2005):* Unknown (2006):* of Los Angeles (film) (2011)* A portion of the Mountain Railroad was used in the filming of the movie Guys, which is a 1986 comedy starring Lancaster, Douglas, Wallach and Carvey. Tough Guys was the final collaboration for Lancaster and Douglas. They played a couple of released cons who plan the last great train robbery. At the end, they hijack a train, pulled by famed locomotive Pacific 4449, and run it full throttle to the Mexican border. During the filming of the exterior shots of Pacific 4449 the train was stored nightly at the Eagle Mountain rail yards. The local school children from Eagle Mountain School took a field trip in early 1986 to see and tour the train on the location of the shoot along the Eagle Mountain Railroad south of 10.(Tough Guys (1986))* Also filmed in Eagle Mountain was Terminator 2s 3D Attraction, now showing at Universal Studios.(Universal Studios Terminator 2 3D Ride Video) The 3D film is an action sequence based on the original Terminator 2-Judgment Day movie-including Arnold Schwarzenegger on a motorcycle and the T1000 cop. Universal Studios in Los Angeles premiered its version of the Terminator 2 3D ride in 1999. The ride, which is also in Universals Orlando, Fla., location, takes three-dimensional attractions to a new level-incorporating a story, real characters and beefed-up computer and robotics technology.The entire crew spent weeks at Eagle Mountain. This was the site for some big detonations, reportedly the largest explosion ever done in film.See also*of ghost towns in California*Colorado DesertReferences(External links*  Classic and current photos of Eagle Mountain* Info on Eagle Mountain* History of Eagle Mountain* Pictures of Eagle Mountain
2201365
Buschwhacker
A Buschwhacker is a term for NASCAR drivers who are regulars in the top-level Cup Series but who also compete in races in the lower-level Series. The original coinage of the term Buschwacker comes from the fact the Nationwide Series was previously the Busch Series.Because the Nationwide Series is essentially a league for the major-league Sprint Cup Series, this is a controversial practice. Critics say that Buschwhackers are racing against inferior competition and taking opportunities away from younger, less-experienced drivers, but many NASCAR experts contend that without Cup drivers in Busch and the large amount of fan interest they attract, the series would cease to exist. Because the Nationwide Series runs most of its events as undercard races for the Sprint Cup Series, there is almost no time conflict for Cup Series drivers who wish to compete. Cup drivers like to race in Nationwide races, which are usually run on Saturdays, as preparation for the Sprint Cup Series races, usually run on Sundays. Because Nationwide and Cup cars are only subtly different, the primary advantage of running both races is extra practice (seat time) for the drivers. Some racing experts suggested that when the Cup series moved to the of Tomorrow the advantage of Cup drivers racing in Nationwide events would decrease greatly; however, this did not prove true, as each Nationwide Series points title from 2006 to 2010 was won by a Cup Series regular.Due to NASCAR rules changes that will take effect in 2011, Buschwhackers are no longer allowed to compete for the Nationwide Series drivers championship, although they can earn full points toward the owners championship. Before these changes, the last non-Buschwhacker to win the Nationwide Series points title was Truex, Jr. in 2005.The practiceThe presence of Buschwhackers is seen as problematic by some Nationwide Series regulars who complain about more talented Cup drivers taking the top prize money and thus leading to loss of sponsorship for Nationwide Series teams with no Cup affiliation.  Also, in some cases, Cup regulars have better equipment thus taking away the regulars chance to win and score much needed championship points.  Other Cup drivers will run equipment independent of the Cup Series;  in recent years, Stewart, Nemechek and McMurray have raced with Nationwide Series teams entirely separate from their Sprint Cup Series ones. While most Buschwhackers cherry-pick which Nationwide Series races to drive in, a few non-rookie Sprint Cup Series drivers, including Biffle in 2004, Edwards in 2005, and Biffle, Edwards, J. Yeley, Hamlin, Sorenson, Bowyer, and Harvick in 2006 and 2007, attempt to run every Nationwide event while also competing in a full season of Sprint Cup, even though on some weekends the two series race at venues hundreds of miles apart.  Some critics of Buschwacking cite the lack of Nationwide Series veterans left in the series, after long-time series veterans and champions (such as Grissom, David Green, Lajoie, Keller, Atwood, and Lewis) could not find a team to drive for as all the seats were taken by Cup drivers.Still, the presence of Sprint Cup Series drivers in Nationwide Series races increases the exposure for the series and raises the attractiveness of the series for potential competitors as well as potential sponsors. It also increases the level of competition, and accelerates the development of non-Buschwhacker Nationwide Series drivers. Some fans believe the television broadcasters focus solely on the Cup drivers during the broadcast of a race.In 2007, only three non-Cup Series regulars won during the 35-race schedule: Almirola, Leicht and Leffler.  (A fourth winner, Reutimann made only 26 Cup starts out of 36 events: however, Reutimann missed 8 of the remaining 10 races merely because he failed to qualify, and was benched for a course ringer in the other two.)  Almirolas victory at the Mile on June 23 was controversial and unusual. Almirola was pulled from his car after leading 42 of the first 58 laps to make room for his teams regular driver, Cup regular Hamlin.  Hamlin missed the start of the race because he was delayed flying back east to Wisconsin from California, where he was driving a Cup event at Raceway the same weekend. Even though the car lost a lot of time during the driver change, Hamlin got back to the front to take the checkered flag after 250 laps.  Almirola was officially credited with the win because he made the start.(http://www.racing-reference.info/race?id2007-17&seriesB)(http://www.jayski.com/busch/next/2007/17milwaukee.htm)One of the Buschwhackers, Carl Edwards, clinched the 2007 Busch Series championship with two races to go.  He ended the season 618 points over his fellow Buschwhacker David Reutimann.  There were four non-Buschwhackers in the top 10 in drivers points: Leffler, Hamilton, Jr., Leicht, and Ambrose.There have been some proposals made to restrict Cup regulars participation in the Nationwide Series by not awarding championship points to such drivers, none which were made official until 2011. Even though there is a widespread perception that drivers running both races hindered the development of new drivers, there has been a steady influx of successful new drivers into the Sprint Cup Series: e.g., in 2007 three of the Top 10 drivers had less than four years of Cup experience, eight of the ten had less than 10 years of Cup experience, and only one (Burton) was over 40 years of age.(http://www.racing-reference.info/raceyear?yr2007&seriesW) Cup drivers turn up in other series as well.  Although it would be impractical for a Cup regular to run a full World Truck Series or Modified Tour schedule, there are several who run trucks part-time. Harvick in particular is very active in the Truck Series: he owns a truck team which enters at least one vehicle in every race, and he frequently drives for his own team; and the most successful of these drivers is Busch, who has won 29 Truck Series races. Most of the leading Truck Series drivers have at least some Cup experience.  Cup drivers also occasionally compete in regional racing series events.In late 2010, media reports began to indicate that NASCAR would respond to the critics of Buschwhacking by effectively splitting the difference between the two extremes of unrestricted presence of Cup drivers and none at all. It was specifically reported that in 2011, Cup drivers would be allowed to run in the Nationwide Series, but not to compete for the series championship.() This rule change was confirmed by NASCAR.com in a report on January 11, 2011. Drivers are now allowed to compete for the championship in only one of NASCARs three national touring series in a given season. The NASCAR license application form now includes a check box requiring drivers to select the series in which they wish to compete for the championship.() NASCAR president and CEO France officially announced this change on January 26, adding that Cup Series drivers will still be allowed to earn owners points, but not drivers points, in the Nationwide and Truck Series.()UsageThe term originated in an argument Craig Witkowski had with another user Tinadog in the Usenet newsgroup rec.autos.sport.NASCAR in May 1997. Tinadog was against Earnhardt and liked Martin, and Witkowski the reverse. He was especially critical of Martin using his Cup team and resources to beat up on the drivers in the lower Grand National Series. The old western term of bushwhacker was morphed into Busch Whacker. The term continued in use among the regulars on rec.autos.sport.NASCAR (rasn for short), referring now to any driver whose primary ride is in the Cup series and cherry-picks Busch races. The term was picked up by Fox Sports broadcaster Joy, who also participated in the group. After Mike Joy used the term in his broadcasts, it was picked up by other members of the media and found its way into common use. Mike gave credit on the air on lap 64 of the Fox telecast of the Hersheys 300 Busch Series race at Daytona International Speedway in 2005.Fox later discontinued the use of the term on its telecasts.  This may have been done to save face among the critics of this practice, or perhaps because few of the leaders were non-Sprint Cup Series drivers anymore.An alternative term was used by McReynolds initially, as Nationwide is an insurance company, he dubbed the Sprint Cup invaders as Claim Jumpers, punning off the term of an insurance claim and mining rights. See also*of NASCAR double duty performers - drivers who competed full-time in both Sprint Cup and Nationwide Series during a single season. Sources (*  http://groups.google.com/group/rec.autos.sport.nascar/msg/123cac6eb8ae3bb9*  http://groups.google.com/group/rec.autos.sport.nascar/browse_frm/thread/167b5763e2f50155*  The Death of WCW, a book by Reynolds and Alvarez published in 2005*http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/C/CAR_NASCAR_BUSCHWHACKING_THE_BANQUET?SITEGENERIC&SECTIONHOME&TEMPLATEDEFAULT&CTIME2006-12-07-21-13-40no:Buschwhacker
2205320
Sierre
Sierre (German: Siders) is the capital of the district of Sierre in the canton of Valais in Switzerland. It has a population of 14,355.It is situated on the FrenchGerman language border of the canton of Wallis (Valais in French). As a German-speaking minority lives in Sierre, it counts as one of the three official bilingual towns in Switzerland. Historythumb|left|Panoramic view of Sierre.Sierre is first mentioned about 800 as Sidrium, though a 12th century document refers to the village being founded in 515.  In 1179 it was mentioned as Sirro and in 1393 as Syder.(PrehistoryThe area around the modern town, especially Gerunden hill, was settled very early.  Archeological sites on Gerunden hill have produced neolithic objects and grave goods (including a polished stone ax), Age weapons and jewelry, Early Age objects and Roman era inscriptions, jars, jewelry and coins.  A soapstone pot from the Middle Ages and a gold signet ring with the name Graifarius from the 6th century have also been found.  Other sites on nearby hills and near the chapel of Saint-Ginier, the Chteau de Villa, the churches of Sainte-Croix, Grands-Prs, Muraz, Glarey and Bernunes have yielded up graves originating from the Bronze Age to the Carolingian era.  In Grands-Prs there is a fire pit from the beginning of the Late Iron Age (5th-6th century BC).(  During the Roman era it appears that there was no major population center, but rather several scattered groupings of separate, upper class dwellings.  Under the chapel of  Saint-Ginier, the remains of a Roman era house or estate have been discovered.  Other Roman ruins have been found near the Chteau de Villa, in the church of Sainte-Croix (small terraced bath), in Grands-Prs by Muraz another house and in Gerunden the remains of buttress reinforced masonry indicate that a public or government building once stood there.  Five altars were found in Saint-Ginier, along with another two in the scattered settlements, one of which was dedicated to Mercury.  During the early imperial period, the duumvir or mayor of the Civitas Vallensium, Caius Cominus Chiu, lived in Sierre.  In the late imperial period, the family of the senator of Vinelia Modestina also lived in the area.(The chapel of Saint-Flix was built in the 5th or the beginning of the 6th Century on Gerunden hill.(Medieval and early modern developmentsIn 515 the estate at Sierre was given by the of Burgundy Sigismund to the Abbey of Saint-Maurice to hold as a fief.  By the 11th Century, the fief of Sierre was owned by the Bishop of Sion.  The aristocratic families and the residents of the fief lived on the Gerunden, Vieux-Sierre and Plantzette hills.  On each of these hills there was a castle that served as the residence for the Bishops representatives and as a refuge for the population.  The castles were razed in the mid-14th Century when the noble families stood with the Bishop in his war with the Zenden of the Upper Valais and of Savoy.  The demolished castles and villages were abandoned and most residents settled farther north, in plan-Sierre.  The only castle that survived the wars of the 14th Century was Goubing Castle, southeast of Sierre, which belonged to the lords of Granges.(The Contre of Sierre was originally a group the managed commons.  As vassals of the Bishop, they had the right to assemble twice a year to regulate the management of the common lands and the affairs of the local police.  In the 14th and 15 Century this cooperative adopted a larger political role as they started to administer more of the daily affairs in the villages and acquired the right to appoint their own judges.  Eventually this grew into the Noble Contre which then formed the core of Sierre Zenden from which the city of Sierre later developed.  The town of Plan-Sierre soon took over the leadership role in the Noble Contre.  Until 1798, the Noble Contre was appointed by a council of village representatives, under the leadership of the Bishops representative.  In 1559, Plan-Sierre divided into four quarters Villa, Monderche, La Salla and Glarey.  In 1620, the town hall was built.(19th centuryAs the capital of a Zenden, Sierre fought the French in the 1798-99 invasion.  In 1799, the city was occupied by French and Vaudois troops.  The French set up their headquarters in Sierre.(In the conflicts between the conservative Upper Valais and the liberal Lower Valais, Sierre served as the seat of government in 1839-40.  After 1848, the villages of the Noble Contre became municipalities under the Valais cantonal constitution.  The Zenden of Sierre became the District of Sierre with Sierre as the capital.  The new city executive council had nine members, while of the General Council (legislature) had 60.  Initially, the majority of the power was held by the Conservatives (now the Christian Democrats).  In 1913, they were joined by the Liberals, in 1945 the Social Democratsand in 2004 the Greens. Modern SierreAt the beginning of the 20th century, Sierre became economically important as very early smelting is enabled by its access to hydroelectricity.  Today the aluminium industry Novelis and Alcan employs 1200 workers in Chippis and Sierre.In 2007, the agglomeration of Sierre/Crans-Montana was formed to address created to common problems, especially in the fields of tourism and transportation.(GeographySierre has an area, , of .  Of this area,  or 34.5% is used for agricultural purposes, while  or 21.4% is forested.   Of the rest of the land,  or 34.4% is settled (buildings or roads),  or 6.8% is either rivers or lakes and  or 3.1% is unproductive land.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office-Land Use Statistics 2009 data  accessed 25 March 2010)  Of the built up area, industrial buildings made up 5.4% of the total area while housing and buildings made up 10.3% and transportation infrastructure made up 10.3%.  Power and water infrastructure as well as other special developed areas made up 4.0% of the area while parks, green belts and sports fields made up 4.4%.  Out of the forested land, 18.7% of the total land area is heavily forested and 2.7% is covered with orchards or small clusters of trees.  Of the agricultural land, 6.9% is used for growing crops and 2.5% is pastures, while 25.1% is used for orchards or vine crops.  Of the water in the municipality, 1.3% is in lakes and 5.5% is in rivers and streams.(The municipality is the capital of the Sierre district.  It is located in the middle Rhone valley, on the right bank of the river.  The nearby Raspille mountain stream is considered the dividing line between the French and German speaking portions of Switzerland.  It consists of the city of Sierre, the villages of Granges, Nos and Muraz, and the hamlets and settlements of Gerunden, Plantzette, Vieux-Sierre, Bourg, Glarey, Borzuat, Zervettaz, Villa den Bas, den Haut, Sous Gronde, Cuchon and Monderche.Sierre is starting point for the tourist sites of the dAnniviers comprising the villages of Vercorin, Chandolin, St-Luc Vissoie, St-Jean Chandolin, Grimentz, Zinal and Ayer. Sierre is connected with Crans-Montana by a funicular railway.de Gronde is a small lake at its outskirts.Coat of armsThe blazon of the municipal of arms is Gules, a Sun in Splendour Or.(Flags of the World.com accessed 23-September-2011)DemographicsSierre has a population (lcon) of .  , 27.0% of the population are resident foreign nationals.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Superweb database - Gemeinde Statistics 1981-2008  accessed 19 June 2010)  Over the last 10 years (20002010 ) the population has changed at a rate of 12.3%.  It has changed at a rate of 11.9% due to migration and at a rate of 0% due to births and deaths.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office accessed 23-September-2011)  Most of the population () speaks French (10,710 or 74.8%) as their first language, German is the second most common (1,803 or 12.6%) and Italian is the third (765 or 5.3%).  There are 6 people who speak Romansh.(, the population was 48.4% male and 51.6% female.  The population was made up of 5,339 Swiss men (33.8% of the population) and 2,305 (14.6%) non-Swiss men.  There were 6,123 Swiss women (38.8%) and 2,020 (12.8%) non-Swiss women.(Stndige Wohnbevolkerung nach Geschlecht und Heimat am 31.12.2009.xls   accessed 24 August 2011)  Of the population in the municipality, 5,363 or about 37.5% were born in Sierre and lived there in 2000.  There were 3,705 or 25.9% who were born in the same canton, while 1,412 or 9.9% were born somewhere else in Switzerland, and 3,273 or 22.9% were born outside of Switzerland.(  , children and teenagers (0-19 years old) make up 22% of the population, while adults (20-64 years old) make up 61.9% and seniors (over 64 years old) make up 16.1%.(  , there were 5,651 people who were single and never married in the municipality.  There were 6,891 married individuals, 974 widows or widowers and 801 individuals who are divorced.(STAT-TAB Datenwrfel fr Thema 40.3 - 2000   accessed 2 February 2011 ), there were 6,016 private households in the municipality, and an average of 2.3 persons per household.(  There were 2,133 households that consist of only one person and 319 households with five or more people.  , a total of 5,728 apartments (84.1% of the total) were permanently occupied, while 875 apartments (12.9%) were seasonally occupied and 205 apartments (3.0%) were empty.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB - Datenwrfel fr Thema 09.2 - Gebude und Wohnungen  accessed 28 January 2011)  , the construction rate of new housing units was 3.4 new units per 1000 residents.(  The vacancy rate for the municipality, , was 1.15%.(The historical population is given in the following chart:()(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Bevlkerungsentwicklung nach Region, 1850-2000  accessed 29 January 2011)Colors  id:lightgrey value:gray(0.9)  id:darkgrey  value:gray(0.8)ImageSize   width:1020 height:210PlotArea    height:150 left:100 bottom:50 right:100AlignBars   justifyDateFormat  x.yPeriod      from:0 till:15000TimeAxis    orientation:verticalAlignBars   justifyScaleMajor  gridcolor:darkgrey increment:3000 start:0ScaleMinor  gridcolor:lightgrey increment:600 start:0PlotData  color:yellowgreen width:40   mark:(line,white) align:center  bar:1802 from:start till:724 text:724  bar:1850 from:start till:1150 text:1,150  bar:1860 from:start till:1314 text:1,314  bar:1870 from:start till:1596 text:1,596  bar:1880 from:start till:1740 text:1,740  bar:1888 from:start till:1642 text:1,642  bar:1900 from:start till:2270 text:2,270  bar:1910 from:start till:3637 text:3,637  bar:1920 from:start till:4371 text:4,371  bar:1930 from:start till:5679 text:5,679  bar:1941 from:start till:7144 text:7,144  bar:1950 from:start till:8112 text:8,112  bar:1960 from:start till:9739 text:9,739  bar:1970 from:start till:12343 text:12,343  bar:1980 from:start till:13050 text:13,050  bar:1990 from:start till:14143 text:14,143  bar:2000 from:start till:14317 text:14,317Heritage sites of national significanceThe Centrale lectrique et Btiments Alusuisse (Power station and buildings of the Alusuisse company) is listed as a Swiss heritage site of national significance.  The entire Sierre town and surrounding are part of the of Swiss Heritage Sites.()SightsSierre is host to a local wine museum (Muse Valaisan de la Vigne et du Vin) and of a museum dedicated to the memory of Maria Rilke who lived there until his death and is buried in the nearby town of Raron.Twin TownsSierre is twinned with the towns of Aubenas, France and Cesenatico, Italy.(Conseil des Communes et Regions dEurope  accessed 27 April 2011)PoliticsIn the 2007 federal election the most popular party was the CVP which received 34.23% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were the SP (19.19%), the FDP (17.78%) and the SVP (16.92%).  In the federal election, a total of 5,203 votes were cast, and the turnout was 57.3%.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office, Nationalratswahlen 2007: Strke der Parteien und Wahlbeteiligung, nach Gemeinden/Bezirk/Canton  accessed 28 May 2010)  In the 2009 Conseil dEtat/Staatsrat election a total of 4,904 votes were cast, of which 330 or about 6.7% were invalid.  The voter participation was 54.4%, which is similar to the cantonal average of 54.67%.(Staatsratswahlen vom 1. Mrz 2009  accessed 24 August 2011)  In the 2007 Swiss Council of States election election a total of 5,130 votes were cast, of which 498 or about 9.7% were invalid.  The voter participation was 57.4%, which is similar to the cantonal average of 59.88%.(Stnderatswahl 2007  accessed 24 August 2011)Economy, Sierre had an unemployment rate of 5%.  , there were 195 people employed in the primary economic sector and about 62 businesses involved in this sector.  2,654 people were employed in the secondary sector and there were 145 businesses in this sector.  6,607 people were employed in the tertiary sector, with 729 businesses in this sector.(  There were 6,938 residents of the municipality who were employed in some capacity, of which females made up 43.6% of the workforce.   the total number of equivalent jobs was 7,876.  The number of jobs in the primary sector was 134, of which 118 were in agriculture and 16 were in forestry or lumber production.  The number of jobs in the secondary sector was 2,570 of which 1,834 or (71.4%) were in manufacturing, 13 or (0.5%) were in mining and 584 (22.7%) were in construction.  The number of jobs in the tertiary sector was 5,172.  In the tertiary sector; 1,373 or 26.5% were in the sale or repair of motor vehicles, 224 or 4.3% were in the movement and storage of goods, 401 or 7.8% were in a hotel or restaurant, 255 or 4.9% were in the information industry, 104 or 2.0% were the insurance or financial industry, 414 or 8.0% were technical professionals or scientists, 300 or 5.8% were in education and 1,194 or 23.1% were in health care.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Betriebszhlung: Arbeitssttten nach Gemeinde und NOGA 2008 (Abschnitte), Sektoren 1-3  accessed 28 January 2011)  , there were 4,257 workers who commuted into the municipality and 2,470 workers who commuted away.  The municipality is a net importer of workers, with about 1.7 workers entering the municipality for every one leaving.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Statweb  accessed 24 June 2010)  Of the working population, 10.4% used public transportation to get to work, and 63% used a private car.(ReligionFrom the , 11,139 or 77.8% were Catholic, while 715 or 5.0% belonged to the Reformed Church.  Of the rest of the population, there were 359 members of an Orthodox church (or about 2.51% of the population), there were 3 individuals (or about 0.02% of the population) who belonged to the Christian Catholic Church, and there were 310 individuals (or about 2.17% of the population) who belonged to another Christian church.  There were 5 individuals (or about 0.03% of the population) who were Jewish, and 430 (or about 3.00% of the population) who were Islamic.  There were 31 individuals who were Buddhist, 8 individuals who were Hindu and 25 individuals who belonged to another church.  636 (or about 4.44% of the population) belonged to no church, are agnostic or atheist, and 805 individuals (or about 5.62% of the population) did not answer the question.(WeatherSierre has an average of 87.2 days of rain or snow per year and on average receives  of precipitation.  The wettest month is December during which time Sierre receives an average of  of rain or snow.  During this month there is precipitation for an average of 7.9 days.  The month with the most days of precipitation is August, with an average of 8.4, but with only  of rain or snow.  The driest month of the year is September with an average of  of precipitation over 5.7 days.( , the Sierre weather station elevation is 539 meters above sea level.)EducationIn Sierre about 4,610 or (32.2%) of the population have completed non-mandatory upper secondary education, and 1,576 or (11.0%) have completed additional higher education (either university or a Fachhochschule).  Of the 1,576 who completed tertiary schooling, 58.1% were Swiss men, 28.0% were Swiss women, 7.6% were non-Swiss men and 6.3% were non-Swiss women.(  During the 2010-2011 school year there were a total of 149 students in the Sierre school system.  The education system in the Canton of Valais allows young children to attend one year of non-obligatory Kindergarten.()  During that school year, there 2 kindergarten classes (KG1 or KG2) and 31 kindergarten students.  The cantons school system requires students to attend six years of school.  In Sierre there were a total of 8 classes and 149 students in the primary school.  The school program consists of three lower, obligatory years of schooling (orientation classes), followed by three to five years of optional, advanced schools.  All the lower and upper secondary students from Sierre attend their school in a neighboring municipality.(Obligatorische Schulzeit  accessed 24 August 2011)  , there were 1,077 students in Sierre who came from another municipality, while 517 residents attended schools outside the municipality.( Sierre is home to the Bibliothque et Mdiathque Sierre library.  The library has () 65,898 books or other media, and loaned out 92,412 items in the same year.  It was open a total of 295 days with average of 26 hours per week during that year.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office, list of libraries  accessed 14 May 2010) Events * Festival Week-end au bord de leau (first weekend of July)* Sierre Blues Festival (in August) Notable people The Swiss ski mountaineer Rey was born in Sierre.  Plante, a famous professional hockey player who was the first goaltender to wear a mask while playing a game in the National Hockey League, is buried in Sierre.  Grichting, footballer was born in Sierre. Alphorn composer Daetwyler died in Sierre.ReferencesExternal links**Official website *Public transport operator website frp:Sirrozh-min-nan:Sierreca:Sierrede:Sierrees:Sierrefr:Sierreit:Sierrelmo:Sierre(gemeente)nn:Sierrepms:Sierrepl:Sierrept:Sierrerm:Sierrescn:Sierresimple:Sierrefi:Sierrevo:Sierrewar:Sierrezh:
2208639
Partek
Partek Ski Lifts was a chairlift manufacturer based in Island, New York. It was founded in 1996 as the successor to Borvig, who went out of business in 1993. The company was founded by Hagen Schulz, the son of Borvigs President Gary Schulz. The company was also the official parts distributor for Borvig lifts.In 2004 Partek had announced that it was developing a chairlift system, however, development was ceased when the company was purchased.In 2005, the company was purchased by CTEC. Also included in the purchase were Parteks rights to Borvig lifts. After the purchase, Partek president Hagen Schulz became a sales consultant at Doppelmayr CTEC, and started a new company, Ski Lift Parts Inc.In its 9 years as a lift manufacturer, Partek installed 24 lifts in North America.Other companiesThere is also a completely unrelated (and currently operating) company called Partek that sells statistical software used by scientific researchers for mining and recognition (http://www.partek.com/).  Their software has found a particular niche in the analysis of microarray data in the field of Genomics(http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/entrez/query.fcgi?dbpmc&cmdsearch&termpartek), because it can perform analysis of fairly large data sets on an ordinary desktop computer.  A number of pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies use Partek software (http://www.partek.com/html/company/customer.html).External links*Ski Lift Parts Inc. References 
2214921
Marysvale_Canyon
Marysvale Canyon or Sevier Canyon () runs eight miles (13 km) north from Utah to the town of Utah. It is a steep walled canyon formed by the flow of the meandering River.Points of interest in the canyon are Big Rock Candy Mountain, old mining sites, and the rail tunnels along the old Branch of the and Rio Grande Western Railroad that has been converted to a hiking/biking path.* Official Website of Marysvale Utah* Marysvale Canyon* Rock Candy Express Bike Trail* Sevier River* Historic Mining Sites* Canyon of Gold Tour
2219136
List_of_Chilean_companies
This is a list of Chilean companies by field of operation.Media*El Mercurio SAP*CopesaMining*Codelco*Escondida, Billiton*Qumica y Minera de Chile*plc*Punta de LobosTransport*LAN Airlines*Airline*del Sur*Sudamericana de VaporesBanks*BCI*Corpbanca*de ChileRetail*ABC*Cencosud*Verde*D&S*Falabella, Falabella.com*Fasa*Johnsons*Jumbo http://www.jumbo.cl*Arauco S.A.*Ripley*Brand*Sodimac-Homecenter, Sodimac.com*Tottus*ParisTelecommunications*Compaa de Telfonos*Telefnica Chile*Entel S.A.*Gtd*former Smartcom*del Sur (CNT)*Chile*VTR GlobalCom S.A.Internet*Bazuca.com Inc.Food*Calaf*CAPEL*Empresas Carozzi S.A.*Via Concha y Toro S.A.*COLUN*Entrelagos*Kunstmann*Loncoleche*Empresas Lucchetti S.A.*Sociedad Productores de Leche S.A., SoproleEnergy*Gener*S.A.*Empresas Copec S.A.*Energa*(Chile)*Enersis*Frontel*S.A.*S.A.*SAESAInformation technology*SKM Seaprende - Knowledge Management and e-LearningWood manufacturing*Arauco y Constitucion SA.Defense*Cardoen SA*FAMAE*ASMAR*ENAERExternal links*Chilnet Business Directory*Sociedad Punta de Lobos, SPLdentreprises chiliennes
2226841
Yuscarn
Yuscarn is the capital of the Paraso department of Honduras, located 65 kilometers from Tegucigalpa. This quaint village was a major mining center in the 18th and 19th centuries, first for the Spanish Crown and later for U.S. mining companies. The same topography that produced rich veins of precious metal also gives the town its spectacular mountain scenery and its windy cobblestone roads.The entire village was declared a national monument by the Honduran government in 1979. Today more than 200 colonial homes remain, paying tribute to Yuscarans historic past.The mountain of Montserrat towers over the town to the southeast. This biological reserve is also the main source of water for the area, the same pure water that the villagers use to produce the famous Yuscaran-brand sugar cane alcohol known as burning water (aguardiente, or simply guaro).Ancient rock paintings can be found in the nearby communities of Oreal and Oropol.HistoryThe municipality of Yuscarn was founded in 1730. After gold, silver and other precious metals were found in its foothills in 1746, Spanish mining companies flooded the area and Spaniards settled the town. Thus, Yuscarn was constructed in the traditional colonial style of 18th century Spain.Years of exploitation by the Spanish and later by North American mining companies followed, bringing both advantages and disadvantages. At its height, Yuscarn was a wealthy mining town and home to some of Hondurass most influential families. It was one of the first places in Honduras to get electricity in 1898- even before Tegucigalpa. Because of its importance, it was declared the capital of the El Paraso Department in 1869. However, after the mining stopped, most of the foreigners supporting Yuscarn abandoned the town, taking their money and possessions with them.Although it is said that there are still rich deposits of precious metals in Yuscarn, they have not been extracted for two main reasons. First, because the deposits are not easily accessible without much investment, man power, and machinery. Second, because the metals are located in the biological reserve, an area that is now protected.With the decline of the mining industry came the rise of another industry, from which Yuscarn gets its present day fame: the fabrication of aguardiente, or guaro. The Yuscarn factory, also called the Distileria del Buen Gusto, was founded in 1939. To this day it is the towns largest employer, employing about 120 people at any given time. Yuscarn brand aguardiente is the number one selling aguardiente in Honduras and can be bought across the nation.Great lengths have been taken to preserve Yuscarns traditional colonial-style architecture and cobblestone streets. In 1979 Yuscarn was declared a National Monument. In its center there are more than 200 colonial homes.de:Yuscarnes:Yuscarnit:Yuscarnlt:Juskaranasnl:Yuscarnpt:Yuscarnru:war:Yuscarn
2233115
Charnwood_Forest_Canal
The Charnwood Forest Canal, sometimes known as the Forest Line of the Leicester Navigation, was opened between Thringstone and Nanpantan, with a further connection to Barrow Hill, near Worthington, in 1794It marks the beginning of a period of history that saw the introduction of railways to supplement canals and, in the end, superseding them, leading eventually to the Counties Railway. It was also one of the first uses of edge-rails for a wagonway.(This should not be confused with the Forest Railway.)OriginImage:CharnwoodForestCanal 02.jpg|250px|right|thumb|The now derelict and dried up Charnwood Forest Canal south of Osgathorpe.Image:CharnwoodForestCanal 03.jpg|250px|right|thumb|The remains of Junction House alongside the Charnwood Forest Canal, at the junction with the Barrow Hill branch south of Osgathorpe. This is the last remaining building of the Charnwood Forest Canal.Image:CharnwoodForestCanal 01.jpg|250px|right|thumb|The now derelict Charnwood Forest Canal alongside the entrance to Longcliffe Golf Club in Nanpantan.Until the end of the eighteenth century the City of Leicester had received its supplies of coal by packhorse from the Forest coal mines around Swannington.However, in 1778, the Canal opened up the Soar from the Trent to Loughborough, and the opening of the Canal the following year allowed a ready supply of coal from the Nottinghamshire coalfields into Leicestershire at reduced prices(Owen, C. (1984) The Leicestershire and South Derbyshire Coalfield 1200-1900 Ashbourne: Moorland Publishing Co. Ltd.).In 1785, proposals to extend the Loughborough Canal south from Loughborough to Leicester were opposed by the influential Leicestershire coalmasters, even when a canal linking the mining area to the canal at Loughborough was also proposed. Gradually, however, they warmed to the idea and even came to consider a canal of their own linked to either Loughborough or the proposed Canal. By 1790 serious opposition to a branch canal from Loughborough to the coal field, known as the Forest Line, had been won over and the following year the Leicester Navigation Company obtained an of parliament to extend the Soar Navigation from Loughborough to Leicester, and to build the Forest Line(.The considerable height difference between Nanpantan and Loughborough would have required a number of locks, for which there was not enough water, so the canal terminated at Nanpantan where goods had to be transhipped onto a horse-drawn wagonway which connected to Loughborough wharf. The tramway was engineered by Jessop who used an iron edge-rail railway, in contrast to his partner Outram, who, for other such lines, preferred the traditional iron L shaped flange-rail plateway.Wagonways also linked the other terminus of the Forest Line at Thringstone to the coal mines and to the limestone quarries at Barrow Hill and Cloud Hill.Considerable difficulties were encountered in constructing both the Soar Navigation and the Forest Line, and it was not until 1794 that they were both opened.HistoryUse of the Forest Line was limited until the Reservoir feeder was finished. During the floods of 1799 this collapsed, destroying some earthworks and an aqueduct, and the canal went out of use for two years. Even after some repairs were carried out, further damage occurred and what little trade there had been did not return. Stevenson suggests the problems ... stemmed partially from the hybrid nature of its construction. That is, it was part canal, part wagonway(Stevenson.P.S. (Ed), (1989) The Midland Counties Railway, Railway and Canal Historical Society).In 1808 the company sought to abandon the Forest Line but were advised that this would require a costly of parliament, so they turned this down, and the unused canal became derelict. In 1830 the and Swannington Railway was authorised, which greatly affected the transport situation in the area. The canal company was dismayed to receive a formal request by the Earl of Stamford that the Forest Line be put into good order to carry limestone. A proposal was drawn up to convert the canal to a wagonway or railway throughout and a bill was presented to parliament but was opposed and was not passed. The company tried to sell off the land of the canal piecemeal but this was deemed to be illegal without an of parliament. In the end a landowner who wanted to buy some of the land agreed to pay for a private bill and the Forest Line was officially abandoned in 1846(Franks, D.L., (1975) The Ashby and Nuneaton Joint Railway together with The Charnwood Forest Railway Sheffield: Turntable Publications).After the canals closureIt was not until 1832 that the opening of the and Swannington Railway allowed the Leicestershire miners to regain a competitive advantage. The Nottinghamshire coal miners responded to this by proposing a railway line extending from the and Pinxton Railway, which had been opened in 1819. This eventually led to the building of Counties Railway, which became a founding partner in the Railway.Subsequently the Forest Railway (opened in 1883( and closed in 1963) took over part of the route of the Forest Line between Grace Dieu and Shepshed, including the aqueduct over the Blackbrook(Williams, B.C.J., (1994) An Exploration of the Leicester Navigation (celebrating 1794 - 1994) Sileby: published by the Leicester Navigation 200 Group).Remains of the canal can still be seen in places, particularly: south of Osgathorpe ; the aqueduct over an accommodation track near the Blackbrook (subsequently modified and widened by the Forest Railway) ; alongside the entrance to Longcliffe Golf Club in Nanpantan ; alongside the public footpath in the back gardens of houses on Forest Road in Nanpantan .See also*of the United Kingdom*of the British canal systemReferences(External links* * Swannington Heritage Trust
2239339
Commonsense_knowledge_base
In intelligence research, commonsense knowledge is the collection of facts and information that an ordinary person is expected to know. The commonsense knowledge problem is the ongoing project in the field of representation (a sub-field of intelligence) to create a commonsense knowledge base:  a database containing all the general knowledge that most people possess, represented in a way that it is available to intelligence programs that use natural language or make inferences about the ordinary world. Such a database is a type of  ontology of which the most general are called upper ontologies.The problem is considered to be among the hardest in all of AI research because the breadth and detail of commonsense knowledge is enormous. Any task that requires commonsense knowledge is considered AI-complete: to be done as well as a human being does it, it requires the machine to appear as intelligent as a human being. These tasks include translation, recognition, mining and many others. To do these tasks perfectly, the machine simply has to know what the text is talking about or what objects it may be looking at, and this is impossible in general unless the machine is familiar with all the same concepts that an ordinary person is familiar with.Information in a commonsense knowledge base may include, but is not limited to, the following:* An ontology of classes and individuals* Parts and materials of objects* Properties of objects (such as color and size)* Functions and uses of objects* Locations of objects and layouts of locations* Locations of actions and events* Durations of actions and events* Preconditions of actions and events* Effects (postconditions) of actions and events* Subjects and objects of actions* Behaviors of devices* Stereotypical situations or scripts* Human goals and needs* Emotions* Plans and strategies* Story themes* ContextsCommonsense knowledge bases* Cyc* Mind Common Sense and ConceptNet* ThoughtTreasure* WordNet* Formal Ontology (BFO)* DOLCE and DnS* Formal Ontology* Upper Merged Ontology* Mindpixel* KnowledgeSee also* (computer science)* ontology* reasoning* senseReferences* zh:
2246637
Snow_Lake,_Manitoba
Snow Lake is a town in Manitoba, Canada located 685 km north of Winnipeg at the end of Provincial Road 392. The main industry is and always has been mining; currently with one mine producing Zinc. In late 2009 it was discovered that the Snow Lake area could have one of the largest gold rich VMS deposits in Canada.  Mining Mining is and always has been Snow Lakes major industry. Two separate mining ventures have operated in the community over the past 40 years.  TVX/Kinross/High River operated the New Britannia Mine, which closed in January 2005 and HudBay Minerals, which operated 11 area mines.  They were/are Chisel Lake, Stall Lake, Osborne Lake, Dickstone, Anderson Lake, Ghost Lake, Lost Lake, Spruce Point, Rod Mine, Photo Lake, and Chisel North. In recent years, the New Britannia Mine employed the majority of the towns population; however, its January 2005 closure caused a sudden drop in population. HudBay Minerals is now the communitys major employer and have recently announced the discovery of a new world class gold-zinc property, Lalor Lake. (pronounced LAW - ler). Tourism Nature lovers will delight in the numerous species of birds, animals and vegetation found along the regions many areas hiking trails. Picking strawberries, raspberries, blueberries, or gooseberries are also a favourite summer past time. History enthusiasts can explore ancient Aboriginal pictographs that are approximately 1500 years old. Fishing and boating are popular activities with the presence of many lakes and rivers, such as Snow Lake, Wekusko Lake and the Grass River that have abundances of northern pike, walleye, and perch. The Grass River Route will provide outdoor enthusiasts with an insight into the life of the early voyageurs and fur traders.In the winter months, local hiking paths double as cross-country ski trails while miles of frozen lakes and rivers in the area provide endless trails for snowmobilers. fishing is popular as well.The town of Snow Lake also is home to a hockey arena, curling rink, 9-hole course and several other recreational facilities which play host to a number of activities and tournaments over the course of the year. Education J. H. Kerr School, the lone educational facility in Snow Lake, is a Kindergarten to Senior Four facility with an enrollment of 145 students for the 2008 - 2009 school year. It is now part of the School Division.  Prior to a Provincial amalgamation (2003) of school districts it operated under its own district, the School District of Snow Lake # 2309.  The building, under one form or another, has been open for close to 50 years.  In 2001, Joseph H. Kerr was named one of the 30 most innovative schools by Canadas Schoolnet.Local media and servicesInternet / Telephone* Commstream Communications High Speed Internet* MTS High Speed Internet(DSL) and Telephone serviceNewspapers*The Underground PressRadio* NCI - 96.3* CBC - 95.5TelevisionCBWKT connected to the province-wide microwave system on March 1, 1969.()* Shaw Cable Television* CBWKT channel 8 (CBC)* CKYS-TV channel 11 (CTV)References(External links*Town of Snow Lake web site*Map of Snow Lake at Statcan
2250414
Railroad_Commission_of_Texas
The Railroad Commission of Texas (RRC) is the state agency that regulates the oil and gas industry, gas utilities, pipeline safety, safety in the petroleum gas industry, and surface coal and uranium mining (despite its name, it no longer regulates railroads). Established by the Legislature in 1891, it is the states oldest regulatory agency and began as part of the Movement of the Era. From the 1930s to the 1960s it largely set world oil prices, but was displaced by OPEC (of Petroleum Exporting Countries) after 1973.  In 1984 the federal government took over transportation regulation for railroads, trucking and buses, but the Railroad Commission kept its name. With an annual budget of $79 million it now focuses entirely on oil, gas, mining, propane, and pipelines, setting allocations for production each month.(David F. Prindle, Railroad Commission, Handbook of Texas Online (2008))OriginsAttempts to establish a railroad commission in Texas began in 1876. After five legislative failures, an amendment to the state constitution providing for a railroad commission was submitted to voters in 1890. The amendments ratification and the 1890 election of Governor S. Hogg, a liberal Democrat, permitted the legislature in 1891 to create the Railroad Commission, giving it jurisdiction over operations of railroads, terminals, wharves, and express companies. It could set rates, issue rules on how to classify freight, require adequate railroad reports, and prohibit and punish discrimination and extortion by corporations. George Clark, running as an independent Jeffersonian Democratic  candidate for governor in 1892, denounced the TRC as, Wrong in principle, undemocratic, and unrepublican. Commissions do no good. They do harm. Their only function is to harass. I regard it as essentially foolish and essentially vicious.( See for quote)  Clark lost the 1892 election to Hogg but a federal judge ruled the TRC illegal; the judge in turn was overruled by the U.S. Supreme Court. The governor appointed the first members but in 1894 it became elective, with three commissioners serving six-year, overlapping terms. The TRC did not have jurisdiction over interstate rates, but Texas was so large that the in-state traffic it regulated was of dominant importance. Senator John H. Reagan (1818-1905), the first head of the TRC (1891-1903), had been the most outspoken advocate in Congress of bills to regulate railroads in the 1880s. He feared the corruption caused by railroad monopolies and considered their control a moral challenge. His advocacy of legislation was based on an emotional response to real and imaginary evils. However as chairman of the TRC, he changed his views when he became acquainted with the realities of the complex forces affecting railroad management.  Reagan turned to the Movement for ideas, establishing a pattern of regulatory practice that TRC used for decades. He believed that the agency should pursue two main goals: to protect consumers from unfair railway practices and excessive rates, and to support the states overall economic growth. To find the optimal rates that met these goals he focused the TRC on the collection of data, direct negotiation with railway executives, and compromises with the parties involved. The agency did not have the legal authority to set rates, nor did it have the resources to spend much of its time in court battles. The carrot was far more important than the stick.  Freight rates continued to decline dramatically. In 1891, a typical rate was 1.403 cents per ton mile. By 1907 the rate was 1.039 cents  a decline of 25%. However the railroads did not have rates high enough for them to upgrade their equipment and lower costs in the face of competition from pipelines, cars and trucks, and the Texas railway system began a slow decline.( Gerald Nash, The Reformer Reformed: John H. Reagan and Railroad Regulation. Business History Review 1955 29(2): 189-196. Issn: 0007-6805  in Jstor; Ben H. Procter, Reagan,  John Henninger, Handbook of Texas Online (2008))SegregationFrom the 1890s through the 1960s, the Texas Railroad Commission found it difficult to enforce fully Jim Crow segregation legislation. Because of the expense involved, Texas railroads often allowed wealthier Blacks to mix with whites, rather than provide separate cars, dining facilities, and even depots. In addition, West Texas authorities often refused to enforce Jim Crow laws because few African Americans resided there. In the 1940s, the railroad commissions enforcement of segregation laws began collapsing further, in part because of the great number of African American soldiers that were transported during World War II.  The trains were integrated in the early 1960s.( William S. Osborn, Curtains for Jim Crow: Law, Race, and the Texas Railroads, Southwestern Historical Quarterly 2002 105(3): 392-427. Issn: 0038-478x )Expansion to oilThe agencys reach expanded as it took over responsibility for regulating oil pipelines (in 1917), oil and gas production (1919), natural gas delivery systems (1920), bus lines (1927), and trucking (1929). It grew from  12 employees in 1916 to 69 in 1930 and 566 in 1939.  It does not have jurisdiction over investor owned utility companies; that falls under the jurisdiction of the Utility Commission of Texas.(Childs,  (1990))A crisis for the petroleum industry was created by the East Texas oil boom of the 1930s, as prices plunged to 25 cents a barrel. The traditional TRC policy of negotiating compromises failed; the governor was forced to call in the state militia to. Texas oilmen decided they preferred state to federal regulation, and wanted the TRC to give out quotas so that every producer would get higher prices and profits. Pure Oil Company opposed the first statewide oil prorationing order, which was issued by the TRC in August 1930. The order, which was intended to conserve oil resources by limiting the number of barrels drilled per day, was seen by small producers like Pure as a conspiracy between government and major companies to drive them out of business and foster monopoly in the oil industry.(Childs,  (1990)) Ernest Thompson (1892-1966), head of the TRC from 1932 to 1965, took charge of the agency and indeed the oil industry by appealing to a mythic ideal of Texass role in the global oil order--the civil religion of Texas oil. He cajoled, harangued, and browbeat recalcitrant producers into compliance with the TRCs prorationing orders. The Deal allowed the TRC to set national oil policy.(George N. Green, Thompson, Ernest Othmer, The Handbook of Texas Online (2008) )  As late as the 1950s the TRC controlled over 40% of United States crude production and approximately half of estimated national proved reserves.  It served as a model in the creation of OPEC.(Childs, (2005))OperationsRegulation was a practical rather than ideological affair. The TRC typically worked with the regulated industries to improve operations, share best practices, and address consumer complaints. Radical activities like rate setting to favor shippers or producers or consumers, and heated court battles, were the exception rather than the rule. Within the oil and gas industry, it took into account production in other states, in effect bringing total available supply, (including imports, which were small) within the principle of prorationing to market demand.  Allowable oilfield production was calculated as follows:  estimated market demand, minus uncontrolled additions to supply, gave the Texas total; this was then prorated among fields and wells in a manner calculated to preserve equity among producers, and to prevent any well from producing beyond its Maximum Efficient Rate (MER). Scheduled allowables are expressed in numbers of calendar days of permitted production per month at MER.( The Maximum Efficient Rate is an engineering determination of the theoretical optimum rate of flow of crude oil from each well in a pool that will not endanger ultimate recovery from the pool by a too rapid release of underground pressures. MER depends on the character of the oil-bearing structure and the nature of the natural drive -- whether water pressure, a gas cap, or gas in solution in the crude oil. Engineers look at indices like the pressure at the bottom of the well (bottom-hole pressure) or the ratio of gas to oil in the crude produced. Childs, (2005))Recent historyThe three-member commission was initially appointed by the governor, but an amendment to the states constitution in 1894 established the commissioners as elected officials serving overlapping six-year terms.  No specific seat is designated as Chairman; the Commissioners choose who among them will serve as Chairman.  As of June 2011, the commissions members are Chairman Ames Jones and Commissioners J. Porter and Smitherman. All three members are Republicans. There is currently one vacancy resulting from L. Williamss resignation from the commission in March 2011 until Governor Rick Perry appointed Smitherman to Williams seat in July 2011.Effective October 1, 2005, as a result of House Bill 2702 the rail oversight functions of the Railroad Commission were transferred to the Department of Transportation.(RRC: Former Rail Division. Railroad Commission of Texas. June 2, 2008. Retrieved on September 20, 2010.) The traditional name of the Commission was not changed despite the loss of its titular regulatory duties.Court cases involving the CommissionThe Rate Case, also known as E. & W. Ry. Co. v. United States, 234 U.S. 342 (1914) arose from the Railroad Commissions setting railroad freight rates unequally. Because of the low intrastate rates, shippers in eastern Texas tended to ship their wares to Dallas (in Texas), rather than to Shreveport, Louisiana, despite that Shreveport was considerably closer to much of eastern Texas.  The Railroad Commissions (and the railroads) position was that only the state could regulate commerce within a state, and that the federal government had no power so to do.  The Supreme Court ruled that the federal governments ability to regulate interstate commerce necessarily included the ability to regulate intrastate operations in all matters having a close and substantial relation to interstate traffic and to ensure that interstate commerce may be conducted upon fair terms.The Railroad Commission has also figured prominently in two major U.S. Supreme Court cases on the doctrine of abstention:* Commission v. Pullman Co., a 1941 case in which the U.S. Supreme Court ruled that it was appropriate for federal courts to abstain from hearing a case to allow state courts to decide substantial constitutional issues that touch upon sensitive areas of state social policy.* v. Sun Oil Co., a 1943 case in which the U.S. Supreme Court ruled that a federal court sitting in diversity jurisdiction may abstain from hearing the case where the state courts likely have greater expertise in a particularly complex and unclear area of state law which is of special significance to the state, where there is comprehensive state administrative/regulatory procedure, and where the federal issues cannot be decided without delving into state law.thumb|The main offices of the Railroad Commission of Texas are located in the William B. Travis State Office BuildingOfficesThe agency is headquartered in the William B. Travis State Office Building at 1701 North Congress Avenue in Austin.(Contact. Railroad Commission of Texas. Accessed August 30, 2008.)(Week of April 16 - 20, 2001. Railroad Commission of Texas. Accessed August 30, 2008.)See also* and gas law in the United States* of TexasBibliography* Childs, William R.  The Texas Railroad Commission: Understanding Regulation in America to the Mid-Twentieth Century. (2005). 323 pp. the standard history; online review* Childs, William R. Origins of the Texas Railroad Commissions Power to Control Production of Petroleum: Regulatory Strategies in the 1920s. Journal of Policy History 1990 2(4): 353-387. Issn: 0898-0306  *  De Chazeau, Melvin G., and Alfred E. Kahn. Integration and Competition in the Petroleum Industry (1959) online edition* Green, George N. Thompson, Ernest Othmer, The Handbook of Texas Online (2008)* Norvell, James R. The Railroad Commission of Texas: its Origin and History. Southwestern Historical Quarterly 1965 68(4): 465-480. Issn: 0038-478x online edition* Prindle, David F.  Petroleum Politics and the Texas Railroad Commission.  (1981). 230 pp., focuses on relations with independent oilmen * David F. Prindle, Railroad Commission, Handbook of Texas Online (2008)* Procter, Ben H. Not Without Honor: The Life of John H. Reagan (1962). * Procter, Ben H. Reagan,  John Henninger, Handbook of Texas Online (2008)* Splawn, W. M. W. Valuation and Rate Regulation by the Railroad Commission of Texas, Journal of Political Economy Vol. 31, No. 5 (Oct., 1923), pp. 675-707 in JSTORReferencesExternal links* Railroad Commission of Texas home page* * Hazardous Business: Industry, Regulation, and the Texas Railroad Commission from Texas State Library and Archives Commission* Conversion of EBCDIC filesde Ferrocarriles de TexasCommission of Texas
2253375
AngloGold
AngloGold was a gold mining company based in South Africa and majority-owned by the Anglo American group. In 2004 it merged with the Goldfields Corporation to create the worlds second-largest gold producer, Ashanti.uk:AngloGold
2256044
David_Eccles,_1st_Viscount_Eccles
 footnotes         David McAdam Eccles, 1st Baron Eccles and 1st Viscount Eccles, CH, KCVO, MP, PC (18 September 1904 &ndash; 24 February 1999) was an English Conservative politician.Eccles was educated at College and College, Oxford. He worked with the Central Mining Corporation in London and Johannesburg. During the World War he worked for the Ministry of Economic Warfare from 1939 to 1940 and for the Ministry of Production from 1942 to 1943 and was Economic Adviser to the British ambassadors at Lisbon and Madrid from 1940 to 1942. Eccles was elected as of Parliament (MP) for Chippenham in a wartime by-election in 1943, a seat he held until 1962. He served in the Conservative administrations of Churchill, Eden and Macmillan respectively as Minister of Works from 1951 to 1954 (in which position, he helped organise the 1953 Coronation), as of Education from 1954 to 1957 and again from 1959 to 1962 and as of the Board of Trade from 1957 to 1959. Eccles was also President of the Board of Trade in January 1957.(List of Presidents/Secretaries of State (2007), Department for Business, Enterprise and Regulatory Reform, London, UK, viewed 8 May 2008, http://www.berr.gov.uk/about/about-berr/history/presidents-secretaries/page13935.html)In 1962 he was raised to the peerage as Baron Eccles, of Chute in the County of Wiltshire, and in 1964 he was created Viscount Eccles, of Chute in the County of Wiltshire. Lord Eccles returned to the government in 1970 when Heath appointed him Paymaster-General and Minister for the Arts, a post he held until 1973. As Minister for the Arts he clashed with the Chairman of the Council of Great Britain Goodman over the funding of controversial plays and exhibitions and introduced mandatory admission charges at public museums and galleries. Lord Eccles was made a of Science (DSc) in 1966 by University.(Honorary Graduates and University Medallists since 1966 (2008), Loughborough University, Leicestershire, UK, viewed 29 April 2008, http://www.lboro.ac.uk/service/publicity/degree_days/hon_grads_66to79.html)Eccles married, firstly, the Hon. Sybil Frances Dawson (1904&ndash;1977), daughter of Dawson, 1st Viscount Dawson of Penn, on 1 October 1929. They had three children:*The Hon. Selina Eccles; m. Petty-FitzMaurice, 8th Marquess of Lansdowne; became The Marchioness of Lansdowne*The Hon. Simon Dawson Eccles*The Hon. John Dawson Eccles; later 2nd Viscount Eccles (born on 20 April 1931)Widowed, he married again, this time to the book collector and philanthropist  Mary Morley Crapo Hyde (19122003) on 26 September 1984.He died at age 94 at home of natural causes leaving an estate of approximately 2.4 million.(http://www.oxforddnb.com/view/article/71965)Styles and Honours* Mr David Eccles (19041943)* Mr David Eccles MP (19431953)* Sir David Eccles KCVO MP (19531962)* The Rt. Hon. The Lord Eccles KCVO PC (19621964)* The Rt. Hon. The Viscount Eccles KCVO PC (19641984)* The Rt. Hon. The Viscount Eccles KCVO CH PC (19841999)NotesReferences*Mary, Viscountess Eccles: obituary, The Independent, 5 September 2003*** External links * McAdam Eccles, 1. Viscount EcclesEccles, 1. wicehrabia Eccles
2260133
Tequisquiapan
footnotes               Tequisquiapan is a town and municipality located in the southeast of the state of Quertaro in central Mexico. The center of the town has cobblestone streets, traditional rustic houses with iron fixtures, balconies, and wooden windowsills, which is the legacy of its 300 year heritage as a colonial town populated mostly by indigenous people. This, the climate, the local natural water springs and the climate have made the town a popular weekend getaway for cities such as Quertaro and City, which has led to the construction of weekend homes in the town.Tequisquiapan is part of Quertaros Ruta de Vino (Wine Route) with La Redonda as the municipalitys major producer. Grape production began in the early 1960s, but has become important enough to be featured on the municipalitys seal. The town hosts the annual Nacional del Queso y el Vino, (National Cheese and Wine Fair) which showcases southern Quertaros cheese and wine production.The townThe town of Tequisquiapan in southwestern Quertaro is a tourist town, which mostly caters to weekend visitors from Mexico City and the city of Quertaro. These visitors come to see the parish church, walk the cobblestone streets filled with traditional houses, and  visit recreational attractions such as the areas 18-hole golf course and spas/water parks (called balenarios) such as El Oasis, Thermas del Rey, Fidel Velsquez and La Vega.(  )The town is centered on the main square, named after Hidalgo y Costilla and the Santa Mara de la Asuncin Temple.(  ) Hidalgo Square is a large open, paved area, facing which is the towns parish church and a series of arches. On the east side of the plaza, there is a kiosk made of gray sandstone and metal, which often has bands playing live music such as jazz and rock and roll.(  )(  ) Along one entire side, there are sandstone arches behind which are a number of business such as galleries, cafs and shops selling sweets, silver, furniture and crafts.( It also contains some of the towns better restaurants such as Caprichos, which offers French-Mexican fusion cooking.(  ) Another side of the square is taken up by the parish church of Santa Mara. This church was established in the 16th century, but the current construction is from the 19th century. It is in Neoclassical style with simple lines and made of pink sandstone.(  ) The clock in the tower dates from 1897.(Around the main square, much of the construction remains traditional with cobblestone streets and buildings that relatively simple and rustic. This is because this town was dominated by the indigenous for the first three hundred years of its existence.(  ) Many of the buildings are two stories tall painted in bright colors such as yellow and green and with balconies. They also have wrought iron fixtures with wooden sills and frames on their doors and windows. Flowerpots are a common sight as well.(( The narrowness  of the roads means that vehicular traffic is commonly jammed, especially on weekends.( Efforts at modernization have destroyed many of the towns old trees; however, most of the original junipers along the river remain.( Away from the historic center, many of the newer sections of town consist of subdivisions of weekends homes more recently built. However, these mostly follow the architectural styles of the older structures.(The town is home to a number of important legends.( As it is a tourist town there is a trolley bus to take visitors around the various landmarks. These landmarks include places where Tequisquiapans legends are set and on weekends and holidays, actors in period costumes re-enact these stories.((Another attraction of the town is shopping, especially for handcrafts and folk art. The two most traditional crafts of the area are baskets and furniture made from wood, wicker, rattan and other materials. However, crafts from many parts of Mexico are available for sale as well. The main markets, which are the municipal market and the handcrafts markets are located on Ezequiel Montes Street near Salvador Carrizal.((  In addition to these markets there are a number of street vendors who sell from stalls or by walking around the streets. One common type of merchandise, especially in the main square are sweet breads, dried fruit, fruits in syrup and other sweets.( One unique sweet of the town is crystallized nopal cactus.( Otomi women can be seen in the main plaza and other locations selling their crafts. Most of these vendors are from the neighboring municipality of Amealco. These crafts generally consist of embroidered napkins and other textiles, rag dolls, ceramics and baskets.(  ) The most important park in the municipality is La Pila, which is located just north of the main town square. It contains fresh water springs and large areas of trees and grass for picnicking and other activities.( The park was the site of a old water mill. Its namesake, a reservoir to store water built in 1567, can still be seen.(  It is said that there was an indigenous temazcal at the La Pila site.( Before it became a park, it was the site of a commercial water park for children.( Today, it is an area filled with Montezuma cypress and ash trees and is the site of the annual Feria Nacional del Queso y el Vino.((  Other parks include El Portn, La Recmara and El Salitrillo.( The Callejn del Piojo (lit. Louse Alley) is a historic street in the town which was recently renovated to promote fine arts and handcrafts as well as to serve as a venue for cultural and recreational events.(  )The Centro Cultural or Cultural Center hosts expositions of painting and crafts as well as concerts and workshops. It also has an extensive library.(In the early 20th century, Mexican president Carranza passed through Tequisquiapan on his way to the city of Quertaro. He issued a decree announcing that the town was the geographical center of the country. However, today that distinction is widely considered to be in Zacatecas. However, there is a monument in the town at Centenario and 5 de Mayo Streets to commemorate the decree.((The two oldest neighborhoods of the town are the Barrio de la Magdalena and San Juan, where many of the chapels built for the indigenous population of the colonial era were built.( The main chapel of the Barrio de la Magdalena has a large mesquite tree in its atrium where it is said that the mass celebrated to found the town occurred. This founding is re-enacted here each year in June.((The town contains a bullring which hosts bullfights as well as exhibitions of flamenco dance and concerts. There is a Bullfight Fair in March.(The old Bernal railroad station is located on Avenida Juarez. It was build when the rail line was constructed through the municipality. Today, it served as a viewpoint to see much of the city. It also conserves a locomotive from the beginning of the 20th century.(The Casa de Caballo is located near the river and offers horseback riding in the Barrio de la Magdalena.(Intercity bus service operates out of the towns main terminal, which is served by Flecha azul, Transportes Tequis; Flecha Blanca; Flecha Amarilla; Autotransportes Queretanos and Enlaces Terrestres Nacionales. Two rail lines pass through here connecting Mexico City with Guadalajara and Nuevo Laredo.(The town has a number of festivals and traditions which are especially important or unique to it. The festival of the Holy Cross on May 3 is particularly important in the San Juan neighborhood with the dance of Moors and Christians as the highlight. Preparations for this event begin months in advance.(( The feast day for the patroness of the town, Lady of the Assumption, occurs on August 15. This day is observed by all in the municipality, many of which come to the parish church in the center of town for the festivities. These festivities include traditional dances, which last from early and through the day. This is also a popular day for confirmations, communions and other similar ceremonies. The day ends with a large frame called a castillo (castle ) filled with fireworks which is set alight.(For Week, the town holds an annual Play. This event begins in the main square in front of the Santa Mara de la Asuncin Temple and passes through the streets of the town to a site called Monte Calvario, named after the place where Jesus was crucified. Here the crucifixion of Christ is re-enacted.  Afterwards, an image of the deceased Jesus is carried from the area in a glass coffin. On Holy Saturday, images of Judas are burned along with those of devils and other unliked figures .(The founding of the town is celebrated each year in the Barrio de la Magdalena neighborhood on June 24, where the founding mass took place. This commemoration includes a re-enactment of the founding with actors in 16th century clothing.(The annual pilgrimage to the chapel on the Cerro Grande occurs on September 13. This procession climbs the hill where the chapel is located the day before and spends the night there. The following day, after mass, there is picnicking and spending the day in the countryside. It is not know how or when this tradition started, but it attracts not only those from Tequisquiapan, but those from Santa Rosa Xajay, El Cerrito, Bordo Blanco and San Nicols.(The feast of the Laborer on May 15 is important in the town which is centered on a procession from the Santa Mara de la Asuncin church to the El Llano chapel. The purpose of the feast is to ask for good crops for that growing season. The El Llano chapel is located in the agricultural center of the area.(The feast of Magdalene, patroness of the Barrio de la Magdalena is celebrated on September 8. The feast of the John, patron of the San Juan neighborhood, takes place on December 27. One Christmas tradition in the town is to have a parade through the town on Eve. This parade features floats with Biblical scenes.(One local tradition is the creation of cruces de animas (crosses of encouragement) which can be seen on family altars or in family shrines. These crosses represent loved ones who have died and can be very elaborate although most are simple.  These are most common in the former Indian neighborhoods of San Juan and Barrio de la Magdalena where they can be seen in the local chapels.(Feria Nacional del Queso y el VinoThe Nacional del Queso y el Vino began in the 1980s as a means to promote the regions wine and cheese production.( The fair promotes the 1,200,000 million bottles of wine and 400,000 kilograms of cheese the state produces each year.(  Most of the activity occurs at the La Pila Park, in the town center, but there are also cultural events, conferences, contests, charreadas, concerts and more associated with it.( The main tent contains wine and cheese producers from the local area as well as the rest of Mexico and international companies. The event crowns a festival queen, who is crowned by the municipal president.(  )The fair is sponsored with money from the municipality, the state of Quertaro and the federal Secretary of Tourism.(  ) Artists who have played at the event include de Rentera, Dinamita, Limbo, de Durango, Mediterrneo, de Amrica, Eduardo Rico, Falcn, Sandoval, Pambo and singer Jos .(The 2011, the fair resulted in 100 percent hotel occupancy and a economic impact of forty million pesos for the town.(  ) However, the fair has had problems with the uncontrolled sale of alcoholic beverages and large number of young people simply getting drunk. This has led to incidents of fighting and other illegal behavior. There have also been cases of alcohol intoxication requiring medical attention.(  )The municipalityAs municipal seat, the town of Tequisquiapan is the local governing authority for about two hundred other communities, which together cover a territory of 343.6km.()( However, over 77% of the population is concentrated in five communities, with about 51% in the town of Tequisquiapan alone. The other major population centers are San Nicols, La Fuente, Fuentezuelas and El Tejocote. The main economic activity of San Nicols is the production of cinderblock, followed by agriculture. La Fuentes main economic activity is agriculture with peppers, corn, tomatoes and beans as principle crops.  La Trinidad is the center of opal mining in the municipality, but it also cultivates corn and beans.(The town and municipality are located in the far southeast of the state of Quertaro, just north of the small industrial city of Juan del Ro, and within three hours driving distance from both the city of Quertaro and City. This is one reason why it is a popular place to visit on weekends and many second homes have been constructed here.( The municipality borders the municipalities of Coln, Ezequiel Montes, San Juan del Ro and Pedro Escobedo with the state of Hidalgo to the east. The municipal government consists of a municipal president and thirteen officials called regidors to represent the various communities of the municipality.(The overwhelming majority of the population is Catholic, with a small but growing number in Evangelical groups and Witnesses.(There is one special education school which serves 160 students with sixteen teachers. There are sixteen preschools serving over two thousands young children between four and six years of age.  There are thirty six primary schools. Middle school education is offered through two modes, distance education called telesecundaria and a general middle school system.  Most attend the latter which are located in the larger population centers near the municipal seat. The telesecundarias are located in the communities of La Fuente, Los Cerritos, Fuentezuelas, El Tejocote, San Jos la Laja, Santilln, El Sauz, La Trinidad and San Nicols. High school and vocational school education is offered on five sites.(Almost all residences in the municipality are occupied by their owners, with an average of 4.9 occupants per household. Basic municipal services such as running water, garbage and other services are available to 90% or more of the population with the exception of street lighting, which is available to only 60%. Residential construction has changed significantly since the mid 20th century with the introduction of concrete and cinderblock, which is now used in almost all new construction. This is common in Mexico but there is a local variation on roofing which is a vault with a ridgeline in two styles. Constructions dating from before the 1950s are now considered to be rustic. These are mostly found in the historic center of Tequisquiapan and a number of the oldest communities in the municipality. New constructions tend to imitate this style.(The main highway for the municipal is Federal Highway 120, which connects it south to San Juan del Ro and north to the Gorda region of Quertaro into Xilitla in Luis Potos. Other important roads include State Highway 200 which connects it with Galeras, Huichapan and the city of Quertaro, and State Highway 126, connecting it to Tecozautla. Almost all of the municipalitys roads are paved with only 2.3% left as dirt or paved with stone. There are also roads that connect the eighteen communities of the municipalities as well as to the state of Hidalgo.(La Trinidad has an archeological site. The site was excavated in 2009 and 2010 and dates from 750 to 900 CE., around the time of the fall of Teotihuacan. It has been proposed to make it a ecotourism site called D Mkuni. In addition to conserving the areas flora and fauna, it proposes to offer activities such as rappelling, zip-lines, rock climbing, fishing and more, along with a museum dedicated to the archeological site.(  )The municipality sponsors the annual Rally de Tequisquiapan, which is afflilated with the PAC auto championships. The rally begins in the town and winds its way along the highways of Quertaro in the mountain areas of the state.(  )HistoryThe name comes from Nahuatl and means place of tequesquite (nitrate) a type of natural salt used to flavor food since pre Hispanic times. The municipalitys seal was adopted in 1989 at a contest held in conjunction with the annual Feria Nacional del Queso y el Vino. This seal contains elements related to the area such as the sun, grapes, the Tequisquiapan River and the parish church of Santa Mara de la Asuncin.(The presence of humans in the modern state of Quertaro is estimated at between 1500 and 2500 BCE, with the oldest human remains found at a cave in the San Nicols community. This site gives no indication that these early humans had either agriculture or pottery. Much later human remains in the same cave indicate the presence of both and perhaps influence from the Las Ranas site to the north. This would put the area within the sphere of influence of this culture, which was Huastec and part of the early Pre Classic period.(By the Post Classic period, the area was dominated by the people in the east near the Hidalgo border and by the Chichimeca in the rest. The main Chichimeca settlements were just south and west of the modern municipal seat, where fresh water springs were most abundant and the land was the most fertile. Around this same time, the area had a reputation for its fresh water and thermal springs for medicinal purposes. The area did not have any major cities during the pre Hispanic period but a number of important trade routes ran through it. By the time the Spanish arrived, most of the area was allied with the Otomi at Xilotepec, itself a tributary of the Empire. The Otomi outnumbered the Chichimecas but both lived in the area peacefully.(The area around Tequisquiapan was taken over by the Spanish relatively peacefully, but the Chichimecas did resist. This resistance remained sporadic until the last battle of the Chichimecas in Quertaro against the Spanish called the of Media Luna which occurred to the north in the Sierra Gorda.(The official founding date for the city is 1551 by indigenous cacique Nicols de San Luis Montaez, who was allied with the Spanish. The settlement received its royal seal founded as Santa Mara de la Asuncn y de las Aguas Calientes.  The foundation grouped local Chichimecas and Otom onto the site and the foundation was celebrated with a Mass. With the pacification of southern Quertaro, lands in the area were redistributed among the Spanish and the evangelized Otomi, leading to three hundred years of intense agricultural development. However, much of this came at the expense of most of the indigenous population. By 1656, it had been definitively named Tequisquiapan.(Despite the exploitation, the population of the town and municipal area remained mostly indigenous. For this reason, the town has kept much of its rustic architecture.(In the decades before the War of Independence, Tequisquiapan experienced a number of small rebellions on area haciendas, by indigenous people whose socioeconomic status was still serf-like. However, during Independence and other major conflicts of the 19th century, there were no major battles in the area and little information as to how this area was affected. It was officially declared a town in 1861, with the name of Villa de Mateos Tequisquiapan.(During the Revolution, army loyal to Villa, Carranza and Obregn passed through but no battles were fought in the municipality. However, these armies did sack area haciendas and other locations, mostly for supplies.  The Centenario Dam was inaugurated in 1910.( Venustiano Carranza visited the thermal springs of the area before heading to the city of Quertaro to sign the 1917 Constitution. This Mexican president also declared the town as the geographic center of the country. There is a monument in the town to this effect; however, today the geographic center is considered to be in Zacatecas .(Shortly after the end of the Revolution, there was political instability in the state and Tequisquiapan was designated as the provisional capital in 1920.(Although its first municipal status was gained in 1861, but its current municipal organization was not formalized until 1939.(The growing of grapes in the municipality begin in the early 1960s, with the planting of 120,000 vines for wine grapes in the community of San Jos Buenavista by the Sofimar enterprise, affiliated with Martelli in France. Initial varieties were blanc (used for brandy), sauvignon and Grenache, for reds, whites and ross.(The latter 20th century saw significant population growth, as the town transformed from a small traditional farming village to a popular weekend getaway. This growth has also been spurred by the growth of the nearby industrial city of Juan del Ro .( Since 1950, the population of the municipality has grown from 10,877 to 54,929 in 2005. However, the indigenous population has severely decline, from an indigenous majority in the 19th century to only 120 people speaking an indigenous language in the entity as of 2005.(In 2007, the PRD municipal president No Zrraga, was shot twice by unknown persons.(  )EnvironmentThe territory is located in the Plateau on the southeast side of the Gorda. The land is relatively flat with rolling hills and small valleys which are mostly farmland. The terrain contains both volcanic and sedimentary rock due to its geological history. The elevations in the area are small with mostly porous rock. In some areas there are quartz and opal deposits. In other areas, there are deposits of rhyolite and pearlite. The highest elevations in the east and are formed by volcanic basalt. This rock varies in color between black and red.( The San Juan/Tequisquiapan River crosses the municipality in the south on which are the Centenario Dam, near the town of Tequisquiapan and the Paso de Tablas Dam near the border with Hidalgo. The latter has an inactive hydroelectric plant.  There are subsurface currents of water which feed a number of freshwater springs on either side of the San Juan River.(( Near the river a number of fruit and nut trees are grown such as walnuts, peaches, pomegranate, avocado, apricots, limes, guavas and fig. There is also vineyards which have not yet reached peak potential.(The main dam for the municipality is the El Centenario Dam, located just south of the town of Tequisquiapan.  Although its reservoir is important for water storage, it has had serious problems with pollution from industrial waste. The first major disaster occurred in 1999, when over 2,000 wild ducks died from the contaminated water.(  ) A more recent spill, traced to a textile plant in San Juan del Ro killed more than 6,000 fish in 2005. This incident also caused health concerns for those living near the water.(  )( The area around the dam is subject to flooding during the rainy season, which at times has affected the hotels and restaurants which are nearby. The flooding and contamination problems have had a negative effect on tourism in general.(  )The climate is temperate with two well-defined seasons each year. Most rain falls between June and October, with the dry season extending from November to April. Annual precipitation is 511.8mm. Summers are hot and winters are moderately cold leading to an average annual temperature of 17.5C. The coldest months are October to February, and freezes are not uncommon, occurring an average of 18 days per year. Dominant winds flow from the northeast to the southwest.((Natural vegetation is suited for temperate and relatively dry climates. In the higher elevations, there are forests of low and medium height. In the hotter, dryer lowlands vegetation such as pirul (molle), mesquite,  palo bobo (integrifolia), various types of cactus and arid land scrub.(Population growth since the Conquest, and especially in the 20th century has had a negative impact on wildlife in the municipality and other parts of Quertaro. A number of species have already disappeared, such as the jaguarondi and the puma with others in danger of extinction. Species such as deer, coyotes, owls, eagles and foxes have diminished in part due to the contamination of the waters of the Centenario Dam. The most common species of the area are the rabbit, skunk, squirrel, opossum, doves, other species of birds, rattlesnakes and snakes.(EconomyAfter tourism, agriculture and livestock is the most important economic activity of the municipality, employing just under fifteen percent of the working population. This is despite the fact that it is not very profitable due to the high operating costs, obsolete technology, insufficient credit and inadequate commercialization. The main crops are corn, beans, sorghum, alfalfa, grapes, peppers, tomatoes and tomatillos.( Tequisquiapan is the largest producer of pasilla chili peppers in Mexico, but this production is under pressure due to imports of a similar chili pepper from Peru and China, and sold as pasilla. The municipality is asking for a registration to mark authentic pasilla chili peppers from the imported variety.(  )19,703 hectares of the municipality is ejido or other communally owned property. These are owned by thirteen ejidos and one agricultural and livestock cooperative. 11,078 hectares of the municipality are used for agriculture, with 4,867 irrigated and the rest planted during the rainy season.(Livestock mostly consists of the raising of bulls for bullfights. Some of the better known ranches for this include Xajay, La Gloria, San Martn ans Fernando de la Mora. Outside of this, the municipality is not especially dependent on the raising of livestock although cattle, pigs, sheep, goats and horses can be found.( The town contains a bullring which hosts bullfights as well as exhibitions of flamenco dance and concerts. There is a Bullfight Fair in March.(The growing of grapes in the municipality began with wine grapes in the early 1960s and has grown to be one of the most important agricultural products, featured on Tequisquiapans municipal seal.( Reds, whites and ross are produced but most are sparkling wines.(( The major producer in the municipality is Viedos La Redonda, about twelve km outside of the town proper. The vineyards are mostly planted with vines of French origin such as Merlot, Sauvignon and Malbec for reds and Blanc and Trebbiano for whites. It has guided tours for visitors, especially at harvest time.( One major producer of table grapes is Rancho San Miguel. The ranch extends over forty hectares and primarily produces Red Globe and Negra grapes. The ranch also raises 1,200 sheep which helps the ranch maintain an ecological balance through the production of fertilizer. The ranch produces 3,200 crates of the fruit daily during harvest.(  )Just under fifty percent are employed in industry, construction, and the making of handcrafts. The production and sale of furniture and other handcrafts is an important part of the municipalitys economy. Furniture is made with wood, rattan, wicker and willow and pine branches, mostly in colonial or rustic style.( Basketry is the other traditional craft, mostly woven from willow branches and wicker for household use. The commercialization of these baskets began after the railroad was constructed through here in the early 20th century, with baskets going to Mexico City. Later the train was substituted by buses. The space that baskets would normally take on a transport led to a system of semi construction in the town, with final assembly taking place in the place of sale. The most traditional baskets are still made of willow, but other materials have been adapted such as synthetic, rattan, fabric and more. The towns reputation for handcrafts is part of its attraction for tourism. Tourism has impacted the production of crafts with greater quantity and variety. The most common types to the area are basketry and the making of furniture with willow branches, as well as wood. There are also artisans producing wool items, ceramics, opal items and clothing. There are several textile factories Confecciones San Nicols S.A. de C.V., Confecciones 1910 S.A. de C.V., Piel GI S.A. de C.V. and Maklo S.A. de C.V.( Quesos Vai is the largest cheese producer in the region, with their main ranch on the Quertaro-Tequisquiapan highway and stores in the town itself.( The main cheeses are Oaxaca and manchego, with the latter often containing epazote or chipotle .(Mining is focused on non-metallic minerals with opals and kaolin the most important products. The most important opal deposits are located in the southwest of the municipality in small mountain chain near the community of La Trinidad. The most productive mines include El Iris, La Carbonera, La Esperanza and El Rendn producing gems of size, quality and a variety of colors. Most kaolin deposits are found in northeast near the communities of El Sombrerete and Los Charcos.( La Carbonera is an opal mine open to the public. Tours include miners telling stories about mining in the area and visitors are encouraged to look for the stones.(Just over thirty three percent are employed in commerce and services, including tourism.( The tourism and service sector of the town employs about four hundred people directly, along with 200 more during the busy seasons and 450 jobs indirectly depend on it. The municipality has forty one hotels and thirty eight large restaurants.(  ) Retail commercial establishment include those catering to tourists and those catering to the local population. The municipality contains one wholesale food market, a crafts market, an open air market for crafts, three warehouses for grain and over 2100 small retail businesses. The main market for groceries remains the municipal market .(Tequisquiapan is the second most important tourist destination in the state of Quertaro. The major tourist attractions for the town and municipality include the food, the hot springs, the crafts and the climate. It has had a reputation as a place to visit for its thermal and fresh water springs since the pre Hispanic era. However, many of these springs have dried up due to the pumping of groundwater, requiring spas and hotels to pump the spring and thermal water from below ground as well. Today, other attractions of the town include its climate, the layout of its streets, the traditional facades of its houses and the variety of handcrafts and folk art available in its markets.( Spas and water parks include Balneario La Vega, Parque Acutico El Oasis, Parque Acutico Termas del Rey, Fantasa Acutica and Balneario San Joaqun.(  Some of the water parks feature thermal springs and other have water slides and other rides for children.(  The town is part of the Ruta de Vino (Wine Route), a tourist route dedicated to the states wine and cheese production as well as the de Bernal.(Hotels range from the inexpensive to five star accommodations. The town contains twenty nine hotels with a total of 792 rooms. Restaurants have increased in number and size as tourism grows, offering national and international cuisine. However, economical eateries including those in the Santa Cecilia tianguis market are still readily available.( The cuisine of the area maintains is pre Hispanic base of corn, nopal cactus and chili peppers. Typical dishes in the municipality include barbacoa made from goat, menudo, a type of blood pudding, mole Quertaro style, rice with the viscera of chicken or turkey, quesadillas with squash flowers or huitlacoche, carnitas, tamales and gorditas. Bread is an important staple as well, where bakeries such as La Charamusca sometimes have lines of people waiting to buy sweet bread and cookies. Beverages include atole, pulque and aguardiente (a liquor made from sugar cane from the Sierra Gorda region). Although there is wine production here, it is generally not consumed by the local populace.((There are hot air balloon flights for tourists, conducted by the Club Aerosttico Nacional.( Balloon rides are offered only in the mornings due to wind speed.(Despite its long history of being a place to visit for its hot springs and proximity to Mexico City, hotel occupancy is only around twenty to twenty five percent during the year. One reason for this is that many of the visitors stay for only a day or weekend.((  ) Most visitors to the municipality are from Mexico City and the city of Quertaro, as these are within easy driving distance of the town for weekend visits.((( The municipality tried to gain a line of credit with the government finance agency Banobras in order to improve the areas tourism infrastructure.(ReferencesExternal links*Guia turistica de Tequisquiapan GUIA TURISTICA OFICIAL*Municipio de Tequisquiapan Official website*http://www.guajirodreams.com/ galeria/tequis/*http://www.bobbrooke.com/tequisquiapan.htmde:Tequisquiapanes:Tequisquiapan(komunumo)nl:Tequisquiapanno:Tequisquiapanpt:Tequisquiapan
2265913
Reginald_Hawthorn_Hooker
Reginald Hawthorn Hooker (12 January 1867 - 2 June 1944) Englishcivil servant, statistician and meteorologist. Hooker was a pioneer in the application of correlation analysis to economics and agricultural meteorology. Biography Reginald Hawthorn Hooker was born at Kew the fourth son of Sir Dalton Hooker, the distinguished botanist and friend of Darwin and his first wife Frances Harriet Henslow (18251874), daughter of Stevens Henslow.  He was educated in Paris and at College, Cambridge where he read mathematics (Junior Optime BA 1889, MA 1893).() In 1891 he went to the Statistical Society as assistant secretary and sub-editor of its journal. In 1895 he joined the Statistical Branch of the Board of Agriculture; he remained with the Board, later re-named the Ministry of Agriculture, until his retirement in 1927.  He married Olive Marion Rcker (18781933) in 1911 and they had three sons and a daughter.Hooker was a pioneer in applying correlation analysis to socio-economic data. He worked very closely with his friend Yule, who had developed some of the basic theory and was interested in the same kind of applications. Yule recalled how Hooker joined with me in the early days of our acquaintance to form a very select Statistical Dining Club of two members, which met fairly regularly after meetings of the Society. In the preface to the Introduction to the Theory of Statistics Yule gave fulsome thanks to Hooker for his help. In 1907 Hooker published a paper on weather and crops which Fisher later described as magnificent.  Hooker subsequently wrote a number of papers on meteorology. In 1920 1921 he served as President of the Meteorological Society. He was a very effective president, as Dines recalled.Like his contemporary and fellow civil servant,  W. F. Sheppard, Hooker was an out-of hours statistician. Although his researches were connected with food and agriculture, he did not carry them out as part of his official duties. Indeed Yule commented, The importance and value of Hookers scientific work ... was never, in my opinion, appreciated at its proper worth by the Ministry at the time when he was still in its service. Yule also noted that, when Hooker retired, he chose to live far away from any thoughts of the Ministry.  In his obituary Dines noted that meteorologists had not followed up Hookers work on weather and crops. Hooker is chiefly remembered today for the pioneering work on time series analysis in his papers of 1901-5.Writings of R. H. HookerThe bibliography in Yules obituary lists 22 papers of which the following are a sample.* On the Relation Between Wages and the Numbers Employed in the Coal Mining Industry, of the Royal Statistical Society, Vol. 57, No. 4 (Dec., 1894), pp. 627-642.* Correlation of the Marriage-Rate with Trade, Journal of the Royal Statistical Society, Vol. 64, No. 3 (Sep., 1901), pp. 485-492. (reprinted in The Foundations of Econometric Analysis edited by David F. Hendry and Mary S. Morgan, Cambridge : Cambridge University Press, 1995.) * The Suspension of the Berlin Produce Exchange and its Effect upon Corn Prices, Journal of the Royal Statistical Society, Vol. 64, No. 4 (Dec., 1901), pp. 574-613. (reprinted in Classic Futures edited by G. Telser, London : Risk, 2000.) * On the Correlation of Successive Observations, Journal of the Royal Statistical Society, Vol. 68, No. 4 (Dec., 1905), pp. 696-703.* (with G. U. Yule) Note on Estimating the Relative Influence of Two Variables upon a Third, Journal of the Royal Statistical Society, Vol. 69, No. 1 (Mar., 1906), pp. 197-200.* Correlation of the Weather and Crops, Journal of the Royal Statistical Society, Vol. 70, No. 1 (Mar., 1907), pp. 1-51.* Forecasting the Crops from the Weather, Quarterly Journal of the Royal Meteorological Society, Vol. 47, (1921) pp. 75-99.* The Weather and the Crops in Eastern England, 1885-1921, Quarterly Journal of the Royal Meteorological Society, Vol. 48, (1922) pp. 115-38.Obituaries* Udny Yule (1944) Reginald Hawthorn Hooker, M.A.,  Journal of the Royal Statistical Society, Vol. 107, No. 1, pp. 74-77.* J. S. Dines (1944) Obituary: Mr. R. H. Hooker, M. A., Quarterly Journal of the Royal Meteorological Society, Vol. 70, pp. 232-233.Discussions* J. L. Klein (1997) Statistical Visions in Time, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.* M. S. Morgan (1997) Searching for Causal Relations in Economic Statistics, in V. R. McKim & S. P. Turner (eds) Causality in Crisis, Notre Dame Ind: University of Notre Dame Press.References External links For information about the Hooker family see* Joseph Hookers familyAs a baby RHH was quite poorly and his father and Darwin exchanged anxious letters over his health* The Darwin Correspondence Online Database
2272053
Saudi_Geological_Survey
right The Saudi Geological Survey (SGS) is the national geologic survey of the of Saudi Arabia and was established as an independent entity attached to the Ministry of Petroleum and Mineral Resources following a Council of Ministers Decision in 1999.  It is built from other governmental agencies, including the former Directorate General for Mineral Resources, the Geological Survey mission (1963 - 1999) and the Bureau de Recherche et Geologique mission (1972-1999) that have studied the geology of the Kingdom since the 1960s.  The initial USGS presence in the Kingdom was initiated in 1944 by King AbdulAziz al-Saud, and initially consisted of a lone hydrologist named Glen Brown, sent by US President Franklin Delano Roosevelt following a meeting with AbdulAziz on a US warship in the Red Sea.  The SGS headquarters are in Jeddah, which is located on the Sea and is the second largest city in the country. Jeddah is also adjacent to the western margin of the Neoproterozoic Arabian Shield, and studies of that geologic region from one of the primary focuses of the Saudi Geologic Survey. A branch office maintained in Riyadh, the capital of the country, houses facilities for making and printing maps.Under the terms of its establishment, the SGS will be able to provide, on a contract basis, a number of its services and consultation skills to the public and private sectors.SGS also has the flexibility to operate abroad and can form partnerships with private companies or with other earth science agencies. SGS Activities The Saudi Geological Survey activities covers a broad range of strategic and applied earth science topics, with emphasis on understanding the geologic, economic, and engineering factors that affect sustainable management of mineral and groundwater resources, detection and mitigation of earthquakes and other geohazards, protection and management of the environment, and safe development of engineering and construction sites. The bulk of the work involves:* Geological Mapping* Mineral Exploration* Mining Development* Environmental Geology* Environmental Geohazards* HydrogeologySee also* States Geological Survey* Geological Survey*External links* Saudi Geological Survey homepage  
2279370
Clay_Belt
thumb|This satellite photo of Lake Timiskaming shows a clear difference in landforms, with the muskeg of the Canadian Shield to the southwest and flatter drained and cleared area of the Lesser Clay Belt to the north. The white coloring is due to snow lying on the flat land, while it is hidden under the fir-covered Shield to the south.		The Clay Belt is a vast tract of soil in northeastern Ontario, Canada, between the area of District, and County, Quebec covering around 29,000,000&#160;acres (120,000&#160;km2) in total. It is generally subdivided into the Great Clay Belt to the north running eastward from Kapuskasing, and the Lesser Clay Belt to its south, running from Englehart down to the River to the northern tip of Timiskaming. The Clay Belt is the result of the draining of the Lake Ojibway around 8,000 B.C., whose lakebed sediment forms the modern landform. The Clay Belt is surrounded by Shield, forming an island of southern flatlands in the midst of the hilly and rocky surroundings. Similar deposits dot the northern areas of Ontario, Quebec and Labrador.The area was first mapped by Dr. Robert Bell and his assistant Arthur Barlow in 1887, as part of a wider series of surveys in northern Ontario. In 1899, Barlow wrote a report on the geology and natural resources of the area, which suggested that the rich belt of clay that lay north of Lake Temiskaming was ideal for agricultural settlement. The area has a rich clay soil, in contrast to the low fertility of the muskeg and exposed bedrock shield surrounding it. Moreover, the combination of its general fertility, flat topography, high water table and relative accessibility to an extensive network of roads for logging and mining make it suitable for some types of farming. The following year, the government announced plans to develop the area by tapping its natural resources.Soon after, Bernhard Eduard Fernow traveled the area at the behest of the Federal Commission of Conservation, ostensibly to survey the area of the National Railway transcontinental main line (formerly the Grand Trunk) and the potential for fire. He makes extensive mention of the condition of the timber, and has a somewhat tempered view of their potential commercial value. He then moves on to a somewhat more positive report on the soil and its suitability for farming, saying its future is bright. Wishing to avoid the Trent watershed problem, an earlier failed settlement attempt, he suggested setting up an experimental farm to test what treatment is necessary on the various soils.() Such a farm was set up in Kapuskasing on the west side of the river to explore and develop crops and systems for farming the area.The government encouraged immigrants to settle there as farmers during and after War I. Governments of the day were mistakenly impressed with the agricultural potential of the Great Clay Belt. Under the Returned Soldiers and Sailors Act of 1917 the Kapuskasing Soldier Colony was established to settle veterans returned from the Great War. Settlers received homesteads, grants and guaranteed loans and were paid for clearing their own land. But by 1920 only nine of more than a hundred original settlers remained. The farming consisted of some grains, mostly oats, and vegetables. In spite of numerous rocky outcrops some farming was successfully established within the Great Clay Belt, however, it proved to be impractical because of the short growing season. The clay soil is tremendously fertile, but long snowy winters coupled with unpredictable rainfall during the short growing season meant most farming yielded little.By 1935, immigration to the Great Clay Belt virtually ended. One farmer, describing why he returned to urban life, stated that, in the Great Clay Belt, there are seven months of snow, two months rain, and all the rest is black flies and mosquitoes. Some of the farmers returned to Toronto and Montreal. Some moved west to the prairie provinces of Manitoba, Saskatchewan and Alberta once the Transcontinental Railway was completed. Many of the farmers shifted to mining once minerals were found in the area. Others entered the logging industry. Some towns still remaining today include Cochrane, New Liskeard, Timmins, Kapuskasing, and even as far west as Hearst.The Little Clay Belt is an area analogous to the Great Clay Belt, and likewise is located in Northeastern Ontario. Unfortunately, neither the Great nor the Little Clay Belt seems able to attract any sort of sustainable industry to employ people for long periods of time. Both regions go through periodic boom and bust cycles, depending upon the fortunes of the pulp and paper industries, and the mining industries.References
2284615
Lanfang_Republic
The Lanfang Republic (modern name in Chinese: , Pinyin: Lnfng Gnghgu) was a Chinese state in Kalimantan in Indonesia that was established by a Hakka Chinese named Lan Pak (Fangbo) () in 1777, until it was ended by Dutch occupation in 1884 (for their part, the Dutch considered their actions in 1884 as breaking up a Chinese uprising). The sultans of Western Borneo imported Chinese laborers in 18th century to work in gold or tin mines. A number of mining communities (kongsi) enjoyed some political autonomy,() but Lanfang is the best known thanks to a history written by Siong-yoen, the son-in-law of the last kapitan of the Lanfang kongsi, which was translated into Dutch in 1885.(.) None of the other Chinese mining settlements in western Kalimantan left written accounts (Heidhues 2001:169).Notes(References. External links*Info at Asiawind.comde LanfangLanfangja:Lanfangha Lan Phngzh:
2289795
Jimnez,_Coahuila
footnotes               Jimnez  a town and seat of the municipality of Jimnez in the Mexican state of Coahuila, at an altitude of 250 meters above sea level. It is located on the confluence of the San Diego and the Grande (locally known as the Ro Bravo) bordering with the U.S. state of Texas. It had a population of 1,160 inhabitants in the 2010 census, and is, unusual for a Mexican municipal seat, the second-largest locality in the municipality, after the town of San Carlos (which had a population of 3,126).The town was founded in 1859. under the name of Resurreccin by captain Manuel Leal, and tejano expatriate families from San Antonio, Texas.HistoryIn June 1675 the area was first visited by  Lt. Fernando del Bosque, on a reconnaissance expedition up the Rio Grande from the city of Nuestra Sra. de Guadalupe (Monclova). He was accompanied by the Franciscan Friars Juan Larios and Dionisio de San Buenaventura. The troop camped on the edge of the San Diego river, which the Indians called the Nueces, very near the site of the actual town of Jimnez today. They met with two local Indian chiefs, Bacora and Pinanaca whose tribe, numbering 150 people, were on a buffalo hunting expedition. Del Bosque named the camp Santa Clara de las Nueces.The area was again visited in 1729 by captain, Jos de Barrotern, who suggested a site on the San Diego river for a possible Presidio, but no attempt was made at foundation.In December of 1735, Governor Blas de la Garza Falcn and Joseph de Eca y Mzquiz selected an area on the banks of the San Diego river for a fort, and actually began cutting logs for its construction, but had to stop operations when they were ordered back to San Juan Bautista. In 1737, permission was given to captain Miguel de la Garza Falcn, son of the governor who had died the previous year, to begin the construction of the presidio on the San Diego, arriving in October of that year with 50 soldiers and officers as well as 16 families for the new presidio which was named Sacramento.The place turned out to be a poor choice as the land was difficult to irrigate, and after a brief two years it was moved to Santa Rosa, now Melchor Muzquiz, Coahuila.In 1773, a second attempt at another location on the San Diego river was attempted, this time the location was  a small spring, tributary to the San Diego named Aguaverde. The Presidio was completed and occupied by troops by late April of 1773. This presidio and garrison lasted at this site for eight years, during which time it saw plenty of action against Indian attacks. In 1781 the garrison was relocated to San Fernando de Austria (now Zaragoza, Coah.), where the company still kept the name of Aguaverde, but the presidio was abandoned. It was not occupied again until the late 1840s and early 1850s, where the garrison of San Vicente was transplanted into the old Presidio.In December 1859, a group headed by captain Manuel Leal founded villa La Resurreccion, with families from the surrounding towns of Piedras Negras, Guerrero, Nava, Gigedo, as well as a group of families from Antonio, Texas. The town was founded on lands previously occupied by the Colonia de Agua Verde.In February 1861 the village was attacked by a large force of Lipan  Apaches. Some casualties were reported, among them was an old veteran of the  Independence and Texas Ranger, Damacio Galvn. The Lipans carried off some 500 head of cattle, as well as some children from the town.This fierce attack discouraged many of the settlers and the towns population diminished drastically, many of the families from San Antonio returned to Texas.During the mid to late 1860s, more settlers arrived from neighboring towns, and the town prospered. In 1875 the villa was renamed Jimnez in honor of  Mariano Jimnez, a leader during Mexicos Independence movement.On September 26, 1906 the first armed rebellion against the dictatorship of Porfirio Daz, precursor to the Mexican Revolution began in Jimnez, it was led by Juan Jos Arredondo and Calixto Guerra, members of the Liberal Mexicano of Flores Magon.  The movement was short lived as Federal troop reinforcements from Piedras Negras, surprised and dispersed the revolutionaries the next day at Hacienda Victoria.On June 24, 1908 another rebellion was attempted this time at Las Vacas (Cd. Acua), by Benjamn Canales and Calixto Guerra. After a day-long battle and heavy losses on both sides, the federal garrison prevailed and the revolutionaries were forced to retreat across the border into Texas.GeographyJimnez is located at  and an altitude of  above sea level.DemographyIn the 2010 census the municipality had a population of 9,935 inhabitants.ClimateThe climate of the region is semi-arid and Hot. During the hot summer the temperatures  averages (mean) between 79F (26C) and 88F (31C).Highest precipitation months are May, June and September, October with an average monthly downfall in the range of 300 to 400 mm.Natural resourcesThe regions  main resources are agriculture and livestock.EducationThe municipality of Jimnez has a total of 33 primary schools, and 5 secondary schools.Tourism*The Plaza Francisco I. Madero*Monument to Ricardo Flores Magn and the Revolutionaries of Sept. 26, 1906*The Old Cemetery*The San Diego River*Hacienda VictoriaList of Presidentes Municipales*Silverio Campos	(19371938)	PNR*Epifanio Martnez	(19391940)	PRM*Alejandro Siller	(19411942)	PRM*Dionisio Prez Faz	(19431945)	PRM*Pedro Bravo Zertuche	(19461948)	PRI*Jos V. Snchez	(19491951)	PRI*Cruz Olivo Rico	(19521954)	PRI*Justo Guerra G.	(19551957)	PRI*Jos Snchez Arreola	(19581960)	PRI*Anselmo Balderas Abundis	(19611963)	PRI*Emilio Ramrez Escobedo	(19641966)	PRI*Ignacio Rivero Ros	(19671969)	PRI*J. Cruz Olivo Rico	(19701972)	PRI*Apolonio Martnez Rodrguez	(19731975)	PRI*Ma. del Consuelo Villarreal Prez de G.	(19761978)	PRI*Miguel Lozano Arizpe	 (19791981)	PRI*Adolfo Narvez Faz	(19821984)	PRI*Ludivina Hernndez de Trevio	(19851987)	PRI*Evelio Celedn Banda	(19881990)	PRI*Pedro Bravo Berlanga	(19911993)	PRI*Faustino Infante Regalado	(19941996)	PRI*Juan Antonio Balderas Balboa	(19971999)	PRI*Federico Ordoez Coronado	(20002002)  PRI*Agapito Balderas Elizondo	 (20032005)  PRI*Francisco Trujillo Reyes	(20062008)  COAL. Mario Robles Molina (presidente interino actual) Notable people from Jimnez * Calixto Guerra - Jimnez Revolutionary of 1906 and Las Vacas in 1908* Vicente Arreola Herrera (18751935) - Mining Engineer, industrialist References 
2296257
Roger_Revelle
footnotes          right|250px|thumb|The atmospheres CO2-concentrationRoger Randall Dougan Revelle (March 7, 1909  July 15, 1991) was a scientist and scholar who was instrumental in the formative years of the of California, San Diego and was one of the first scientists to study warming and the movement of Earths plates.  UC San Diegos first college is named College in his honor. Career Roger Revelle was born in Seattle to William Roger Revelle and Ella Dougan, and grew up in southern California, graduating from College in 1929 with early studies in geology and then earning a Ph.D. in oceanography from the of California, Berkeley in 1936.  While at Cal, he studied under Dr. George D. Louderback and was initiated into Theta Tau Professional Engineering Fraternity which started as a mining engineering fraternity and maintained a strong affinity for geology and geological engineering students. Much of his early work in oceanography took place at the Institution of Oceanography (SIO) in San Diego.  He was also Oceanographer for the Navy during WWII.  He became director of SIO from 1950 to 1964.  He stood against the UC faculty being required to take an anti-communist oath during the McCarthy period.  He served as Science Advisor to Interior Secretary Udall during the Kennedy Administration in the early 1960s, and was President of the Association for the Advancement of Science (1974).  Growth of OceanographyRevelle was deeply involved in the growth of oceanography in the United States and internationally after World War II.  Working for the Navy in the late 1940s, he helped to determine which projects gained funding, and he promoted the idea that the Navy ought to support basic research instead of only trying to build new technology.  At Scripps he launched several major long-range expeditions in the 1950s, including the MIDPAC, TRANSPAC (with Canada and Japan), EQUAPAC, and NORPAC, each traversing a different part of the Pacific Ocean.  He and other scientists at Institution of Oceanography helped the U.S. government to plan weapons tests, in the hope that oceanographers might make use of the data.  Revelle was one of the committee chairmen in the influential National Academy of Sciences studies of the biological effects of atomic radiation (BEAR), the results of which were published in 1956.  In 1952, along with Dr. Q. Duntley, he successfully moved the MIT Visibility Lab to SIO with financial support of the U.S. Navy.( History of the Scripps Visibility Lab http://www.physics.miami.edu/optics/ken/OtherPapers/A25_VA_OOXVI_2002.pdf )  Along with oceanographers at the Hole Oceanographic Institution, Revelle planned the American contributions to the oceanographic program of the Geophysical Year (IGY).  He became the first president of the Committee on Oceanic Research, an international group of scientists devoted to advising on international projects, and he was a frequent advisor to the Oceanographic Commission, created in 1960.(Jacob Darwin Hamblin, Oceanographers and the Cold War: Disciples of Marine Science (Seattle: University of Washington Press, 2005).) Global warming Revelle was instrumental in creating the Geophysical Year (IGY) in 1958 and was founding chairman of the first Committee on Climate Change and the Ocean (CCCO) under the Scientific Committee on Ocean Research (SCOR) and the International Oceanic Commission (IOC).  During planning for the IGY, under Revelles directorship, SIO participated in and later became the principal center for the Atmospheric Carbon Dioxide Program.  In July 1956, David Keeling joined the SIO staff to head the program, and began measurements of atmospheric carbon dioxide at the Loa Observatory on Loa, Hawaii, and in Antarctica. In 1957, Revelle co-authored a paper with Suess that suggested that the Earths oceans would absorb excess dioxide generated by humanity at a much slower rate than previously predicted by geoscientists, thereby suggesting that human gas emissions might create a effect that would cause warming over time.(Revelle, R., and H. Suess, Carbon dioxide exchange between atmosphere and ocean and the question of an increase of atmospheric  during the past decades. Tellus 9, 18-27 (1957).)  Although other articles in the same journal discussed carbon dioxide levels, the Suess-Revelle paper was the only one of the three to stress the growing quantity of  contributed by our burning of fuel, and to call attention to the fact that it might cause global warming over time.(Waenke, Heinrich, and Arnold, James R., Hans E. Suess, A biographical Memoir (2005).)Revelle and Suess described the buffer factor, now known as the factor, which is a resistance to atmospheric carbon dioxide being absorbed by the ocean surface layer posed by bicarbonate chemistry.  Essentially, in order to enter the ocean, carbon dioxide gas has to partition into one of the components of carbonic acid: carbonate ion, bicarbonate ion, or protonated carbonic acid, and the product of these many chemical dissociation constants factors into a kind of back-pressure that limits how fast the carbon dioxide can enter the surface ocean.  Geology, geochemistry, chemistry, ocean chemistry ... this amounted to one of the earliest examples of integrated assessment, which 50 years later became an entire branch of global warming science. UC San Diego During the late 1950s, Revelle fought for the establishment of a of California campus in San Diego.  He had to contend with the UC University Board of Regents who would have preferred merely to expand the of California, Los Angeles campus rather than create an entirely new campus in San Diego.  He also faced local San Diego politicians and businessmen who tried to undermine establishing the new campus near the original Scripps Institute in La Jolla by suggesting it be placed in less optimal sites in San Diego proper, such as near Diego State University or in Balboa Park.  The watershed decision was made in 1959, with the first graduate students enrolled in 1960, and the first undergraduates in 1964.    Revelles struggle to acquire land for the new campus put him in competition with Salk, and Revelle lost some of what he called the best piece of land we had on UCSDs eventual Torrey Pines site to the fledgling Institute.  In later years Revelle continued to show some animosity toward Salk, once saying, He is a folk hero, even though he is... not very bright.(UCSD 25th Anniversary Oral History Project, Interview conducted May 15-16, 1985 by Dr. Kathryn Ringrose)When at Scripps and while building UCSD, Revelle also had to deal with a La Jolla community that refused to rent or sell property to Jews.  In addition to battling the anti-semitic covenant of La Jolla real estate, Revelle helped found a new housing subdivision for Scripps professors, partially because some of them would not have been allowed to live in La Jolla.  Revelle left Scripps in 1963 and founded the for Population Studies at University.  In over ten years as director there, he focussed on the application of science and technology to the problem of world hunger.  In 1976 he returned to UC San Diego as Professor of Science, Technology and Public Affairs (STPA) in the schools science department.Alleged doubts about climate changeIn 1991, Revelles name appeared as co-author on an article written by physicist S. Fred Singer for the publication Cosmos: A Journal of Emerging Issues, along with another co-author, electrical engineer Starr, titled What to do about greenhouse warming: Look before you leap, which was published in the summer of 1992. The Cosmos article included the statement that: Drastic, precipitous and, especially, unilateral--steps to delay the putative greenhouse impacts can cost jobs and prosperity and increase the human costs of global poverty, without being effective. Stringent economic controls now would be economically devastating particularly for developing countries...(What to do about greenhouse warming: Look before you leap http://www.sepp.org/key%20issues/glwarm/cosmos.html)The article concluded:The scientific base for a greenhouse warming is too uncertain to justify drastic action at this time. There is little risk in delaying policy responses.(What to do about greenhouse warming: Look before you leap http://www.sepp.org/key%20issues/glwarm/cosmos.html)These particular statements and the bulk of the article, including the title, had been written and published a year earlier by S. Fred Singer, as sole author. (What to do about greenhouse warming, Environmental Science and Technology, Vol. 24, No. 8, 1990)  Singers article stated that there is every expectation that scientific understanding will be substantially improved within the next decade, and advocated against drastic and hastily-conceived action at the time without further scientific evidence. It does not, however, deny climate change or global warming.Justin Lancaster, Revelles graduate student and teaching assistant at the Scripps Institution of Oceanography from 1981 until Revelles death, alleges that Revelle was hoodwinked by Singer into adding his name to the article and that Revelle was intensely embarrassed that his name was associated with it.  In 1992, Lancaster charged that Singers actions were unethical and specifically designed to undercut Al Gores global warming policy stance; however, to end a lawsuit brought by Singer against Lancaster with support of the Center for Public Interest in Washington, D.C., Lancaster gave Singer a statement of apology and confirmed that Revelle had allowed his name to be used.  In 2006, prompted by Robert Balling and others continuing to state that Revelle actually wrote the article, Lancaster formally withdrew his retraction and reiterated his charges.(The Cosmos Myth,http://www.ossfoundation.us/projects/environment/global-warming/myths/revelle-gore-singer-lindzen) (James Hoggan, Richard Littlemore, Climate Cover-Up: The Crusade to Deny Global Warming, Graystone Books, 2009, pages 134-8)When Gore was running for the vice-presidential nomination in 1992, the New Republic picked up on the contrast between the references to Revelle in Gores book, Earth In The Balance, and the views in the Cosmos article that could now be attributed to Revelle. This was followed up by Newsweek and elsewhere in the media.  Patrick Michaels boasted that the Cosmos article had been read into the Congressional Record.  The issue was even raised by Admiral Stockdale in the televised Vice-Presidential debate. Gores response was to protest that Revelles views in the article had been taken completely out of context. Lancasters involvement was as a result of his relationship with his graduate supervisor, David Keeling, and Lancasters position on an editorial board of a CRC publication to which Singer resubmitted the Cosmos article as a book chapter after Revelles death.(http://www.ossfoundation.us/projects/environment/global-warming/myths/revelle-gore-singer-lindzen/documents/Lancaster_affidavit.pdf/view)  Because Lancaster was aware Revelles views were misrepresented by the Cosmos article and because the CRC publication was directed toward only original, scholarly research, Lancaster called Singer to ask that the article not be republished, or that at least Revelles name be removed from the article. Singer explained that this was not possible, as the article had already been previously published. Lancaster persisted, claiming that Revelle had not really been a co-author of the article at all and that his name had been included despite his objections to key statements in the article, most importantly the statement predicting that the warming in the next century would be less than year-to-year variations. Based on statements from Revelles secretary who was in the room during Revelles single meeting with Singer to review the final paper, Lancaster suggested that Singer must have pressured a sick old man whose mental capacities tired quickly during such activities.(http://www.ossfoundation.us/projects/environment/global-warming/myths/revelle-gore-singer-lindzen/documents/Beran_affidavit.pdf/at_download/file)  After Lancaster published his charges in a letter to the supervising editors at CRC publishing, Singer sued for libel.When the two sides exchanged documents during legal discovery, it emerged that Lancaster had been rung by Gore after the Newsweek article appeared, and that Gore had particularly pressed him about Revelles mental state towards the end of his life. Lancaster told Gore that Revelle had in fact been mentally sharp to the end, but that he tired quickly in class and in meetings. He also stated that Revelle had shown him the Cosmos article before it was published, that he had scanned it too quickly to detect the misstatements, Lancaster saying to Revelle there did not seem to be anything in it that was not true, and that it was honest to admit uncertainties about greenhouse warming.This eventually led to Lancaster settling his case with Singer by issuing a retraction and apology, although Lancaster firmly refused to admit that anything he said was false. Twelve years later, in 2006, Lancaster recanted his retraction on a website, The Cosmos Myth, in which he specifically included references to the evidence that had come to light during the discovery process of the legal action, most importantly the sworn testimony of Singer regarding actual authorship of the Cosmos article (http://www.ossfoundation.us/projects/environment/global-warming/myths/revelle-gore-singer-lindzen/documents/S-F-Singer_Deposition.pdf/view), as well as the sworn affidavit of Revelles secretary(http://www.ossfoundation.us/projects/environment/global-warming/myths/revelle-gore-singer-lindzen/documents/Beran_affidavit.pdf/view) and Singers earlier publication of the article under his sole authorship(http://www.ossfoundation.us/projects/environment/global-warming/myths/revelle-gore-singer-lindzen/documents/Singer_article_solo.pdf/view).  Revelles daughter wrote:Contrary to George Wills Al Gores Green Guilt Roger Revelle - our father and the father of the greenhouse effect - remained deeply concerned about global warming until his death in July 1991. That same year he wrote: The scientific base for a greenhouse warming is too uncertain to justify drastic action at this time. Will and other critics of Sen. Al Gore have seized these words to suggest that Revelle, who was also Gores professor and mentor, renounced his belief in global warming. Nothing could be farther from the truth. When Revelle inveighed against drastic action, he was using that adjective in its literal sense - measures that would cost trillions of dollars. Up until his death, he thought that extreme measures were premature. But he continued to recommend immediate prudent steps to mitigate and delay climatic warming. Some of those steps go well beyond anything Gore or other national politicians have yet to advocate.(Global Warming: What My Father Really Said, Carolyn Revelle Hufbauer, 13 September 1992, Washington Post.)LegacyDuring his last decade at UCSD and SIO, Revelle continued to work and teach.  In the early 1980s, he taught undergraduate STPA seminars twice a year, in Energy and Development (mainly on problems in Africa), the Carbon Dioxide Problem (known now as the Warming problem), and Marine Policy. In 1986 he won the Prize for Oceanography/Climatology.A 1990 heart attack forced him to move his course to the Scripps Institution from the Revelle College provosts office, where he continued to teach the Marine Policy program until his death the following year.  In 1991, he was awarded the Medal of Science by President H.W. Bush (one of about 500 recipients in the 20th Century).  He remarked to a reporter: I got it for being the grandfather of the greenhouse effect.()Revelle died in San Diego on July 15, 1991 of complications of cardiac arrest.  He was survived by his wife, Ellen Clark Revelle (1910-2009) (), three daughters, and one son, William, as well as numerous grandchildren.  In his honor, a new research vessel at the Scripps Institution was christened R/V Roger Revelle.Notes External links *NASA Roger Revelle Biography*San Diego Biography: Roger Revelle*Revelle College 40th Anniversary*Research Vessel Roger Revelle at Scripps Institution of Oceanography*Roger Revelle, a profile Judith & Neil Morgan*Spencer Wearts Roger Revelles Discovery*Scripps Institution of Oceanographybo:RevelleRevelleRandall Dougan RevelleRevelleRevelleRevelleRevelle
2300897
Kielce_University_of_Technology
The Kielce University of Technology () is a relatively young institution, although the traditions of higher education in Kielce go back to the beginning of the 19th century. It was here that Staszic founded the Mining Academy, one of the first higher schools in Poland, which operated in the years 18161826 and provided qualified personnel to meet the needs of the Old Polish Industrial Basin. Higher education became available in Kielce again in 1965 when Kielce-Radom Evening Higher Engineering School was established. It was transformed into the Kielce University of Technology in 1974.The University has four faculties: * Civil and Environmental Engineering,* Electrical and Computer Engineering,* Mechatronics and Machinery Design,* Management and Computer Modelling.At present, over 9,400 students take courses in seven fields of studies: Civil Engineering, Environmental Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Mechanics and Machinery Design, Management and Marketing, Management and Production Engineering. The University is entitled to award a Doctors degree in five academic disciplines: civil engineering, environmental engineering, electrical engineering, machine building and operation, mechanics, and a degree of Doctor Habilitated in machine building and operation. In the last discipline doctoral courses are also run.Highly qualified staff of 403 academic teachers, including 81 Professors and Doctors Habilitated and 153 PhDs together with well-equipped laboratories (e.g. those of acoustic emission, laser technologies, soil mechanics, cracking mechanics, geometrical quantities measurement or materials strength) provide high educational standards in all fields of studies and specializations.Co-operation with partner institutions constitutes an important issue for the University. 27 bilateral agreements provide basis for collaboration in research and teaching with 50 universities from 27 countries. The University is currently running 10 projects being a part of international programmes and also research tasks, one of which belongs to the Fifth EU Framework Programme.A number of things differentiate our University from other Polish higher schools:The Centre for Laser Technologies of Metals, named after Prof. Frckiewicz, the late University Rector, is a joint unit of the University and the Academy of Sciences. It is housed in a modern building completed in 2000. The equipment the Centre has at its disposal (the most powerful lasers in Poland), together with the support from the Polish Academy of Sciences provides the possibility of conducting unique research. Such investigations have led, among others, to working out the technology of laser forming, the only one in the world. Apart from the research, the Centre also offers educational options, running a country unique specialization in laser and plasma technologies.The specialization of Repair and Preservation of Historical Monuments combines the practical knowledge of civil engineering with arts and architecture. Its students have recently worked on the overhaul and conservation of the Mirror Room of the Polish Academy of Sciences Station in Paris. The quality of their work and the level of expertise have been highly appreciated. For many years, ordered by the Minister of Culture and National Heritage, inventory making of Polish tombs in Ukraine has been going on.One of the most modern, fully computerised libraries in Poland was made available to the users in 2002.Compact University campus housing laboratories, teaching buildings and hostels (all within 15 min walk) as well as the size of the University account for its being student friendly, facilitate human contact, making it easier to find help. Structural computer network, covering also students hostels, provides access to the worlds knowledge and information resources. Student organisations and the Student Cultural and Social Centre operating at the hostel area offer different ways to spend free time. The Student Self-government started to run a new student club in 2002.Relatively low costs of studying, which results from readily available accommodation in student hostels, cheap meals at the University canteen as well as lower living costs when compared with major Polish cities.Careers Office, operating at the University on the basis of agreement with the Province Labour Office, helps our graduates seek job vacancies.See also* of universities in PolandExternal links* Official PageUniversitt Kielcewitokrzyska
2305249
Mahamadou_Issoufou
religion       IslamMahamadou Issoufou (born 1952) is a Nigerien politician who has been of Niger  since 7 April 2011. He is also President of the Party for Democracy and Socialism (PNDS-Tarayya),(PNDS-Tarayya National Executive Committee, as of September 2004 .) a social democratic party. He was Prime Minister of Niger from 1993 to 1994 and President of the National Assembly from 1995 to 1996, and he has stood as a candidate in each presidential election since 1993. During the Presidency of Tandja (1999&ndash;2010), Issoufou was the main opposition leader.BackgroundIssoufou, an ethnic Hausa, was born in the town of Dandaji in Tahoua Department. An engineer by trade, he served as National Director of Mines from 1980 to 1985 before becoming Secretary-General of the Mining Company of Niger (SOMAIR). He is married to Dr Issoufou Mahamadou.(Fin de la visite damiti et de travail du Prsident de la Rpublique, Chef de lEtat, SEM. Issoufou Mahamadou,  Paris (France) : le Chef de lEtat a regagn Niamey, vendredi dernier. Le Sahel (Niamey) 2011-07-11 )1993 presidential election and appointment as Prime MinisterIn February 1993, the countrys first multiparty legislative and presidential elections were held. In the parliamentary election, Issoufous party, the PNDS, won 13 seats in the National Assembly,(Elections in Niger, African Elections Database.)(Jibrin Ibrahim and Abdoulayi Niandou Souley, The rise to power of an opposition party: the MNSD in Niger Republic, Politeia, volume 15, number 3, Unisa Press, 1996.) and Issoufou himself won a seat(Afrique de lOuest - Niger - Cour suprme - 1993 - Arrt no 93-10/cc du 18 mars 1993, droit.francophonie.org .) as a PNDS candidate in Tahoua constituency.(Afrique de lOuest - Niger - Cour suprme - 1993 - Arrt no 93-3/cc du 1er fvrier 1993, droit.francophonie.org .)Together with other opposition parties, the PNDS then joined a coalition, the Alliance of the Forces of Change (AFC). This coalition held the majority of the newly elected seats in the National Assembly.( Later in February 1993, Issoufou ran as the PNDS candidate in the presidential election. He placed third, winning 15.92% of the vote.( The AFC then supported second-place finisher Ousmane for president in the second round of the election, held on March 27.( Ousmane won the election, defeating Mamadou, the candidate of the Movement of the Development Society (MNSD); with the AFC holding a parliamentary majority, Issoufou became Prime Minister on 17 April 1993.Conflict, cohabitation, and arrest: 1994&ndash;1999On 28 September 1994, Issoufou resigned in response to a decree from Ousmane a week earlier that weakened the powers of the prime minister, and the PNDS withdrew from the governing coalition. As a result, the coalition lost its parliamentary majority and Ousmane called a new parliamentary election to be held in January 1995. Issoufou and the PNDS forged an alliance with their old opponents, the MNSD, and in the January 1995 election that alliance won a slight majority of seats; Issoufou was then elected as President of the National Assembly. The oppositions victory in the election led to cohabitation between President Ousmane and a government, backed by a parliamentary majority, that opposed him; the result was political deadlock. With the dispute between President Ousmane and the government deepening, on 26 January 1996 Issoufou requested that the Supreme Court remove Ousmane from office for alleged incapacity to govern. A day later, on 27 January 1996, Bar Manassara seized power in a military coup.( Issoufou, along with President Ousmane and Prime Minister Amadou, was arrested and subsequently placed under house arrest until April 1996.(Niger: A major step backwards, Amnesty International, 16 October 1996.) They were all put on television by the military regime in February 1996 to endorse the official view that the coup was caused by flaws in the political system and that changes in the system were needed.( Issoufou placed fourth (receiving only 7.60% of the vote) in the flawed and controversial 7&ndash;8 July 1996 presidential election that gave Manassara an outright victory.( Along with the three other opposition candidates, Issoufou was placed under house arrest on the second day of polling and held for two weeks.( Afterward, he refused to meet with Manassara, unsuccessfully appealed to the Supreme Court for the election to be annulled, and the PNDS called for demonstrations.(Aprs llection prsidentielle conteste, Afrique Express .) On July 26, he was again placed under house arrest, along with another leading PNDS member, Bazoum; they were freed on the order of a judge on 12 August.( Following a pro-democracy demonstration on 11 January 1997, Issoufou was arrested along with Ousmane and Tandja and held until 23 January.(Harassment of Government Opponents has Become Systematic, Amnesty International, May 1, 1997.)Opposition leader: 1999&ndash;2010Manassara was killed in another military coup in April 1999, and new elections were held in late in the year. In the first round of the presidential election, held in October, Issoufou placed second, winning 22.79% of the vote. He was later defeated by Tandja Mamadou in the November run-off, capturing 40.11% of the vote compared to Tandjas 59.89%.((, democratie.francophonie.org .) He was backed in the second round by the unsuccessful first round candidates Algabid, Adamou Djermakoye, and Djibo, while Tandja received Ousmanes support. After the announcement of the provisional results showing Tandjas victory, Issoufou accepted them and congratulated Tandja.( In the November 1999 parliamentary election, Issoufou was again elected to the National Assembly as a PNDS candidate in Tahoua constituency.(List of deputies elected in the 1999 election by constituency, National Assembly website (2004 archive page) .)In a repeat of the 1999 election, Issoufou placed second behind incumbent Tandja in the 2004 presidential election, winning 24.60% of the vote.( He was defeated in the run-off, winning 34.47% of the vote to Tandjas 65.53%;((, democratie.francophonie.org .) however, that was still considered an impressive result for Issoufou, as he had substantially increased his share of the vote even though the other first round candidates had backed Tandja in the second round.(Incumbent wins Niger presidential poll, afrol News, December 8, 2004.) Issoufou, who targeted corruption in his campaign, accused Tandja of using state funds for his own campaign, along with other accusations of electoral misconduct, and said that the election was not as transparent as the 1999 election.(Nico Colombant, Niger Opposition Cries Foul Following Runoff Election, VOA News, December 4, 2004.)In the December 2004 parliamentary election, Issoufou was re-elected to the National Assembly as a PNDS candidate in Tahoua constituency.(List of deputies elected in the 2004 election by constituency, National Assembly website (2005 archive page) .)2009 political crisisIn 2009, the PNDS strongly opposed Tandjas efforts to hold a referendum on the creation of a new constitution that would allow him to run for re-election indefinitely. At an opposition rally in Niamey on 9 May 2009, Issoufou accused Tandja of seeking a new constitution to stay in power for ever and the establishment of a dictatorship and a monarchy.(Thousands protest Niger presidents plans, AFP, 9 May 2009.) As leader of the Front for the Defence of Democracy (FDD) opposition coalition, he said on 4 June 2009 that a planned anti-referendum protest would be held on 7 June despite an official ban.(Niger protesters vow to defy anti-referendum demo ban, AFP, 4 June 2009.)As part of the constitutional dispute, Tandja assumed emergency powers on 27 June. Accusing Tandja of undertaking a coup dtat, violating the constitution and ... forfeiting all political and moral legitimacy, Issoufou called on the armed forces to ignore his orders and urged the international community to intervene.(Niger opposition slams presidential coup, AFP, 27 June 2009.) Issoufou was detained at his home by the armys paramilitary police on 30 June;(Niger opposition accuses president of coup, The Washington Post, 30 June 2009.) he was questioned and released after about an hour. A nationwide strike called by the FDD was held on 1 July and was deemed partially successful by the press.(Boureima Hama, Anti-referendum strike partially followed in Niger, AFP, 1 July 2009.)The referendum was held on 4 August 2009, despite the oppositions furious objections and calls for a boycott, and it was successful. Speaking on 8 August, shortly after the announcement of results, Issoufou vowed that the opposition would resist and fight against this coup detat enacted by President Tandja and against his aim of installing a dictatorship in our country.(Niger opposition vows to fight dictatorship, AFP (IOL), 8 August 2009.)On 14 September 2009, Issoufou was charged with misappropriation of funds and then released on bail. He said that he was actually charged for political reasons.(Niger opposition leader charged with financial crimes, AFP, 14 September 2009.) Subsequently he left the country. On 29 October 2009, international warrants for the arrest of Issoufou and Hama Amadou were issued by the Nigerien government, and Issoufou returned to Niamey from Nigeria late on 30 October in order to cooperate with the judiciary.(Niger opposition leader returns to face law, AFP (IOL), 31 October 2009.)Tandja was ousted in a February 2010 military coup, and a new transitional junta enabled the opposition leaders to return to politics in Niger while preparing for elections in 2011. The PNDS designated Issoufou as the partys candidate for the January 2011 presidential election at a meeting in early November 2010. Issoufou said on the occasion that the moment has come, the conditions are right, and he called on party members to turn these conditions into votes at the ballot box. Some observers considered Issoufou to be potentially the strongest candidate in the election.(Free Tandja, Niger junta told, Reuters, 8 November 2010.)Presidency: 2011&ndash;PresentHe won the 2011 presidential election. He was inaugurated as president on 7 April 2011 and succeeded Djibo who was in power as Chairperson of the Supreme Council for the Restoration of Democracy since 19 February 2010. He named Rafini as Prime Minister. In July 2011, a planned assassination of Issoufou was uncovered. A major, lieutenant, and three other soldiers in Nigers military were arrested.()Referencesafter|-IssoufouIssoufouIssoufouIssoufuIssoufouIssoufouIssoufouIssoufouIssoufouIssoufouIssoufouzh:
2312395
Coolgardie,_Western_Australia
KalgoorlieCoolgardie is a small town in the Australian state of Australia,  east of the state capital, Perth. It has a population of approximately 800 people.Although Coolgardie is now known to most Western Australians as a tourist town and a mining ghost town, it was once the third largest town in Western Australia (after Perth and Fremantle). At this time, mining of alluvial gold was a major industry and supplied the flagging economy with new hope. Many miners suffered under the harsh conditions, but for a few, their finds made the hard work worthwhile. Most men, however, left poorer than they had started off, with their hopes dashed. Historythumb|left|Coolgardie School of MinesThe town was founded in 1892, when gold was discovered in the area. Australia had seen several major rushes over the previous three decades, mostly centred on the east coast, but these had mostly been exhausted by the 1890s. With the discovery of a new goldfield, an entire new gold rush began, with thousands flocking to the area. By 1898, Coolgardie was the third largest town in the colony, with a population of 15,000, and another 10,000 in the surrounding region. At its peak, 700 mining companies based in Coolgardie were registered with the Stock Exchange. The town also supported a wide variety of businesses and services, including a railway(Coolgardies Railway Days Morris, Bernie & Milne, Rod Railway History, June; July, 2008 pp183-196; 219-234), a swimming pool (first public baths in the state), many hotels and several newspapers. The value of Coolgardie to the colony in the late 1890s was so very significant that it was used as leverage to force Western Australia to join the federation - Britain and the eastern colonies threatened to create a new state to be named Auralia around Coolgardie and other regional goldfields, such as Kalgoorlie, if the government in Perth did not agree to hold a referendum on federation. The Western Australian government reluctantly complied and a referendum was held just in time to become a founding state in the new federation. When federation did occur in 1901, Coolgardie was the centre of a federal electorate, the of Coolgardie. Soon after in November 1901, Morgans from the state electorate of Coolgardie briefly became of Western Australia.  Albert Thomas, also of Coolgardie, was elected the first Member of Dundas, an electoral division south of Coolgardie.However, the gold began to decrease in the early 1900s, and by War I, the town was in serious decline. The federal electorate was abolished in 1913 due to the diminished population, as many of its residents left for other towns where the gold was still plentiful, and it soon ceased to be a municipality. The situation remained unchanged throughout the century, as its population slipped to around 200 and it became a virtual town. An example of this decline is that, in March 1896, Coolgardies main street was lit by an electric light, but by April 1924, the same street was lit by four Hurricane Lamps.  Despite this, many of the buildings from the towns peak were retained, which in recent years has helped start a small revival in the towns fortunes. The development of a tourist industry has once again created some employment in the town, resulting in a small increase in population. Coolgardie appears to be no longer in danger of dying.GalleryFile:Misery Coolgardie.jpg|Prospector riding Misery, a famous camel which travelled a record 600 mi without water, 1895(Reid, Arthur. Those Were the Days. Perth: Press, 1986. ISBN 0859051013, p. 97)File:Coolgardie Aboriginals.jpg|Aboriginals participate in ceremony to mark the opening of the Coolgardie Railway Line, 1896File:Burning McCann efigy.jpg|Miners burn effigy of prospector who lied about gold discovery near Coolgardie, 1897File:Chamber of Mines Coolgardie.jpg|Coolgardie Chamber of Mines, ca. 1900Muslim Afghan Cameleersthumb|Camel team, Coolgardie ca. 1900When the Coolgardie gold rush occurred in 1894, the Afghan cameleers (so-called, although they did not originate in Afghanistan) were quick to move in. The goldfields could not have continued without the food and water they transported. In March that year, a caravan of six Afghans, forty-seven camels and eleven calves, set out across the desert from Marree to the goldfield. It arrived in July with the camels, carrying between 135 and 270 kilograms each, in good condition. Another fifty-eight camels for Coolgardie arrived by ship in Albany in September.(A History of Islam in Australia accessed: 27 May 2010)By 1898 there were 300 members of the Muslim community in Coolgardie and 80 on average attended Friday prayer. Coolgardie held the main Muslim community in the colony at that time. There was not one Muslim woman amongst them, no marriages were performed and no burials, reflecting a relatively young, celibate and transient population. Simple mud and tin-roofed mosques were initially constructed in the town. All of the Afghan Muslim population eventually relocated from Coolgardie generally to Perth, the new capital of Western Australia. Racism was very common towards the Afghan cameleers, there were reports of unsolved murders and torture of Afghan owned animals.TransportEastern Highway (National Highway 94) runs through the town as Bayley Street. Just to the towns east, Highway 94 turns south onto Highway, which heads towards Norseman, the starting point of the route east across the Plain.The Prospector train stops 14 km north of the town at Bonnie Vale.Mining fieldsIn the 1890s there were four mining fields gazetted with Coolgardie as reference point:* Coolgardie Gold Field            (1894)* East Coolgardie Gold Field       (1894). In 1902, this was the richest gold field in Western Australia.()* North Coolgardie Gold Field      (1895)* North East Coolgardie Gold Field (1896)Despite the changes to the Kalgoorlie region, Coolgardie still has a Mining Registrar.See also* mine rescue at nearby Bonnie Vale in 1907* Gold Mine* Gold Mine* safe.ReferencesExternal links*Shire of Coolgardieda:Coolgardiede:Coolgardiees:Coolgardiefr:Coolgardieit:Coolgardienl:Coolgardie
2319179
John_Lister-Kaye
 subject  conservationSir John Philip Lister Lister-Kaye, 8th Baronet OBE (b. 1946 in Yorkshire) is an English naturalist, conservationist, author and owner and Director of Scotlands premier field studies centre, Aigas Field Centre, among other business interests. He is married with four children and has lived in the Highlands of Scotland since 1969.BiographyHaving been born into an ancient established family who for many generations had been Yorkshire landowners, distinguished political figures and successful industrialists with interests in both quarrying and mining,(Song of the Rolling Earth p. 18.) John Lister-Kayes early fascination with natural history was something his family hoped he would eventually grow out of. In 1959, at the age of 13, his parents sent him to public school in Devon. Fortuitously for him, if not for his parents, the school was situated within an  Nature Reserve and near the wilderness of the Lyme Regis landslip (to which he returned with his daughter, as documented in Natures Child). After five years in such an environment Lister-Kayes love of nature was deep and permanent.(After leaving school in 1964,Lister-Kaye was peruaded against his wishes to accept a post as a management trainee attached to the steel supply industry at Talbot in Wales.(After witnessing the ecological disaster that resulted from the sinking of the supertanker Canyon the Scillies in 1967, John Lister-Kaye then knew that a long-term career in industry was not for him.(Song of the Rolling Earth p. 35.) The escape finally came in 1968 when he was invited by naturalist and author Maxwell, to move to Maxwells home on Eilean Bn (White Island) in the Highlands, to help him work on a book about British wild mammals and to assist with a project to build a zoo on the island.(The White Island p. 2.) Lister-Kaye readily accepted Maxwells invitation, resigned from his job, and moved to Scotlandin 1969. After Maxwells unexpected death from cancer later that same year, both the book and the zoo project had to be abandoned, and John Lister-Kaye became both jobless and homeless.(The Seeing Eye p. 13.) Rather than return to a career in industry he remained in Scotland and went into isolation to write a book about the short but eventful time he had spent with Maxwell on Eilean Bn. His acclaimed first book, The White Island, was published by Longman in 1972. It has remained in print for 30 years.In 1970, after the completion of The White Island, Lister-Kaye formed Highland Wildlife Enterprises, a natural history guiding service based at the village of Drumnadrochit, near Ness.(The Seeing Eye p. 70.) Initially he was assisted in the venture by friend and ex-employee of Gavin Maxwell, Richard Frere. Two years later this was to become Scotlands first field studies centre, and in 1972, Lister-Kaye and the field centre moved to a remote valley near Affric.(The Seeing Eye p. 145.)Four years later, needing to accommodate a growing family and to be able to extend the facilities of the field centre, Lister-Kaye persuaded the Inverness-shire County Council to sell him the remains of a Victorian sporting estate near Beauly called Aigas, which had previously been used by the council as an old peoples home.(The Seeing Eye p. 274.) In 1977, the Field Centre was opened by Sir Frank Fraser Darling, Scotlands most celebrated ecologist.(Song of the Rolling Earth p. 176.)In 1979 Lister-Kaye was commissioned to write a Penguin Special SealCull (published 1979)on the political row that surrounded a proposal by the UK government to cull thousands of grey seals off the coast of Scotland. This book was adopted by University as a conservation and zoology textbook, cementing Lister-Kayes career as a writer on nature and wildlife.Lister-Kayes second autobiographical work, The Seeing Eye: Notes of a Highland Naturalist, which was published by Allen Lane in 1979, continues the story of his life from when he left Eilean Bn in 1970 up until his purchase of Aigas in 1976. In his third, the best-sellingSong of the Rolling Earth: A Highland Odyssey, published in 2003, Lister-Kaye chronicles the place Aigas from the Bronze Age to his development of Aigas Field Centre from its humble beginnings in 1976, to what is now Scotlands premier field centre, winning international awards for environmental education and hosting travel study groups from all over the world. This book was to establish Lister-Kaye as one of the UKs foremost nature writers.Lister-Kaye has also written a novel One for Sorrow, published by Balnain in 1994. It is a real life environmental saga and a murder based in the Highlands of Scotland. In 2003 he became a Times columnist as well as contributing features and articles to a wide variety of publications. This was followed by a technical land use paper for Scottish Natural Heritage, Ill Fares the Land, with a foreword by HRH The Prince of Wales.Lister-Kayes seventh book is the sequel to Song of the Rolling Earth, Natures Child - Encounters with Wonders of the Natural World (Time Warner 2004), and is about exciting expeditions and adventures with his youngest daughter Hermione.  His eighth is At the Waters Edge published by Canongate in 2010, subtitled A Personal Quest for Wildness.In 2000, to celebrate the millennium Lister-Kaye took ten members of his family and Aigas Field centre staff on an expedition to follow the footsteps of Laurens van der Posts across the Kalahari Desert (recounted in Natures Child).  In 2008, with his son Warwick and daughter Hermione, Lister-Kaye mounted a private Land Rover expedition up 8,000 miles of Africas Great Rift Vally from Malawi to Ethiopia to explore and write about the human ecology of the seven countries they passed through.  They returned to Scotland in time for the official opening of Aigas Field Centres new environmental education centre, by HRH The Prince Charles, Duke of Rothesay and HRH the Duchess of Rothesay in 2009.In 1989 Lister-Kaye was appointed to the board of the Nature Conservancy Council, later the Conservancy Council for Scotland (1990) and was appointed the first Regional Chairman for the Highlands & Islands of Scotland for Scottish Natural Heritage in 1991. He has also served as Chairman of the Royal Society for the Protection of Birds in Scotland, President of the Scottish Wildlife Trust, the Forestry Commission and the UKs Environmental Training Agency, and is Vice President of the Association for the Protection of Rural Scotland.In 1983 John Lister-Kaye was awarded the Wilderness Societys Gold Award for environmental edcuation for the work of his field studies centre.  In 2003 he was awarded an OBE for services to the Scottish environment, In 1995 he received an Honorary Doctorate from the University of Stirling, and was awarded Honorary Membership of the Scottish Wildlife Trust. In 2006 he received an honorary doctorate from the of St Andrews, and was made a Vice President of the RSPB.(Biography on Aigas Field Centre website)Bibliography* *  (paperback)*  (illustrated by Sarah Norton)* * * * * References* * * Notes(External links* Aigas Field Centre Website* Biography of Aigas founder John Lister-Kaye* Interview on Life Changing Books website* Mentioned in Hansard* Mentioned in the Scottish Parliament* The Eilean Bn Trust
2322403
Jack_Delano
 footnotes    Jack Delano (August 1, 1914 &ndash; August 12, 1997) was an American photographer for the Security Administration (FSA) and a composer noted for his use of Puerto Rican folk material. Biography Delano was born as Jacob Ovcharov in Voroshilovka, 120 miles southwest of Kiev, Ukraine and moved, with his parents and younger brother, to the States in 1923. Between 1924 and 1932 he studied graphic arts/photography and music (viola and composition)(New Grove Dictionary of American Music) at the Settlement Music School and solfeggio with a professor from the Institute in Pennsylvania.(Composers of the Americas page 22) After being awarded an art scholarship for his talents, he attended the Academy of the Fine Arts (PAFA) where, from 1928 until 1932, he studied illustration and continued his musical training. While there, Delano was awarded the Kesson traveling fellowship which he took to Europe where he bought a camera that got him interested in photography.After graduating from the PAFA, Delano proposed a photographic project to the Art Program: a study of mining conditions in the County, Pennsylvania coal area. Delano sent sample pictures to Stryker and applied for a job at the Security Administration Photography program FSA. Through the help of Rosskam and Post Wolcott, Stryker offered Delano a job at $2,300/year. As a condition of the job, Delano had to have his own car and drivers license, both of which he acquired before moving to D.C. left|thumb|220px|Chicago railyards, 1942.  Photograph by Jack Delano.Before working at the FSA, Delano had done his own processing and developing but did neither at the FSA. Other photographers working for the FSA include Evans, Lange, and Parks. In 1943 FSA was eliminated as budget waste and subsumed into the of War Information (OWI). He travelled to Rico in 1941 as a part of the FSA project. This trip had such a profound influence on him that he settled there permanently in 1946.With his wife Irene (a second cousin to fellow photographer Shahn) he worked in the Community Division of the Department of Public Education producing films, for many of which Delano composed the score.(Composers of the Americas page 22) Delano also directed Los Peloteros, a Puerto Rican film about poor rural kids and their love for baseball. The film remains a classic in Puerto Rican cinema.Jack Delanos musical compositions included works of every type: orchestral (many composed for the Rico Symphony Orchestra), ballets (composed for Ballet Infantil de Gilda Navarra and Ballets de San Juan), chamber, choral (including a commission for Coro de Nios de San Juan) and solo vocal. His vocal music often showcases Puerto Rican poetry, especially the words of friend and collaborator Blanco. Blanco, Dlano and his wife Irene collaborated on childrens books. The most prominent of these remains a classic in Puerto Rican literature: Childs Gift: A Twelfth Night Tale by Blanco, with illustrations by Dlano and incidental music (written on the margins) by Jack Dlano. His score for the film Desde las nubes demonstrates an early use of electronic techniques. Most of his works composed after he moved to Puerto Rico are notable for using folk material in a classical form.(New Grove Dictionary of American Music) Selected compositions thumb|240px|right|At the bus station. May 1940.; Orchestral* Ofrenda Musical (Musical Offering) for viola, horn and string orchestra (1959)* El sabio Doctor Mamb, Ballet for children (1962); libretto by the composer* Concertino classico for C trumpet and small orchestra (1968)* Sinfonietta for string orchestra (1983); Chamber and instrumental music* Sonata in A minor for viola and piano (1953)* Sonata for violin solo (1960)* Sonatina for flute and piano (1965)* String Quartet (1984)* Tres preludios (3 Preludes) for piano (1985); Vocal* Esta luna es ma for soprano solo, female chorus and piano (1962); words by P.H. Hernndez* Me voy a Ponce for mixed chorus (1965); words by Agustn Balseiro* Tres cancioncitas del mar for medium voice and piano (1969); words by Vicns, Feliciano Mendoza and Vizcarrondo* Cuatro sones de la tierra for soprano and piano (1974); words by Blanco* Ptalo de rosa, Suite for a cappella childrens choir (1993); written for the Juan Childrens Choir; Film scores* Los Peloteros (1953)ReferencesFile:Roundhouse wipers.jpg|thumb|220px|Roundhouse wipers at lunch, Iowa, 1943Bibliography* H. Wiley Hitchcock and Stanley Sadie (eds), New Grove Dictionary of American Music, (London: Macmillan Press, 1986), volume 1, p 595.* Composers of the Americas: biographical data and catalogs of their works, (Washington: Secretara General, Organizacin de los Estados Americanos),  volume 19, pp 22-27. External links*Interview of Jack & Irene Delano by Richard Doud of the Archives of American Art, Smithsonian Institution (June 12, 1965)*Photography of Jack Delano*Bound for Glory, exhibit featuring color photographs by Delano and others.*http://www.shorpy.com/jack-delano-photos Handpicked selection of photographs at Shorpy*Columbus Museum of Art Web page on Delanos 1940 photograph Miner at Doughertys Mine, Near Falls Creek, Pennsylvania (click on picture for larger image)*Portrait of an Artist: Jack Dlano by Francisco J. Cabn-Vales, MusikDelanoDelanoDelano
2328878
August_Paulsen
August Paulsen (July 29, 1871 - March 11, 1927) was a Danish-American businessman noted for his philanthropy in the states of Washington and Idaho.BackgroundAugust Paulsen was a Danish immigrant, who arrived in America at the age of nineteen. Paulsen arrived in Spokane in the autumn of 1892, where he would later be regarded as a great asset to the community.CareerPaulsen initially worked in the dairy industry in Spokane and ID. However, his interest lay in the mountains of the dAlenes district, where productive mining claims were making hard working miners rich. In 1895, Paulsen managed to save $850 to buy a quarter stake in the Hercules mining claim. Paulsens partners in the claim included Harry, Eugene, and Jerome Day, three brothers, Charles H. Reeves (Dad Reeves) , Levi W. Hutton, Frank Rothrock, Damien Cardoner, and the Markwells. These partners all came from working class backgrounds like Paulsen, and their mining claim was considered essentially a poor mans mine as a 1927 article of the Spokesman-Review notes.(August Paulsen - Dairy Farmer to Millionaire  (Spokane Chronicle - Oct 26, 1989) http://news.google.com/newspapers?nid1345&dat19891026&id-7YSAAAAIBAJ&sjid8_kDAAAAIBAJ&pg6021,3762894)The partners had very little capital with which to work the mine, so much of the digging, drilling, shoring, hauling and other difficult mining work was done by hand. Paulsen is often credited with keeping the partners together, and keeping focus on working and exploring the mine. Upon manually drilling a 1500 foot shaft, the partners finally exposed a high quality ore body in 1901 that proved to be the best in the district. The Hercules mine provided a full six-percent of the nations lead, and also produced good values in silver. The Hercules mine continued production until its closure in 1925.(Records of the Hercules Mining Company (University of Idaho))(Records of the Gertie Mining Company (University of Idaho))With Paulsens resultant wealth, he poured millions of dollars into the Spokane region, which still benefits the region today.  Paulsens interest in philanthropy and the civic needs of Washington and Idaho make him a notable character in the history of the Pacific Inland Northwest. He is perhaps best remembered within Spokane for the two downtown buildings he constructed that bear his name. Paulsen died during 1927 and was buried in the Riverside Memorial Park in Spokane, Washington.(August Paulsen (Riverside Memorial Park, Spokane))( Riverside Memorial Park (Fairmount Memorial Association))August Paulsen BuildingThe August Paulsen Building was designed by architects Dow and Hubbel, and built from 1908-1911 by the Fredrick Phair Company. It used the then new form of steel construction which allowed the 11-story building to become the tallest building in Spokane, at the time.(Mines produced the riches which built Spokane (Spokane Daily Chronicle - Nov 26, 1981) http://news.google.com/newspapers?nid1338&dat19811126&idxasSAAAAIBAJ&sjidVPkDAAAAIBAJ&pg7061,3780740)Paulsen CenterThe Paulsen Medical and Dental Building, designed by Gustav Pehrson, adjacent to the August Paulsen Building. Built between 192829, together they are referred to as the Paulsen Center. The Medical and Dental Building is a 15-story Deco style skyscraper, with Spanish Moor styled exterior.  This building, not completed until after Paulsens death, includes distinctive penthouse in which Paulsen family members lived until 2007.(Paulsen Center History (Spokane Historic Landmarks Commission))ReferencesOther sources*Heritage From Heroes, Spokanes Dreamers & Builders (Chapter 49, Dairying Dane Makes Mine Miracles by Dorothy Rochon Powers. Fairmount Memorial Association; 1993)External links*Paulsen Center*Paulsen Building
2332526
Kootenai_National_Forest
Kootenai National Forest is located in the far northwestern section of Montana and the northeasternmost lands in the Idaho panhandle, States along the Canadian border. Of the 2.2 million acres (9,000 km2) administered by the forest, less than 3 percent is located in the state of Idaho. Forest headquarters are located in Montana. There are local ranger district offices in Eureka, Fortine, Libby, Trout Creek, and Troy.(USFS Ranger Districts by State) The 93,000 acre (375 km2) Mountains Wilderness area is located within the forest. Wilderness designation prohibits motorized and mechanical travel, including bicycles and eliminates logging, mining, road and or building construction.Peak in the Cabinet Mountains Wilderness at 8,738 feet (2,700 m) is the highest peak within the forest. Mountain ranges included in the forest include the Whitefish, Purcell, Bitterroot, Salish, and Cabinet ranges.  The Northwest National Scenic Trail traverses the Forest. More than 90 miles of the 1,200 mile long trail are within the Kootenai.The Kootenai and the Clark Fork river are the major rivers and are fed by abundant rainfall that is more than double that amount found elsewhere in Montana. Three major hydroelectric dams exist in the Kootenai National Forest with Libby Dam on the Kootenai river creating a 90 mile (145 km) long lake known as Koocanusa (a play on Kootenai-Canada-United States of America), which extends into Canada. The shores of the lake are all forest land with no private property easements. The lowest elevation in Montana is where the Kootenai River leaves the state (1,832 feet/ 560 m). Other rivers in the forest include the Yaak, Fisher, Tobacco and Vermillion, with water flowing from over 100 lakes.The climate of the Kootenai has been described as modified Pacific maritime in character, meaning that compared to the remainder of Montana, this areas climate resembles that found along the Pacific coast. The character becomes modified by occasional intrusions of arctic air masses, more commonly found in the remainder of the State, which can bring winter temperatures down to -30 F (-34 C). with heavy snowfalls in the mountains. Access into the Forest is via Highway 2 and Highway 93 and Montana State Highways 37, 56, 200 and 508. The forest is located overwhelmingly (almost 95%) in County, Montana, but extends into neighboring counties. In descending order of forestland area they are Flathead County in Montana, Bonner and Boundary counties in Idaho, and Sanders County in Montana.See also* of Forests in Montana External links * * ReferencesNational Forestnationale de Kootenai
2337773
Mikoaj_Gomka
Image:Tomb effigy of Mikoaj Gomka in Yazlovets.png|166px|thumb|right|Tomb effigy of Mikoaj Gomka in YazlovetsMikoaj Gomka (born c. 1535  in Sandomierz, died after 30 April 1591, most probably 5 March 1609) was a Polish Renaissance composer, member of the court of II August, where he was a singer, flautist and trumpeter. Between 1545-1563 he stayed at the royal court, where initially he was a descantist, learned to play the flute, the sztort (an old Polish instrument, prototype of the bassoon), the violin and the lute, and then he became a royal chapel musician with full rights. Having left the court he fulfilled various social and legal functions in Sandomierz; for some time he stayed at the court of the Krakw bishop Myszkowski (to whom he dedicated his work Melodies for the Polish Psalter); he conducted mining researches near Muszyna and also stayed at the court of Zamoyski in Cracow, where he was still living in April 1591; this is the last known date of his life. The only preserved work by Gomka is a collection of 150 independent compositions to the text of Psalter by Kochanowski, for four-part unaccompanied choir. The music is fully subordinated to the contents and the expressive layer of the text; he illustrates the mood or particular words by means of musical devices. In some works the composer applies dance rhythms characteristic of canzonetta. The Melodies for the Polish Psalter are a valuable monument of Old Polish culture showing the lay achievements of the renaissance adapted to the Polish conditions.GomkaGomkaGomka
2343510
Tom_McGrath
Tom McGrath is an American media executive. Early life and education McGrath (born 1956) grew up in Washington, DC, graduated from Johns College High School (72), received his A.B. at 19(Facebook Profile) from Harvard and earned his M.B.A. there as well.  At Harvard he was music director of the Pudding Theatricals and conductor of both the Harvard Marching Band and the Harvard-Radcliffe Gilbert and Sullivan Players. Career McGrath began his career as a musician, performing in the orchestra at the Trap National Park for the Performing Arts outside Washington, DC, while in college. After college he was a Broadway press agent at the Center in Washington, DC, work that included the original Broadway production of Annie and the first national tour of Chorus Line.  He also handled the U.S. Bicentennial visits of the La Scala Opera, Berlin Opera, Royal Ballet, Cuba National Ballet, Bolshoi Opera and Ballet and the Stuttgart Ballet.  These visits included the US debut of Jos Carreras and the American debut of the recently defected, Russian dancer Baryshnikov. Columbia Pictures (The Coca-Cola Company) While in business school, McGrath wrote a thesis on future potential of the home videocassette for film distribution which brought him to the attention of Columbia Pictures then CEO, Vincent (later the commissioner of League Baseball). McGrath was then hired by Pictures in 1980 to start a home video distribution company as well as set up a licensing regime for the emerging pay TV channels such as HBO and Showtime, at a time when few had even heard of a videocassette.  While at Columbia,  McGrath wrote an econometric paper on movie theaters and video competition that contributed to the Justice Department lifting the 30-year old Paramount Consent Decree which had prohibited film companies from owning movie theatersafter which Columbia became the first motion picture studio since 1954 to acquire a chain of movie theaters. McGrath also lead the formation of Pictures, a partnership of Columbia, HBO and CBSthe first new movie studio in fifty yearswhich survives to this day as part of Sony Entertainment. With Brothers, Fox, Films and Thorn/EMI, McGrath formed Premiere International, Europes first Pay TV service.  McGrath also led the acquisition of Belwin-Mills Music by Columbia, as well as Embassy Television (All in the Family, among many other shows) and Merv Griffin productions (Wheel of Fortune and Jeopardy). President and CEO, Act III Communications After Columbia, McGrath started up Act III Communications in partnership with famed TV writer Lear, Bert Ellis, Scott Wallace and Paul Schaeffer. Act III was the first non-industry player to acquire movie theaters in a move that subsequently led to virtually all the major movie theater chains being acquired by financial players. Act III also owned TV stations (eventually becoming the largest Fox Network affiliate when that network was starting up), trade magazines such as Channels and produced a handful of movies. President of Time Warner International Broadcasting McGrath moved on in 1990 to become President of Time Warner International Broadcasting, where he worked with the legendary Steve Ross and HBOs Jeff Bewkes, now CEO of Time Warner; to take advantage of the deregulation of media internationally by launching radio and TV channels such as Classic FM in the UK, Channel Five (UK), VIVA-TV (Germany), the first major competitor to MTV and the only one to beat them in local ratings, NTV, a German language 24-hour news network in partnership with CNN, (TV) a national German TV network with Bertelsmann, and others. Chief Operating Officer, Viacom Entertainment Group After Time Warner International, McGrath became chief operating officer of the Viacom Entertainment Group following Viacoms acquisition of Pictures in 1994. At Viacom McGrath headed up Players Theaters which eventually obtained a 50% share of the Canadian market, and Cinemas International which led the effort to modernize international movie theaters by building almost 1,300 movie theater screens in 13 countries including Brazil, China, Italy, Japan, Germany and others.  McGrath acted as chairman of Famous Music, Paramounts music publishing subsidiary, doubling net publishers share; also heading up licensing and merchandising (launching the Cheers and Bubba Gump Shrimp Company restaurant chains) and corporate finance.McGrath also led up the build-up of the Paramount TV station group from 14 local independents to 27 stations for the launch of the UPN network, formerly Americas fifth major broadcast network. In new technology, he led the formation of Digital Cinema Initiatives, a movie studio effort to define standards for digital cinema projection, served on the committee for advanced DVD standards, formed the studio joint venture Movielink to offer internet downloading of major feature films, and led industry efforts to both combat internet film piracy and create viable online alternatives.While at Paramount, McGrath formalized and rationalized the use of off-balance-sheet film financing, making it an indispensable tool of modern film making, including over $4bn in German tax partnerships, $2bn in UK sale-leasebacks and the Melrose Film Partners slate financing.  Other accomplishments included the acquisition and mergers of Viacom Television, Spelling TV and Rysher Entertainment (more than doubling Paramounts TV library) and heading up Paramounts theme park division, then the fifth largest theme park operator in North America. Chairman, Key Brand Entertainment On January 25, 2008 it was announced that McGrath, in partnership with UK producer John Gore, had acquired the live theater division of Live Nation known as Across America.  The company trades under the parent name Key Brand Entertainment, Inc.BAA is the largest producer and touring production company for Broadway musicals in the US.  The company includes theaters in Boston, Baltimore and Minneapolis and a touring subscription series in 42 cities across the US.  It also has an interest in NETworks Presentations LLC, a producer of touring musicals; and an interest in The Booking Group, a New York-based booking agency specializing in touring theatrical productions.In December 2010 Key Brand acquired Broadway.com from Hollywood Media Corp.  Broadway.com is a secondary ticketing company specializing in last minute tickets for Broadway shows. Film Films produced by Act III under McGrath include: Fried Green Tomatoes, Stand by Me,Breaking In,and The Princess Bride. Theater First-class theatrical productions set up by McGrath include: Arsenic and Old Lace, Vacanza Romana (Holiday), Irving Berlins White Christmas, Footloose,Night Fever, Urban Cowboy, Flashdance, First Wive Club, Johnny Guitar, Ghost, Sunset Boulevard and the stage adaptation of Days with Marshall. McGrath received the Tony Award for Best Revival of a Play at the 2008 Tony Awards for Boeing-Boeing.  He received a Tony Award for Best Revival of a Musical for Hair at the 2009 awards ceremony.  McGrath received the Olivier Award for Best New Musical for the London production of Awakening at the 2010 BAFTA Awards.  At the 2010 Tony Awards McGrath received Tonys for Best Musical Revival for Cage aux Folles and for Best musical for Memphis.  He was also nominated for Best Revival of a Play for A View From The Bridge.McGrath has produced on Broadway:* How to Succeed in Business Without Really Trying Musical, Comedy March 27, 2011  present* Priscilla, Queen of the Desert Musical, Comedy March 20, 2011  Present* The Merchant of Venice Play, Drama November 13, 2010 - February 20, 2011* Harry Connick, Jr. in Concert Special, Concert, Solo July 15, 2010 - July 29, 2010* La Cage Aux Folles  Musical, Comedy April 18, 2010 - Current* Fela! (Assoc. Producer) Musical, Comedy Nov 23, 2009 - Jan 2, 2011* Promises, Promises  Musical, Comedy April 25, 2010 - Current* Million Dollar Quartet   Musical, Comedy April, 2010 - Current* Lend Me A Tenor  Comedy, Play April 4, 2010 - August 15, 2010* Dreamgirls in Assoc. with Tokyo Broadcasting; Bunkamura Theater Tokyo, Japan May 22-June 4, 2010* A View From the Bridge  Play, Drama January 24, 2010 - April 4, 2010* A Little Night Music  Musical, Comedy December 13, 2009 - January 9, 2011* Irving Berlins White Christmas  Musical, Comedy November 13, 2009 - January 4, 2010* Memphis  Musical, Comedy October 19, 2009 - Current* Desire Under the Elms Play, Drama April 27, 2009 - May 24, 2009* Hair  Drama March 26, 2009 - May 30, 2009* Next to Normal  Musical, Drama March 31, 2009 - June 27, 2010* God of Carnage  Play, Comedy March 22, 2009 - June 6, 2010* Impressionism   Play, Drama March 24, 2009 - May 10, 2009* Blithe Spirit Play, Comedy March 15, 2009 - July 19, 2009* Xanadu (Tokyo, Japan; in Assoc. with Tokyo Broadcasting) May 931, 2009* A Chorus Line (Tokyo, Japan; In Association with TBS Events)August 12 - September 30, 2009* Minskys  Musical, ComedyPremieres Broadway 2011 Original Production Ahmanson Theater Los Angeles* West Side Story  Musical, Drama Mar 19, 2009 - Present* Irving Berlins White Christmas Musical November 23 - January 4, 2009* title of show Musical,Comedy July 17, 2008 - October 12, 2008* 13  Musical, Comedy October 5, 2008 - January 4, 2009* Boeing-Boeing  Play, Comedy May 4, 2008 - January 4, 2009* A Catered Affair  Musical Apr 17, 2008 - July 27, 2008* Passing Strange  Musical February 28, 2008 - July 20, 2008* Cirque Dreams Special, Circus June 26, 2008 - August 24, 2008McGrath has produced in the London West End:* Million Dollar Quartet (Noel Coward Theatre) February 28, 2011  present* Sweet Charity (Theatre Royal Haymarket London) April 23, 2010 - November 8, 2010* Spring Awakening (Novello Theatre, London) March 21, 2009 - May 31, 2009 (Olivier Award, Best New Musical)* Hair  (Gielgud Theatre) April 14, 2010 - September 4, 2010* Saturday Night Fever (London Palladium) from the film by Paramount Pictures May 5, 1998 - Feb 26, 2000McGrath produced with Paramount Pictures:* Barefoot in the Park  Play, Comedy in assoc. with Paramount Pictures February 16, 2006 - May 21, 2006* Vacanze Romane (Roman Holiday) Opened February 16, 2004 Teatro Il Sistina; Rome, Italy* Johnny Guitar, The Musical (Off Broadway - Century Center) from the film by Paramount Pictures 2004 (2004 Outer Critics Circle Best New Musical)* Urban Cowboy  Musical from the film by Paramount Pictures March 27, 2003 - May 18, 2003* The Wild Party  Musical, Drama April 13, 2000 - June 11, 2000* Saturday Night Fever  MusicalBased on the film by Paramount/RSO October 21, 1999 - December 30, 2000* Footloose Musical, ComedyBased on the film by Paramount Pictures October 22, 1998 - July 2, 2000* A Funny Thing Happened on the Way to the Forum  Musical, Comedy April 18, 1996 - January 4, 1998* Roman Holiday in assoc. with Toho Productions Premiere October, 1998 Tokyo, Japan* Seven Guitars Play, Drama March 28, 1996 - September 8, 1996McGrath produced at Act III Communications: * Arsenic and Old Lace Revival,Play,Comedy Produced by Act III Communications June 19, 1986 - January 3, 1987As a press agent at the John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts* Annie Musical, Comedy Apr 21, 1977 - Jan 2, 1983Produced by the John F. Kennedy center for the Performing Arts  (Press Agent)* Music Is Musical, Comedy Dec 20, 1976 - Dec 26, 1976Produced by the John F. Kennedy center for the Performing Arts  (Press Agent)* The Merchant Play 	Nov 16, 1977 - Nov 20, 1977Produced by The John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts (Press Agent)* Caesar and Cleopatra Play, Comedy 	Feb 24, 1977 - Mar 5, 1977Produced by The John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts (Press Agent)* Dirty Linen & New-Found-Land Play, Farce 	Jan 11, 1977 - May 28, 1977Produced by arrangement with The John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts (Press Agent)* Fiddler on the Roof Musical, Comedy, Drama 	Dec 28, 1976 - May 21, 1977Produced by The John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts (Press Agent)* A Texas Trilogy Play 	Sep 21, 1976 - Oct 30, 1976Originally produced by The John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts (Press Agent) Theatrical Exhibition McGrath has a particular association with theatrical exhibition. In 1948 the U.S. Supreme Court decided the major film studios (Paramount, Universal etc.) must divest themselves of their movie theaters (the Paramount Consent Decree.) In 1985 Columbia Pictures, then a unit of The Coca-Cola Company, acquired a 58% interest in Walter Reade cinemas in New York.  Columbia (which had not been a signatory to the original decree as it had owned no Theaters then) submitted an econometric study by McGrath showing that the inter-relationship and growth of the Home Video, cable TV and subscription Pay TV businesses eliminated the need to consider exhibition as a unique product market.  The deal went forward and Pictures, Brothers, Universal and Paramount all subsequently acquired theaters. At Act III McGrath built what was then the 6th largest theater circuit (Scott Wallace, president), notable for its early adoption of digital sound and extensive roll-out of the THX sound system.  While at Paramount McGrath led the development of stadium-seated cinemas building 800+ stadium screens in Canada at Famous Players, eventually achieving a 50% market share; while spurring the re-birth of the contemporary international cinema business building some 1,300 screens in stadium megaplexes in 13 countries at United Cinemas International (UCI).  McGrath also pioneered the use of screen advertising in cinemas first at UCI in England (Joe Peixoto, president) and then introducing the idea to North America at Famous Players. He is responsible for the 2001, $15mm renovation of the historic Grumanns Chinese Theater in Hollywood which included the replication of the original tapestries, carpets and drapes from the designers hand-cut templates.  With AMC and Sumner Redstones Showcase, he formed the online movie ticketing company MovieTickets.com.  Finally, McGrath led the formation of Digital Cinema Intitiatives, a joint venture of the major studios, which developed the standards and technology for the introduction of digital cinema. In 2006 he worked with Blackstone to form Cineworld, the largest (by box office) theater circuit in the UK (Steve Wiener, ceo) which went public in an IPO in the Spring of 2007.  Cineworlds achievements include leading the introduction of 3D exhibition technology and currently has more than 50% of the 3D screens in the UK and Ireland. Senior Managing Director, Crossroads Media McGrath is currently Senior Managing Director of Media, a private equity backed acquisition vehicle. Most recently Crossroads acquired a controlling interest in Music, which manages the catalogs of Johnnie Cash, Willie Dixon, Annie Roboff, Harry Ruby, Stevie Ray Vaughan and others.  In June 2007 Bug Music acquired Windswept Music from Fuji (Japan), in 2011 they acquired Countdown Music in Germany.  Bug is currently the largest independent music publisher in North America. The acquisition of Windswept which added the 60s catalog Trio/Quartet to Bug, included songs such as (You Give Me) Fever,Do You Believe in Magic, Summer in the City and others.  McGrath also serves on the boards of V-Media, Cineworld (UK), the Entertainment Aramid Fund (a specialty hedge fund for the entertainment industry) and previously on the board of Gallery. References *Executives at the Gate, Vanity Fair *Springtime of the Moguls, Vanity Fair *Serious Money, Vanity Fair*Thomas B. McGrath Profile from Fathom.com*Norman Lear, Act III Communications*Gore and McGrath acquire Live Nation Legit Theater Biz from the NY Times*Bug Music Records Four Consecutive Quarters as #1 Indie Publisher from Billboard*Mining Gold in Tin Pan Alley from The Deal 9/15/2008*The New Song of Broadway from The Deal July 17, 2009*  Bug Music Number 99 on INC Magazine 500 Fastest Growing Small Companies from Inc. Magazine* Media Mogul Builds Broadway Empire from Crains New York Business December 30, 2009External links*Internet Broadway Database entry*Internet Movie Database entry*Famous Players Theaters*Crossroads Media (McGrath)*United Cinemas International*VIVA TV (German and English)*N-TV Nachrichten Fernsehen (in German)*Paramount Pictures*Bug Music* Broadway Across America*Movie Gallery Board of Directors*Cineworld Board of Directors*TBS Events; Tokyo, Japan*TED Profiles
2347104
Osborne_Beauclerk,_12th_Duke_of_St_Albans
Osbourne de Vere Beauclerk, 12th Duke of St Albans (16 October 1874 &ndash; 2 March 1964) was the son of Beauclerk, 10th Duke of St Albans.Osborne de Vere Beauclerk served as a Captain during the Boer War. In 1913 he spent an extended period of time in British Columbia, Canada where he was involved in mining investment. Part of his time there was spent camping with British travelogue writer Pike and the American mining engineer Latham Bond. During World War I he served as Aide-de-Camp to Field Marshal Haig. During his late eighties he spent a month traveling in the United States on a Greyhound unlimited travel pass.On 19 August 1918, He married Beatrix Beresford, Dowager Marchioness of Waterford and daughter of the 5th Marquess of Lansdowne. He died in 1964, aged 89 and childless, and his titles passed to his cousin, Charles Beauclerk.Sources*Home from the Hill: Three Gentleman Adventurers by Peter Murray*NY Times: Lord Osborne Beauclerk arrives at New YorkBeauclerk, 12. ksi St Albans
2350549
Allenheads
 Allenheads is a village in Northumberland, England, situated in the Pennines to the north of Weardale. It is the village at the highest altitude in England. Allenheads is situated 8 miles further along the river East Allen from Allendale. Being a former lead mining community, it is widely believed that it would not have existed if it wasnt for the industry, it being too high for other types of settlement.The village currently hosts The Hemmel (caf), The Allenheads Inn and the Heritage Centre.Image:Samara.jpeg|left|thumb|A Samara car in Allenheads, photographed in England - December 1992The Highforest Show is held on the first Saturday of September each year. The show is a community event, organised by a local committee, and allows the village to showcase its various talents. Each year there is usually a quoits competition, dog show and childrens attractions and stalls.  Governance Allenheads is in the parliamentary constituency of Hexham.References External links * Up-to-date weather news, including temperature, wind speed, air pressure, and information about past weather* Local resident Peter Mathews has set up a webcam in the village, for a live feed giving weather information, and an overview of the village: http://www.peterm1.camarades.com/pl:Allenheads
2361731
RBM
RBM is a three-letter acronym. It refers to:*The Back Malaria (RBM) Partnership, the global framework to implement coordinated action against malaria.*bone marrow, a tissue found at the core of large bones*Based Maintenance; risk assessment software (RBM-software)*Restricted Boltzmann Machine, a type of neural network used in artificial intelligence applications*Belt Music, a San Franciscan band*Merganser, a diving duck*des Bains de Mer a group of metre gauge railways centred on Noyelles-sur-Mer in France*Bank of Malawi, a central bank in Republic of Malawi*Rotational Brownian motion*Bart Mampaey, a racing team competing in the Touring Car Championship, running the BMW Team RBM operation*Bay Minerals, a South African mining company*Bound Material*Banned Member,a member of a forum who was previously banned returning under a different handleReferencesde:RBMit:RBM
2370419
List_of_songs_about_Birmingham,_Alabama
This is a list of songs written about the city of Alabama:* Hiatt, Train to Birmingham* Autry, Birmingham Daddy* Farina, Birmingham Sunday, recorded by Baez* Belafonte and B. Greaves, Birmingham, Alabama* Blackhawk, Postmarked Birmingham* Cockburn, Birmingham Shadows (1995)* Daniels Band, Birmingham Bus Station (1994)* DiFranco, Hello Birmingham(Song lyrics)* Dorsey, Birmingham Bounce (1946)* Truckers, Birmingham (2002)* Ellington, Birmingham Breakdown (1926)* Harris,  Boulder to Birmingham* Hawkins, Junction* Charlie Johnson, Birmingham Black Bottom (1927)* Johnson, I Got a Man in a Bama Mine (1937)* Lawrence, Me a Birmingham (2004)* Leadbelly, Jail* Skynyrd, Home Alabama (1974)* Marshall, Birmingham* Mellencamp, When Jesus Left Birmingham (1993)* Moore, Sweet Birmingham (first recorded by Taj Mahal)* Lee Murphy,  Breakfast in Birmingham* Newman, Birmingham* Ochs, Talking Birmingham Jam (1965)* of the Mississippi,  Down and Out in Birmingham* Rouse, Sparrows over Birmingham* Smith, Mining Camp Blues (1925)* Telluride,  Birmingham Tonight* Waters, Birmingham Bertha (1929) (from with the Show!)* Whitley, Birmingham Turnaround* Williams, Pratt City Blues (1932)* Wilson, Waller (and many others) Birmingham Blues (1921)Birmingham is also mentioned in the following:* Berry, Promised Land (later remade as a 1975 hit for Presley)* Hornsby, Jacobs Ladder (first recorded by Lewis and the News, (1987)* Richard, Hey, Hey, Hey, Hey* Skynyrd, Sweet Home Alabama* Waits, Swordfishtrombone (1983)* Waits, Gun Street Girl (1985)* Amos, Playboy Mommy  (1998)* Truckers, One of These Days* Offutt Irwin, Maribel* Frank Perkins/Parish, Fell on Alabama (1934)* Lovett, I Cant Love You Anymore* Ledbetter/Jam, Betty* Rolling Stones, Rip This Joint (1972)* Heads, Cities (1979)* Sean Hayes, Alabama Chicken (2003)* Steeldrivers, If It Hadnt Been For Love (2008)* Reed, Guitar Man (1967)References* Directory of African-Appalachian musicians (March 22, 2004) Black Music Research Journal
2371307
List_of_Star_Wars_planets_(OQ)
Obroa-SkaiObroa-Skai is the home of the oldest and most extensive neutral knowledge archive in the galaxy. It is located in the Inner Rim a stones throw form Myrkr and the Perlemian Trade Route.Admiral Thrawn used the Obroa-Skai database to find information vital to his plot.  It was captured by the Vong relatively early in their invasion, and was used to further their knowledge of the Wars galaxy.(J. Anderson, Darksaber (1995). ISBN 0-553-57611-9)(Slavicsek, The Heir to the Empire Sourcebook, ed. End Games (1992). ISBN 0-87431-186-1)OdosOdos is a backwater planet in the Sector, located near the Spangled Veil Nebula and Exodo II.(Hambly, of Twilight (1997). ISBN 0-553-09540-4)OjomOjom, located in the Deep Core, is a frigid ocean world speckled with enormous glaciers that slowly move across the planets surface. Each glacier supports a small community of the semi-humanoid Besalisks. Ojom has many space stations orbiting it, most of them larger than the Besalisk glaciers. These stations fill the role of Ojoms spaceports, and are more hospitable than the planet itself.Omiddelon IIIOmiddelon III is a planet in the Omiddelon system. The planet has four seasons: an intensely hot climate, a brief mild season, an extremely freezing winter, and another mild season. The planet, whos orbital and rotational axes are perpendicular, is home to the adar creatures.OnderonOnderon is one of three planets in the Stenness Node in the Japreal System. Onderon has a humid climate, and was once home to a primitive race of humanoids. Like many other fringe worlds, the Onderonians have a distrust of aliens. Onderons largest moon is Dxun which is largely jungle and mountain terrain. Onderon had a power struggle within the royal family five years after the Civil War, which was aided by the Exile.(Tom Veitch et al., Knights of the Old Republic, Book 1 of of the Jedi (1994). ISBN 1-56971-020-1)(Tom Veitch et al., The Freedon Nadd Uprising, Book 2 of Tales of the Jedi (1996). ISBN 1-56971-307-3)(Kevin J. Anderson et al., Dark Lords of the Sith, Book 3 of Tales of the Jedi (1996). ISBN 1-56971-095-3)(Kevin J. Anderson, The Sith War, Book 4 of Tales of the Jedi (1996). ISBN 1-56971-173-9)(Daniel Wallace and Scott Kolins, The Essential Guide to Planets and Moons (Star Wars) (1998). ISBN ISBN 0-345-42068-3)Oovo IVThe planet of Oovo IV hosts many podracing events due to its low gravity. It is also the site of an asteroid prison from which Fett and Zam Wesell both attempted to recover the smuggler Fust. Fett then acquired a Firespray patrol craft, that would later become his I. The planet shows up in the videogame Wars: Bounty Hunter and in the  videogame Wars: Episode I Racer. Podrace tracks include Vengeance, Executioner and The Gauntlet.(Entertainment Company, Wars: Episode I Racer for 64 and PC.)OphideraanOphideraan is the planet once ruled by the Masters, who enslaved people until Skywalker freed them. This was the time in between Star Wars Episodes IV and V. Also, Shire is a native to Ophideraan that met Luke in the shipyards of Fondor.Ord CestusOrd Cestus is a planet that is home to the Xting. It was a giant prison that was eventually changed into a world with an economy based on weapon building.(Stephen Barnes, Cestus Deception: A Clone Wars Novel)Ord IbannaOrd Ibanna is a giant like Bespin planet located in the Outer Rim. It is home to the Gandalorian prostitute training camp, as featured in the Empire series. It was at one time home to several podraces, including Scrappers Run, Dethros Revenge and Abyss.(Ord Ibanna looks a lot like City.Ord Mantellthumb|150px|Ord MantellOrd Mantell is a scrap heap planet on the Rim. It is home to mercenaries, exiles, murderers, smugglers and all other sorts of illegals. The planet is first mentioned (as Ord Mandell) in The Empire Strikes Back, depicted in an audio story entitled Mission to Ord Mantell, and seen in the video games Wars: Shadows of the Empire and in Wars: Jedi Knight: Jedi Academy. Ord Mantell has a mostly human population with Talz, Ithorians, Rodians, and Arcona representing it as well.Ord Mantell is a planet with a yellowish atmosphere and greyish-yellow hue to the environment, likely due to extensive pollution from junked starships and other mechanical apparatus.Ord Mantell was founded in the year 12,000 BBY as an Old Republic base. The Jedi Knight Pablo-Jiil brought peace to this world until Palpatine and the Galactic Empire took over. Once the Empire was defeated, the planet had dozens of run-ins with hunters including Skorr, Dengar, Bossk, and Fett. Solo, Chewbacca, Skywalker, and other major Rebel heroes had connections to Ord Mantell. In the story Rebel Mission to Ord Mantell (which takes place shortly before the events in The Empire Strikes Back), Solo confronts a bounty hunter named Cypher, who tries to capture Solo for delivery to the Hutt. In the year 9 ABY, the New Republic added Ord Mantell to its territory. The following year Admiral Thrawn attacked the planet to keep the New Republic off balance. The planet also plays host to a large race known as the Runners Derby. Han Solo himself is a three-time winner of the race.The prefix Ord refers to Ordnance Regional Depot. Ords are storage and disposal facilities for outdated weapons and military equipment used during the Old Republic era. Some of these facilities are also used by the Empire. It has been referenced in Star Wars Knights of the Old Republic II: The Sith Lords.(Steve Perry, Wars: Shadows of the Empire (1999). ISBN 0-553-57413-2)(Lucas et al., The Annotated Screenplays (1997). ISBN ISBN 0-345-40981-7)(Ord Mantell is a part of the Wars Battlefront: Renegade Squadron story, and is a playable map, mostly in junkyard-like areas where a large hollow hull of a ship can be found, in addition to an energy complex, with cantinas and buildings seen in the distance.Ord Mantell is also part of the Wars Galaxies story, and a station in the system, Tansarii Point Station, is the tutorial area for new players.Ord TassonOrd Tasson is located in the Ord system.Ord Mantell is also seen, in the introduction, in the Star Wars galaxies online video game.OrinackraThe Rebel spy Crix Madine was held on Orinackra for a time in an Imperial detention facility. In Wars: Dark Forces, he was rescued by Katarn, after which Madine could provide more information on the Trooper project.OsarianOsarian is a lush, green planet with forests, white sand beaches, and sprawling cities. The forests consist of giant wroshyr trees, like Kashyyyk. The citizens are usually human, because this planet is believed to be a human homeworld. It is located in the same rim of the galaxy as Kashyyyk and Naboo. Osarian is not even mentioned in any Star Wars movie or video game, much less pictured.OssusOssus was once a training ground for the Order, and was the location of a vast museum of Jedi artifacts and ancient lore. During the Sith War, Sith Lord Kun caused a star in the nearby Cron Cluster to go supernova, the shockwave from which would have terrible effects on the planet. The Jedi rescued as many artifacts as they could, and had to leave the rest behind. The Neti Master Ood Bnar stood over a cache of lightsabers and turned himself into his giant tree form, surviving the shockwave and protecting his charge for over 4,000 years, until he awakened to fight Sedriss during the reign of the reborn Emperor.((Tom Veitch, Dark Empire II (1995). ISBN ISBN 1-56971-119-4)(It is believed that the Order was created on Ossus.In the Legacy of the Force series, Ossus was a planet with a Jedi academy. It was held hostage by GAG forces in the novel Sacrifice.OvoratOvorat is a Core World located in the Ovorat System along the Trade Spine between Duro and Corellia. Ovorat was a contract holder with the Galactic Economic Expansion and Investment Authority (G.E.E.I.A.) some two hundred years BBY. Much like the majority of other worlds that were part of the program, Eia Ovorats effort to build a major trading center along the Trade Spine failed miserably, with the Republic losing millions of credits in the investment. However, the Overatians made a surprising comeback.In the aftermath of the project, Eia Ovorats government, a democratically elected governing council called the Schwetta (its members were called Schwettari) wanted erase the memory of the disastrous project and so erased the Eia prefix from its name. The G.E.E.I.A. caused a sizeable portion of the planets landscape to be ruined by commercial development (which failed). The Schwetta decided to invest in converting the commercial district into a park filled with state-of-the-art rides and attractions. EnterSpace, as it came to be called, eventually became the galaxys preeminent amusement park, attracting millions of tourists yearly to the Ovorat System. The success of the theme park brought enormous revenue onto the planet, which allowed the Schwetta to clean up the planets cities and preserve much of the planets surface as nature preserves.During the Vong invasion of the galaxy, the invaders laid siege to Ovorat. The New Republic managed to hold the Vong off and Ovorat was saved from Vong oppression. The capital city of the planet is the city of Piassu.PachaPacha is the beautiful water world of the aquatic Lomin species. It was an oceanic resort world with casino submarines. It was attacked by Grand Admiral Thrawn in ABY. Loran of Squadron was from Pantolomin.PalanhiPalahi was colonized by humans in 4,000 BBY. Forty years later they built large cities to cover the vast grasslands. The wildlife are a type of grassland bantha, thrantas, krahbus and vesps.PannaPanna is a water planet introduced in the animated segment of Star Wars Holiday Special. Its surface has an orange hue to it, and the oceans seem to be composed of a thick liquid with a high tension. The name perhaps is an allusion to the Italian word for whipped cream, panna, which also has a thick consistency. It apparently has at least one major city established. The city was known to have been occupied by the Empire, as evidenced in The Holiday Special. Troops marched through the city, keeping a watch. In The Holiday Special, Fett makes a trip to the city to get a serum to cure a sleeping virus contracted by Solo and Skywalker from a talisman Han was searching for. It was in this city that Fett first revealed his true allegiance, when he made contact with Vader via viewscreen, and updated him on his progress in attempting to capture the rebels.Shipwrights manufactured the Vanda, a submersible cruiser that operated in the famous oceans of Pantolomin. This world is also considered the birthplace of the beverage lomin-ale.Peragus IIPeragus II refers to a planet rich in fuel which appeared in the game of the Old Republic II. During the first attempts to mine the planet, an accidental blaster shot ignited the fuel, and a sizeable chunk of the planet blew off into space, exposing the planets core, and forming a small asteroid field. The explosion rendered the planet uninhabitable. So, mining then took place solely in the asteroid belt. An HK-50 droid, stowed away aboard the Ebon Hawk, manipulated the droids and miners into killing each other off, to preserve the Jedi Exiles bounty for itself. After a short battle between the Ebon Hawk, and the Republic Cruiser, Harbinger, the asteroid field was completely destroyed, possibly taking the rest of the planet with it. The destruction of Peragus II meant that many planets suffered the loss of fuel, notably Telos--which was being reconstructed after being decimated during the Jedi Civil War--and had a space station over the planet. Without the fuel the space station would drift into the planet and cause another massive disaster.PhindarPhindar was a planet in the Outer Rim Territories, near Mandalore sector. It was controlled by a criminal organization, the Syndicat, until 44 BBY, when it was overthrown by the Jedi Knights Jinn and Kenobi. The Phindians then elected a Governor. The planet was orbited by Phindar Station, which was twice attacked by the Confederacy of Independent Systems in 20 BBY, during the Clone Wars. The planet was an early member of the New Republic. PollillusThis planet was home to the double-headed Troig species.  This system was in the Koornacht Cluster.  It was discovered shortly before the Battle of Naboo, which took place at 32 B.B.Y. (Before the Battle of Yavin)Polis MassaPolis Massa, the birthplace of Skywalker and Leia Organa, was once an arid, barren planetoid and the origin of a colony of resulting asteroids. It was originally the  homeworld of the little-known Eellayin civilization, who dwelt in underground cities such as Wiyentaah, but the world was fractured by a mysterious cataclysm. This natural disaster formed a field of asteroids known as Polis Massa, especially the largest of them. The Eellayin civilization disappeared.About BBY, the Kallidahin from Kallidah, another world in the sector, abandoned their homeworld and under the leadership of the Research Council of Kallidah settled Massa Base. They sought to prove the Eellayin were the ancestors of the Kallidahin through cloning tissue samples recovered in their digs. The most important find was the lost city of Wiyentaah (not far from the Research Base), discovered BBY. began an archaeological mining project on this planetoid, to uncover the mysteries of the cataclysm and the native species it destroyed. The Dig was established over Wiyentaah. Such was the length of this project, the Kallidahin became known as Polis Massans themselves.Excavations on the largest Polis Massa asteroids uncovered many prize artifacts, mostly from deep within the planetoid. The Polis Massans analyzed these artifacts for organic tissue suitable for cloning. Though the aliens frequented the Subterrel Sector, they had little contact with the galaxy and as a whole, the Polis Massa outpost remained remote and hidden.The gravitational pull on the rocky colony was just strong enough to be harmful to those who walked the surface without the proper equipment or protection. However, the facilities built on the asteroids were especially gravity-controlled inside and so suitable for living in. Polis Massa was technically a loyal part of the Galactic Republic and friendly to the Jedi. Far from any major route, the remote settlement served as an emergency sanctuary for the Jedi after Order 66, during the rise of the Empire and Palpatines Jedi Purge. The colony also housed the medical facilities in which Padm Amidala Skywalker gave birth to the twins Luke and Leia, and subsequently died, having lost her will to live. It was here that Organa chose to adopt Leia into his family. When Yoda arrived with Bail, he was visited by the specter of Jinn who offered to tutor Kenobi in the art of surviving ones death with the consciousness still intact.Not long after the formation of the Galactic Empire, the Inquisitors Malorum and Sancor began investigations of Polis Massa, discovering much information to be sent to Vader. In a fateful run-in with Obi-Wan Kenobi at the Research Base, Sancor lost his life.During the Civil War, shortly before the Battle of Yavin, Imperial intelligence tracked the Star plans to a small Rebel outpost in the medical center. The Legion stormed the facility, and managed to obtain one holodisc. Overall, the raid was only a partial success, with the Rebels beaming the remainder of the plans to Leia Organas corvette, the IV, orbiting over Tatooine.Polis Massa did not attract the attention of the Vong and was not damaged by the war that their incursion had caused.Polis Massa also makes an appearance in Wars: Battlefront II.PraesitlynPraesitlyn is a planet in Sluis Sector. It is also a major hub for communication between sectors. Praesitlyn was under attack by the Separatist Admiral Pors Tonith.A small taskforce containing 20,000 clone troops, Jedi Master Neeja Halcyon, and Padawan Anakin Skywalker was dispatched to reinforce the defenders of Praesitlyn, including the rogue Zozridor Slayke. The Republic was not able to defeat the C.I.S. in ship to ship combat, but Anakin Skywalker took 20 clone troops and landed in the enemy base to rescue the hostages so that planetary bombardment could take place. However, after rescuing the hostages, Anakin captured Admiral Pors Tonith, thus saving countless lives. Then, the Republic prevented Separatist reinforcements from landing. For his heroic actions, Yoda then promoted Anakin to the rank of a Jedi Knight.(Wikia.com)PriaPria is the homeworld of the Priapulin, where the Intergalactic Communications Center stood during the late years of the Old Republic, and where Skywalkers Jedi test as commander of a fleet against a Separatist army was held.PylifPylif is peaceful planet. The planet is Colonized by Pylifians. The Jedi made it their main training ground around 175 ABY. The planets forests are covered in enormous mushrooms. The Oceans of Pylif cover up most of the planet. The Enormous trees cover up all the sunshine from reaching the planets floor. The Jedi go there for constructing most of their lightsabers in the center of the jedi Counsel  memorial. It also was the planet where Jacean Skywalker was killed. It is located near the planet Dakarop.PzobPzob is an Outer Rim planet in the remote and uncharted K749 System. It is covered in thick heavy forests and swamps. It was colonized by nomadic Gamorreans decades prior to the formation of the Empire. Eighteen years after the Battle of Yavin, a secret Imperial base was established there as a supply station for the Eye of Palpatine and staffed by forty-five stormtroopers. All but one trooper had been killed by skirmishes with the hostile Gamorreans as they waited for the ship that would never arrive.(Barbara Hambly, of the Jedi (1995). ISBN ISBN 0-553-57293-8)QoribuQoribu is a ringed gas giant in the Gyuel system with 55 moons, including Jwlio, Evyl, Zvbo, Ruu, Nrogu, and Kr.QuermiaQuermia is the homeworld of the Quermian species, and the Quermian Jedi Master Yarael Poof.QuiluraQuilura is a planet filled with grasslands, forests, and rivers. The species of the planet (Gurlanins) can shapeshift into anything or anybody of any shape or size. The only reference is the Republic Commando book series.Referencesplanet ve svt Star Warsde la Guerre des toilesdi Guerre Stellarija:Gwiezdnych wojen
2375348
Walter_H._Kansteiner,_III
RepublicanWalter H. Kansteiner, III (born November 14, 1955) was the States Assistant Secretary of State for African Affairs from June 2001 until November 2003. Career In the late 1980s, Kansteiner was appointed Director of Economic Studies at the on Religion and Democracy.(http://www.fpif.org/commentary/2001/0104kansteiner.html) In May 1989, Kansteiner joined the Departments policy planning staff as Africa director.  He served in this position until June 1991, when he moved to the National Security Council as director for African affairs. In April 1992, he was appointed as the National Security Council Deputy Press Secretary.(http://bushlibrary.tamu.edu/research/papers/1992/92042203.html)As a founding Principal of Scowcroft Group,(http://www.scowcroft.com/html/staff/kansteiner.html) Kansteiner has advised corporations on a wide range of mergers, acquisitions and privatizations throughout Africa in the telecommunications, forestry, mining, financial services, health care and aviation industries.  Kansteiner advised the buy side on the $1.3 billion privatization of Telkom South Africa, to date the largest privatization in Africa. He also was Executive Vice President of W.H. Kansteiner, Inc. in Chicago, an agricultural commodity trading and manufacturing company specializing in tropical commodities in the developing world.(http://www.worldpolicy.org/projects/arms/updates/050701.htm)(http://allafrica.com/stories/200103080004.html)In June 2001 he was appointed by Powell as Assistant Secretary of State for African Affairs.  In 2003, he left the post, citing family reasons.(http://www.state.gov/r/pa/ho/po/12045.htm)(http://georgewbush-whitehouse.archives.gov/news/releases/2002/03/20020318.html) He was appointed in April 2004 as independent non-executive director to the board of Limited.(http://www.spescom.co.za/news.asp?menuID144)Kansteiner is on the Board of Directors of the Council on Africa,(http://www.africacncl.org/About_CCA/board.asp) Development Foundation,(http://www.leadershipdirectories.com/fmfyb9.htm) and Rutile.(http://www.kfmb.com/story.php?id16349)FamilyKansteiner is married, has two children Beverly and Chalker, and resides in Middleburg, Virginia. His wife, Frances Kansteiner,  is from Alabama.  Her father Houston Blount, ran Vulcan Materials for many years and his brother Winton M. Red Blount, Postmaster General in Nixons cabinet. She is a Board member of the Foundation. Red and his brother, Houston, founded Blount Brothers Construction, a large construction and manufacturing firm formerly headquartered in Montgomery.  It was later renamed Blount International and moved to Portland, Oregon. Frances Kansteiner was an Officer, Director and Advisor to the Foundation. http://www.wild.org/about/board.html  She also on the board of Stratford Hall.Memberships and Affiliations*States Department of Defense, Strategic Minerals Task Force*Senior Associate of Forum for International Policy*Member of on Foreign Relations*Senior Associate of the for Strategic and International Studies*Steering Committee and International Advisory Board Member of New Global Economy Project*Board member of WildlifeDirectExternal links* US Department of State: Assistant Secretary of State for African Affairs Walter H. Kansteiner to Travel to Angola and Nigeria* Excerpts at Special Briefing - leaves U.S. State Dept by Walter H. Kansteiner III, Assistant Secretary of State for African Affairs, States Department of State October 28, 2003, Washington, D.C.* http://www.rasmusen.org/x/archives/c/archives/cat_cia.html* Letter to Bush Regarding Kansteiner Cynthia McKinney, Member of Congress* Bio - Walter KansteinerReferences
2378911
Lesotho_Highlands_Water_Project
thumb|right|300px|Katse Dam reservoir and intake towerThe Lesotho Highlands Water Project  is an ongoing water supply project with a hydropower component, developed in partnership between the governments of Lesotho and Africa. It comprises a system of several large dams and tunnels throughout Lesotho and Africa. In Lesotho, it involves the rivers Malibamatso, Matsoku, Senqunyane and Senqu. In South Africa, it involves the River. It is Africas largest water transfer scheme.The purpose of the project is to provide Lesotho with a source of income in exchange for the provision of water to the central Gauteng province where the majority of industrial and mining activity occurs in South Africa, as well as to generate hydroelectric power for Lesotho (currently almost 100% of Lesothos requirements).Efforts to create a dam in the location were spearheaded by then British High Commissioner Sir Baring in the 1950s. After a complete feasibility study was conducted between August 1983 and August 1986 (German-British Lahmeyer MacDonald Consortium was appointed for this task), the project eventually began to realize.The project has also been alleged to have had negative social and environmental effects. While compensation was provided in kind and paid to the few hundred households affected by the dams, there is criticism that it was insufficient.(Pipe Dreams, 2001, Ryan Hoover, International Rivers) It was not intended to address the water supply problems in Lesotho, but by paying royalties to the Lesotho Government for development purposes benefits have reached much of the population.In recent years, water from the scheme has been discharged into the Mohokare (Caledon) river to provide water to Maseru in times of critical shortages. The new dams have filled as anticipated and discharge of water from the dams into the downstream rivers continues in a scheme devised to preserve ecological balances. This discharged water flows to the Senqu (Orange) and while preserving the ecological status quo benefits only those communities along the rivers.The project has had an important impact on Lesothos infrastructure, as hundreds of kilometers of engineered paved roads were built in order to improve access to the different construction sites, and, together with engineered unpaved feeder roads around the dams, continue to provide much improved communication for many villages in the mountainous interior. Since its inception the project has been dogged by corruption which has resulted in a number of court cases involving both individuals and multinational corporations.(Information Portal on Corruption and Governance in Africa, .) Project features Below is an overview of the main features of the first three phases of the project.* The values are estimates based on the feasibility study, and may differ from the current or eventual values, respectively. Phase I  Phase IA: Katse Dam This phase of the project was completed 1998. It consisted mainly of the construction of:* The dam, a concrete arch dam, across the Malibamatso river.* The Matsoku weir and tunnel, to collect an input from the Matsoku river to the east.* A 48.2 km long transfer tunnel between the Katse reservoir and the Muela hydroelectric power station, in northern Lesotho.* A 110 MW hydropower plant at Muela with an embankment dam with central impermeable core.* A delivery tunnel which draws water from Muela and carries it underneath the Caledon River at the Lesotho/South Africa border and underneath the Little Caledon River at Clarens to discharge it into the Ash river from where it flows into the Wilge River and eventually into the Vaal River.Although the Katse dam has power generation capability for local use, the primary purpose is as the storage basin for Phase IA and provide discharge into the transfer tunnel. Phase IB: Mohale Dam This phase of the project was completed 2002 EMMA. It consisted mainly of the construction of:* The dam, a very large rockfill dam, located on the Senqunyane river.* A transfer tunnel between Mohale and the Katse reservoir.The system is interconnected in such a way that water may be transferred in either direction for storage in Mohale or ultimate transfer to South Africa through the Katse reservoir. Later phases As initially conceived, three further dams were proposed further downstream after the Malimbamatso joins the Senqu river, at Mashai, Tsoelike, and Ntoahae.In 2007, further studies resulted in a modification, proposing instead a dam on the Senqu upstream from the confluence with the Malibamatso. This is currently the preferred extension of the scheme, although construction has not yet begun (as of December 2007). References  External links * Lesotho Highlands Development Authority* Trans Caledon Tunnel Authority picture gallery* Lesotho corruption trial relating to project* Lesotho Highlands Further Phases Feasibility Studyaf:Lesotho-Hoogland-waterprojekHighlands Water ProjectMagasfldi Vzltestmny
2387970
Polar_ecology
Polar ecology is the relationship between plants and animals in a polar environment. Polar environments are in the Arctic and Antarctic regions. Arctic regions are in the northern hemisphere, and it contains land and the islands that surrounds it. Antarctica is in the southern hemisphere and it also contains the land mass, surrounding islands and the ocean. Polar regions also contain the subantarctic and subarctic zone which separate the polar regions from the temperate regions. Antarctica and the Arctic lie in the polar circles. The polar circles are not visible on the earth but it is shown on maps to be the areas that receives less sunlight due to less radiation. These areas either receive sunlight or shade 24 hours a day because of the earths tilt. Plants and animals in the polar regions are able to withhold living in harsh weather conditions but are facing environmental threats that limit their survival.ClimatePolar climates are cold, windy and dry. Much of the radiation from the sun that is received is reflected off the snow making the polar regions cold (Stonehouse, 23). When the radiation is reflected, the heat is also reflected. The polar regions reflect 89-90% of the sun radiation that the earth receives (Stonehouse, 24). And because Antarctica is closer to the sun, it receives 7% more radiation than the Antarctic. Also in the polar region, the atmosphere is thin. Because of this the radiation that gets to the atmosphere can cause fast tanning and can cause snow blindness (Stonehouse, 29).Polar regions are dry areas; there is very little precipitation due to the cold air. There are some times when the humidity may be high but the water vapor present in the air may be low. Wind is also strong in the polar region. Wind carries snow creating blizzard like conditions. Winds may also move small organisms or vegetation if it is present (Stonehouse, 44). The wind blows the snow making snow dunes which may exist even in the spring when the snow is thawing out (Stonehouse, 44). It is hard for meteorologists to measure the amount of precipitation. This is because it is expensive to take care of the stations that collect weather data and it hard for them to measure snow fall amounts because the wind blows the snow too much to calculate exact amounts.The temperatures are similar between the Arctic and Antarctica. The temperatures in the Arctic are different depending on the location. Temperatures in the Arctic have a higher range than in the Antarctic. Temperatures can range as much as 100 C. Along the coast in the Arctic temperatures average -30to-40o Celsius in December, January and February (Stonehouse, 48). The ice melts along the coast during the summer months which are around June, July and August and the temperature may rise a few degrees above freezing causing there to be some vegetation. During these same months in the northern regions there will be 24 hours of daylight. Arctic regions also receive a lot of snowfall. The Arctic Basin has snow 320 days out of the year while the Arctic Seas have snow cover 260 days a year (Melnikov, 14). The thickness of the snow averages 3040 cm (Melnikov, 14). In Greenland, temperatures have an average temperature of -40 C in the winter and in the summer the temperatures reach -12 C. Iceland on the other hand is in a subarctic region meaning it is near the temperate zone. Because of this the temperatures are above the freezing point throughout much of the year. In Russia temperatures are extremely cold. In Verkhoyansk, Siberia it has reached the coldest temp of -68.8 C in the northern Hemisphere (Stonehouse, 51). The temperatures in the summer in Siberia can get to 36 C.  In the Antarctic there is less temperature variations. Temperatures only range by around 30 C. The winter months are May till September while the summer months will be October till April. The sun reappears in September which then starts the 24 hours of daylight. The temperatures are different between the plateaus in Antarctica and between the coasts. The plateaus are the coldest regions of Antarctica (Stonehouse, 52). In the summer months there is low precipitation with light winds. Vostok has received the lowest temperature worldwide getting as low as -88.3 C in 1960. The West Antarctica plateau reaches snow levels of around 30 cm. This area is also warmer but it receives the heaviest snow and receives more wind. Because of the cold desert like conditions on the plateaus there are very little plants and animals. Some species of birds though have been seen.On the coasts in the summer there is more wind, and it is cloudier. Coasts with higher latitudes have a temperature of -24 C in the winter months whereas lower latitude coasts get down to -20 C. Coastal areas may receive 40 cm or more of snow.WaterWater is an important part of human survival. Because of its cold temperature much of the earths water comes from the polar regions. 90% of the worlds water comes from the Antarctic ice cap although a lot of this water is not used (Stonehouse, 106). Water environments are important for many species around the world. Many bacteria thrive there as well as algae and flora. Many of the ponds or lakes in polar regions are frozen over or snow covered for most of the year. Larger lakes thaw out around the edges during the warmer months while the smaller lakes thaw entirely. There are few rivers in the polar regions. The Arctic has more rivers compared to Antarctica. The regions also have ponds. The ponds that attract birds tend to be rich in nutrients. This is because of the bird droppings or bird feathers (Stonehouse, 109). There are two different types of lakes in polar regions including Arctic lakes and Antarctic lakes. Of the Arctic lakes they include glacial lakes and permafrost lakes.The polar regions include the Arctic Ocean and the Southern Ocean. The Arctic ocean covers 14 million km squared (Stonehouse, 127). In the spring the ice covers an area of 5-8 million km squared and in the winter it is twice that. In this area it is never totally ice covered. This is due to the winds breaking up the ice. Because of these cracks in the ice there is more biological productivity in the ocean.The Ocean is 28 million km squared. This ocean contains the Sea and Sea. The ocean contains large packs of ice that surrounds Antarctica. At minimum it may be 3-5 million km squared but in the winter months it spreads to 17-20 million km squared. The average thickness of the ice is 12 meters thick. The packs of ice are pushed away due to winds. This is the time that animals such as seabirds and seals start to bread in this area. Temperatures of the Southern Ocean range from -1 C to 3 C.LandDue to the cold weather it is hard for plants to grow. Frozen ground covers most of the polar regions for the majority of the year. Permafrost reaches a thickness of 600-1000m deep. Large amounts of permafrost can lead to poor water drainage. Due to the permafrost the water in the soil remains frozen for most of the year. In the summer the top of the permafrost may be covered with water due to melting in the area (Stonehouse, 69).   Weathering is also common in polar regions. There is rubble from rocks that are scattered on the land due to movement of glaciers. Also due to quick temperature change causes weathering.  The main type of soil in the polar regions is soil. This includes the cold desert soil. This soil consists of sand that is frozen. These soils tend to not have a lot of vegetation. In this soil there is bacteria that have been found.The other type of soil is organic soil. This type of soil is found in areas that are warmer and have more moisture. Some vegetation that live here are algae, fungi and mosses. One type of organic soil is the brown soils. These soils have drainage. Animals Due to the harsh weather in the polar regions, there are not many animals. The animals that do exist in the polar region are similar between the Antarctic and Arctic. The animals do differ by the temperature. In the Arctic some invertebrates include spiders, mites, mosquitoes and flies. In warmer areas of the polar regions moths, butterflies and beetles can be found. Some of the larger animals that exist are foxes, wolves, rabbits, hares, reindeer and caribou. There are various bird species that have been spotted in the Arctic. Eight species of birds reside on the polar tundra year round while only 150 breed in the Arctic (Stonehouse, 96). The birds that do breed go to the Arctic between May and July. One of the known birds is the snowy owl. The owl has enough fat on it to be able to survive in the cold temperatures.In the Antarctic some invertebrates that exist are mites, fleas and ticks. Antarctica is the only continent that does not have a land mammal population (Stonehouse, 105). There are also no birds that reside in Antarctica. Though, it has been known that various birds from South America have been spotted in Antarctica.  For animals to be able to live in the polar region they have to have adaptations which allow them to live in the cold and windy environments. These animals have originated with these adaptations, and animals that live in these regions are accumulating adaptations to be able to live in this type of environment. Some of these adaptations may be to be big and insolated, have a lot of fur, and to be darker. Also, many animals live in groups to be able to protect themselves from the cold. Animals also tend to be homeotherms which are animals that maintain a high temperature (177) Smaller invertebrates also tend to be smaller in polar regions which helps them conserve energy.There are also many different animals that live in the sea water near polar regions. Squids are one animal that live in both Antarctica and the Arctic. They are the food source for other large animals such as the male whale (Fogg, 202). There is also a wide variety of fish in the polar regions. Arctic cod is a major species in the Arctic. Halibut, cod, herring, and walleye Pollock are some other types of fish. In Antarctica there is not a lot of diversity among the fish; there is a lot of the same kind. Silverfish and Myctophidae are some examples of fish that live in Antarctica (Fogg, 204).  Seals are also found in polar regions. The population of seals is around 2.5 million (Fogg, 206). They are known to breed on land in the polar regions. Whales are also in the polar regions and can be found near the surfaces of water where they prey.There are also birds that breed in the polar regions. In the Arctic, 95% of the birds breeding here consist of only four different species. These include the northern fulmar, kittiwake, the little auk and the thick billed murre. These birds breed here when the ice starts to thaw and when there is cracks in the ice so the birds are able to feed. In the Antarctic there are two different birds that live there including the penguin and the procellariforms. Vegetation There is a wide variety of vegetation in the polar region but there are few species in common in the Southern and Northern polar regions. The Arctic consists of desert and tundra vegetations. The desert vegetation consists of algae, lichens, and mosses. Lichens are the most dominant plants. The ground is bare with patchy cover of lichens and mosses (Stonehouse, 83). Flowering plants are also seen but not as common. It only contains 60 species of flowering plants. The Arctic tundra vegetation also consists of lichens and mosses, but it includes shrubs, grasses and forbs as well. The amount of vegetation in the tundra consists on how much sun, or snow cover is in the area. The vegetation in this area may grow as tall as 50 cm. In the southern part of the Arctic there tend to be more shrubs whereas the northern parts there is less plant cover. In wet areas of the tundra there is tussock grasses and cotton grasses. In moist areas there are short grasses, mosses, willows, and birches.  The Antarctic vegetation consists of algae or lichens, and some bacteria and fungi. Mosses and lichens dominate though. The algae and lichens grow where there is moisture, and they hid in cracks to be protected from the wind. The dominate grassland is the tussock. These grasses get to be 2 m high, so they provide habitat for many mammals (Fogg, 96). Of the 14 million km squared of land that makes up Antarctic, less than 2% of it does not have snow or ice (Bergstrom, 161). One example of a type of vegetation is a lichen. These lichens are found in moist areas that are hidden from wind. They hide on the surface of rocks in the cracks. They survive off the water that melts from above. These lichen occur in Canada and Alaska, as well as Greenland. These lichens can be red or orange colored and are known to defoliate rocks (72). Threats There exist many threats to the polar region. One threat is whaling. Whaling started in the 16th century. People hunted whale to sell the meat. By 1925 the number of whales being killed rose from fourteen thousand to forty thousand. The Whaling Commission tried to stop whaling in the 20th century (Stonehouse, 192). But the commission was unsuccessful.Over-fishing is another threat to the polar regions. In the Sea there is a lot of fishing due to the high populations of halibut and Alaskan Pollock. Around the 1970s krills began to become a popular fish to catch. The USSR started advertising food with krill in it so they started over-fishing krill. It has been estimated that 40 tonnes of krill per hour were caught during this time (Fogg, 221). In 1982, the Economic Zone was established. This said that a certain country can fish  off the shore. The country is now able to control who fishes in their EEZ area. But the EEZ has been unsuccessful. Another threat is pollution. There are many land and water areas within the polar regions that are contaminated. This can be due to the transport of oil by large ships. Siberia is one example of a place that has had major pollution in its rivers (Nuttall, 529).Depletion on the layer is one more threat. The ozone layer has been detected above Antarctica. The cause of the depletion of the ozone layer is due to chlorofluorocarbons and other gases. The other main reason is due to man made gases that are released into the atmosphere. There are many environmental effects due to this because the gases that are being released five times faster than they are destroyed (Brown, 31).warming is also having effect on the Arctic and Antarctic regions. Global warming is causing the temperature on the earth to increase. In Plan B 2.0 Lester R. Brown talks about how the Arctic is warming twice as fast as the rest of the world (Brown, 70). He goes on to say that the temperature in the Arctic region has increased by 3-4 degrees Celsius within the last half century. And with the increase in temperatures some worry that if the temperature increases this will create the sea level to rise. Scientists believe that if the Greenland ice sheet melts then the sea level could rise by 23 feet (Brown, 71). The melting of this ice sheet or others could have an effect on ocean currents. It could cause lower temperatures in northern North America. Rising of the sea level will also impact coastal areas. One example is in Bangladesh. If there was a 1 meter increase in sea level then millions of people would have to migrate from the coast. warming is also affecting Antarctica. Larsen A is an ice sheet on the Antarctic Peninsula. The sheet broke in 1995, and then in 2000 an iceberg that is  broke off the Ice Shelf in Antarctica (Brown, 72). In 2002 Larsen B, which was 5,500 square kilometers, broke off.  Global warming affects plants and animals. For plants, the warmer temperatures induce stress on the plant (Marchand). For animals, there has been a decrease in the amount of polar bears in the Hudson Bay area (Stirling, 294). Since 1981, the polar bear population has been declining. This is because global warming causes the ice to break up faster so the polar bears are going to the coasts when there are poor conditions (Stirling, 294).Conservation EffortsWhoever owns the land is responsible or managing it. And the owners of the land differ between the Antarctic and Arctic and also within the polar regions. In the Arctic, there are six nations that own the land about 60N. These nations include: Canada, USSR, Finland, USA, Denmark, Iceland and Norway (Stonehouse, 193). There have been international treaties set up so there are no disputes. These nations have also have set their government to manage the land properly. They have set up national parks, land for wilderness, and also land for research. In the polar regions there have been laws set up to manage the amount of visitors, There have been rules set up allowing only certain amount of mining done and other measures to protect the environment from damages.  In the Antarctic the owners of the land are less clear. Some areas of Antarctica are controlled by the French, while other areas are controlled by Africa, Australia, Zealand, and the UK (Stonehouse, 194). Whoever owns Antarctic is still unclear therefore many other countries have put out scientific stations. The Treaty of 1961 was established to make sure all the conflicts were resolved about who owned the land. This and other treaties have shown interest in helping to conserve the Antarctic region. All of these countries have conservation laws. These laws manage the amount of hunting in the area, monitor invasive species, and control burning and settlement.Still unexplored?In a analysis of the published work in aquatic ecosystems since the term biodiversity appeared in the bibliography, the Arctic and Antarctic Polar regions were found to be still unexplored. In addition, the North Pacific Ocean (Pacific Northeast and Pacific Northwest), still has few citations in comparison to its large size. This limits our perception of the worlds aquatic biodiversity. Consequently we do not have sufficient information about biodiversity in most places on earth. Even though biodiversity declines from the equator to the poles in terrestrial ecosystems, this is still a hypothesis to be tested in aquatic and especially marine ecosystems where causes of this phenomenon are unclear. In addition, particularly in marine ecosystems, there are several well stated cases where diversity in higher latitudes actually increases (Moustakas et al. 2005). Therefore, the lack of information on biodiversity of Polar Regions prevents scientific conclusions on the distribution of the worlds aquatic biodiversity.ConclusionIn conclusion, polar ecology is the relationship between plants and animals in a polar environment. The polar regions of Antarctica and the Arctic do differ but overall they are both cold environments and that have little vegetation and not a lot of animal life. Today there are threats, but there are conservation efforts that are being done in order to stop these threats.See also* Biodiversity* bear* Seals* WhalesWork cited*Arntz, W.E., Clarke., 2002. Ecological Studies in the Antarctic Sea Ice Zone. Springer, New York.*Bergstrom, D.M., Convey, P., Huiskes, A. H.L., 2006. Trends in Antarctic Terrestrial and Limnetic Ecosystems. Springer, The Netherlands.*Brown, L. R., 2006. Plan B 2.0: Rescuing a Planet Under Stress and a Civilization in Trouble. Earth Policy Institute, New York.*Fog, G.E., 1998. The Biology of Polar Habitats. Oxford University Press, New York. *Marchand, F.L., Kockelbergh, F., Vijver, B. V.D., Beyens, L., and Jijs, I., 2005. Are heat and cold resistance of arctic species affected by successive extreme temperature events? New Phytologist. V. 170, pg 291-300.*Melnikov, I.A., 1997. The Arctic Sea Ice Ecosystem. P.P. Shirshov Institute of Oceanology, Russia.*Moustakas, A. & I. Karakassis. How diverse is aquatic biodiversity research?, Aquatic Ecology, 39, 367-375*Nuttall, M., Callaaghan, T.V., 2000. The Arctic: Environment, People, Policy. Harwood Academic, UK. *Stirling, I., Lunn, N.J., Iacozza, J., 1999. Long-term Trends in the Population Ecology of Polar Bears in Western Hudson Bay in Relation to Climate Change. The Arctic Institute of North America. V. 52 No. 3, p. 294-306.*Stonehouse, B., 1998. Polar Biology. Chapman and Hall, New York.*Wein, R.W., MacLean, D. A., The Role of Fire in Northern Circumpolar Ecosystems. Scientific Committee on Problems of the Environment, New York.
2392019
Andrew_George,_Jr.
Andrew George Jr. (born November 11, 1963) was in Smithers, British Columbia which is located in north central British Columbia. Andrew grew up in British Columbia.Andrew is the third eldest of six children; Andrews family lived in a very small four room house with no indoor plumbing or running water. Life was simple, Andrew can always remember his parents taking the children out to the traditional territories of the Wetsuweten people. In the spring Andrewss family would harvest trout and set trap lines. In the summer Andrewss family would harvest salmon and smoke and can them for the winter, later in the summer they would get several different species of berries for home use or for Potlatch ceremony. In the fall they would hunt moose, deer and would dry, can or freeze them for the winter. In the winter Andrew would snare rabbits and assist his father on his trap line and go ice fishing. Andrew started school at Telkwa Elementary School, and later went to Chandler Park Junior High and eventually to Smithers Senior Secondary School and graduated on June 18, 1982.  During his final year of high school Andrew ran the Smithers 26 mile marathon for P.E. 12 and came in second place for runners under the age of 18.In 1983 Andrew was accepted into Vancouver Vocational Institute for cook training in Core/Short order, Institutional and Camp cooking and finally the A la carte program. Andrew graduated in 1985 with a B average and achieved certificates in all three courses.Andrew took his apprenticeship programs through Columbia Institute of Technology (B.C.I.T.) completing in the fall of 1989 with certificates of qualifications in cooking and continued his chef training in various hotels and restaurants in the Greater Vancouver area.During high school summer breaks Andrew would do camp cooking for the local mining companies. Andrews first job in the city was at the Vancouver Indian Friendship Centre in 1985, he was a part time short order cook for the weekend shift.  Andrews first full time job was at the Quillicum Restaurant in Vancouver. This is where he learned how to cook on a wood burning grill and prepare other Native cuisine dishes.  At the age of 23 Andrew became the head grill cook for the First Nations Restaurant at the Folk Life Pavilion at the World Exposition in Vancouver B.C. (86). After 86 Andrew started continuing his Chefs apprenticeship at Avenue Grill in Kerrisdale on Vancouvers Westside and completed his training at Isadoras Restaurant on Granville Island in 1989.Andrew also worked at Dempseys Restaurant located at the Pacific Centre Mall in downtown Vancouver then moved to Whistler to work at the Chateau Whistler Resort and then back to Vancouver to the Four Seasons Hotel before opening his own business in Vancouver as Toody Ni Restaurant and Catering Company specializing in Northwest coast style native cuisine.In the fall of 1991 Andrew was honored to be chosen as a representative for the Aboriginal peoples of Western Canada with four other native chefs from the Nation to participate in the World Culinary Olympics to be held in Frankfurt Germany in October 1992. The team was known as the Native Canadian Haute Cuisine Team, the other members were:* David Wolfman of Toronto * Bertha Skye from Six nations in southern Ontario * Arnold Olson from Saskatchewan * Brian Sappier from New Brunswick * Andrew George Jr. from British Columbia Andrew and the rest of the team members trained in Toronto at the Sutton Place Hotel in 1991/92 for the World Culinary Olympics that had 13,000 chefs from over 54 countries to compete against they were the first Aboriginal team from anywhere in the world to contend at that level of competition.In 1993 Andrew returned home to his mothers home town of Burns Lake, British Columbia with the closure of his restaurant due to the health of Andrews late father whom had recently had a stroke.It was there that Andrew decided to choose a different career path. From 1994 through 1998 Andrew accepted a position with the Ministry of Forests in Lake.  The position was the Aboriginal Liaison officer responsible for referral and consultation which included building relationships between the local First Nations and governments and industry as well as dealing with native issues pertaining to forest practices.During this time Andrew also took on a part time contract in Montral Quebec 1995 through 1997 with Oudeheeman/Medina foods to teach the native Culinary Arts Program at the I.T.H.Q. (Hotel and Hospitality College) for six weeks every six months.  The students were from Native owned lodges from all across Canada that were interested in using native foods on their menus. The lodges also wanted to have their own local native chefs prepare meals with their local products.In the fall of 1996 Andrew went back to Germany with Tom Jacksons Indian Summer Festival sponsored by Canadian Tourism Commission and Tourism Canada where they did Concerts, Fashion shows, pow-wows and banquets for up to 500 people at each event in five different cities throughout Germany.In 1997 Andrew co-authored a cookbook called FEAST - Canadian Native Cuisine for all Seasons. The book was designed around the Wetsuweten people and Andrews traditions. The book was published by Doubleday of Toronto and New York and was released in Canada and the States. The book is widely used by chefs in large hotels and restaurants in Canada that want produce traditional native cuisine for their restaurantsOn September 28, 1998 Andrew was seconded from the Ministry of Forests in Burns Lake B.C. to assist the Office of the Wetsuweten (Treaty Office) in Smithers B.C. in Forestry related matters such as referral and consultation, Higher level planning, capacity initiatives and relationship building with governments, industry and local stakeholders and held the position of Lands and Resources Manager for eight years until 2005.During his time at the office of the Wetsuweten Andrew had sat on various boards such as.* Aboriginal Tourism British Columbia, (A.T.B.C.). * Burns Lake Community Forest board (Blcomfor) * Morice Forest District Lands and Resources Management Planning process (L.R.M.P.). * Bulkley Valley Community Forests Board (Bvcomfor) * Regional instructor for Fraser University (S.F.U.) on Community Economics. Andrew had the privilege to lecture on many campuses across Canada whether it was resource based or Hospitality based.- Atlantic Centre of Excellence (Chef)- McMaster University (Traditional use/Archeology)- College of New Caledonia (Economics)- University of Northern British Columbia, (Land use planning/Traditional use)- Simon Fraser University (Community economics from first nations perspective)- Northwest Community College (Traditional use and Chef)Andrew has done presentations to senior secondary, middle and elementary schools and local interest groups locally and across the country on careers as a Chef, Traditional use/system of the Wetsuweten people.Since Andrews return home he has learned a lot about his people and his culture and fully participate in the Wetsuweten Batlats  (Potlatch) system, and even became a hereditary Chief (wing chief) in 1998 with a traditional name of Skitden which in Andrews language means the wise man.Andrews main objectives is to represent his people in the best of his abilities in the Chef and hospitality field to showcase his people and his skills as a chef and secondly to assist his people to have a strong open dialogue with the governments, industry and stakeholders on how traditional resources are used and managed.Andrew George Jr. was most recently head chef at the Four Host First Nations pavilion at the 2010 Winter Olympics (the first games in which Indigenous peoples were recognized as official host partners by the IOC). Books * George Jr., Andrew : Canadian native cuisine for all seasons (1997) ISBN 0-385-25580-2* George Jr., Andrew Feast for All Seasons: Traditional Native Peoples Cuisine (2010) ISBN 155152368X
2395137
Surrender_of_Japan
Image:Shigemitsu-signs-surrender.jpg|thumb|300px|Japanese foreign affairs minister Shigemitsu signs the Instrument of Surrender on board USS Missouri as General K. Sutherland watches, September 2, 1945The surrender of Japan brought hostilities in War II to a close. By the end of July 1945, the Japanese Navy was incapable of conducting operations and an Allied invasion of Japan was imminent. While publicly stating their intent to fight on to the bitter end, Japans leaders at the Supreme Council for the Direction of the War (the Big Six) were privately making entreaties to the neutral Union, to mediate peace on terms favorable to the Japanese. The Soviets, meanwhile, were preparing to attack the Japanese, in fulfillment of their promises to the Americans and the British made at the Tehran and Conferences.On August 6, the Americans dropped an atomic bomb on Hiroshima. Late in the evening of August 8, in accordance with Yalta agreements but in violation of the Neutrality Pact, the Soviet Union declared war on Japan, and soon after midnight on August 9, it invaded the Japanese puppet state of Manchukuo. Later that day the Americans dropped an atomic bomb on Nagasaki. The combined shock of these events caused Emperor Hirohito to intervene and order the Big Six to accept the terms for ending the war that the Allies had set down in the Declaration. After several more days of behind-the-scenes negotiations and a failed coup dtat, Hirohito gave a recorded radio address to the nation on August 15. In the radio address, called the Gyokuon-hs (Jewel Voice Broadcast), he announced the surrender of Japan.On August 28, the of Japan by the Commander of the Allied Powers began. The surrender ceremony was held on September 2 aboard the U.S. battleship , at which officials from the Japanese government signed the Instrument of Surrender, ending World War II. Allied civilians and servicemen alike celebrated Day, the end of the war; however, some isolated soldiers and personnel from Japans far-flung forces throughout Asia and the Pacific islands refused to surrender for months and years after, some into the 1970s. Since Japans surrender, historians have debated the ethics of using the atomic bombs.Hostilities formally ended when the of San Francisco came into force on April 28, 1952.Impending defeatthumb|350px|right|Allied landings in the Pacific Theatre of Operations, August 1942 to August 1945By 1945, the Japanese had suffered an unbroken string of defeats for nearly two years in the South West Pacific, the Marianas campaign, and the Philippines campaign. In July 1944, following the loss of Saipan, General Tj was replaced as prime minister by General Koiso, who declared that the Philippines would be the site of the decisive battle.(Frank, 90.) After the Japanese loss of the Philippines, Koiso in turn was replaced by Admiral Suzuki. The first half of 1945 saw the Allies capture the nearby islands of Iwo Jima and Okinawa. Okinawa was to be a area for Downfall, the American invasion of the Japanese Home Islands.(Skates, 158, 195) Following Germanys defeat, the Soviet Union quietly began redeploying its battle-hardened European forces to the Far East, in addition to about forty divisions that had been stationed there since 1941, as a counterbalance to the million-strong Army.(Chris Bellamy. Absolute War: Soviet Russia in the Second World War. Alfred A. Knopf, 2007 ISBN 0375410864, 9780375410864, p. 676.)The Allied submarine campaign and the mining of Japanese coastal waters had largely destroyed the Japanese merchant fleet. With few natural resources, Japan was dependent on raw materials, particularly oil, imported from Manchuria and other parts of the East Asian mainland, and from the conquered territory in the East Indies.(Frank, 8788) The destruction of the Japanese merchant fleet, combined with the strategic bombing of Japanese industry, had wrecked Japans war economy. Production of coal, iron, steel, rubber, and other vital supplies was only a fraction of that before the war.(Frank, 81)(Robert A. Pape. Why Japan Surrendered, International Security, Vol. 18, No. 2 (Fall 1993), 154201.)battleship Haruna sunk.jpg|thumb|right|The rebuilt battle cruiser  was sunk at her moorings in the naval base of Kure on 24 July during a series of bombings.As a result of the losses it had suffered, the Japanese Navy (IJN) had ceased to be an effective fighting force. Following a series of raids on the Japanese shipyard at Kure, Japan, the only major warships in fighting order were six aircraft carriers, four cruisers, and one battleship, none of which could be fueled adequately. Although 19 destroyers and 38 submarines were still operational, their use was limited by the lack of fuel.(Feifer, 418)(Reynolds, 363)Defense preparationsFaced with the prospect of an invasion of the Home Islands starting with Kysh, and also the prospect of a Soviet invasion of Manchuria, Japans last source of natural resources, the War Journal of the Imperial Headquarters concluded:We can no longer direct the war with any hope of success. The only course left is for Japans one hundred million people to sacrifice their lives by charging the enemy to make them lose the will to fight.(Frank, 89, citing Daikichi Irokawa, The Age of Hirohito: In Search of Modern Japan (New York: Free Press, 1995; ISBN 0029156653). Japan consistently overstated its population as 100 million, when in fact the 1944 census counted 72 million.)As a final attempt to stop the Allied advances, the Japanese Imperial High Command planned an all-out defense of Kysh codenamed Operation Ketsug.(Skates, 100115) This was to be a radical departure from the defense in depth plans used in the invasions of Peleliu, Iwo Jima, and Okinawa. Instead, everything was staked on the beachhead; more than 3,000 kamikazes would be sent to attack the amphibious transports before troops and cargo were disembarked on the beach.(If this did not drive the Allies away, they planned to send another 3,500 kamikazes along with 5,000 Shiny suicide boats and the remaining destroyers and submarinesthe last of the Navys operating fleetto the beach. If the Allies had fought through this and successfully landed on Kysh, only 3,000 planes would have been left to defend the remaining islands, although Kysh would be defended to the last regardless.( A set of caves were excavated near Nagano. In the event of invasion, these caves, the Underground Imperial Headquarters, were to be used by the army to direct the war and to house the emperor and his family.(McCormack, 253)Supreme Council for the Direction of the WarJapanese policy-making centered on the Supreme Council for the Direction of the War (created in 1944 by earlier Prime Minister Koiso), the so-called Big Sixthe Prime Minister, Minister of Foreign Affairs, Minister of the Army, Minister of the Navy, Chief of the Army General Staff, and Chief of the Navy General Staff.(Frank, 87) At the formation of the Suzuki government in April 1945, the councils membership consisted of:thumbnail|right|The Suzuki cabinet in June, 1945*Prime Minister: Admiral Suzuki*Minister of Foreign Affairs: Tg*Minister of the Army: General Anami*Minister of the Navy: Admiral Yonai*Chief of the Army General Staff: General Umezu*Chief of the Navy General Staff: Admiral Oikawa (later replaced by Admiral Toyoda)Legally, the Japanese Army and Navy had the right to nominate (or refuse to nominate) their respective ministers. Thus, they could prevent the formation of undesirable governments, or by resignation bring about the collapse of an existing government.(Frank, 86.)(Spector 33.)Emperor Hirohito and Lord Keeper of the Privy Seal Kido also were present at some of the meetings, following the emperors wishes.(The exact role of the Emperor has been a subject of much historical debate. Following PM Suzukis orders, many key pieces of evidence were destroyed in the days between Japans surrender and the start of the Allied occupation. Starting in 1946, following the constitution of the tribunal, the imperial family began to argue that Hirohito was a powerless figurehead, which brought some historians to accept this point of view. Others, like Bix, W. Dower, Fujiwara and Yoshimi argue that he actively ruled from behind the scenes. According to Richard Frank, Neither of these polar positions is accurate and the truth appears to lie somewhere in between.Frank, 87.)Divisions within the Japanese leadershipFor the most part, Suzukis military-dominated cabinet favored continuing the war. For the Japanese, surrender was unthinkableJapan had never been invaded or lost a war in its history.(Alan Booth. Lost: Journeys through a Vanishing Japan. Kodansha Globe, 1996, ISBN 1-56836-148-3. Page 67) Only Mitsumasa Yonai, the Navy minister, was known to desire an early end to the war.(Frank, 92) According to historian B. Frank::Although Suzuki might indeed have seen peace as a distant goal, he had no design to achieve it within any immediate time span or on terms acceptable to the Allies. His own comments at the conference of senior statesmen gave no hint that he favored any early cessation of the war ... Suzukis selections for the most critical cabinet posts were, with one exception, not advocates of peace either.(Frank, 9192)After the war, Suzuki and others from his government and their apologists claimed they were secretly working towards peace, and could not publicly advocate it. They cite the Japanese concept of harageithe art of hidden and invisible techniqueto justify the dissonance between their public actions and alleged behind-the-scenes work. However, many historians reject this. Robert J. C. Butow wrote::Because of its very ambiguity, the plea of haragei invites the suspicion that in questions of politics and diplomacy a conscious reliance upon this art of bluff may have constituted a purposeful deception predicated upon a desire to play both ends against the middle. While this judgment does not accord with the much-lauded character of Admiral Suzuki, the fact remains that from the moment he became Premier until the day he resigned no one could ever be quite sure of what Suzuki would do or say next.(Butow, 7071)Japanese leaders had always envisioned a negotiated settlement to the war. Their prewar planning expected a rapid expansion, consolidation, eventual conflict with the United States, and then a settlement in which they would be able to retain at least some of the new territory they had conquered.(Spector, 44-45) By 1945, Japans leaders were in agreement that the war was going badly, but they disagreed over the best means to negotiate an end to it. There were two camps: the so-called peace camp favored a diplomatic initiative to persuade Stalin, the leader of the Soviet Union, to mediate a settlement between the Allies and Japan; and the hardliners who favored fighting one last decisive battle that would inflict so many casualties on the Allies that they would be willing to offer more lenient terms.(Frank, 90) Both approaches were based on Japans experience in the War, forty years earlier, which consisted of a series of costly but largely indecisive battles, followed by the decisive naval of Tsushima.(Frank, 89)Image:Kantaro Suzuki suit.jpg|thumb|left|upright|As prime minister, Adm. Suzuki headed the Japanese government in the final months of the warBy the end of January 1945, the Japanese were suggesting peace terms.() These proposals, sent through both British and American channels, were assembled by General MacArthur into a 40-page dossier and given to President D. Roosevelt on February 2, two days before the Conference. Reportedly, the dossier was dismissed by Roosevelt out of handthe proposals all included the condition that the emperors position would be assured, if possibly as a puppet ruler; whereas at this time the Allied policy was to accept only an surrender.(Trohan. Bare Peace Bid U.S. Rebuffed 7 Months Ago. Daily Tribune, August 19, 1945.) Additionally, these proposals were strongly opposed by the powerful military members of the Japanese government.(In a May 21 message to all of Japans diplomats, foreign minister Tg denied that Japan made any peace proposals to America and EnglandFrank, 112.)In February 1945, Prince Konoe gave Emperor Hirohito a memorandum analyzing the situation, and told him that if the war continued, the imperial family might be in greater danger from an internal revolution than from defeat.(Bix, 488489) According to the diary of Grand Chamberlain Fujita, the emperor, looking for a decisive battle (tennzan), replied that it was premature to seek peace, unless we make one more military gain.(Hisanori Fujita, Jijch no kais, Cho Kronsha, 1987, 6667) Also in February, Japans treaty division wrote about Allied policies towards Japan regarding unconditional surrender, occupation, disarmament, elimination of militarism, democratic reforms, punishment of war criminals, and the status of the emperor.(Hasegawa, 39) Allied-imposed disarmament, Allied punishment of Japanese war criminals and especially occupation and removal of the emperor were not acceptable to the Japanese leadership.(Hasegawa, 39, 68)(Frank, 291)On April 5, the Soviet Union gave the required 12 months notice that it would not renew the five-year Neutrality Pact(Soviet-Japanese Neutrality Pact, April 13, 1941. (Project at University)Declaration Regarding Mongolia, April 13, 1941. (Project at University)) (which had been signed in 1941 following the Nomonhan Incident), when it expired.(Soviet Denunciation of the Pact with Japan. Avalon Project, Yale Law School. Text from United States Department of State Bulletin Vol. XII, No. 305, April 29, 1945. Retrieved February 22, 2009.)  Unknown to the Japanese, at the Conference in NovemberDecember 1943, it had been agreed that the Soviet Union would enter the war against Japan once Nazi Germany was defeated. At the conference in February 1945, the Americans had made substantial concessions to the Soviets to secure a promise that they would declare war on Japan within three months of the surrender of Germany. Although the five-year Neutrality Pact did not expire until April 5, 1946, the announcement caused the Japanese great concern.(Molotovs note was neither a declaration of war nor, necessarily, of intent to go to war. Legally, the treaty still had a year to run after the notice of cancellation. But the Foreign Commissars tone suggested that this technicality might be brushed aside at Russias convenience.  So Sorry, Mr. Sato. Time, April 16, 1945)(Russia and Japan, declassified CIA report from April 1945.)  Molotov, in Moscow, and Malik, Soviet ambassador in Tokyo, went to great lengths to assure the Japanese that The period of the Pacts validity has not ended.(Slavinski (page 153-4), quoting from Molotovs diary, recounts the conversation between Molotov and Sat, the Japanese ambassador to Moscow: After Molotov has read the statement, Sat permits himself to ask Molotov for some clarifications, saying he thinks his government expects that during that year April 25, 1945-April 25, 1946, the Soviet government will maintain the same relations with Japan it had maintained up to present, bearing in mind that the Pact remains in force. Molotov replies that Factually Soviet-Japanese relations revert to the situation in which they were before conclusion of the Pact. Sat observes that in that case the Soviet and Japanese government interpret the question differently. Molotov replies that there is some misunderstanding and explains that on expiry of the five year period ... Soviet-Japanese relations will obviously revert to the status quo ante conclusion of the Pact. After further discussion, Molotov states: The period of the Pacts validity has not ended.Boris Nikolaevich Slavinski, The Japanese-Soviet Neutrality Pact: A Diplomatic History 1941-1945, Translated by Geoffrey Jukes, 2004, Routledge. (Extracts on-line). Page 153-4.Later in his book (page 184), Slavinski further summarizes the chain of events:*Even after Germanys exit from the war, Moscow went on saying the Pact was still operative, and that Japan had no cause for anxiety about the future of Soviet-Japanese relations.* 21 May 1945: Malik (Soviet ambassador to Tokyo) tells Tanakamura that the treaty continues in force.* 29 May 1945: Molotov tells Sat: we have not torn up the pact.* 24 June 1945: Malik tells Hirota that the Neutrality Pact ... will continue ... until it expires.Note, however, that Malik did not know (had not been informed) that the Soviets were preparing to attack.Slavinski, pg.184)thumb|right|Foreign Minister Shigenori TgAt a series of high-level meetings in May 1945, the Big Six first seriously discussed ending the warbut none of them on terms that would have been acceptable to the Allies. Because anyone openly supporting Japanese surrender risked assassination by zealous army officers, the meetings were closed to anyone except the Big Six, the Emperor, and the Privy Sealno second- or third-echelon officers could attend.(Frank, 93) At these meetings, despite the dispatches from Japanese ambassador Sat in Moscow, only Foreign minister Tg realized the possibility that Roosevelt and Churchill may already have made concessions to Stalin to bring the Soviets into the war against Japan.(Frank, 95) As a result of these meetings, Tg was authorized to approach the Soviet Union, seeking to maintain its neutrality, or (despite the very remote probability) to form an alliance.(Frank, 9394)In keeping with the custom of a new government declaring its purposes, following the May meetings the Army staff produced a document, The Fundamental Policy to Be Followed Henceforth in the Conduct of the War, which stated that the Japanese people would fight to extinction rather than surrender. This policy was adopted by the Big Six on June 6. (Tg opposed it, while the other five supported it.)(Frank, 96) Documents submitted by Suzuki at the same meeting suggested that, in the diplomatic overtures to the USSR, Japan adopt the following approach:It should be clearly made known to Russia that she owes her victory over Germany to Japan, since we remained neutral, and that it would be to the advantage of the Soviets to help Japan maintain her international position, since they have the United States as an enemy in the future.(Toland, John. The Rising Sun. Modern Library, 2003. ISBN 0-8129-6858-1. Page 923)On June 9, the emperors confidant Marquis Kido wrote a Draft Plan for Controlling the Crisis Situation, warning that by the end of the year Japans ability to wage modern war would be extinguished and the government would be unable to contain civil unrest. ... We cannot be sure we will not share the fate of Germany and be reduced to adverse circumstances under which we will not attain even our supreme object of safeguarding the Imperial Household and preserving the national polity.(Frank, 97, quoting The Diary of Marquis Kido, 1931-45: Selected Translations into English, p 435436.) Kido proposed that the emperor take action, by offering to end the war on very generous terms. Kido proposed that Japan give up occupied European colonies, provided they were granted independence, and that the nation disarm and for a time be content with minimum defense. With the emperors authorization, Kido approached several members of the Supreme Council, the Big Six. Tg was very supportive. Suzuki and Admiral Yonai, the Navy minister, were both cautiously supportive; each wondered what the other thought. General Anami, the Army minister, was ambivalent, insisting that diplomacy must wait until after the United States has sustained heavy losses in Ketsug.(Frank, 9799.)In June, the emperor lost confidence in the chances of achieving a military victory. The of Okinawa was lost, and he learned of the weakness of the Japanese army in China, of the Army in Manchuria, of the navy, and of the army defending the Home Islands. The emperor received a report by Prince Higashikuni from which he concluded that it was not just the coast defense; the divisions reserved to engage in the decisive battle also did not have sufficient numbers of weapons.(  According to the Emperor:I was told that the iron from bomb fragments dropped by the enemy was being used to make shovels. This confirmed my opinion that we were no longer in a position to continue the war.(Frank, 100, quoting Terasaki, 13637.)On June 22, the emperor summoned the Big Six to a meeting. Unusually, he spoke first: I desire that concrete plans to end the war, unhampered by existing policy, be speedily studied and that efforts made to implement them.(Frank, 102.) It was agreed to solicit Soviet aid in ending the war. Other neutral nations, such as Switzerland, Sweden, and the City, were known to be willing to play a role in making peace, but they were so small they were believed unable to do more than deliver the Allies terms of surrender and Japans acceptance or rejection. The Japanese hoped that the Soviet Union could be persuaded to act as an agent for Japan in negotiations with America and Britain.(Frank, 94)Attempts to deal with the Soviet UnionFile:Naotake Sato.jpg|thumb|SatOn June 30, Tg told Sat, Japans ambassador in Moscow, to try to establish firm and lasting relations of friendship. Sat was to discuss the status of Manchuria and any matter the Russians would like to bring up.(Frank, 221, citing Magic Diplomatic Summary No. 1201.) The Soviets were well aware of the situation and of their promises to the Allies, and they employed delaying tactics to encourage the Japanese without promising anything. Sat finally met with Soviet Foreign Minister Molotov on July 11, but without result. On July 12, Tg directed Sat to tell the Soviets that:His Majesty the Emperor, mindful of the fact that the present war daily brings greater evil and sacrifice upon the peoples of all the belligerent powers, desires from his heart that it may be quickly terminated. But so long as England and the United States insist upon unconditional surrender, the Japanese Empire has no alternative but to fight on with all its strength for the honor and existence of the Motherland.(Frank, 2223, citing Magic Diplomatic Summary No. 1205, 2 (PDF).)The emperor proposed sending Prince Konoe as a special envoy, although he would be unable to reach Moscow before the Conference.Sat advised Tg that in reality, unconditional surrender or terms closely equivalent thereto was all that Japan could expect. Moreover, in response to Molotovs requests for specific proposals, Sat suggested that Tgs messages were not clear about the views of the Government and the Military with regard to the termination of the war, thus questioning whether Tgs initiative was supported by the key elements of Japans power structure.(Frank, 226, citing Magic Diplomatic Summary No. 1208, 1012.)On July 17, Tg responded:Although the directing powers, and the government as well, are convinced that our war strength still can deliver considerable blows to the enemy, we are unable to feel absolutely secure peace of mind ... Please bear particularly in mind, however, that we are not seeking the Russians mediation for anything like an unconditional surrender.(Frank, 227, citing Magic Diplomatic Summary No. 1209.)In reply, Sat clarified:It goes without saying that in my earlier message calling for unconditional surrender or closely equivalent terms, I made an exception of the question of preserving imperial family.(Frank, 229, citing Magic Diplomatic Summary No. 1212.)On July 21, speaking in the name of the cabinet, Tg repeated:With regard to unconditional surrender we are unable to consent to it under any circumstances whatever. ... It is in order to avoid such a state of affairs that we are seeking a peace, ... through the good offices of Russia. ... it would also be disadvantageous and impossible, from the standpoint of foreign and domestic considerations, to make an immediate declaration of specific terms.(Frank, 230, citing Magic Diplomatic Summary No. 1214, 23 (PDF).)American cryptographers had broken most of Japans codes, including the Purple code used by the Japanese Foreign Office to encode high-level diplomatic correspondence. As a result, messages between Tokyo and Japans embassies were provided to Allied policy-makers nearly as quickly as to the intended recipients.(Some messages were deciphered and translated the same day and most within a week; a few in cases of key change took longerThe Oxford Guide to World War II, ed. I.C.B. Dear. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2007. ISBN 978-0-19-534096-9 S.v. MAGIC.)Soviet intentionsSecurity concerns dominated Soviet decisions concerning the Far East.(Hasegawa, 60) Chief among these was gaining unrestricted access to the Ocean. The year-round ice-free areas of the Soviet Pacific coastlineVladivostok in particularcould be blockaded by air and sea from island and the Islands. Acquiring these territories, thus guaranteeing free access to the Strait, was their primary objective.(Hasegawa, 19)(Hasegawa, 25) Secondary objectives were leases for the Eastern Railway, Manchuria Railway, Dairen, and Port Arthur.(Hasegawa, 32)To this end, Stalin and Molotov strung out the negotiations with the Japanese, giving them false hope of a Soviet-mediated peace.(Hasegawa, 86) At the same time, in their dealings with the United States and Britain, the Soviets insisted on strict adherence to the Declaration, re-affirmed at the Conference, that the Allies would not accept separate or conditional peace with Japan. The Japanese would have to surrender unconditionally to all the Allies. To prolong the war, the Soviets opposed any attempt to weaken this requirement.( This would give the Soviets time to complete the transfer of their troops from the Western Front to the Far East, and conquer Manchuria (Manchukuo), Inner Mongolia (Mengjiang), Korea, Sakhalin, the Kuriles, and possibly, Hokkaid(Hasegawa, 115116) (starting with a landing at Rumoi).(Frank, 279)Manhattan ProjectIn 1939, Einstein and Szilrd wrote a letter to President Roosevelt urging him to fund research and development of atomic bombs. Roosevelt agreed, and the result was the Projecta top-secret research program administered by General Groves, with scientific direction from Robert Oppenheimer. The first bomb was tested successfully in the Trinity explosion on July 16, 1945.As the project neared its conclusion, American planners began to consider the use of the bomb. Groves formed a committee that met in April and May 1945 to draw up a list of targets. One of the primary criteria was that the target cities must not have been damaged by conventional bombing. This would allow for an accurate assessment of the damage done by the atomic bomb.()The targeting committees list included 18 Japanese cities. At the top of the list were Kyoto, Hiroshima, Yokohama, Kokura, and Niigata.(Frank, 254)(Hasegawa, 67) Ultimately, Kyoto was removed from the list at the insistence of Secretary of War L. Stimson, who had visited the city on his honeymoon and knew of its cultural and historical significance.(David F. Schmitz. Henry L. Stimson: The First Wise Man. Rowman & Littlefield, 2001, ISBN 0-8420-2632-0. Page 182)In May, S. Truman (who had become president upon Franklin Roosevelts death on April 12) approved the formation of an Interim Committee, an advisory group that would report on the atomic bomb.( It consisted of L. Harrison, Bush, Bryant Conant, Taylor Compton, L. Clayton, and Austin Bard, advised by scientists Oppenheimer, Fermi, Lawrence, and Compton. In a June 1 report, the Committee concluded that the bomb should be used as soon as possible against a war plant surrounded by workers homes, and that no warning or demonstration should be given.(Hasegawa, 90)The Committees mandate did not include the use of the bombits use upon completion was presumed.(Frank, 256) Following a protest by scientists involved in the project, in the form of the Report, the Committee re-examined the use of the bomb. In a June 21 meeting, it reaffirmed that there was no alternative.(Frank, 260)Events at PotsdamThe leaders of the major Allied powers met at the Conference from July 16 to August 2, 1945. The participants were the Union, the Kingdom, and the States, represented by Stalin, Churchill (later Attlee), and Truman respectively.NegotiationsAlthough the Potsdam Conference was mainly concerned with European affairs, the war against Japan was also discussed in detail. Truman learned of the successful Trinity test early in the conference, and shared this information with the British delegation. The successful test caused the American delegation to reconsider the necessity and wisdom of Soviet participation, for which the U.S. had lobbied hard at the Tehran and Conferences.(Hasegawa, 152153) High on the Americans list of priorities was shortening the war and reducing American casualtiesSoviet intervention seemed likely to do both, but at the cost of possibly allowing the Soviets to capture territory beyond that which had been promised to them at Tehran and Yalta, and causing a postwar division of Japan similar to that which had occurred in Germany.(American officials meeting in Washington on August 10, 1945 ... decided that a useful dividing line between the U.S. and Soviet administrative occupation zones would be the 38th parallel across the midsection of the Korean peninsula, thereby leaving Koreas central city, Seoul, within the U.S. zone. This arrangement was suggested to the Soviet side shortly after the USSR entered both the Pacific War and the Korean peninsula. The Soviets accepted that dividing line, even though their attempt to obtain a corresponding northern Japan occupation zone on the island of Hokkaido was rejected by Washington. - Edward A. Olsen. Korea, the Divided Nation. Greenwood Publishing Group, 2005. ISBN 0275983072. Page 62)In dealing with Stalin, Truman decided to give the Soviet leader vague hints about the existence of a powerful new weapon without going into details. The Allies were unaware that Soviet intelligence had penetrated the Manhattan Project in its early stages, so Stalin already knew of the existence of the atomic bomb, but did not appear impressed by its potential.(Rhodes, 690)The Potsdam DeclarationIt was decided to issue a statement, the Declaration, defining Unconditional Surrender and clarifying what it meant for the position of the emperor and for Hirohito personally. The American and British governments strongly disagreed on this pointAmericans wanted to abolish the position and possibly try him as a war criminal, while the British wanted to retain the position, perhaps with Hirohito still reigning. The Potsdam Declaration went through many drafts until a version acceptable to all was found.(Hasegawa, 145148)On July 26, the United States, Britain and China released the Potsdam Declaration announcing the terms for Japans surrender, with the warning, We will not deviate from them. There are no alternatives. We shall brook no delay. For Japan, the terms of the declaration specified:* the elimination for all time of the authority and influence of those who have deceived and misled the people of Japan into embarking on world conquest* the occupation of points in Japanese territory to be designated by the Allies* Japanese sovereignty shall be limited to the islands of Honsh, Hokkaid, Kysh, Shikoku and such minor islands as we determine. As had been announced in the Declaration in 1943, Japan was to be reduced to her pre-1894 territory and stripped of her pre-war empire including Korea and Taiwan, as well as all her recent conquests.* The Japanese military forces shall be completely disarmed* stern justice shall be meted out to all war criminals, including those who have visited cruelties upon our prisonersImage:Bundesarchiv Bild 183-R67561, Potsdamer Konferenz, Konferenztisch.jpg|thumb|right|A session of the Conference - those pictured include Attlee, Bevin, Molotov, Stalin, D. Leahy, F. Byrnes, and S. TrumanOn the other hand, the declaration stated that:* We do not intend that the Japanese shall be enslaved as a race or destroyed as a nation, ... The Japanese Government shall remove all obstacles to the revival and strengthening of democratic tendencies among the Japanese people. of speech, of religion, and of thought, as well as respect for the fundamental rights shall be established.* Japan shall be permitted to maintain such industries as will sustain her economy and permit the exaction of just reparations in kind, ... Japanese participation in world trade relations shall be permitted.* The occupying forces of the Allies shall be withdrawn from Japan as soon as these objectives have been accomplished and there has been established in accordance with the freely expressed will of the Japanese people a peacefully inclined and responsible government.Contrary to popular belief, the only use of the term unconditional surrender came at the end of the declaration:* We call upon the government of Japan to proclaim now the unconditional surrender of all Japanese armed forces, and to provide proper and adequate assurances of their good faith in such action. The alternative for Japan is prompt and utter destruction.Contrary to what had been intended at its conception, the Declaration made no mention of the emperor at all. Allied intentions on issues of utmost importance to the Japanese, including whether Hirohito was to be regarded as one of those who had misled the people of Japan or even a war criminal, or alternatively, whether the emperor might become part of a peacefully inclined and responsible government were thus left unstated.The prompt and utter destruction clause has been interpreted as a veiled warning about American possession of the atomic bomb (which had been tested successfully on the first day of the conference).(Hasegawa, 118119)Japanese reactionOn July 27, the Japanese government considered how to respond to the Declaration. The four military members of the Big Six wanted to reject it, but Tg persuaded the cabinet not to do so until he could get a reaction from the Soviets. In a telegram, Kase, Japans ambassador to Switzerland, observed that unconditional surrender applied only to the military and not to the government or the people, and he pleaded that it should be understood that the careful language of Potsdam appeared to have occasioned a great deal of thought on the part of the signatory governmentsthey seem to have taken pains to save face for us on various points.(Weintraub, 288) The next day, Japanese newspapers reported that the Declaration, the text of which had been broadcast and dropped by leaflet into Japan, had been rejected. In an attempt to manage public perception, Prime Minister Suzuki met with the press, and stated:I consider the Joint Proclamation a rehash of the Declaration at the Cairo Conference. As for the Government, it does not attach any important value to it at all. The only thing to do is just kill it with silence (mokusatsu). We will do nothing but press on to the bitter end to bring about a successful completion of the war.(Frank, 234)The meaning of mokusatsu, literally kill with silence, can range from ignore to treat with contemptwhich fairly accurately described the range of reactions within the government.( But Suzukis statement, particularly its final sentence, leaves little room for misinterpretation and was taken as a rejection by the press, both in Japan and abroad, and no further statement was made in public or through diplomatic channels to alter this understanding.On July 30, Ambassador Sat wrote that Stalin was probably talking to Roosevelt and Churchill about his dealings with Japan, and he wrote: There is no alternative but immediate unconditional surrender if we are to prevent Russias participation in the war.(Frank, 236, citing Magic Diplomatic Summary No. 1224.)  On August 2, Tg wrote to Sat: it should not be difficult for you to realize that ... our time to proceed with arrangements of ending the war before the enemy lands on the Japanese mainland is limited, on the other hand it is difficult to decide on concrete peace conditions here at home all at once.(Frank, 236, citing Magic Diplomatic Summary No. 1225, 2 (PDF).)Hiroshima, Manchuria, and Nagasaki August 6: Hiroshima On the morning of August 6, the Gay, a B-29 Superfortress piloted by Colonel Tibbets, dropped an atomic bomb (code-named Boy by the Americans) on the city of Hiroshima in southwest Honsh. Throughout the day, confused reports reached Tokyo that Hiroshima had been the target of an air raid, which had leveled the city with a blinding flash and violent blast. Later that day, they received U.S. President Trumans broadcast announcing the first use of an bomb, and promising:We are now prepared to obliterate more rapidly and completely every productive enterprise the Japanese have above ground in any city. We shall destroy their docks, their factories, and their communications. Let there be no mistake; we shall completely destroy Japans power to make war. It was to spare the Japanese people from utter destruction that the ultimatum of July 26 was issued at Potsdam. Their leaders promptly rejected that ultimatum. If they do not now accept our terms they may expect a rain of ruin from the air, the like of which has never been seen on this earth...(White House Press Release Announcing the Bombing of Hiroshima, August 6, 1945. The American Experience: Truman. PBS.org. Sourced to The Harry S. Truman Library, Army press notes, box 4, Papers of Eben A. Ayers.)At first, some refused to believe the Americans had built an atomic bomb. The Japanese Army and Navy had their own independent atomic-bomb programs and therefore the Japanese understood enough to know how very difficult building it would be.(While senior Japanese officers did not dispute the theoretical possibility of such weapons, they refused to concede that the Americans had vaulted over the tremendous practical problems to create an atomic bomb. On August 7, the Imperial Staff released a message saying that Hiroshima had been struck by a new type of bomb. A team led by Lieutenant General Arisue was sent to Hiroshima on August 8 to sort out several competing theories as to the cause of the explosion, including that Hiroshima was struck by a magnesium or liquid-oxygen bomb.Frank, 270271) Admiral Toyoda, the Chief of the Naval General Staff, argued that even if the Americans had made one, they could not have many more.(Frank, 270271) American strategists, having anticipated a reaction like Toyodas, planned to drop a second bomb shortly after the first, to convince the Japanese that the U.S. had a large supply.((Frank, 283284)August 89: Soviet invasion and NagasakiDetailed reports of the unprecedented scale of the destruction at Hiroshima were received in Tokyo, but two days passed before the government met to consider the changed situation.At 04:00 on August 9 word reached Tokyo that the Soviet Union had broken the Neutrality Pact,( declared war on Japan,(Soviet Declaration of War on Japan, August 8, 1945. (Project at University)) and launched an invasion of Manchuria.(The Soviets delivered a declaration of war to Japanese ambassador Sat in Moscow two hours before the invasion of Manchuria. However, despite assurances to the contrary they did not deliver Sats cable notifying Tokyo of the declaration, and cut the embassy phone lines. This was revenge for the Japanese sneak attack on Port Arthur 40 years earlier. The Japanese found out about the attack from radio broadcast from Moscow.Butow, 154164; Hoyt, 401)File:Nagasakibomb.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Atomic bombing of NagasakiThese twin shocksthe atomic bombing of Hiroshima and the Soviet entryhad immediate profound effects on Prime Minister Suzuki and Foreign Minister Tg Shigenori, who concurred that the government must end the war at once.(Sadao Asada. The Shock of the Atomic Bomb and Japans Decision to Surrender: A Reconsideration. The Pacific Historical Review, Vol. 67, No. 4 (Nov., 1998), pp. 477512.) However, the senior leadership of the Japanese Army took the news in stride, grossly underestimating the scale of the attack. With the support of Minister of War Anami, they did start preparing to impose law on the nation, to stop anyone attempting to make peace.(Frank, 2889.) Hirohito told Kido to quickly control the situation because the Soviet Union has declared war and today began hostilities against us.(Diary of Kichi Kido, 1966, p 1223.)The Supreme Council met at 10:30. Suzuki, who had just come from a meeting with the emperor, said it was impossible to continue the war. Tg Shigenori said that they could accept the terms of the Potsdam Declaration but needed a guarantee of the emperors position. Navy Minister Yonai said that they had to make some diplomatic proposalthey could no longer afford to wait for better circumstances.In the middle of the meeting, shortly after 11:00, news arrived that Nagasaki, on the west coast of Kysh, had been hit by a second atomic bomb (called Man by the Americans). By the time the meeting ended, the Big Six had split 33. Suzuki, Tg, and Admiral Yonai favored Tgs one additional condition to Potsdam, while Generals Anami, Umezu, and Admiral Toyoda insisted on three further terms that modified Potsdam: that Japan handle their own disarmament, that Japan deal with any Japanese war criminals, and that there be no occupation of Japan.(Frank, 29091.)Imperial intervention, Allied response, and Japanese replyFile:Korechika Anami.jpg|thumb|upright|War Minister AnamiThe full cabinet met on 14:30 on August 9, and spent most of the day debating surrender. As the Big Six had done, the cabinet split, with neither Tgs position nor Anamis attracting a majority.(Hasagawa, 207208) Anami told the other cabinet ministers that, under torture, a captured American B-29 pilot had told his interrogators that the Americans possessed 100 atom bombs and that Tokyo and Kyoto would be bombed in the next few days. The pilot, Marcus McDilda, was lying. He knew nothing of the Project, and simply told his interrogators what he thought they wanted to hear to end the torture. The lie, which caused him to be classified as a high-priority prisoner, probably saved him from beheading.(Jerome T. Hagen. War in the Pacific: America at War, Volume I. Hawaii Pacific University, ISBN 0-9762669-0-3. Chapter, The Lie of Marcus McDilda, 159162) In reality, the United States would have had the third bomb ready for use around August 19, and a fourth in September 1945.(Hasegawa 298.) The third bomb probably would have been used against Tokyo.(A few hours before the Japanese surrender was announced, Truman had a discussion with the of Windsor and Sir John Balfour (British ambassador to the U.S.). According to Balfour, Truman remarked sadly that he now had no alternative but to order an atomic bomb dropped on Tokyo.Frank, 327, citing Bernstein, Eclipsed by Hiroshima and Nagasaki, p 167)The cabinet meeting adjourned at 17:30 with no consensus. A second meeting lasting from 18:00 to 22:00 also ended with no consensus. Following this second meeting, Suzuki and Tg met the emperor, and Suzuki proposed an impromptu Imperial conference, which started just before midnight on the night of August 910.(Hasagawa, 209) Suzuki presented Anamis four-condition proposal as the consensus position of the Supreme Council. The other members of the Supreme Council spoke, as did Kiichir Hiranuma, the president of the Privy Council, who outlined Japans inability to defend itself and also described the countrys domestic problems, such as the shortage of food. The cabinet debated, but again no consensus emerged. At around 02:00 (August 10), Suzuki finally addressed Emperor Hirohito, asking him to decide between the two positions. The participants later recollected that the emperor stated:I have given serious thought to the situation prevailing at home and abroad and have concluded that continuing the war can only mean destruction for the nation and prolongation of bloodshed and cruelty in the world. I cannot bear to see my innocent people suffer any longer. ...I was told by those advocating a continuation of hostilities that by June new divisions would be in place in fortified positions of Tokyo ready for the invader when he sought to land. It is now August and the fortifications still have not been completed. ...There are those who say the key to national survival lies in a decisive battle in the homeland. The experiences of the past, however, show that there has always been a discrepancy between plans and performance. I do not believe that the discrepancy in the case of Kujukuri can be rectified. Since this is also the shape of things, how can we repel the invaders? then made some specific reference to the increased destructiveness of the atomic bombIt goes without saying that it is unbearable for me to see the brave and loyal fighting men of Japan disarmed. It is equally unbearable that others who have rendered me devoted service should now be punished as instigators of the war. Nevertheless, the time has come to bear the unbearable. ...I swallow my tears and give my sanction to the proposal to accept the Allied proclamation on the basis outlined by the Foreign Minister.(Frank, 295296)According to General Sumihisa Ikeda and Admiral Zenshir Hoshina, Privy Council President Kiichir Hiranuma then turned to the emperor and asked him: Your majesty, you also bear responsibility (sekinin) for this defeat. What apology are you going to make to the heroic spirits of the imperial founder of your house and your other imperial ancestors?(Bix, 517, citing Yoshida, Nihonjin no senskan, 4243.)Once the emperor had left, Suzuki pushed the cabinet to accept the emperors will, which it did. Early that morning (August 10), the Foreign Ministry sent telegrams to the Allies (by way of the Swiss Federal Political Department and Grssli in particular) announcing that Japan would accept the Potsdam Declaration, but would not accept any peace conditions that would prejudice the prerogatives of the emperor. That effectively meant no change in Japans form of government(Hoyt, 405)that the of Japan would remain a position of real power.August 12The Allied response was written by F. Byrnes and approved by the British, Chinese, and Soviet governments, although the Soviets agreed only reluctantly. The Allies sent their response (via the Swiss Political Affairs Department) to Japans qualified acceptance of the Potsdam Declaration on August 12. On the status of the emperor it said:From the moment of surrender the authority of the Emperor and the Japanese government to rule the state shall be subject to the Supreme Commander of the Allied powers who will take such steps as he deems proper to effectuate the surrender terms. ...The ultimate form of government of Japan shall, in accordance with the Potsdam Declaration, be established by the freely expressed will of the Japanese people.(Frank, 302)President Truman ordered military operations (including the B-29 bombings) to continue until official word of Japanese surrender was received. However, news correspondents incorrectly interpreted a comment by Andrew Spaatz that the B-29s were not flying on August 11 (because of bad weather) as a statement that a ceasefire was in effect. To avoid giving the Japanese the impression that the Allies had abandoned peace efforts and resumed bombing, Truman then ordered a halt to further bombings.(Frank, 303)(While the ceasefire was in effect, Spaatz made a momentous decision. Based on evidence from the European Strategic Bombing Survey, he ordered the strategic bombing to refocus its efforts away from firebombing Japanese cities, to concentrate on wiping out Japanese oil and transportation infrastructure. Frank, 303307)The Japanese cabinet considered the Allied response, and Suzuki argued that they must reject it and insist on an explicit guarantee for the imperial system. Anami returned to his position that there be no occupation of Japan. Afterward, Tg told Suzuki that there was no hope of getting better terms, and Kido conveyed the emperors will that Japan surrender. In a meeting with the emperor, Yonai spoke of his concerns about growing civil unrest:I think the term is inappropriate, but the atomic bombs and the Soviet entry into the war are, in a sense, divine gifts. This way we dont have to say that we have quit the war because of domestic circumstances.(Frank, 310)That day, Hirohito informed the imperial family of his decision to surrender. One of his uncles, Prince Asaka, then asked whether the war would be continued if the kokutai (national polity) could not be preserved. The emperor simply replied of course.(Terasaki, 129)(Bix, 129)August 1314The Big Six and the cabinet spent August 13 debating their reply to the Allied response, but remained deadlocked. Meanwhile, the Allies grew doubtful, waiting for the Japanese to respond. The Japanese had been instructed that they could transmit an unqualified acceptance in the clear, but with what in retrospect appears to be incredibly poor judgement they sent out coded messages on matters unrelated to the surrender parlay. The Allies took this coded response as non-acceptance of the terms.(Via Ultra intercepts, the Allies also detected increased diplomatic and military traffic, which was taken as evidence that the Japanese were preparing an all-out banzai attack.( President Truman ordered a resumption of attacks against Japan at maximum intensity so as to impress Japanese officials that we mean business and are serious in getting them to accept our peace proposals without delay.( The States Third Fleet began shelling the Japanese coast. In the largest bombing raid of the War, more than 400 B-29s attacked Japan during daylight on August 14, and more than 300 that night.(Smith, 188) A total of 1,014 aircraft were used with no losses.(Wesley F. Craven and James L. Cate, The Army Air Forces in World War II, Vol. 5, pp. 73233. (Catalog entry, U Washington.))In the longest bombing mission of the war,(Smith, 183) B-29s from the 315 Bombardment Wing flew 3,800 miles to destroy the Nippon Oil Company refinery at Tsuchizaki on the northern tip of Honsh. This was the last operational refinery in the Japan Home Islands and it produced 67% of their oil.(Smith, 187) After the war, the bombing raids were justified as already in progress when word of the Japanese surrender was received, but this is only partially true.(Smith 187188 notes that though the daytime bombers had already attacked Japan, the night bombers had not yet taken off when radio notification of the surrender was received. Smith also notes that, despite substantial efforts, he has found no historical documentation relating to Carl Spaatzs order to go ahead with the attack.)File:B29 leaflet.jpg|right|thumbnail|A leaflet dropped on Japan after the bombing of Hiroshima. The leaflet says, in part: The Japanese people are facing an extremely important autumn. Your military leaders were presented with thirteen articles for surrender by our three-country alliance to put an end to this unprofitable war. This proposal was ignored by your army leaders... The United States has developed an atom bomb, which had not been done by any nation before. It has been determined to employ this frightening bomb. One atom bomb has the destructive power of 2000 B-29s.At the suggestion of American psychological operations experts, B-29s spent August 13 dropping leaflets over Japan, describing the Japanese offer of surrender and the Allied response.(Frank, 313) The leaflets had a profound effect on the Japanese decision-making process. As August 14 dawned, Suzuki, Kido, and the emperor realized the day would end with either an acceptance of the American terms or a military coup.(Frank, 314)The emperor met with the most senior Army and Navy officers. While several spoke in favor of fighting on, Field Marshal Hata did not. As commander of the Second General Army, the headquarters of which had been in Hiroshima, Hata commanded all the troops defending southern Japanthe troops preparing to fight the decisive battle. Hata said he had no confidence in defeating the invasion and did not dispute the emperors decision. The emperor asked his military leaders to cooperate with him in ending the war.(At a conference with the cabinet and other councilors, Anami, Toyoda, and Umezu again made their case for continuing to fight, after which the emperor said:I have listened carefully to each of the arguments presented in opposition to the view that Japan should accept the Allied reply as it stands and without further clarification or modification, but my own thoughts have not undergone any change. ... In order that the people may know my decision, I request you to prepare at once an imperial rescript so that I may broadcast to the nation. Finally, I call upon each and every one of you to exert himself to the utmost so that we may meet the trying days which lie ahead.(Frank, 315)The cabinet immediately convened and unanimously ratified the emperors wishes. They also decided to destroy vast amounts of material pertaining to matters related to war crimes and the war responsibility of the nations highest leaders.(Burning of Confidential Documents by Japanese Government, case no. 43, serial 2, International Prosecution Section vol. 8)(Bix, 558) Immediately after the conference, the Foreign ministry transmitted orders to its embassies in Switzerland and Sweden to accept the Allied terms of surrender. These orders were picked up and received in Washington at 02:49, August 14.(The text of the Imperial Rescript on surrender was finalized by 19:00, transcribed by the official court calligrapher, and brought to the cabinet for their signatures. Around 23:00, the emperor, with help from an NHK recording crew, made a record of himself reading it.(Hasegawa, 244) The record was given to court chamberlain Tokugawa, who hid it in a locker in the empresss secretarys office.(Hoyt, 409)Attempted military coup dtat (August 1215)Image:Major Kenji Hatanaka.jpg|thumb|upright|Hatanaka, leader of the coup dtatLate on the night of August 12, 1945, Major Hatanaka, along with Lieutenant Colonels Ida, Takeshita (Anamis brother-in-law), and Masao, and Colonel Arao, the Chief of the Military Affairs Section, spoke to War Minister Anami (the army minister and most powerful figure in Japan besides the Emperor himself),(Frank, 316) and asked him to do whatever he could to prevent acceptance of the Potsdam Declaration. General Anami refused to say whether he would help the young officers in treason.(Frank, 318) As much as they needed his support, Hatanaka and the other rebels decided they had no choice but to continue planning and to attempt a coup dtat on their own. Hatanaka spent much of August 13 and the morning of August 14 gathering allies, seeking support from the higher-ups in the Ministry, and perfecting his plot.(Hoyt 407408)Shortly after the conference on the night of August 1314 at which the surrender finally was decided, a group of senior army officers including Anami gathered in a nearby room. All those present were concerned about the possibility of a coup dtat to prevent the surrendersome of those present may have even been considering launching one. After a silence, General Kawabe proposed that all senior officers present sign an agreement to carry out the emperors order of surrenderThe Army will act in accordance with the Imperial Decision to the last. It was signed by all the high-ranking officers present, including Anami, Sugiyama, Umezu, Doihara, Kawabe, Kawabe, and Wakamatsu. This written accord by the most senior officers in the Army, in addition to Anamis announcement, acted as a formidable firebreak against any attempt to incite a coup dtat in Tokyo.(Frank, 317)Image:Tanaka Shizuichi.jpg|left|upright|thumbnail|The coup collapsed after Tanaka convinced the rebellious officers to go home. Tanaka committed suicide nine days later.Around 21:30 on August 14, Hatanakas rebels set their plan into motion. The Second Regiment of the First Imperial Guards had entered the palace grounds, doubling the strength of the battalion already stationed there, presumably to provide extra protection against Hatanakas rebellion. But Hatanaka, along with Lt. Col. Shiizaki, convinced the commander of the 2nd Regiment of the First Imperial Guards, Colonel Toyojir Haga, of their cause, by telling him (falsely) that Generals Anami and Umezu, and the commanders of the District Army and Imperial Guards Divisions were all in on the plan. Hatanaka also went to the office of Tanaka, commander of the Eastern region of the army, to try to persuade him to join the coup. Tanaka refused, and ordered Hatanaka to go home. Hatanaka ignored the order.(Originally, Hatanaka hoped that simply occupying the palace and showing the beginnings of a rebellion would inspire the rest of the Army to rise up against the move to surrender. This notion guided him through much of the last days and hours and gave him the blind optimism to move ahead with the plan, despite having little support from his superiors. Having set all the pieces into position, Hatanaka and his co-conspirators decided that the Guard would take over the palace at 02:00. The hours until then were spent in continued attempts to convince their superiors in the Army to join the coup. At about the same time, General Anami committed seppuku, leaving a message that, Iwith my deathhumbly apologize to the Emperor for the great crime.(Frank, 319) Whether the crime involved losing the war, or the coup, remains unclear.(Butow, 220)At some time after 01:00, Hatanaka and his men surrounded the palace. Hatanaka, Shiizaki and Captain Shigetar Uehara (of the Air Force Academy) went to the office of Lt. General Takeshi Mori to ask him to join the coup. Mori was in a meeting with his brother-in-law, Shiraishi. The cooperation of Mori, as commander of the 1st Imperial Guards Division, was crucial. When Mori refused to side with Hatanaka, Hatanaka killed him, fearing Mori would order the Guards to stop the rebellion.(Hoyt, 409410) Uehara killed Shiraishi. These were the only two murders of the night. Hatanaka then used General Moris official stamp to authorize Imperial Guards Division Strategic Order No. 584, a false set of orders created by his co-conspirators, which would greatly increase the strength of the forces occupying the Imperial Palace and Household Ministry, and protecting the emperor.(The Pacific War Research Society, 227)The palace police were disarmed and all the entrances blocked.( Over the course of the night, Hatanakas rebels captured and detained eighteen people, including Ministry staff and NHK workers sent to record the surrender speech.(The rebels, led by Hatanaka, spent the next several hours fruitlessly searching for Imperial House Minister Ishiwatari, Lord of the Privy Seal Kido, and the recordings of the surrender speech. The two men were hiding in the bank vault, a large chamber underneath the Imperial Palace.(The Pacific War Research Society, 309)(Butow, 216) The search was made more difficult by a blackout in response to Allied bombings, and by the archaic organization and layout of the Imperial House Ministry. Many of the names of the rooms were unrecognizable to the rebels. The rebels did find the chamberlain Tokugawa. Although Hatanaka threatened to disembowel him with a sword, Tokugawa lied and told them he did not know where the recordings or men were.(Hoyt, 410)(The Pacific War Research Society, 279) During their search, the rebels cut nearly all of the telephone wires, severing communications between their prisoners on the palace grounds and the outside world.At about the same time, in Yokohama, another group of Hatanakas rebels led by Captain Takeo Sasaki went to Prime Minister Suzukis office, intent on killing him. When they found it empty, they machine-gunned the office and set the building on fire, then left for his home. Sakomizu had warned Suzuki, and he escaped minutes before the would-be assassins arrived. After setting fire to Suzukis home, they went to the estate of Hiranuma to assassinate him. Hiranuma escaped through a side gate and the rebels burned his house as well. Suzuki spent the rest of August under police protection, spending each night in a different bed.((Wainstock, 115)Around 03:00, Hatanaka was informed by Lieutenant Colonel Ida that the District Army was on its way to the palace to stop him, and that he should give up.(The Pacific War Research Society, 246)(Hasegawa, 247) Finally, seeing his plan collapsing around him, Hatanaka pleaded with Takashima, Chief of Staff of the District Army, to be given at least ten minutes on the air on NHK radio, to explain to the people of Japan what he was trying to accomplish and why. He was refused.(The Pacific War Research Society, 283) Colonel Haga, commander of the 2nd Regiment of the First Imperial Guards, discovered that the Army did not support this rebellion, and he ordered Hatanaka to leave the palace grounds.Just before 05:00, as his rebels continued their search, Major Hatanaka went to NHK studios, and, brandishing a pistol, tried desperately to get some airtime to explain his actions.(Hoyt, 411) A little over an hour later, after receiving a telephone call from the District Army, Hatanaka finally gave up. He gathered his officers and walked out of the NHK studio.(The Pacific War Research Society, 303)At dawn, Tanaka learned that the palace had been invaded. He went there and confronted the rebellious officers, berating them for acting contrary to the spirit of the Japanese army. He convinced them to return to their barracks.((The Pacific War Research Society, 290) By 08:00, the rebellion was entirely dismantled, having succeeded in holding the palace grounds for much of the night but failing to find the recordings.(The Pacific War Research Society, 311)Hatanaka, on a motorcycle, and Shiizaki, on horseback, rode through the streets, tossing leaflets that explained their motives and their actions. Within an hour before the emperors broadcast, sometime around 11:00, August 15, Hatanaka placed his pistol to his forehead, and shot himself. Shiizaki stabbed himself with a dagger, and then shot himself. In Hatanakas pocket was found his poem: I have nothing to regret now that the dark clouds have disappeared from the reign of the Emperor.(Surrender Broadcast of the Imperial Rescript on surrender At 12:00 noon standard time on August 15, the Emperors recorded speech to the nation, reading the Imperial Rescript on the Termination of the War, was broadcast:... Despite the best that has been done by everyonethe gallant fighting of the military and naval forces, the diligence and assiduity of Our servants of the State, and the devoted service of Our one hundred million peoplethe war situation has developed not necessarily to Japans advantage, while the general trends of the world have all turned against her interest.Moreover, the enemy has begun to employ a new and most cruel bomb, the power of which to do damage is, indeed, incalculable, taking the toll of many innocent lives. Should we continue to fight, not only would it result in an ultimate collapse and obliteration of the Japanese nation, but also it would lead to the total extinction of human civilization.Such being the case, how are We to save the millions of Our subjects, or to atone Ourselves before the hallowed spirits of Our Imperial Ancestors? This is the reason why We have ordered the acceptance of the provisions of the Joint Declaration of the Powers.The hardships and sufferings to which Our nation is to be subjected hereafter will be certainly great. We are keenly aware of the inmost feelings of all of you, Our subjects. However, it is according to the dictates of time and fate that We have resolved to pave the way for a grand peace for all the generations to come by enduring the unendurable and suffering what is unsufferable.The low quality of the recording, combined with the archaic court Japanese used by the Emperor in the Rescript, made the recording very difficult to understand for most listeners.(Dower, 34)Public reaction to the Emperors speech varied&ndash;many Japanese simply listened to it, then went on with their lives as best they could, while some Army and Navy officers chose suicide over surrender.  At a base north of Nagasaki, some Japanese Army officers, enraged at the prospect of surrender, pulled some 16 captured American airmen out of the base prison and hacked them to death with swords. A large, weeping crowd gathered in front of the Imperial Palace in Tokyo, with their cries sometimes interrupted by the sound of gunshots as military officers present committed suicide.(Dower, 38-39)On August 17, Suzuki was replaced as prime minister by the emperors uncle, Prince Higashikuni, perhaps to forestall any further coup or assassination attempts;(Spector, 558. (Spector incorrectly identifies Higashikuni as the Emperors brother.)) Shigemitsu replaced Tg as foreign minister.Japans forces were still fighting against the Soviets as well as the Chinese, and managing their cease-fire and surrender was difficult. The last air combat by Japanese fighters against American reconnaissance bombers took place on August 18.(The Last to Die | Military Aviation | Air & Space Magazine. Airspacemag.com. Retrieved on 2010-08-05.) The Soviet Union continued to fight until early September, taking the Islands.Beginning of occupation and the surrender ceremonyImage:American military personnel gather in Paris to celebrate the Japanese surrender.jpg|thumb|right|Allied personnel celebrate Japanese surrender in ParisAllied civilians and servicemen alike rejoiced at the news of the end of the war. A photograph, day in Times Square, of an American sailor kissing a woman in New York, and a news film of the Man in Sydney have come to epitomize the immediate celebrations. August 14 and 15 are celebrated as over Japan Day in many Allied countries.(Which day they celebrate V-J day depends on the local time at which they received word of Japans surrender. British Commonwealth countries celebrate the 15th, whereas the United States celebrates the 14th.)The Soviet Union had some intentions of occupying Hokkaid.(Hasegawa, 271ff)  Unlike the occupations of Germany and Korea, however, these plans were frustrated by the opposition of President Truman.(Japanese officials left for Manila on August 19 to meet Commander of the Allied Powers MacArthur, and to be briefed on his plans for the occupation. On August 28, 150 U.S. personnel flew to Atsugi, Prefecture, and the occupation of Japan began.  They were followed by USS Missouri, whose accompanying vessels landed the 4th Marines on the southern coast of Kanagawa. Other Allied personnel followed.MacArthur arrived in Tokyo on August 30, and immediately decreed several laws: No Allied personnel were to assault Japanese people. No Allied personnel were to eat the scarce Japanese food. Flying the Hinomaru or Rising Sun flag was severely restricted.(Individuals and prefectural offices could apply for permission to fly it. The restriction was partially lifted in 1948 and completely lifted the following year.)at surrender ceremony. The flag flown by Perry is visible in the background.The formal surrender occurred on September 2, 1945 when representatives from the of Japan signed the Instrument of Surrender in Bay aboard the USS Missouri. Shigemitsu signed for the civil government, while Gen. Umezu signed for the military.On the Missouri that day was the American flag flown in 1853  on the USS Powhatan by Commodore C. Perry on the first of his two expeditions to Japan. Perrys expeditions had resulted in the of Kanagawa, which forced the Japanese to open the country to American trade.(The framed flag in lower right is that hoisted by Commodore Matthew C. Perry on 14 July 1853, in Yedo (Tokyo) Bay, on his first expedition to negotiate the opening of Japan. Formal Surrender of Japan, 2 September 1945Surrender Ceremonies Begin. United States Naval Historical Center. Retrieved February 25, 2009.)(Dower, 41)After the formal surrender on September 2 aboard the Missouri, investigations into war crimes began quickly. At a meeting with General MacArthur later in September, Emperor Hirohito offered to take blame for the war crimes, but his offer was rejected, and he was never tried.(1945: Japan signs unconditional surrender On This Day: September 2, BBC.)  Legal procedures for the Military Tribunal for the Far East were issued on January 19, 1946.(The Tokyo War Crimes Trials (19461948). The American Experience: MacArthur. PBS. Retrieved February 25, 2009.)In addition to August 14 and 15, September 2, 1945 is also known as Day.(  In Japan, August 15 is often called Shsen-kinenbi (), which literally means the memorial day for the end of the war, but the governments name for the day (which is not a national holiday) is Senbotsusha o tsuit shi heiwa o kinen suru hi (, day for mourning of war dead and praying for peace).() In Korea, V-J Day is commemorated on August 15 as Gwangbokjeol (literally Restoration of the Light Day) in the South and as Joguk Haebang Ginyeomil (roughly translated to Motherland Liberation Day) in the North; in Australia it is Victory in the Pacific Day, V-P Day.President Truman declared September 2 to be V-J Day, but noted that It is not yet the day for the formal proclamation of the end of the war nor of the cessation of hostilities.(Radio Address to the American People after the Signing of the Terms of Unconditional Surrender by Japan, Harry S. Truman Library and Museum (1945-09-01).)Further surrenders and continued Japanese military resistanceFollowing the signing of the instrument of surrender, many further surrender ceremonies took place across Japans remaining holdings in the Pacific. Japanese forces in East Asia surrendered on September 12, 1945 in Singapore. The Japanese surrender ceremonies in Taiwan marked the beginning of the military occupation of the island.() It was not until 1947 that all prisoners held by America and Britain were repatriated. As late as April 1949, China still held more than 60,000 Japanese prisoners.(Dower, 51) Some, such as Tominaga, were not repatriated until the late 1950s.(Cook 40, 468)The logistical demands of the surrender were formidable. After Japans capitulation, more than 5,400,000 Japanese soldiers and 1,800,000 Japanese sailors were taken prisoner by the Allies.(Weinberg, 892)(Cook 403 gives the total number of Japanese servicemen as 4,335,500 in Japan on the day of the surrender, with an additional 3,527,000 abroad.) The damage done to Japans infrastructure, combined with a severe famine in 1946, further complicated the Allied efforts to feed the Japanese POWs and civilians.(Frank, 350352)(Cook contains an interview with Iitoyo Shogo about his experiences as POW of the British at Islandknown to prisoners as Starvation Island)Some holdouts, especially on small Pacific Islands, refused to surrender at all (believing the declaration to be propaganda or considering surrender against their code). Some may never have heard of it. Nakamura, the last known holdout, emerged from his hidden retreat in Indonesia in December 1974, while two other Japanese soldiers, who had joined communist guerrillas at the end of the war, fought in southern Thailand until 1991.(World War II, Wilmott, Cross & Messenger, Dorling Kindersley, 2004.)Brigadier Taunton, the commander of British forces in Borneo accepts the sword of a Japanese commander.References Footnotes Texts** extracts on-line**** Ford, Daniel, The Last Raid. Air&Space Smithsonian, September 1995: 7481* * Glantz, LTC David M. (1983a). August Storm: The Soviet 1945 Strategic Offensive in Manchuria, Leavenworth Paper No.7, and General Staff College, Fort Leavenworth, KA, February 1983.* Glantz, LTC David M. (1983b). August Storm: Soviet Tactical and Operational Combat in Manchuria, 1945, Leavenworth Paper No.8, Command and General Staff College, Fort Leavenworth, KA, June 1983.* Glantz, David M. (1995) The Soviet Invasion of Japan. Quarterly Journal of Military History, vol. 7, no. 3, Spring 1995.*** * ** *** * Hidenari Terasaki () (1991). Shwa Tenn dokuhakuroku: Terasaki Hidenari, goy-gakari nikki (). Tokyo: Bungei Shunj. ISBN 4-16-345050-5. * * * External links* Original Document: Surrender of Japan* United Newsreel of surrender from Google Video* The last mission over Japan* Hirohitos Determination of surrender  Shsen (Japanese)* Top secret record of private talk between British Prime Minister Churchill and Marshal Stalin, at the Conference on July 17, 1945.* YouTube - JAPANESE SIGN FINAL SURRENDER on USS Missouri (subtitled) Japansde Japnde capitulation du JaponJepangdel Giapponeja:do JapoJaponieizh:
2400934
Yeshivah_College,_Australia
website       www.ybr.vic.edu.auYeshivas Oholei Yosef Yitzchok Lubavitch, known more commonly as Yeshivah College, is an independent, single-sex, Orthodox day school for boys, located in St Kilda East, a suburb of Melbourne, Victoria, Australia.The school is run by the Chabad-Lubavitch movements Yeshivah Centre, and caters for students from kindergarten through to Year 12.AdministrationThe school is part of a worldwide network of schools named after Rabbi Yitzchok Schneersohn, the sixth Lubavitcher Rebbe. The school is as a branch of the Yeshiva Centre umbrella, and Rabbi Mordechai Berger was the principal of the high school, having replaced Rabbi Avrohom Glick at the start of the 2008 school year, however, Rabbi Glick stepped in as Interim Menahel when Rabbi Berger left at the end of the 2009 school year. Rabbi Glick ended his term as Interim Menahel at the end of term two, being succeeded by Rabbi Yehoshua Smukler from Sydney, Australia.Curriculumthumb|225px|left|The Mochkin Building, which serves as the entrance to the Yeshivah primary school.Yeshivah College has two educational tracks.  One is a dual curriculum including both religious studies and general education studies.  The other is a religious studies only curriculum known as Mesivta (Hebrew for academy), for Year 10 students and above.Every year a group of five shluchim (emissaries) are sent from Ohlei Torah Rabinical College to assist the teachers and mashpias of the school in setting an example for todays students. They do so my insituting mivtzos (programs) which encourage the practice of Chassidic life and a connection to the Rebbe.In the communityIn previous years Yeshivah has scored the top VCE result for a non-selective boys only school.The Yeshivah school is part of a larger network of facilities of the Yeshivah Centre, which include a youth movement, Jewish studies classes, day camps, and many other initiatives for Melbournes wider Jewish community.The Melbourne Lubavitch community is part of a larger Haredi community based in Melbourne.Sexual Abuse ScandalIn 2011, the Yeshivah College was rocked by a sexual abuse scandal at the school and the consistent failure of the school leadership to report the matters to police.Victoria Police launched a formal investigation and established a taskforce. Whilst the investigation initially focused on former teacher David Kramer and alleged sexual assaults between 1989 and 1993, it has spread to include other alleged perpetrators operating on the Yeshivah grounds. The matter has been widely reported in the mainstream press including The Age(http://www.theage.com.au/victoria/jewish-community-leader-tells-of-sex-abuse-20110707-1h4t4.html); The Australian(http://www.theaustralian.com.au/news/nation/jewish-boys-school-gave-molester-free-run/story-e6frg6nf-1226095591892); Herald Sun(http://www.heraldsun.com.au/news/more-news/jewish-group-protected-sex-offender/story-fn7x8me2-1226131032390); and The Australian Jewish News.(http://www.jewishnews.net.au/further-abuse-claims-rock-community/21931). In September 2011, David Cyprys a former student and employee at the Yeshivah College was charged 13 counts of gross indecency with a child and 16 counts of indecent assault with a child between 1984 and 1991. The youngest of his 12 alleged victims was aged 7 at the time(http://www.theaustralian.com.au/news/nation/yeshiva-turned-blind-eye-to-sex-abuse-claims/story-e6frg6nf-1226130935332).Notable alumni*Filmore - writer, director, producer and venture philanthropist*Rabbi Gutnick*Rabbi Bentzion Milecki()*Rabbi Chaim Tzvi Groner*Gutnick - mining magnate*Harvey Silver - original producers of the Footy Show*Safran - award winning comedian*Solomon (writer) - noted international Jewish historian and author See also * of schools in Victoria* of high schools in Victoria* Certificate of Education*JudaismReferencesExternal links* Yeshivah College Website
2405325
Farrington_Gurney
North East SomersetFarrington Gurney is an English village and parish situated in and North East Somerset unitary authority. The village lies on the junction of the A37 and the A362 in Somerset. The parish has a population of 846.(HistoryIn the book the village was known as Ferentone.() The second part of the name is believed to come from the Gournays, its ancient possessors, including Robert de Gournay in 1225. Sir Thomas de Gournay was concerned in the murder of Edward II at Castle, for which his estates were confiscated, and Farrington was later annexed to the of Cornwall.The manor house is believed to date from 1637 and the old parsonage from around 1700.(Industry included mining on the coalfield from about 1780 but the local pits closed in the 1920s.() There used to be an unmanned railway station or halt between 11 July 1927 and 2 November 1959, when the and North Somerset Railway line closed.GovernanceThe parish council has responsibility for local issues, including setting an annual precept (local rate) to cover the councils operating costs and producing annual accounts for public scrutiny. The parish council evaluates local planning applications and works with the local police, district council officers, and neighbourhood watch groups on matters of crime, security, and traffic. The parish councils role also includes initiating projects for the maintenance and repair of parish facilities, such as the hall or centre, fields and playgrounds, as well as consulting with the district council on the maintenance, repair, and improvement of highways, drainage, footpaths, public transport, and street cleaning. Conservation matters (including trees and listed buildings) and environmental issues are also of interest to the council.The parish falls within the authority of and North East Somerset which was created in 1996, as established by the Government Act 1992. It provides a single tier of local government with responsibility for almost all local government functions within its area including local planning and building control, local roads, housing, health, markets and fairs, collection, recycling, cemeteries, crematoria, leisure services, parks, and tourism. It is also responsible for education, services, libraries, main roads, transport, trading standards, disposal and strategic planning, although fire, police and ambulance services are provided jointly with other authorities through the Fire and Rescue Service, and Somerset Constabulary and the Western Ambulance Service. Bath and North East Somersets area covers part of the ceremonial county of Somerset but it is administered independently of the county. Its administrative headquarters is in Bath. Between 1 April 1974 and 1 April 1996, it was the Wansdyke district and the City of Bath of the of Avon.() Before 1974 that the parish was part of the Rural District.(A Vision of Britain Through Time : Clutton Rural District)The parish is represented in the House of Commons of the of the United Kingdom as part of North East Somerset.() It elects one Member of Parliament (MP) by the past the post system of election. It is also part of the South West England constituency of the Parliament which elects seven MEPs using the method of proportional representation.EducationThere is a school in the village, Farrington Gurney of England Primary School.Religious sitesThe church is a small stone edifice dedicated to John the Baptist, originally of architecture, rebuilt in Gothic style by Pinch the younger in 1843.() The stump of the medieval cross and a carving over the door survive from an earlier building.() The church is set away from the main village in a picturesque location in the middle of a field, originally in order to protect the villagers from the plague.The Methodist Church situated on the main A37/39 Road is part of the North East Somerset and Bath Circuit of Methodist Churches. Methodism started in the village around 1823, and the first building was near the site of the old village hall. The present church was built during 1880-1881 at a cost of 485, with a further 129 spent on furnishings. The land was negotiated from the of Cornwall by Colonol Mogg from Manor House. Mogg was an Anglican and this was a good early example of Ecumenism. The building was extended with the schoolrooms added in 1909, with the new electric light installed in 1931. The last significant addition was the toilet and kitchen extension added in 1971. The building is used extensively during the week by the Little Stars Nursery, church members and friends meet for Coffee and Chat on a Wednesday morning, and Morning Worship is held in the church every Sunday. (North East Somerset and Bath Circuit News Magazine September 2011)Mineral ResourcesGurney Colliery  operated from around 1738 until 1921.() Sport  Farrington Gurney FC was founded in 1901 and it officially joined the FA in that year. Farrington joined the Football League in 1961/62 season and stayed with the league for four seasons before moving into the Bristol League. The 1975/76 season saw Farrington Gurney switch back to the Mid-Somerset League from the Suburban League going straight into Division 2. After winning promotion in style the next few seasons saw Farrington Gurney struggle in the Premier Division finishing 7th (1976/77), bottom (1977/78) and again bottom (1978/79). They were relegated to the First Division in 1979 and finished 4th that season.The early 90s started promisingly for Farrington Gurney, in 1990 finished the season well by getting promoted back to the First Division. Farrington Gurney Football Club play in the Premier Division of the Mid-Somerset Football League.() References  External links *BANES Rural Areas Area 8 Farrington Gurney Farmlands*  Map of Farrington Gurney circa 1900GurneyGurneyGurney
2411709
Lucas_Alamn
 footnotes      Lucas Ignacio Alamn y Escalada (Guanajuato, October 18, 1792 &ndash; City, June 2, 1853) was a Mexican scientist, politician, historian and writer. He studied at the Colegio de Minas de la Nueva Espaa. He frequently traveled on his credentials as a scientist and diplomat, becoming one of the most educated men in Mexico. At the outset of the war for Mexican independence, in September 1810, Alamn is said to have been an eyewitness of the massacre of Spanish families in his home city of Guanajuato. This experience may have influenced his lifelong devotion to politics and his nostalgia for monarchic rule for Mexico. In 1821, before the consummation of Mexicos independence, Alamn was a deputy  to the Cortes (the Spanish national parliament) for the province of Galicia (now Jalisco, Nayarit, Sonora, Sinaloa, among other states), Spain. Later in the same year Mexico won its independence from Spain. Alamn returned to Mexico and became one of the most influential politicians in the nascent country. He was a co-founder and lifelong member of the Conservative Party, and he consistently defended the centralist organization of Mexico. It is said that he was one of those behind the murder of independence hero Guerrero. Under the junta that governed Mexico after the fall of Iturbide, Alamn served from 1823 to 1825 in the powerful post of Minister of Interior and Exterior Relations (Ministro de Relaciones Interiores e Exteriores; the States equivalent of this posting would encompass the combined functions of Secretary of State, Secretary of the Interior, and Attorney General). He was a member of the junta that briefly governed Mexico in 1829 after the Plan de Jalapa with the aim of installing Bustamante as president. Alamn returned to the post of Minister of Interior and Exterior Relations in 1830-1832 under the Bustamante government. It was in this capacity that he named Victoria of Alta California March 8, 1830. In October 1830, he created the Nacional de Avo, the first bank in Mexico. The Banco Nacional de Avo provided Mexico with the financial infrastructure necessary for its burgeoning economy. During the same period Alamn negotiated a deal with the States to the north fixing the national borders of the two nations which held right up to the time of the War. He also promoted colonizing the northern provinces in order to stave off U.S. expansionism.After what he saw as the disaster of Texas independence from Mexico in 1836, Alamn largely retired from politics, though he continued to promote what he saw as the interests of the country by serving as Director de la Junta de Fomento de la Industria (Directorate for the Promotion of Industry) from 1839 until his death. For most of the 1840s, he devoted himself primarily to writing the history of Mexico from the perspective of a conservative. His three-volume work Disertaciones sobre la Historia de la Republica mexicana (Mexico, 1844-1849) and his five-volume Historia de Mxico, desde los primeros movimientos que prepararon su independencia en el ao de 1808, hasta la poca presente (Mexico, 1849-1852), stand as the major intellectual productions of the Conservative Party in nineteenth-century Mexico, and the only histories produced by a Mexican author of his era to view the Spanish presence in his country favourably.Among his more important actions are the creation of the Natural History Museum in City and the foundation of Mexicos General National Archive. The latter has been very important for learning about the historical events in Mexico and understanding the political processes of the Mexican Republic. He also founded and ran a mining company, established the first metal foundry in independent Mexico in 1825, administered the estates of the descendants of Corts, and served as president of the Mexico City ayuntamiento (city council) in 1849.Lucas Alamn returned to national public service in 1851, when Santa Anna reappointed him for the last time to the post of Minister of Relations, in which he served until his death from pneumonia on June 2, 1853.External links***** http://lacasonadedonlucas.comAlamnAlamnAlamnAlamnAlamnAlamnAlamnAlamnAlamn 
2418254
Wad
Wad is an old mining term for any black manganese oxide or hydroxide mineral rich rock in the oxidized zone of various ore deposits. Typically closely associated with various iron oxides. Specific mineral varieties include pyrolusite, lithiophorite, nsutite, takanelite and vernadite.References*MindatExternal linksit:Wadpt:Waduk:
2423272
Ty_Nguyn
Ty Nguyn, translated as Western Highlands and sometimes also called Central Highlands, is one of the regions of Vietnam.  It contains the provinces of k Lk, k Nng, Gia Lai, Kon Tum, Lm ng.This region is sometimes referred to as Cao nguyn Trung b (literally Midland Highlands), and was referred to during the of Vietnam as Cao nguyn Trung phn (literally Central Highlands).ProvincesDemographicsThe Tay Nguyen region is home to a large population of ethnic minorities such as the people of languages (Jarai and Ede) and the people of languages (Bahnar and Khor). They have made up the majority of the regions population for a long time. However, this changed over the last few decades due to immigration of Kinh people (ethnic Vietnamese). As of 2006, there was a Kinh majority in the Central Highlands, while there were still several districts that had a non-Kinh majority (most of them in Lai Province).(General Statistics Office (1996): Population Data of Sparsely Populated Areas in Vietnam. Statistical Publishing House, Hanoi)The Central Highlands had a population of 4,935,200 people in 2007.(calculations based on General Statistics Office (2009): Socio-economical Statistical Data of 63 Provinces and Cities. Statistical Publishing House, Hanoi) As a result of resettlement campaigns of various governments (colonial, Vietnam, post-war), the regions population has increased significantly. It was 420,000 in 1926, but had reached 2.8 million in 1991(McElwee, Pamela 2008: Becoming Socialist or Becoming Kinh? Government Policies for Ethnic Minorities in the Socialist Republic of Vietnam. in Duncan, Christopher (ed.): Civilizing the Margins - Southeast Asian Government Policies for the Development of Minorities. NUS Press, Singapore) and 4.2 million in 2000.(General Statistics Office (2009): Socio-economic Statistical Data of 63 Provinces and Cities, Vietnam. Statistical Publishing House, Hanoi) Population growth between 2000 and 2007 averaged 2.24% per year, which is significantly higher than that of other regions, such as the South Central Coast (1.22%) and North Central Coast (0.86%).( Growth has been particularly fast in Nong Province with 4.76%, followed by Tum Province with 2.64%.(The Central Highlands population density is 72.2/km as of 2007, higher than that of the South Central Coast (68.4), but lower than that of the North Central Coast (86.1).( The most densely populated provinces are Dak Lak and Lam Dong, while Kon Tum is the least densely populated.GeographyFile:Dong Son Village.jpg|thumb|right|Dong Son village in Lak Province, surrounded by mountains.Ty Nguyn is a plateau bordering the lower part of Laos and northeastern Cambodia. Tum Province shares a border with both Laos and Cambodia but Lai Province and Lak Province only share borders with Cambodia. Dong Province is landlocked, and thus has no international border with any other nation.Actually, Tay Nguyen is not situated on a unique plateau, instead it lies on series of contiguous plateaus, namely Kon Tum at the height of 500 m, Plng Plateau, H Nng Plateau, Pleiku with the height of around 800m, Plateau of approximately 500 m, k Lk of around 800m, M Nng with the height of about 800&ndash;1000 m, Lm Vin Plateau of approximately 1500 m and Linh Plateau of about 900&ndash;1000 m. All of these plateau are surrounded by the high mountain ranges and mounts (Anamite Range).Ty Nguyn can be divided into 3 subregions according to its deviation in topography and climate, namely: North Tay Nguyen (Bc Ty Nguyn) (inclusive of Kon Tum and Gia Lai Provinces), Middle Tay Nguyen (Trung Ty Nguyn) (covering provinces of k Lk and k Nng), South Tay Nguyen (Nam Ty Nguyn) (Lm ng). Trung Ty Nguyn has lower altitude and therefore has a higher temperature from other two subregions.AgricultureTay Nguyen contains in it many primitive forests and is protected in its parks, such as Tien National Park, Don National Park, Ka Kinh National Park. The region has an average altitude of 500&ndash;600 m with basalt soil, suitable for planting tree, cacao, pepper, and mulberry. Cashew and plants are also planted here. Coffee is the most important product of Tay Nguyen, with production centred in Dak Lak Province. The provincial capital of Buon Ma Thuot hosts a number of major coffee factories, including ones owned by major producer Nguyen. Tay Nguyen is also the third natural bauxite source in the world. Plans for bauxite mining in the area have met with some controversy, both because of the environmental impact of the proposed operations, and because of labour issues.Flora and faunaTay nguyen is the home to most prominent and also most endangered species of Vietnam and Southeast Asia: the tiger, the huge gaur, the Asian Water Buffalo, the banteng, and the elephant.ReferencesNguynNguyn Nguyenja:Paskowyu CentralnegoAltas do CentroNguynNguynzh:
2430273
Alibaba_Group
Alibaba Group (simplified Chinese: ; traditional Chinese: ; pinyin:lbb Jtun) is a privately owned Hangzhou, China-based family of Internet-based businesses that includes online marketplaces that facilitate business-to-business international and domestic China trade, retail and payment platforms, a shopping search engine, and data-centric cloud computing services.Alibaba Group and its affiliated entities now have more than 22,000 employees across some 70 cities and regions, including China, Hong Kong, India, Japan, Korea, Taiwan, the United Kingdom, and the United States.Alibaba Group and its affiliated entities:*Alibaba.com (HKSE: 1688) - publicly traded company in e-commerce for small businesses*Marketplace - consumer-to-consumer (C2C) online shopping platform*Mall - business-to-consumer (B2C) online retail marketplace*eTao - search engine designed for online shoppers*Alibaba Cloud Computing - advanced data-centric cloud computing services platform*China Yahoo! - one of Chinas leading internet portals*Alipay - third-party online payment platformNamingthumb|Alibaba screenshotMa said, One day I was in San Francisco in a coffee shop, and I was thinking Alibaba is a good name. And then a waitress came, and I said do you know about Alibaba? And she said yes. I said what do you know about Alibaba, and she said Open sesame. And I said yes, this is the name! Then I went onto the street and found 30 people and asked them, Do you know Alibaba? People from India, people from Germany, people from Tokyo and China They all knew about Alibaba. Alibaba  open sesame. Alibaba is a kind, smart business person, and he helped the village. Soeasy to spell, and globally known. Alibaba opens sesame for small- to medium-sized companies. We also registered the name Alimama, in case someone wants to marry us!()Alibaba Group companies and affiliated entitiesAlibaba.comAlibaba.com Limited (HKSE: 1688.HK) (simplified Chinese:; traditional Chinese: ),), the flagship company of Alibaba Group, is the worlds largest online business-to-business trading platform for small businesses.Founded in Hangzhou in eastern China, Alibaba.com has four marketplaces. The companys English language international marketplace (www.alibaba.com) serves to bring together importers and exporters from more than 240 countries and regions. The China marketplace (www.1688.com) is developed for domestic business-to-business trade in China. It also has a Japanese marketplace (www.alibaba.co.jp), which is focused on facilitating trade to and from Japan through an associated company. In addition, Alibaba.com offers a transaction-based wholesale platform, AliExpress (www.aliexpress.com), which allows smaller buyers to buy small quantities of goods at wholesale prices.The company claims that together these marketplaces have more than 65 million registered users.  Alibaba.com was listed in the Hong Kong Stock Exchange at the IPO price of HK$13.5 on 6 November 2007, raising HK$13.1 billion (US$1.7 billion) in the second-largest initial public offering sale of an Internet company after Google Inc.Taobao MarketplaceMarketplace (www.taobao.com), previously known as Taobao, is the biggest C2C online shopping platform in China. Founded in 2003, it provides a wide variety of product offerings. The company claims that it served more than 370 million registered users as of the end of 2010.Taobao MallMall (www.tmall.com) was introduced in April 2008 as a dedicated B2C platform to complement Taobaos C2C marketplace and became an independent business in June 2011. It is now a major online shopping destination for quality, brand name goods in China.eTaoeTao was beta-launched by Taobao in October 2010 as an independent search engine and became an independent business in June 2011. It is the most comprehensive shopping search engine in China, covering product results from all major Chinese online shopping platforms.AlipayLaunched in 2004, Alipay (www.alipay.com) is a third-party online payment platform. According to analyst research report, Alipay has the biggest market share in China. The company claims it had more than 550 million registered users as of the end of 2010. In 2011, it was the largest online payment system in the world by value of transactions. (http://www.economist.com/node/21524821 The Economist An internet with Chinese characteristics.)Alipay provides a payment service called escrow,( in which consumers can verify whether they are happy with goods they have bought before releasing money to the seller.In China, Alipay partners with more than 65 financial institutions including Visa and MasterCard to provide payment solutions for Taobao as well as more than 500,000 Chinese businesses. Internationally, Alipay helps more than 300 merchants and sellers worldwide sell directly to consumers in China. It currently supports transactions in 12 major foreign currencies. Alipay is an affiliate of Alibaba Group. The 2009 transfer of Alipays ownership from the Alibaba Group to a private company controlled by Jack Ma was controversial, with media reports in 2011 that Yahoo! and Softbank (Alibaba Groups controlling shareholders) were not informed of the sale for nominal value. Chinese business publication Century Weekly criticised the actions of Ma,(Caixin Online (2011). How Jack Mas Mistake Damaged Chinas Market. Retrieved 14 June 2011.) while Ma stated that Alibaba Groups board of directors were aware of the transaction. The ownership dispute was resolved by Alibaba, Yahoo! and Softbank in July 2011.(Dealbook (2011). Yahoo and Alibaba Resolve Dispute Over Alipay. Retrieved 30 July 2011.)Alibaba Cloud ComputingAlibaba Cloud Computing aims to build an advanced data-centric cloud computing service platform, including e-commerce data mining, high-speed massive e-commerce data processing, and as well as data customization. It was established in September 2009 in conjunction with the 10th anniversary of Alibaba Group.China Yahoo!In October 2005, Alibaba Group formed a strategic partnership with Yahoo! Inc and acquired China Yahoo! (www.yahoo.com.cn), which is a Chinese portal with a focus on essential Internet services including news, email and search. Development history * In December 1998, Jack Ma and other 17 founders released their first online marketplace named Alibaba Online.*  From 1999 to 2000, Alibaba Group raised a total of US$25 million from SoftBank, Goldman Sachs, Fidelity and some other institutions.* In December 2001, Alibaba.com achieved profitability.*  In May 2003, Taobao was founded as a consumer e-commerce platform.* In December 2004, Alipay became an independent business.* In October 2005, Alibaba Group took over the operation of China Yahoo! as part of its strategic partnership with Yahoo! Inc.* In November, 2007, Alibaba.com successfully listed on the Hong Kong Stock Exchange.* In April 2008, Taobao established Taobao Mall, a dedicated B2C platform, to complement its C2C marketplace.* In September 2008, Alibaba Group R&D Institute was established.* In September 2009, Alibaba Group established Alibaba Cloud Computing in conjunction with its 10-year anniversary.* In May 2010, Alibaba Group announced a plan to earmark 0.3% of its annual revenues to fund environmental protection initiatives.* In October 2010, Taobao beta-launched eTao as an independent shopping search engine.* In June 2011, Alibaba Group reorganized Taobao into three separate companies: Taobao Marketplace, Taobao Mall and eTao.* In July 2011, Alibaba Group launched its first self-developed mobile operating system, Aliyun over K-Touch Cloud Smartphone. A customized Android system of a PC running the Aliyun OS will be launched by the end of 2011.(Alibaba launches smartphone running its Clouds OS)ReferencesExternal links*Alibaba.com*http://online.wsj.com/article/SB10001424052748704247504575008742148632682.html*Alibaba UKGroupGroupja:Grouptr:Alibaba.comvi:Alibaba.comzh:
2438083
Metacomet_Trail
:This topic is about a footpath in Connecticut. It should not be confused with the similarly named Trail of Massachusetts and New Hampshire.The Metacomet Trail is a  Blue-Blazed hiking trail that traverses the Ridge of central Connecticut and is a part of the newly designated England National Scenic Trail. Despite being easily accessible and close to large population centers, the trail is considered remarkably rugged and scenic. The route includes many areas of unique ecologic, historic, and geologic interest. Notable features include waterfalls, dramatic cliff faces, woodlands, swamps, lakes, river flood plain, farmland, significant historic sites, and the summits of Mountain and the Hills.(Connecticut Walk Book: A Trail Guide to the Connecticut Outdoors. 17th Edition. The Connecticut Forest and Park Association. Rockfall, Connecticut. Undated.)(The Traprock Wilderness Recovery Strategy. Cited Dec. 13, 2007) The Metacomet Trail is maintained largely through the efforts of the Forest and Park Association.On March 30, 2009 President Barack Obama signed the Omnibus Public Land Management Act of 2009 establishing the England National Scenic Trail (and two other national scenic trails).()The combination of the Metacomet, Monadnock and Mattabesett trails is also often referred to as the 3-M, MMM or Metacomet-Monadnock-Mattabesett trail.  The England National Scenic Trail includes all or almost all of the MMM trails as well as a the new extension trail from the southern-most point on the Mattabesett Trail through Guilford, Connecticut to the northern shore of Long Island Sound.(http://newenglandnst.org/Map.aspx)Trail descriptionThe Metacomet Trail extends from the Connecticut/ Massachusetts border south through Hartford and northern New Haven counties in Connecticut. The southern terminus of the trail is located just east of the Hills on Route 5,  north of the city of Meriden, in the town of Connecticut; the northern terminus is located in the hamlet of Rising Corner, part of Connecticut,  southwest of Massachusetts. The  Trail in Massachusetts and the Greenway in Hampshire continue the footway north from the Metacomet Trail another  to central New Hampshire. The  Trail picks up where the Metacomet Trail leaves off in Berlin and continues south to Mountain then northeast to the River in Middletown.((The Metacomet-Monadnock Trail Guide. 9th Edition. The Appalachian Mountain Club. Amherst, Massachusetts, 1999)(Hardy, David. Monadnock-Sunapee Greenway Trail Guide 4th ed. Society for the Protection of New Hampshire Forests, Concord, New Hampshire, 1994.) Significant networks of shorter hiking trails intersect the Metacomet Trail, most notably on Mountain, the Hills, and Ragged Mountain.(The Metacomet Trail is primarily used for hiking, backpacking, picnicking, and in the winter, snowshoeing. Portions of the trail are suitable for, and are used for, biking and skiing. Site-specific activities enjoyed along the route include hunting, fishing, riding, boating, bouldering, climbing (access), and swimming.((Connecticut Department of Environmental Protection. Cited Dec. 21, 2007)Trail routeImage:Farmingtonriver gorge.jpg|left|thumb|180px|Tariffville Gorge from HillThe Metacomet Trail traverses the traprock Ridge which extends from Island Sound to the Massachusetts/ Vermont border. This ridge, rising hundreds of feet above the River, River, and River valleys, is a prominent landscape feature of central Connecticut. From south to north, the trail uses the ridges of the Hills, Mountain, Ragged Mountain, Mountain, Pinnacle Rock, Rattlesnake Mountain, Mountain, Mountain, Hill, Mountain, and Suffield Mountain. Abrupt vertical cliffs with visible talus slopes and frequent viewpoints are common throughout. Views are generally to the west from West Suffield Mountain south through Ragged Mountain; with views in all directions at varying points in the Hanging Hills. The Farmington River cuts through the ridgeline between Hatchet Hill and Talcott Mountain in the Tariffville Gorge (east of Simsbury). Historic features along the trail include Newgate Prison museum and copper mine in East Granby; Tower on Talcott Mountain with  expansive view of four states; the Hill-Stead museum in Connecticut, notable for its French impressionist painting collection and gardens; and Park of the Hanging Hills of Meriden, designed with the help of famous landscape architect Law Olmstead and crowned with a small observation tower known as Castle Craig.(((Hubbard Park. PDF Brochure. South Central Regional Council of Governments. Cited Dec. 13, 2007.) The traprock ridges and talus slopes of the Metacomet Ridge are also home to several unique microclimate ecosystems that support species of plants that are unusual or endangered in this part of England, and are a seasonal migration path for raptors.(Farnsworth, Elizabeth J. Metacomet-Mattabesett Trail Natural Resource Assessment., 2004. PDF file. Cited Nov. 20, 2007. ) Viewshed from the ledges include agrarian land, suburbs, small towns, river corridors, the eastern Berkshires ridgeline, and metropolitan Meriden and Hartford.(Trail communitiesThe Metacomet Trail passes through land located within the following incorporated towns, from south to north: Berlin, Meriden, Southington, New Britain, Plainville, Farmington, West Hartford, Avon, Bloomfield, Simsbury, East Granby, and Connecticut ((DeLorme Topo 6.0. Mapping Software. DeLorme, Yarmouth, Maine)Landscape, geology, and natural environmentthumb|right|220px|Ragged Mountain summitThe Metacomet Ridge that forms the spine of the Metacomet Trail was formed 200 million years ago during the late Triassic and early Jurassic periods, and is composed of traprock, also known as basalt, an extrusive rock. Basalt is a dark colored rock, but the iron within it weathers to a rusty brown when exposed to the air, lending the ledges a distinct reddish appearance. Basalt frequently breaks into octagonal and pentagonal columns, creating a unique postpile appearance. Huge slopes made of fractured basalt scree are visible beneath many of the cliffs along the Metacomet Trail.(Raymo, Chet and Maureen E. Written in Stone: A Geologic History of the Northeastern United States. Globe Pequot, Chester, Connecticut, 1989.) The Metacomet Ridge was the product of several massive lava flows hundreds of feet deep that welled up in faults created by the rifting apart of America from Eurasia and Africa. The basalt floods of lava occurred over a period of 20 million years. Erosion occurring between the eruptions deposited deep layers of sediment between the lava flows, which eventually lithified into rock. left|thumb|120px|Chestnut OakThe resulting layer cake of basalt and sedimentary sheets eventually faulted and tilted upward. Subsequent erosion wore away the weaker sedimentary layers a faster rate than the basalt layers, leaving the abruptly tilted edges of the basalt sheets exposed, creating the distinct linear ridge and dramatic cliff faces visible today. The best way to imagine this is to picture a layer cake tilted slightly up with some of the frosting (the sedimentary layer) removed in between. The sedimentary rock of the Metacomet ridge is well known for its fossils, especially dinosaur tracks.(The Metacomet Ridge hosts a combination of microclimates unusual in New England. Dry, hot upper ridges support savannas, often dominated by oak and a variety of understory grasses and ferns. Eastern red cedar, a dry-loving species, clings to the barren edges of cliffs. Backslope plant communities tend to be more similar to the adjacent upland plateaus containing species common to the northern hardwood and forest types. Eastern hemlock crowds narrow ravines, blocking sunlight and creating damp, cooler growing conditions with associated cooler climate plant species. Talus slopes are especially rich in nutrients and support a number of calcium-loving plants uncommon in Massachusetts. Many bogs, ponds, and reservoirs lie cupped between traprock ridge shelves, demonstrating the value of these ridges as important aquifers and wetland ecosystem habitats. Because the Metacomet Ridge generates such varied terrain, it is the home of several plant and animal species that are state-listed or globally rare.((A good, thorough study of the Metacomet Ridge environment and its species can be found within a report commissioned by the Park Service as part of its New England National Scenic Trail Study.)Other ecosystems on the southern sections of the Metacomet Trail include the northern riverine community which supports species such as willow, elm, and sycamore; this ecosystem can be found along the Westfield and Connecticut Rivers.(Kricher, John. A Field Guide to Eastern Forests Houghton-Mifflin, Boston, 1998.)History and folkloreImage:King Philip C by Revere.jpg|thumb|left|100px|Metacom by RevereOrigin and nameIn the late 19th century, interests in mountains as places to build recreational footpaths took root in New England with organizations such as the Mountain Clubhttp://www.outdoors.org/, the Mountain Clubhttp://www.greenmountainclub.org/, and the Forest and Park Association.(http://www.ctwoodlands.org/CFPA.html) Following the pioneering effort of the Green Mountain Club in the inauguration of Vermonts Trail in 1918,(Green Mountain Club. Cited Dec. 22, 2007) the Connecticut Forest and Park Association, spearheaded by Edgar Laing Heermance, created the 23-mile (37 km) Trail on the Metacomet Ridge in southern Connecticut in 1928 and soon followed it up with the Metacomet Trail. Over  of blue blaze trails in Connecticut were completed by the association by the end of the 20th century.(Connecticut Forest and Park Association Cited. Dec. 23, 2007)The name Metacomet was borrowed from the 17th century sachem of the Wampanoag Tribe of southern New England who led his people during Philips War.( According to popular folklore, Metacomet, dubbed King Phillip by the English colonists, watched the burning of the village of Simsbury in 1676 from a cave on Talcott Mountain. The cave is now known as King Phillips Cave, accessible via a side trail from the Metacomet Trail. Wadsworth is also said to have camped at the cave after saving the Charter of Connecticut from being repossessed by the Kings emissary.(W.H. Gocher. Wadsworth, or the Charter Oak Hartford, 1904.)Historic sitesthumb|right|200px|Landscape of Hubbard Park, Hanging HillsNewgate Prison, located below Peak Mountain, was originally a mine, opened in 1705. After mining operations proved unprofitable, the colony of Connecticut converted it to a prison and named it after Prison of London. The first prisoner, John Hinson, was committed for burglary in 1773. Later Tories and Loyalists were held there during the War. In 1790 it became a state prison, the first such in the United States.  After the prison closed in 1827 mining operations resumed for a time, but since the 1860s it has been mainly a tourist attraction. In 1972 Old Newgate Prison was declared a Historic Landmark.(postscript and )The Hanging Hills Park was financed by Walter Hubbard, local entrepreneur and president of the Bradley & Hubbard Manufacturing Company. Most of the land in the park was given to the town of Meriden by him, offered outright, with the stipulation that everything connected with the park was to remain free of charge for the people of Meriden, and that no concessions for profit would ever allowed within the park. Hubbard elicited the assistance of notable landscape architect Fredrick Law Olmstead in drawing up the design. Finished in 1900, It comprises approximately  of carefully kept woodlands, streams, dramatic cliff faces, flower gardens, and the James Barry bandshell and picnic spots. Craig, a stone observation tower built on East Peak, and Mirror Lake, nestled between the high ledges of East Peak and South Mountain, are considered particularly scenic.(City of Meriden. Cited Dec. 13, 2007) Tower,  tall and  above sea level, built for Gilbert F. Heublein in 1914 on the summit crest of Talcott Mountain as a summer retreat and home, was designed to withstand winds of 100 mph (160 km/h). Put up for sale in the 1960s and slated for residential development, the tower became part of the Mountain State Park in 1965 through the efforts of conservation non-profit groups, the state of Connecticut, and the States government. The tower has been renovated as a museum with period artifacts and furnishings. Visitors may climb to the top of the tower for a 360-degree view encompassing four states.(Friends of Heublein Tower. Cited Dec. 21, 2007)(Connecticut Department of Environmental Protection Cited Dec. 21, 2007)Image:Hill-Stead Museum (Farmington, CT) - west facade.JPG|right|thumb|MuseumHill-Stead, now a museum, was created on  of Farmington Mountain as a country estate for wealthy industrialist Atmore Pope, to the designs of his daughter Pope Riddle in 1901. Theodate inherited the house after her parents deaths, and prior to her own passing in 1946 willed Hill-Stead Museum as a memorial to her parents. Hill-Stead comprises . Buildings include the  colonial-revival style Pope-Riddle House; an 18th-century farm house; a carriage garage with an arts and crafts theater; and a barn and additional farm buildings. The house is extensively furnished with paintings, prints, and art. Highlights include works by Manet, Monet,  McNeill Whistler, Drer and postcards including correspondence from Cassatt, James, and James McNeill Whistler.(Hill-Stead Museum. cited Dec. 19, 2007.)FolkloreWill Warrens Den, a boulder cave located on the west side of Rattlesnake Mountain, is an historic landmark of the town of Farmington. A plaque affixed to the cave reads, Said Warren, according to legend, after being flogged for not going to church, tried to burn the village of Farmington. He was pursued into the mountains, where some Indian squaws hid him in this cave. The personage of Will Warren has never been vindicated historically, and may have been an amalgamation of several individuals. The cave is accessible from the Metacomet Trail.(The Hanging Hills are allegedly stalked by the supernatural presence of the Black Dog of the Hanging Hills; (a frequent spectre in folklore worldwide; see Black dog). According to local mythology extant since at least the early 19th century, the Black Dog manifests as a small black dog, often gregarious in nature, who leaves no footprints and makes no sound. To see the Black Dog the first time results in joy; a second sighting, misfortune. Seeing the Black Dog a third time would result in ones death. At least six deaths have been blamed on third meetings with the Black Dog.(Connecticut Windows on the Natural World. cited Dec. 13, 2007.)Hiking the trailThe trail is blazed with blue rectangles. It is regularly maintained, and is considered easy hiking, with sections of rugged and moderately difficult hiking.( As the crow flies, the Metacomet Trail route is never more than a mile or two from a public road.  However, cliffs and steep terrain make access much more difficult in some areas. There are no camping facilities along the trail and camping is generally prohibited. Trail descriptions are available from a number of commercial and non-commercial sources, and a complete guidebook is published by the Forest and Park Association (Weather along the route is typical of Connecticut. Conditions on exposed ridge tops and summits may be harsher during cold or stormy weather.(NOAA) Lightning is a hazard on exposed summits and ledges during thunderstorms. Snow is common in the winter and may necessitate the use of snowshoes. Ice can form on exposed ledges and summits, making hiking dangerous without special equipment.( Biting insects can be bothersome during warm weather. Parasitic ticks (which are known to carry disease) are a potential hazard. The northern copperhead snake, while considered rare, does inhabit portions of the Metacomet Ridge in Connecticut. ivy is native to the Metacomet Trail environs, prolific in some areas.((Conservation and maintenance of the trail corridorright|thumbnail|180px|Prickly Pear Cactus, an endangered species found along the Metacomet Ridge in ConnecticutThe Metacomet Trail passes through public land (state parks, town parks, and municipal watershed  areas), land managed by conservation non-profit organizations, private land under conservation easement, and unprotected private land via permission of individual land owners. Significant threats to the trail, its ecosystems, and its viewshed included quarrying and sprawl.((The footway of the Metacomet Trail is maintained by volunteer efforts largely facilitated by the Forest and Park Association. Many groups are invested in preserving the landscape and ecosystem of the Metacomet Trail, including the Connecticut Department of Environmental Protection, the Metropolitan District (responsible for the watershed properties on Talcott Mountain), Suffield Land Conservancy, East Granby Land Trust, Farmington Land Trust, Meriden Land Trust, Berlin Land Trust, Simsbury Land Trust, Ragged Mountain Foundation, and the Avon Land Trust.(Information derived from the websites of these organizations. Links provided below.)      In 2000, the Metacomet Trail was included in a study by the Park Service for possible inclusion in a new Scenic Trail, which was officially recognized in 2009 as the England National Scenic Trail, which also includes the Trail and Trail.(Recognition / Inspiration ProgramsThe Forest and Park Association (CFPA) provides commemorative patches as recognition to hikers completing the entire length of one of the three original Blue-Blazed trails in Connecticut (Quinnipiac, Metacomet and Mattabesett). The Metacomet Trail patch can be obtained for a small fee ($1) after the hiking the entire trail is completed by contacting the Forest and Park Association.See also* Trails* Ridge* Trail* TrailReferences(External links* U.S. Congress New England National Scenic Trail Designation Act.* NPS brochure for National Scenic Trail proposal.* Map of Hubbard Park* Connecticut Forest and Park Association* The Traprock Wilderness Recovery Strategy* Talcott Mountain State Park* Talcott Mountain State Park map* Penwood State Park map* Penwood State Park* MDC Talcott Mountain Reservoir area map* MDC website* MDC rules & regulations page* Hill-Stead Museum* Map of trails on Farmington Mountain*Ragged Mountain trail map and driving directions (scroll down for map).* Meriden Land Trust* Berlin Land Trust* Ragged Mountain Foundation* Farmington Land Trust* Avon Land Trust* Simsbury Land Trust* East Granby Land Trust* The City of Meriden* Legend of the Black Dog  Trail
2443090
Blackwell,_Bolsover
Blackwell is a village in Derbyshire, England.  It is one of the four villages that make up the civil parish of Blackwell within the District of Bolsover - the other villages being Hilcote, Newton and Westhouses.  The Parish Council meets monthly.  A brief history of the Parish of Blackwell was published in 1994 (the centenary year of the formation of Blackwell Parish Council)(The Parish and Parish Council of the Parish of Blackwell by E. Storer, 1994, registered at Stationers Hall No B9/1200-37196.).It is approximately 3 miles north-east of Alfreton.William Foulke the Sheffield United, Chelsea, Bradford City and England goalkeeper was born and lived in Blackwell before moving to Sheffield to sign for Sheffield United.Another famous former resident of Blackwell was Toplis &ndash; Monocled Mutineer &ndash; who went on to become a mutineer and conman during and after World War I. Toplis, while wanted for treason,  was eventually shot and killed by police officers on the Scottish Borders. A Television series based on the life of the Monocled Mutineer was written by Bleasdale in 1986 and broadcast on the BBC.The main industry of Blackwell was coal mining. On the 11th of November 1895, 7 men were killed in an underground explosion at the colliery. The mine was closed in 1969 since when light industry has taken over.Blackwell has two churches: St Werburghs Parish Church and Blackwell Methodist Church.Blackwell forms part of the Bolsover parliamentary constituency; the MP is Skinner (Labour) a noted firebrand in the House of Commons.Famously the highest ever 8th wicket cricket partnership is held at the village ground, 283 was scored by J Chapman & A Warren for Derbyshire v Warwickshire, the date 1910.References(External links*  Parish Council Website(Derbyshire)(Bolsover)
2448101
Mazaruni_River
The Mazaruni River is a river in northern Guyana, running from its source in the remote western forests of the Mountains to its confluence with the River near Bartica. As it descends from the Highlands the river runs south-east, past Issano, then northward to Bartica. The river is a source of alluvial gold. Source thumb|Roraima Plateau is the source of the Mazaruni riverThe Mazaruni River takes source in the Roraima Plateau, three levels of sandstones and conglomerates, crowned by Mt. Roraima (2810 m.). In Guyana, the two highest levels of the Roraima Plateau are known as Pakaraima Mountains and Merume Mountains. The source of the Mazarunu River is in the Merume Mountains. The area is one of the very few places in the world still inaccessible. In 1992, a joint expedition of the Defence Force and Guards members was unable to reach the source of Mazaruni River, even with training, finances and equipment. Course The Mazaruni River drops down from each Roraima plateau through three steep sided canyons with many picturesque sets of falls. The first set is Chai-chai Falls. The next is near village of Imbaimadai and the last set is below the village of Kamarang where the Mazaruni River tumbles through last few major falls, the first of which is a few kilometres long gutter known as Chitigokein Falls, which finishes in Coffy pool, a deep pool named after Mehir Cousin Body Coffy, one of the last Porknockers (these are small diamond and gold miners) of Guyana.The term Porknockers comes from the old prospectors having to carry in all their food one of which was salt pork which attracted flies and had to be knocked regularly to keep flies away. According to legend, during 1950s, Coffy was diving in the river for diamonds when he got the bends, due to overstaying below and rapid decompression.After few kilometres of relatively calm water, the last set of great Mazaruni River Falls begin. The first falls is the Aruwai Falls and the last is the Peaima Falls.Soon after Peaima Falls, the river, which was flowing north-south, turns east-south-east. It passes the Issineru River mouth on the left bank, with the Amerindian village, Issineru, on the other bank. Then, over the lowlands of greenstones of Precambrian Shield, the River, River and River join the Mazaruni River. Together, these rivers serve to drain the highlands of the Merume Mountains.Next, the Mazaruni River flows past Oranapai Rapids, Kamakusa Landing, the mouth of Merume River, Banana Landing, Tiboku Rapids, the mouth of Equeribisi River, Issano Landing, the mouth of the Puruni River, Kaburi rapids, Marshal Falls, the last set of rapids, Itabali Landing, the mouth of the Cuyuni River, then, near the village of Bartica, finishes into the River, the largest river of Guyana. Fauna The iron hydroxide stained brown waters of Mazaruni are home to many fish. The most abundant are the large and dangerous black electric eels (numfish), piry (relative of piranha cutleback), haimara, and baiara.  However, the most famous fish is lau-lau, with specimens weighing up to 200 kg. Lau-lau lives in deep pools of Mazaruni River hunting in the night. Mazaruni River waters are also home to a largest water snake, anaconda, locally known as water kamudi. Large herds of wild pigs, peccaries, sometimes as large as a few hundred, live on swampy flat of Mazaruni River. They are very dangerous since they are known to attack humans. The only escape is up the large tree. Pumas and the much smaller ocelot are also found there but rarely seen since they hunt at night. Many monkeys, of which the howling monkey is the noisiest, inhabit tree tops, sharing the space with many types of birds. Pairs of Red, yellow or bleu Macaws, united for life, often can be seen to fly by. Flora The Mazaruni River flows over three distinct habitats; the flat tops of Roraima Plateau, known in Venezuela as tepuis, the lower two plateaus and the low lands. Each habitat is characterised by its own vegetation. The upper one is a fantastic land of rain swept sandstone eroded into fantastic forms with exotic plants trying to survive this inhospitable land of denuded rocks. The middle one is mainly savannas with bands of single canopy jungle, the lowest is a triple canopy jungle. Exotic orchids are found in last two habitats. Mineral resources In the upper Mazaruni River basin, in 1890, near Issineru village, first alluvial diamonds were found in Guyana.(Venezuela and Guyana diamond deposits, geology, exploration, mining, use - Part I) The discovery was made accidentally by Edward Gilkes, was prospecting for gold along the Putareng Creek, a small left hand tributary of the Mazaruni River. Since then, according to Guyana Geology and Mines Commission, Mazaruni River, along with its tributaries (Meamu, Kurupung and Eping Rivers), produced over 50 percent all of alluvial diamonds mined up to now in Guyana.The gravels of Mazaruni River and its tributaries are, as well, gold bearing. Some places, such as Imbaimadai, Kamarang, Aruwai, Tiboku, Kaburi and Marshal Falls produced a large amount of alluvial gold during golden era of river dredging (1980-1995).The river remains, to a lesser degree, a source of alluvial gold and diamonds. A few miles west of Bartica, there was an unsuccessful attempt to establish a hard-rock gold mine in 1888. The source of extensive gold and diamond placers is still a mystery. Regardless of the origins, the Mazaruni River Basin was blessed with rich gold and diamond placers which were exploited for over last one hundred years.References( External links Photos from the personal collection of Rafal Swiecki.* Mazaruni River after the rain* View of lower Roraima Plateau* Aruwai Falls* Diamond dredges on Kurupung River, Mazaruni River Basin* Gold and diamond mining above Aruwai Falls, Mazaruni River* Piray, the example of piranha related fish common in Mazaruni River* Preston King documentary film on portknoking in Guyana, ca. 1993de:MazaruniMazarunilt:Masarunis
2457236
The_Train_Job
List of Firefly episodesThe Train Job is the second episode of US science-fiction western television series Firefly created by Whedon, although it was the first to be shown. (The pilot, Serenity, was not shown until nine other episodes had been aired.) According to the DVD commentary, Whedon and Minear had only two days to write the script.The crew of Serenity take on a hovertrain heist commissioned by a sinister crime lord. The cargo they are after, however, is worth more than they know. Synopsis Captain Malcolm Mal Reynolds, his first mate, Zoe, and fellow crewman Cobb are in a bar. When Lund, one of the other bar patrons gives a loud drunken toast celebrating the anniversary of Unification Day, former Browncoat rebel Mal picks a fight. Zoe, who fought with Mal in the war, immediately steps up to help him. Tough-guy Jayne holds back at first (Hey, I didnt fight in no war. Best of luck, though.), but eventually joins the fight just for the fun of it. As the entire bar attacks them, Mal radios his pilot, Wash, who also happens to be Zoes husband, and shortly Serenity dramatically backs up the hapless crew.Mal runs into one of the passengers in the ships infirmary, Dr. Tam. Simon is tending to his mentally-disturbed teenage sister River, who occasionally shows flashes of her old genius hidden beneath her insanity. Outside the infirmary, Mal sees one of the other passengers, Book, a shepherd (preacher). Book tells Mal that Simon is very brave for giving up his life as a wealthy doctor to go on the run from the Alliance in order to protect his sister. Book senses that while Mal pretends to be merely an unsympathetic Smuggler, he is protecting the fugitives out of a sense of honor, despite the risk of drawing attention from the Alliance. Mal finds Serra brushing Fryes hair in Inaras shuttle. Inara is a beautiful Companion, a licensed and well-respected courtesan, and Kaylee is the ships mechanic. The local crime lord, Adelei Niska hires the ship for their next smuggling job.On a skyplex (an orbiting space city), Mal, Zoe, and Jayne meet with Niska and his giant brutish lieutenant Crow. In order to cement his reputation, and show that he is serious, Niska shows them a bloody dead body hanging by his feet. He killed this man (his wifes nephew), for failing to do a job. Niska outlines the job for Mal and his crew - steal two crates of an unnamed Alliance cargo from a train as it travels from Hancock to Paradiso, and deliver it to Crow at the rendezvous point.When Mal and Zoe board the train, they discover that an entire squad of Alliance troops are also aboard - though not specifically guarding the cargo. After they break into the locked train car and secure the crates, Jayne is lowered in on a winch while Serenity hovers over the train. While they attach the cargo to the winch, a curious Fed trips a trap at the car door. In the resulting melee, a wounded Jayne is hoisted back to the ship, Mal knocks out the Fed before he sees whats happening, and Mal and Zoe use the smoke as cover to re-enter the passenger car.On Serenity, Simon patches up Jaynes leg and gives him a shot while Wash parks the ship in a canyon near Paradiso - NOT the rendezvous point. Jayne tells the crew that they should finish the job, leave Mal and Zoe behind, and deliver the cargo to the dangerous Niska. Wash wont leave without his wife and the captain. Shepherd Book, who knows a lot about crime lords for a Shepherd, states that, If Niska finds out Mal is being held, and may speak as to who hired him - I think were better off being a little late.Meanwhile, in Paradiso, Mal and Zoe are aghast to find that the cargo was critical medicine for this poor mining town, in which everyone is suffering from Bowdens malady, a degenerative disease. The local sheriff, who is questioning everyone from the train, is suspicious of Mals cover story. Inara appears, and the working-class townspeople, who have never seen a Companion before, make a big fuss over her. Inara plays up her respectable status as a Companion, claiming that Mal is her runaway indentured man who persuaded Zoe to leave her husband and escape with him. She tells the Sheriff that she is taking the runaways back into her own custody.Back on the ship, Mal announces to the crew that they will be returning the cargo to the townspeople. However, Crow arrives with henchmen and a violent fight ensues, which the Serenity crew wins. After the villains are secured, Mal and Zoe drive the cargo back to town. They intend to drop off the crates and notify the sheriff once theyre well away, but they run into the Sheriff who has overheard their conversation. Realizing the cargo is intact, the sheriff decides to let them go, respecting their courage to do the right thing.Outside Serenity, Mal returns Niskas money to a trussed-up Crow, proposing that they will stay out of Niskas way from then on. When Crow rejects the offer and threatens to hunt him down wherever he goes, Mal casually kicks him into Serenitys engine intake. Another trussed-up henchman is then brought before Mal  who begins repeating his proposal  but the second man quickly agrees to take the money back to Niska.Back on the Alliance cruiser, two mysterious men in suits and wearing blue gloves inquire about a girl  and show the captain a photo of River Tam. Continuity * Since this second episode was actually the first to be aired, writers Whedon and Minear had to introduce the characters to the new audience, even though many elements of these introductions were covered in the actual pilot, Serenity. Quite a bit of the dialogue alludes to information provided in the pilot.* Kaylee claims that her messy rewiring in the engine room is required because somebody wont replace that crappy compression coil, which she first brought up in Serenity.  In of Gas, the catalyzer on the compression coil will be the source of the explosion that stops Serenity dead, just as she predicted in Serenity.* Inara questions Mal walking into her shuttle unannounced, just as she did in the pilot.* Niska warns Mal that things between us be not so solid if Mal fails to bring him the cargo, and Zoe is perturbed by mental images of the dead man hanging from the ceiling (leading Mal to express a desire for it not to be him). Niskas lieutenant dies rather than accept Mals returning of the money. Mals thwarting of Niskas goal comes back to bite Serenitys crew in War Stories.* This is our introduction to the ominous Hands of Blue, two men who are pursuing River.* As noted by Tim Minear in the DVD commentary, Books knowledge of underworld dealings (particularly his theory of Niskas reaction to an incarcerated Mal and Zoe) is meant to reference his shady past. Guest cast * Towles as Lund, a thug at the bar Mal, Zoe and Jayne drink at, who takes a disliking to Mal.* Bryniarski as Crow, Adelai Niskas lieutenant.* Fairman as Adelai Niska, the client who hires Mals crew for the train job.* Henry as Sheriff Bourne, leader of the township of Paradiso, who investigates the train theft.* Ricketts as Blue Glove Man #1* Cockrum as Blue Glove Man #2 References ****** External links * * * Firefly Wiki - The Train Job script
2465549
Sharps_Pixley
Sharps Pixley was formed through the merger of two of Londons leading gold dealers, Wilkins and & Abell. It was acquired by Benson in 1966 largely at the behest of the of England who needed a stable parent for a firm that played an important part in the fixing of the gold price.In 1993 the business was bought from Kleinwort Benson by Bank who no longer use the Sharps Pixley brand and sit on the London Fixing committee under their own name.In 1995 Sharps Pixley trade name expires and in 1998 is brought by Ross Norman. Bank closed Sharps Pixley in 2001 and was reopened in 2010 by Ross Norman as a website portal to sell gold in the UK markets, as well as giving news and information about the precious metals markets.Sharps Pixley LtdHistory of Sharps Pixley1778-1795Diamonds at Batsons and Bank Coffee HousesWilliam Sharp started his diamond brokerage in 1778 at Batsons Coffee House in Cornhill by the Royal Exchange (where many brokers had their pitch). Sharp favoured Batsons until 1786, when he shifted to Bank Coffee House, operating there for a decade. The diamond trade in London reached its zenith in the late 18th century, spurred by the East India Companys links with India, the prime source, and this probably encouraged William Sharp to become a dealer.1796-1804Office in Winchester Street and partnershipIn 1796 Sharp took an office at 32 Winchester Street (later Great Winchester Street), where the business remained for over 180 years. Initially he was listed as merchant but in 1800 was diamond broker, broker & auctioneer, indicating diversification as the diamond trade had declined. In 1804 he took a partner, Joseph Kirkup. Sharp & Kirkup traded as diamond and pearl brokers and auctioneers. Kirkup was a jeweller in New Bond Street in the 1790s and probably joined Sharp in 1800, gaining partnership in 1804. William Sharps son, James, was also learning the business.1805-1816Bullion brokers but denied Bank of England recognitionIn 1811 Sharp & Kirkup embarked on bullion broking, but an application for acceptance as broker at the Bank of England was refused. Mocatta & Goldsmid retained their long held exclusive post as the Banks broker for another 30 years, despite repeated appeals by Sharp, Nathan Mayer Rothschild and other bankers. Even so, Sharps had a turnover of 47,000 in 1812, equal to nearly 200,000 t.oz. of silver. Silver from Mexico became their main focus. James Sharp, who had probably now taken over from his father William, worked closely with Nathan Mayer Rothschild selling him silver and advising him on diamonds. In 1815 the firm was listed Jewel and bullion brokers. William Sharp and Joseph Kirkup died about this time.1817-1839James Sharp in charge, silver business flourishedAll London directories for 1817 report James Sharp, jeweller and bullion broker, 32 Winchester Street. He led the firm until 1839, with his son, Granville Sharp, becoming joint partner in 1821. They cultivated Mexican silver mining companies. You may rely upon our obtaining the highest market price, wrote James Sharp, and upon our attention to the melting, assaying and other requisite details. By 1825 turnover was 500,000 (around 2 million t.oz.) and reached 1 million in 1830. In 1835 Sharps, backed by miners and banks, again sought Bank of England recognition, but was rebuffed. Business, however, thrived. Turnover reached 1.8 million in 1837, aided by deals in Brazilian gold with Percival Norton Johnson, father of Johnson Matthey.1840-1849Bank of England accreditation and new partnersAfter James Sharps death in 1839, Granville Sharp led the firm, making it a new partnership, J. G. & G. A. Sharp, in 1842. They benefited from the Bank of England having finally opened its doors in 1840 to any sworn broker in the purchase and sale of gold bars. A major change came in 1847, when Frederick Charles Wilkins joined the partnership, now Sharps & Wilkins. However, both Sharps died shortly afterwards (perhaps the reason for Wilkins joining if they were in poor health). The Sharps name, known in the City for over 60 years, was retained, although there has now been no family connection for over 150 years. The business was run by Frederick Wilkins, then his son and grandson, for the next 90 years. His immediate challenge was the gold rushes in California in 1849 and Australia in 1851.1850-1870A new market born of the gold rushesBritish gold imports in 1848 were 432,000 t.oz., by 1853 they were 3.3 million t.oz. The London Market was hard pressed. Within five years new brokers, assayers and refiners opened. Sharps & Wilkins profits shot up from 4,980 in 1847 to 14,523 in 1853. They faced competition. In 1852 Stewart Pixley, a senior clerk in the Cashiers Office at the Bank of England, opened a partnership with Henry Haggard, son of the principal of the Bullion Office, at 8 Copthall Court. They moved to 27 Old Broad Street in 1857, staying there until 1929. Haggard soon left and Stewart Pixley took several other partners before settling with Henry Gibson Abell in 1872 as Pixley & Abell, which remained until 1957, when they merged with Sharps & Wilkins as Sharps Pixley. Another newcomer, Samuel Montagu & Co., bankers and bullion brokers, opened in 1853. They completed the line-up of Sharps & Wilkins, Pixley & Abell, Mocatta & Goldsmid and Samuel Montagu that was at the heart of the market for the next hundred years. An alliance was also made in 1861 when Edward Matthew, a junior partner at Johnson Mattheys refinery, married Frederick Wilkins daughter, Alice Elizabeth. Two of their children later joined Johnson Matthey, forging a special relationship between broker and refiner. The gossip was that Matthey gave Sharps preference in marketing refined gold.1871-1897Gold for India, seeking American silver, the silver fixingStewart Pixley proved an aggressive rival. He won much of the 10-ounce 998 gold bar business with India, ordering from Johnson Mattheys new refinery. He also kept close track of silver, whose price fell 50% between 1850 and 1900 as European nations turned from gold and silver. In pursuit of American silver, he took a train to Montana (his great-grandson prized the ticket a hundred years later) and bought a stake in the Drum Lummon mine. However, Frederick Wilkins (son of the first 1847 partner) had retained the connections with Mexican and South American mines that James Sharp had fostered half a century earlier. Wilkins gave a precise analysis of silver output in Mexico (the foremost producer) to the 1876 House of Commons Select Committee on the Depreciation of Silver. The firms status as silver broker also secured them the chairmanship of the London Silver Fixing, which was held in their office at 32 Great Winchester Street, from 1897. They were joined by Mocatta & Goldsmid, Pixley & Abell and Samuel Montagu & Co. at 1.45 pm Monday through Friday and 11.45 am on Saturday.1898-1918Riding the Indian silver tigerThe challenge for the London silver market after 1900 was buying for Indian coinage, while outwitting Bombay speculators. Sharps & Wilkins, now under Philip Wilkins, together with Mocatta & Goldsmid, were charged with rounding up 55 million ounces (one-third of world output) in 1900 and 150 million ounces in 1905/6 (half world production). Indian speculators tried to corner even more, to profit from a fast rising price. The entanglements tested all the brokers. Sharps was caught out not taking adequate margin from an Indian client, but the other brokers rallied to the firms support. The resulting Indian Bazaars Margin Agreement of 1914 between all four brokers stabilised the market.1919-1939The gold fixing and a turbulent era for goldMutual co-operation was also signalled by the first London Gold Fixing at N. M. Rothschilds in September 1919. A Rothschild memo noted, The four bullion brokers, Mocatta & Goldsmid, Pixley & Abell, Sharps & Wilkins, and Samuel Montagu & Co., were given the opportunity of bidding and would obtain their requirements if the price they bid equalled or exceeded the realization price fixed by Rothschilds. The collapse of the gold standard in 1931 and subsequent price rise to $35 an ounce in 1934 gave the brokers hectic years coping with dishoarding from India matched by hoarding of coin and small bars in Europe. The fourth Stewart Pixley recalled as a young man hustling to Croydon Airport with boxes of sovereigns for the Paris plane. Silvers price also doubled in 1935, leading to European and Indian selling, with the United States the sole buyer. The silver fixing at Sharps & Wilkins often lasted until late afternoon, while the assembled brokers played bridge until the US Treasury woke up with orders. That ended abruptly with war in 1939 which virtually shut the market.1939-1966New era for gold brings new partnershipsThe London Gold Fixing resumed in 1954 with the four historic partners. But it was a different world of central bank deals and large Russian sales, hardly suited to small private partnerships forged in the 19th century. First Mocatta & Goldsmid was acquired by Hambros Bank in 1957. Four months later Sharps & Wilkins and Pixley & Abell merged into a private unlimited partnership, Sharps Pixley. The partners were Louis Balfour (a Sharps partner since 1916), Stewart Pixley, grandson of the founder of Pixley & Abell, with his son, also Stewart. The Pixleys moved into Sharps offices in Great Winchester Street. The alliance did not immediately seek a financial backer but, in 1966, became wholly owned by Kleinwort Benson, the merchant bankers.1967-2010Round-the-world markets, dissolution and re-birthStewart Pixley, great-grandson of the firms founder in 1852, took Sharps to Hong Kong in the 1970s establishing the loco London gold market there, along with market-makers from London, Swiss, German and US banks. In a market now dominated by international banks, Deutsche Bank bought Sharps Pixley from Kleinwort Benson in 1993. Deutsche Sharps Pixley was run until 2001, although the trade name Sharps Pixley Ltd, which expired in 1995, was bought in 1998 by Ross Norman, who has now revived the business first created by William Sharp at Batsons Coffee House over 230 years ago.Sources*Guildhall Library, London, Street Directories*Ledgers of Sharp & Kirkup, Archives of Messrs Kleinwort Benson Ltd*The Times, Gold, Reprint of the Special Number, June 20, 1933*Timothy Green, The World of Gold, 1968, Michael Joseph, London*Timothy Green, Precious Heritage: Three Hundred Years of Mocatta & Goldsmid, Rosendale Press, 1984*Timothy Green, The Ages of Gold, GFMS Ltd, 2007*Gedalia Yogev, Diamonds and Coral, Anglo-Dutch Jews and Eighteenth Century Trade, Leicester University Press, 1978
2471320
Red_Indian_Lake
 cities  Red Indian Lake is located in the western interior of the island of Newfoundland in the province of and Labrador, Canada. The downstream end of the lake drains into the River.  This winds through the interior of the island and eventually exits into the Ocean through the of Exploits. River, the Victoria River and River feed into the lake.     HistoryThe Beothuk, also known as Red Indians, inhabited several campsites on the shore of the lake. An expedition into the interior by John Cartwright and brother George Cartwright in search of the Beothuk found only abandoned campsites. At the time of their discovery of the lake they named it Lieutenants Lake and they had assumed that the lake was part of the same system as Lake Mickmack, known today as Grand Lake.In January 1811, an expedition led by Buchan travelled up the River in an attempt to establish friendly relations with the Beothuk; Buchan found them, but the encounter went badly and resulted in the deaths of two marines. John Peyton Jr. led another expedition to the lake in 1819 which also ended in tragedy, resulting in the death of the Beothuk headman Nonosbawsut and the capture of Demasduwit.(Marshall (1996), pp. 162-167.)Economy and ResourcesThe interior of the island of Newfoundland became accessible on the completion of the Railway, and the forest surrounding the lake attracted attention. The lake was surveyed in 1899 by Alex McCombie and by 1901 Lewis Miller had set up a logging operation on the shore near the site of Demasduwits capture. A railway branch line to the town of Millertown was constructed, and in 1905 the Anglo-Newfoundland Development (AND) Company acquired a 99 year lease on timber and mineral rights for the land surrounding the lake.Prospectors for the AND Company also discovered a substantial deposit of base metals on the north shore of the lake, and in 1926 the town of Buchans was established. Mining operations began the following year.HydroA pulp and paper mill was constructed at Grand Falls, further downstream on the Exploits River. The mouth of Red Indian Lake was dammed, creating a vast storage reservoir for the power plant at the mill in Grand Falls.FootnotesReferences*Marshall, Ingeborg (1996). A History and Ethnography of the Beothuk. McGill-Queens University Press. ISBN 0-7735-1390-6.)Red Indian
2475534
Illinois_and_Midland_Railroad
The Illinois and Midland Railroad  is a railroad in the state of Illinois, serving Peoria, Springfield and Taylorville. Until 1996, when & Wyoming Inc. bought it, the company was named the Chicago and Illinois Midland Railway . It was once a I railroad, specializing in the hauling of coal.HistoryThe history of the Chicago and Illinois Midland Railway traces to 1888 when the villagers of Pawnee built a rail line from their town to the Central Railroad mainline 15 miles south of Springfield.  The railroad was named the Pawnee Railroad and was later extended eastward to Taylorville and a rail connection with what is today the Southern Railway (ex-Railroad).In 1905, the Chicago Edison Company (the predecessor of Edison Company, the Chicago electric utility, now part of Exelon Corp) purchased the Pawnee Railroad for the purpose of transporting coal out of the central Illinois coal fields for Chicago Edisons coal-fired power plants in Chicago.  Insull, the founder of Commonwealth Edison helped develop the coal fields along with Peabody and his Midland Coal Company.  Thus the railroads name was changed from the Pawnee Railroad to the Chicago and Illinois Midland Railway Company, drawing its name not from its terminal points (the C&IM never went to Chicago), but from its corporate parents:  Chicago Edison and Illinois Midland Coal Company.In the 1920s, Insull bought some of the trackage of the bankrupt Peoria and St. Louis Railroad (CP&StL), running from Springfield to Havana on the River and then running northeast from Havana to East Peoria.  He connected his new acquisition with the existing C&IM by obtaining 15 miles of rights over the Illinois Central from Springfield to the connection between the C&IM and the IC at a point known as CIMIC.  Insull then built a rail-to-river coal transfer facility on the Illinois River at Havana, IL, where coal could be dumped from rail cars into barges for shipment up the Illinois River to Commonwealth Edison power plants located on the river in the Chicago area.  Insull, being a believer in integration, thus was able to control the mining and shipment of coal, via his railroad, to his coal transfer plant, to his barges, to his power plants, where it was burned to create electricity for transmission on his lines to the customers in Chicago.When the Air Act was passed in the 1960s, the market for high sulfur central Illinois coal evaporated and the coal mines (at one time numbering 15) along the C&IM closed one by one.  Commonwealth Edison put the C&IM on the market and offered to sell it for $1.00, but there were no takers.Then Commonwealth Edison changed its philosophy and began building power plants in central Illinois, adjacent to C&IM tracks, sending electricity to Chicago via high voltage lines. Soon the C&IM was back in action, but this time it was hauling coal into central Illinois from the River Basin in Wyoming and Montana, instead of hauling coal out of the central Illinois coal fields.  Soon coal trains, received in interchange from Burlington Northern and the Chicago and North Western were traversing C&IM tracks to Commonwealth Edisons power plant at Powerton (Pekin) and to the still operating Coal Transfer Plant.However, by the late 1980s Commonwealth Edisons philosophy changed again.  In the wake of railroad deregulation in 1980, they began seeking competitive bids from railroads who could deliver western coal directly to Chicago.  As a result, Commonwealth Edison sold the C&IM in December 1987 to a group of private investors.  The ownership of the C&IM changed hands twice more before it was purchased by & Wyoming Inc. in 1996 and the name was changed to Illinois and Midland Railroad. References * and Illinois Midland Railway
2478359
Black_Mesa_Peabody_Coal_controversy
The Black Mesa Peabody Coal controversy arose in the 1960s over a mineral lease in the Black Mesa plateau of the Corners region in the western States. The plateau overlaps the reservations of the Navajo and Hopi Tribes. The controversy arose from an unusually generous agreement negotiated under questionable circumstances between the Tribes and Peabody Energy, and the coal companys use and degradation of a potable source of water to transport coal via a pipeline from the mine to a power plant hundreds of miles away.ControversyIn 1964, Peabody Energy (then Peabody Western Coal), a publicly-traded energy company based in the United States signed a contract with the Navajo Tribe and two years later with the Hopi Tribe, allowing the company mineral rights and use of an aquifer. The contract offered unusually advantageous terms for Peabody and was approved despite widespread opposition and the lack of clear authority by the governments of the respective Native American tribes. It was negotiated by prominent natural resources attorney John Sterling Boyden, who claimed to be representing the Hopi Tribe while actually on the payroll of Peabody.()Peabody Energy pumped water from the underground Navajo Aquifer in a pipeline operation to transport extracted coal to the Generating Station in Nevada. The Navajo Aquifer is the main source of potable groundwater for the Navajo and Hopi tribes, who use the water for farming and livestock maintenance as well as drinking and other domestic uses.  The tribes have alleged that the pumping of water by Peabody Energy has caused a severe decline in potable water and contamination of water sources. Both tribes, situated in an arid semi-desert, attach religious significance to water, considering it sacred, and have cultural, religious, and practical objections to over-use of water.The Peabody mine, a coal mine, used the slurry to pump its coal through pipes  away, where the coal could be filtered and used in the Mohave Generating Station in Nevada. The generating station produces energy for the southern parts of California and Nevada. This was the only coal slurry operation in the country and only plant that used groundwater in such a way.The Black Mesa Mines last day of operation was December 31, 2005. One of the power plants served by the coal mined at the location had the highest emission levels in the Western United States.The Office of Surface Mining approved Peabodys permit request to continue operations at the mine on 22 December 2008. However, in January 2010, an administrative law judge, on appeal of that approval, decided that the Final EIS did not satisfy the National Environmental Policy Act because it did not take into account changed conditions, and vacated the approval.(Current Initiatives: Black Mesa Project Office of Surface Mining Reclamation and Enforcement (OSMRE) website)(Holt, Robert G. (administrative law judge) (7 January 2010) Opinion In re: Black Mesa Complex Permit Revision Office of Hearings and Appeals, United States Department of the Interior)ReferencesFurther reading***External links*Peabody Energy company website*Black Mesa Trust organization* Black Mesa Indigenous Support*Black Mesa coal mine, SourceWatch*Peabody Energy, SourceWatch*Coal and Native American tribal lands, SourceWatch*Arizona and coal, SourceWatch*The Curse of the Black Mesa and the Lehman Brothers*Report on the history of Black Mesa as a sacred site*Drawdown: An Update on Groundwater Mining on Black Mesa, a 2000 report (updated in 2006) by the Resources Defense Council on the effects on the Hopis and Navajos drinking water sources
2487596
Chapeltown,_South_Yorkshire
 Chapeltown is in northern Sheffield, in Yorkshire, England. It forms part of the Ecclesfield parish. There is a wide variety of shops, pubs and restaurants as well as a supermarket.  Sheffield library also has a branch in Chapeltown.The town also has a twice-weekly market (Tuesday and Friday).Like much of Sheffield there is a large amount of greenspace in and around Chapeltown. The town centre has a cricket ground and a wooded park on either side of it. Between Chapeltown and Ecclesfield the land is used for residential purposes on one side of the main road and agricultural on the other. There is also a brownfield site above the park.It has two railway stations, one being a disused and allegedly haunted passenger station which is very well hidden in nearby overgrown woodlands, plus the railway station next to the Asda supermarket which is on the Line.  Chapeltown is near the motorway.  There are two junctions (35 and 35a) serving the town: the latter is mainly used by Thorncliffe industrial estate, which contains the head office of Beatty Utility Solutions among other companies. There are also  regular bus services into Sheffield and additional services to Barnsley and Rotherham town centres. Most of the industry in the town lies within the Thorncliffe industrial estate, formerly the Thorncliffe Works of Chambers & Company.  This company was first established on this site in 1793 (Jones 1999:148), initially an iron works but which over time expanded into related mining industries and the production of products produced by the fractional distillation of coal. These included the famous Izal disinfectant range.  During War II tanks were built in the estate. Until recently one of these tanks stood as a memorial on the site of the old factory, but it had fallen into a poor state of repair and has now been removed for restoration, it is unclear if the tank will be replaced when the restoration is complete. The proximity of the M1 has helped the industrial estates expansion in recent years, especially with companies involved in distribution.  The disused railway station can be found by trekking though approximately a mile of dense woodland from the west (J35A), from White Lane. Part of this once- building is still lived in, but it is need of restoration and could be done very easily. The alleged ghosts are said to be WWII soldiers, killed by bomb blast while on the train to the Tank factory.The old station  Chapeltown & Thorncliffe  can be seen from White Lane.References(* Jones J 1993 An Illustrated History of Izal in Jones M Aspects of Sheffield Vol 2, Sheffield: Wharncliffe Books(South Yorkshire)
2489532
Christopher_Merret
Christopher Merret (Merrett) FRS (16 February 1614/5 &ndash; 19 August 1695) was an English physician and scientist. He was the first to document the deliberate addition of sugar for the production of wine, and produced the first list of British birds.LifeMerret was born in Winchcombe, Gloucestershire on 16 February; Hunter gives the year of his birth as 1615, which may be 1614 Old Style. In 1632 he went up to Hall, Oxford (which later became Worcester College); he received his BA from Oriel in 1635, and his BMed and DMed from Gloucester Hall in 1636 and 1643 respectively.( )Merret then practised medicine in London, becoming a Fellow of the College of Physicians in 1651.()  Three years later he moved to the RCPs premises at Amen Corner near Pauls Cathedral, as the first Harveian Librarian, a post he held until 1665.( He was a founding Fellow of the Society and chairman of the Royal Societys committee concerned with the history of trade and commerce,(Koinm, AJ (2000) Christopher Merrets Use of Experiment Notes Rec. R. Soc. Lond. 54 (1), 2332 (2000)) but was expelled in 1685.(He died at his home near the chapel in Garden, on 19 August 1695, and was buried at Andrews, Holborn.(NaturalistMerret collected new plants, maintained a herb garden and compiled one of the first lists of the flora, fauna and minerals of England, the Pinax Rerum Naturalium Britannicarum.  The Pinax was published in 1666 and is an alphabetical catalogue with no explanatory commentary.( However it represents the first list of British birds, and contains one of the first statements by an Englishman on the organic origin of fossils:Metallurgy and glass makingMerret had a particular interest in industrial uses of minerals, publishing papers on smelting and tin mining.  In 1662 he translated Neris The Art of Glass (1611) and added 147 pages of his own, from other authors and his own observations.( His descriptions of glassmaking indicate an intimate familiarity with the process, but his modern claim to fame lies in a passing mention to a different field altogether. On 17 December 1662 he presented Some Observations concerning the Ordering of Wines to the Society. In this paper, unearthed by wine writer Tom Stevenson, Merret describes winemakers adding quantities of sugar and molasses to make the wines drink brisk and sparkling.(Mountain, Donna (2005) Sounds of Summer: English wine, a quiet revolution Transcript of ABC radio programme.) Today this would be called the champenoise, the addition of liqueur de tirage in order to stimulate a secondary fermentation that produces the bubbles in sparkling wine.() Spontaneous secondary fermentation had occurred in still wines since antiquity; most glass bottles of the time were not strong enough to contain the high pressures thus generated and so exploding bottles were an occupational hazard of winemaking. Sir Robert Mansell obtained a monopoly on glass production in England in the early 17th century and industrialised the process; his coal-powered factories in Newcastle-on-Tyne produced much stronger bottles than were available in France. As a result the English could deliberately induce a secondary fermentation in wine without the risk of blowing up the bottle, long before Dom Prignon is traditionally considered to have  invented sparkling wine in Champagne around 1697.(()Although Merret appears to have been more interested in making glass than in making wine, producers of English sparkling wine such as Ridgeview have been quick to use his name as a generic term to describe their wines.(Bibliography* The Art of Glass, wherein are shown the wayes to make and colour Glass, Pastes, Enamels, Lakes, and other Curiosities. Written in Italian by Antonio Neri, and translated into English, with some observations on the author. Printed by Octavian Pulleyn, at the Sign of the Rose in St. Pauls Church-yard, London, 1662.* Pinax Rerum Naturalium Britannicarum, continens Vegetabilia, Animalia, et Fossilia. Londini : Impensis Cave Pulleyn ad insigne Rosae in Coemeterio Divi Pauli, typis F. & T. Warren, 1666.The following papers ascribed to Merret were published in the Philosophical Transactions of the Royal Society, although the last two were published in the year of his death and attributed to Mr. Merret, Surveyor of the Port of Boston, which may have been his son Christopher.* Observations concerning the uniting of barks of trees cut, to the tree itself. Phil. Trans. R. Soc. Lond. II, 453454 (abridged version, III, 706).* An experiment on Aloe Americana serrati-folia weighed; seeming to import a circulation of the sappe in plants. Phil. Trans. R. Soc. Lond. II, 455457 (abridged version, II, 645646).* An experiment of making cherry-trees, that have withered fruit, to bear full and good fruit; and recovering the almost withered fruit. Phil. Trans. R. Soc. Lond. II, 455 (abridged version, II, 652)* A relation of the tinn-mines, and working of tinn in the county of Cornwal. Phil. Trans. R. Soc. Lond. XII, 949952.* The art of refining. Phil. Trans. R. Soc. Lond. XII, 10461052.* A description of several kinds of granaries, as those of London, of Dantzick, and in Muscovy. Phil. Trans. R. Soc. Lond. II, 464467.* An account of several observables in Lincolnshire, not taken notice of in Camden, or any other author. Phil. Trans. R. Soc. Lond. XIX, 343353 (abridged version, III, 533).* A table of the washes in Lincolnshire. Phil. Trans. R. Soc. Lond. XIX, 392 (abridged version, II, 267).ReferencesFurther reading* Dodds, C. (1954) Christopher Merrett, F.R.C.P. (1614-1695), First Harveian Librarian Proc R Soc Med. 1954 December; 47(12): 10531056. Old but detailed account of Merrets time at the RCP.External links* MerrettMerrett
